
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26873 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  20 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Delivers Report at Education Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Delivers Report at Education Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2506204194 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1440 
GMT 20 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2506204194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report delivered by Premier Li Peng at the national </F>
education conference on 14 June 1994: "Get Mobilized and Work 
Hard To Implement the `Outline of China's Education Reform and 
Development'"] 
  [Text] Comrades: 
  This is the second national education conference held by the 
party Central Committee and the State Council since the 
beginning of reform and opening up. It is also an important 
conference in the history of our country's development of 
education. The holding of this conference is bound to have a 
major impact on our efforts to plan and mobilize in an 
all-around way the implementation of the "Outline of China's 
Education Reform and Development," to study and resolve major 
issues in China's education reform and development, to realize 
the strategic goal of education reform and development in the 
nineties, and to promote China's socialist modernization. 
  General Secretary Jiang Zemin has just given an important 
speech. I hope everyone has an in-depth grasp of it and 
earnestly implements what has been said. I will now give my 
view on several specific points of the nation's education work. 
<H5>  1. The Current Situation and Task of Education </H5>
  At present, China's reform, opening up, and socialist 
modernization have entered a new period of development. To 
achieve the second-step strategic goal in the nineties, we must 
uphold the party's basic line, deepen reform, open the country 
wider to the outside world, and concentrate our energy on 
promoting economic construction. While strengthening the 
building of material civilization, we must earnestly strengthen 
the building of socialist democracy and the legal system and the 
building of spiritual civilization to promote all-around social 
progress. Fundamentally speaking, economic construction and 
social progress must rely on science and technology, and 
education. To meet the needs of establishing a socialist market 
economic structure and to take on the development opportunities 
and challenges in the 21st century, we must further deepen 
educational reform, accelerate educational development, raise 
the quality of the whole nation, and train cross-century 
personnel for realizing our strategic objective of economic and 
social development. This is an urgent task confronting us. 
  Since the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's thinking of valuing 
education and respecting knowledge and talent, the entire party 
and society have greatly raised their understanding of 
education. Major achievements have since been made in 
education. For the country as a whole, the nine-year compulsory 
education has advanced in an all-around way. Primary education 
has become basically universal, with 98 percent of school-age 
children enrolling in elementary school. Compulsory education 
has become basically universal in large cities and some 
economically developed areas. Vocational education has also 
developed rapidly, with student enrollment at secondary 
vocational and technical school accounting for 50 percent of the 
total number of senior-high-school-age students. Outstanding 
achievement has been made in adult education, with a large 
number of workers taking part in on-the-job training and a vast 
number of peasants accepting different types of literacy and 
technical education. Notable progress has been made in 
eliminating illiteracy, with the illiteracy rate among young and 
middle-aged people dropping to around 7 percent. Higher 
education has also seen great progress, with 4.39 million 
students enrolled in regular and special undergraduate programs 
at regular or adult institutions of higher learning, 89,000 
students pursuing master degrees, and 1,800 students enrolled 
for doctor's degree. In addition, a large number of students 
were sent abroad, and many have returned after completing study 
there. Institutions of higher learning have become China's 
important research venues of basic science, high technology, and 
applied science. Education, science and technology, and the 
economy have become increasingly integrated, complementing each 
other to the benefit of every one. Many localities have laid 
down the policy of "revitalizing the province or city through 
science and technology" and have brought forward a large number 
of advanced areas and units in reforming and developing 
education. Vast numbers of teachers, education workers, and 
people from all walks of life have made important contributions 
to developing education. 
  We must soberly realize that the development of our 
country's 
education still cannot meet the needs of modernization and that 
education reform still has a long way to go to meet the demands 
for establishing a socialist market economic structure. To 
varying degrees, phenomena of neglecting education, particularly 
basic education, still exist in some localities and departments. 
They lack a sense of urgency toward education reform and have 
failed to fully place education in a strategic position for 
priority development in practical work. They have not done 
enough to improve school facilities and teachers' remuneration, 
and there remains much difficulty and quite a few problems in 
this respect. The question of school dropouts is fairly 
prominent among elementary and middle school students in a 
number of localities. Party committees and government must pay 
greater attention to it and earnestly study and resolve it in 
practical work. 
  Education has been an important component and a strategic 
key aspect of China's modernization drive. In his report to the 
14th CPC National Congress, Comrade Jiang Zemin pointed out: "We 
must place education in a strategic position for priority 
development and make great efforts to enhance the entire 
nation's ideological, moral, scientific, and cultural levels -- 
a basic master plan in modernizing China." A faster and better 
development of our educational undertakings will have a direct 
impact on the smooth realization of the strategic objectives of 
China's modernization programs. The "Outline of China's 
Education Reform and Development" published by the party's 
central committee and the State Council is a programmatic 
document for developing China's educational undertakings. To 
achieve the developmental goals set by the "outline," it is 
essential to do the following tasks well: 
  To basically popularize the nine-year compulsory 
education and largely eliminate illiteracy among the young and 
middle-aged by the end of the century. These will be basic 
requirements in enhancing the quality of the whole nation and "a 
priority among priorities" in China's educational development 
for a certain period ahead. We should strive to popularize the 
nine-year compulsory education in regions inhabited by 
approximately 85 percent of the population by the end of the 
century, raising the literacy rate among the young and the 
middle-aged to about 95 percent. We may have difficulties in 
achieving these goals in the rural areas, particularly the 
remote frontiers and poor areas that make up about 20 percent of 
our population. For the vast rural areas, it is necessary to 
take local conditions into consideration before adopting a 
unified educational approach characterized by the integration of 
agriculture, science, and education. We should link up 
popularization of the nine-year compulsory education, 
eradication of illiteracy among the young and the middle-aged, 
and vocational and technical education; make them a fundamental 
measure in shaking off poverty and achieving prosperity; and 
draw up plans to be carried out in phases. We should attach 
importance to minority nationalities' educational undertakings 
by stepping up educational support for remote frontiers, poor 
areas, and minority nationality regions; to developing preschool 
education; to solving problems of sending girls to school; and 
to developing special education. Funds raised through the "Hope 
Project" -- a beneficial social involvement in education -- 
should be primarily used for keeping poor students in school. 
  Vigorously develop vocational and adult education. 
Vigorous development of vocational and adult education -- an 
important component of modern education -- will be a sure way to 
enhance labor equality and revitalize the economy, the 
importance of which has been proved by both the experiences of 
economically developed countries and that of China all these 
years. Currently, the overall quality of staff and workers in 
China has yet to meet the requirements of the modernization 
drive. It is essential to improve various types of vocational 
and adult schools by conducting more multilevel vocational 
training courses so new urban and rural workers will be able to 
receive the necessary vocational training and the vast working 
personnel be able to enhance their overall cultural quality, 
trade skills, and professional ethics. We should attach greater 
importance to education via television -- a highly efficient 
teaching means with low investment -- with emphasis on improving 
production of teaching materials. Other forms of education that 
also deserve our attention and support include correspondence 
courses, off-duty improvement classes, independent studies, and 
advanced in-service education. 
  Develop higher education with emphasis on enhancing 
educational quality and efficiency. Institutions of higher 
learning are important forces in training highly qualified 
professionals and in developing new and high technologies. 
Higher education should be developed along the route of reform 
and connotation with appropriate size and rational structure to 
ensure marked improvement in both quality and efficiency. For a 
certain period ahead, both highly specialized education and 
higher vocational training will be expanded appropriately with 
emphasis on training qualified personnel needed by the vast 
rural areas, small and medium-sized enterprises, and village and 
town enterprises. Undergraduate education should focus on 
raising educational quality. "Project 211," a key state project 
under which about 100 major institutions of higher learning and 
key research centers will be constructed in facing the 21st 
century, will be carried out in phases. Its implementation will 
help promote higher education reform and joint education 
management in various forms, rationalize distribution and 
structure of higher education, and raise education efficiency 
and quality. We should bring out the superiority of scientific 
research better by linking it to enterprises and by promoting 
industrialization of scientific research achievements, 
particularly in the development of high and new technological 
industries. 
  We should actively carry out international academic 
exchanges and cooperation. Candidates for master's and 
doctorate degrees should be trained basically at home. 
Meanwhile, we should further improve the work of sending 
students to study abroad. We should continue to implement the 
policy of "supporting students studying overseas, encouraging 
them to return, and letting them decide for themselves whether 
to come or go," encouraging them to serve the motherland in 
various ways. 
<H5>  2. Deepen Educational Reform in an All-Around Way To Promote </H5>
the Development of Education 
  The establishment of the socialist market economic structure 
has created an opportunity and motive force for educational 
reform and development, but at the same time it also calls for 
accelerating the pace of educational reform and the integration 
of education with economic development to gradually build a 
socialist educational system with Chinese characteristics. In 
education, China's basic national condition as a developing 
country calls for the promotion of comprehensive education. 
Therefore, under the premise that the government plays the 
central role in running schools, we should encourage all walks 
of life to pool their efforts to expand education. Meanwhile, 
we should improve the quality and efficiency of education 
through reform. In accelerating the pace of educational reform, 
it is necessary to pay particular attention to work in the 
following fields: 
  Readjust the education structure by giving priority to 
raising the quality of laborers and to vigorously developing 
vocational education. Judging from China's current level 
of social productive forces, we should base our education 
structure on nine-year compulsory education while energetically 
developing primary and secondary vocational education and adult 
education, appropriately developing higher specialized education 
and higher vocational education, and striving to raise the 
quality and level of students of schools of higher learning. In 
recent years, people's understanding of vocational school has 
been conspicuously enhanced; however, vocational education has 
not yet received due attention in actual work. We must overcome 
the outdated concept that belittles vocational education. We 
must clearly understand that for a long period of time, an 
important and urgent task of education in China is to vigorously 
develop vocational education on the basis of popularizing 
nine-year compulsory education. This is a fundamental method of 
training a large number of applied personnel, a method which 
conforms to the national conditions in China. Governments at 
all levels should utilize local resources and industrial 
advantages in running various types of vocational schools or 
training centers in the light of local conditions. Based on the 
demands for primary and secondary skilled personnel and on the 
degree to which basic education is popularized, we should 
promote vocational education at three separate levels, namely, 
post-primary, post-junior middle, and post-senior middle school 
vocational education. Post-primary school vocational education 
should be promoted mainly in areas where nine-year compulsory 
education has not been popularized yet and where primary 
vocational education is in demand. In some areas where 
nine-year compulsory education has been popularized, suitable 
courses of vocational education may be added to school curricula 
as deemed necessary. Post-junior middle school vocational 
education should be the centerpiece of vocational education. We 
must ensure step by step that 50 to 70 percent of junior middle 
school graduates enter secondary vocational schools or 
vocational training centers. Post-senior middle school 
vocational education should be provided for senior middle school 
graduates, except for those entering schools of higher learning. 
We must see to it that senior middle school graduates 
incrementally receive various types of vocational training or 
enter higher vocational schools. Based on individual 
aspirations, qualifications, and potentials, graduates having 
received vocational education should be allowed to pursue 
advanced education at higher levels. Through the aforesaid 
readjustment of structure, we should gradually set up a 
rationally proportionate educational system under which primary, 
secondary, and higher general and vocational education all 
develop side by side and are linked with each other. We should 
standardize vocational education enrollment to eliminate 
confusion arising among senior and junior middle school 
graduates' overlapping applications to various vocational 
schools, thereby raising the quality of education. We should 
introduce to the whole society a system of placing equal stress 
on both school diplomas and vocational certificates. The State 
Education Commission and local education administrative 
departments are responsible for making overall planning, 
coordination, and management of vocational education and adult 
education. Vocational and adult schools of all types and at all 
levels, which offer formal education, should in principle be 
managed by education departments at all levels. On-the-job 
training should in principle be managed by labor and personnel 
departments and relevant professional departments. Vocational 
schools should be aimed at training mainly skilled laborers of 
various trades and professions, as well as technical and 
managerial personnel in demand by society. At present, 
particular attention must be paid to training fiscal and 
taxation, banking, business administration, and other applied 
personnel urgently needed for the development of a socialist 
market economy. We must legislate on-the-job training in 
enterprises. Newly recruited workers must first complete 
training and obtain a certificate of qualification before 
assuming a job. 
  Reform the system for running schools. In the 
past, the system under which all schools were run by the 
government did play a positive role under the historical 
conditions then. Now, that system can no longer meet the needs 
of development of a socialist market economy and the increasing 
needs of the society, nor can it help arouse the enthusiasm of 
various sectors of the society for running schools. In recent 
years, the practice of the government running all schools has 
begun to change. From now on, we should deepen such reform and 
establish step by step a system for running schools, under which 
most schools are run by the government while some schools are 
run with funds raised by various sectors of the society. While 
basic education, particularly compulsory education, should be 
run mainly by the government, we should encourage enterprises, 
institutions and others of the society to run schools in various 
forms according to law and government policy. In some 
localities where conditions permit, schools may be run in such 
forms as "private school receiving government assistance" and 
"public school receiving nongovernmental assistance." 
Vocational education and adult education should be under 
government control, but run mainly by trades and professions, 
enterprises, institutions, and mass organizations, or run by 
certain sectors of the society or private citizens with 
appropriate government assistance. Vocational schools should 
take the road of integrating education with industry to enhance 
their ability of developing themselves. In higher education, we 
should practice the system under which schools are run by both 
the government and various sectors of the society, with the 
government playing the dominant role. Certain universities and 
colleges may be funded mainly with income from students' 
tuitions and with funds raised by the society, and subsidized by 
the government. The schools run by various sectors of the 
society should mainly be vocational schools. The primary and 
middle schools currently run by enterprises should continue to 
be run well. In localities where conditions permit, 
enterprise-run schools may be gradually turned over to local 
society under government's overall arrangements. Organizations 
and individuals outside China are welcome to donate funds to run 
schools in China, either alone or in cooperation with others, in 
accordance with China's law and education regulations. 
  Reform the system of educational management. It 
is necessary to straighten out the relations among the 
government, the society, and schools and establish a scientific 
school management system according to the characteristics of 
schools of various categories and levels. Since 1985, basic 
education has been put in the charge of local governments at 
various levels. The orientation of such a reform is correct, 
because it has added more responsibility to local governments 
and aroused the enthusiasm of various sectors of the society for 
running schools. However, in some localities, the 
responsibility for managing rural basic education has been 
assigned to townships and villages, causing certain difficulties 
in funding and in educational management. This is one of the 
reasons why the wages of some rural primary and middle school 
teachers were in arrears in last two years. We should take a 
further step to clarify the responsibility of the central, 
provincial, prefectural, county, and township governments in 
managing basic education; and properly readjust the 
responsibility at the county and township levels. The 
management of rural basic education is mainly a county-level 
responsibility in most localities, except a few economically 
more developed regions where counties and townships may share 
the responsibility. In poor regions where school funds cannot 
be guaranteed, education funds should be placed under overall 
management by county-level governments; and governments above 
the county-level should set up special funds to support 
compulsory education in these regions. In the reform of the 
education management system, the difficult part and the 
important part are in higher education. The existing higher 
education management system was basically arranged in the early 
fifties when the disciplines of colleges were readjusted 
according to major regions and trades and professions. Later, a 
number of universities and colleges were set up by various 
provinces to meet the needs of the local economy; and a 
considerable number of them are of the same nature as those run 
by central ministries and commissions. With the change of 
functional duties of various departments, the system for 
departments to run schools should be changed gradually. From 
now on, higher education should gradually be shifted onto a 
two-level management system -- the central level and the 
provincial (autonomous regional and municipal) level -- with the 
provincial-level playing the dominant role. 
  Universities 
and colleges under central ministries and commissions should 
expand their areas of service and discipline, broaden the 
channel of financial resources, gear themselves to the needs of 
the society, and operate independently. While central 
departments in charge of various trades should continue to run 
well a small number of universities and colleges which have 
distinct features of trades and meet special needs, most schools 
of higher learning run by central ministries and commissions 
should gradually be turned over to provincial-level governments 
or be run jointly in various ways by the central departments and 
provincial-level governments. Provincial-level governments 
should be given more responsibility for coordinating and leading 
the institutions of higher learning in the region and for making 
overall arrangements for them. It is necessary to remove the 
barriers between regions and government departments, change the 
"small but all-embracing" situation, and reduce 
single-discipline schools step by step. It is necessary to 
readjust or merge some schools, departments, courses, and 
disciplines and to promote cooperation among them. It is 
necessary to fully tap the potential of existing faculty and 
equipment and to improve educational quality and benefits. The 
educational reform, which involves a wide range of issues, 
should be carried out step by step after conducting experiments 
at selected localities and schools and after summing up 
experience. We must not be aroused to precipitate action, nor 
practice formalism. The number of institutions of higher 
learning should not increase. Instead, we should concentrate 
manpower, financial, and material resources on running existing 
universities well. We should deepen reform of internal 
management of universities and colleges and enhance the vitality 
of school management. It is necessary to make rational 
readjustment of departments, disciplines, and courses; widen the 
areas of specialized knowledge; and gradually introduce the 
"credit system." Besides required courses, it is necessary to 
set up and increase electives so as to broaden students' vision, 
arouse their initiative and creativity in study, and enhance 
their ability of engaging in social practice and conducting 
further study and research. 
  Reform the systems for student enrollment, tuition and 
fees collection, and placement of graduates of regular 
universities, colleges and secondary and higher vocational 
schools. Universities, colleges, secondary vocational 
schools, and skilled workers schools are currently practicing 
the student enrollment system which takes into account both 
national tasks and regulatory plans. After the labor market 
gradually becomes perfect and the system of paying tuition to 
attend school is implemented across the country, the major tasks 
of the government's education department will be to regulate and 
control the total number and the composition of enrolled 
students, manage well school diplomas, take part in the drawing 
up education budgets, supervise the use of education funds, 
supervise education quality, and supervise the implementation of 
administrative regulations of education. Regular higher 
education, regular senior middle school education, and secondary 
and higher vocational education are noncompulsory education. It 
is a general practice in many countries to pay tuition for these 
levels of education. Some of our schools have also adopted the 
practice on a trial basis and achieved quite good results; and 
the practice has gradually been accepted by society. While 
schools should collect tuition and fees in proportion to the 
costs of education, they should also consider the endurance of 
the society and parents. The system of collecting tuition and 
fees should be supplemented by relevant auxiliary measures. 
Tuition and fees are collected mainly for the purpose of 
changing the operational mechanisms and enhancing students' 
studiousness, not for reducing government's education funding. 
Student loans may be extended to more students with financial 
difficulties. Scholarships should be awarded to students who 
excel in both moral and academic performance; and the total 
number of scholarships may be smaller, but the amount of each 
scholarship should be bigger. Departments, localities, or 
organizations which need graduates to fill job vacancies may 
fund scholarships for certain students. However, a school 
should not lower enrollment standards for the scholarship 
recipients; and after graduation, the scholarship recipients 
must go to work for the department, locality, or organization 
according to contract. The government will practice a 
preferential policy on certain disciplines which meet special 
needs of the country. During the trial period of the tuition 
payment system, "the new system applies to new students only, 
while old students are still subject to the old system." After 
conditions are ripe, most graduates will select jobs by 
themselves under the guidance of government policy, while only a 
small number of them will be placed according to contract. The 
reform plan should be carefully formulated. It is necessary to 
improve propaganda and ideological and political work and handle 
properly the relationship between reform, development, and 
stability. 
<H5>  3. Strengthen and Improve the Moral Education in School and </H5>
Strive To Improve the Education Quality 
  The education quality is the vitality for the development of 
education. Schools of various categories and levels should 
seriously implement the policy that "education must serve 
socialist modernization, integrate with productive labor, and 
cultivate builders and successors who develop morally, 
intellectually and physically," and put the work of improving 
education quality in a prominent position. 
  In implementing the principles of education and raising 
the quality of education, we must attach great importance to 
moral education. At present, the ideological tendency among 
young students at large is generally good, positive, and 
forward-looking. The majority of students link their individual 
destiny with China's development, and study hard for the 
socialist modernization drive. However, a new "theory on the 
uselessness of schooling," money-worship, and other erroneous 
ideas have also emerged and caused harmful effects among young 
students. Faced with the new situation and new requirements, we 
must effectively strengthen party leadership, reinforce and 
improve moral education in schools, and strive to explore new 
ideas for improving moral education under the new situation. We 
must use simple and easy-to-understand terms to explain to 
students the Marxist theory; to conduct education on Mao Zedong 
Thought, especially Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics; to conduct ideological 
education on patriotism, collectivism, and socialism; to conduct 
education on Chinese history, especially modern and contemporary 
history, and on national conditions; and to conduct education on 
traditional Chinese virtues, revolutionary traditions, and the 
legal system. We must teach students to foster a scientific 
world outlook, a correct outlook on life, noble morality and 
sentiments, and the spirit of national pride, confidence, and 
self-improvement. We must help students build up their 
capability to resist the exploiting class' decadent ideas and 
life style so that the traditional virtues of the Chinese nation 
and glorious revolutionary traditions will be carried forward by 
the younger generation in conjunction with the spirit of the 
times. Moral education should be conducted in accordance with 
the demand of the development of the situation and with the 
special features in various stages of students' physical and 
mental development. Moral education for junior middle and 
primary school students should be focused on civility and 
decorum, observance of law and discipline, civic duties, and 
basic mores. Senior middle school and college students should 
be given brief lectures on the basic views of Marxism, and 
should study Comrade Mao Zedong's important philosophical works 
and Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics. We should reinforce aesthetic 
education (including music, art, and craft) among junior middle 
and primary school students, because it is of great importance 
for comprehensively raising students' quality, exerting a 
favorable influence on students' temperament, and training 
talented people who develop in an all-around manner. Leading 
cadres at all levels should visit schools regularly to conduct 
investigation and study, attend discussions with teachers and 
students, listen to their opinions, give reports on the 
situation, and conduct vivid and practical education on national 
conditions. The whole society should show concern and should 
protect the healthy development of the young. Teachers and 
educators should display the spirit of dedication and be the 
role models for students. 
  We must make a determined effort to correct the tendency of 
studying for the sake of passing examinations, which has existed 
over a long period of time. Due to this unhealthy tendency, 
schools and students neglect moral and physical education, are 
divorced from reality and society, and fail to comprehensively 
raise their quality while blindly studying for the sake of 
passing examinations. This problem, if not earnestly resolved, 
will inevitably harm the younger generation and cause serious 
consequences. We must boldly absorb and draw on the advanced 
educational methods of the contemporary world, earnestly 
summarize China's successful experiences in education, and 
resolutely jettison outdated educational programs and methods 
that are incompatible with modern education. We must try hard 
to overcome the dislocation between education and the practice 
of society and production, and teach students to foster an 
enterprising spirit and creativity as well as a healthy 
mentality to cope with the demand of society. We must improve 
teaching materials, reform and perfect examination methods and 
systems, and effectively lighten the excessive curricular 
burdens on middle and primary school students so that the 
younger generation can develop in an all-around manner and grow 
to maturity. 
<H5>  4. Party Committees and Governments at All Levels Should </H5>
Further Strengthen Their Leadership Over Educational Work and 
Strive To Do Solid Work To Expand Education 
  Strengthening party and government leadership over 
educational work is the basic guarantee for making education a 
strategic priority of development. Since the implementation of 
reform and opening up, party committees and governments at all 
levels have attached much greater importance to education. 
However, we must notice that negligence of education continues 
to exist in some localities and departments. Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping incisively pointed out: "A leader who neglects 
education is an immature leader devoid of farsightedness." 
Principal responsible comrades of party committees and 
governments at all levels should apply Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
educational concept to evaluate whether their own locality or 
department has really made education a strategic priority of 
development. We must have a sense of urgency toward the goal 
put forward in the "outline." Leaders at all levels should 
proceed from local realities in strengthening overall planning 
for educational work, incorporate the development goal of 
education into the overall social development plan, and adopt 
effective measures to realize the goal. Attaching importance to 
education and doing solid work to expand education should be the 
important components for evaluating leading cadres' performance 
of responsibilities during their tenure. Governments at all 
levels should report the progress in educational development and 
reform annually to people's congresses at the corresponding 
level and accept supervision from all walks of life. 
  Governments at all levels must pay attention to solving the 
following real problems in education work: 
  Increase educational spending. Since China 
started reform and opening to the outside world, China's total 
educational spending has increased. Funding shortages, however, 
remain in the education sector, and we must improve the 
situation as quickly as possible. Party committees and 
government at all levels must embrace the idea that educational 
spending is a strategic investment, rationally adjust the 
investment structure, and give a higher priority to educational 
needs in drafting the budget, and see to it that the "three 
increases" [increases in teachers' salaries, the amount of 
public funds for each student, and financial allocations from 
the central and local governments] as contained in the "outline" 
are truly materialized. 
  State allocations, which make up the main source of 
educational funds, must be guaranteed. The "outline" suggests 
that the proportion of state allocations for educational funds 
in the gross national product should be increased to 4 percent 
of the latter by the end of the this century and that the 
relevant departments of the State Council should formulate 
corresponding policies and measures as they work in earnest to 
achieve this goal. As for the proportion of educational funds 
in financial expenditures at all levels, the Finance Ministry 
and the education commission should quickly set, on the basis of 
the reformed financial calculation formula, the ratio of central 
and provincial allocations and ensure a relatively big increase 
in real financial spending. 
  As for educational surcharges in urban and rural areas, it 
has been decided that educational surcharges for urban 
educational programs are set at 3 percent of the combined amount 
of the three types of taxes [product taxes, value-added taxes, 
and business taxes]. Procedures for collecting educational 
surcharges from village and township enterprises in rural areas 
that do not pay the three types of taxes should be implemented 
in earnest. It has been decided that 1.5 to 2 percent of the 
5-percent charge collected from farmers should be set aside as 
educational funds. The specific ratio should be set by the 
localities. Educational surcharges, which make up the main 
source of teachers' salaries, subsidies, and school expenses of 
community sponsored schools cannot be reduced or diverted to 
other purposes. Localities must establish strict and effective 
supervision and inspection systems in this regard. 
  It is primarily the responsibility of the government to 
implement compulsory education. Government at all levels must 
make solid arrangements with regard to input into education. To 
ensure implementation of compulsory education in 
poverty-stricken areas, government at the central, provincial, 
prefectural, and county levels should set up special funds for 
this purpose. Centrally financed special funds for compulsory 
education in poverty-stricken areas should be increased year by 
year. Provincial, prefectural, and county treasuries must also 
make corresponding arrangements. 
  A special fund should be set up for implementing "Project 
211." Government and relevant departments at all levels must 
make overall arrangements in this regard. The central treasury 
will set aside special money as the startup fund for this 
project, and funding will be increased year by year. Government 
and relevant departments at the provincial level must also 
implement corresponding measures. 
  The state education funds management system should be 
reformed. Educational funds should be listed separatly in the 
budget. Managerial powers over education and financial powers 
should be integrated. Budgets for educational outlay should be 
formulated by educational department at all levels, incorporated 
into government budgets at the corresponding level, and put into 
effect after they are approved. Beginning from this year, the 
State Statistics Bureau and the State Education Commission will 
compile and publish statistics of spending on education. 
  Further efforts should be made to fine-tune the system of 
raising educational funds through a multiple of channels. In 
light of the new situation in the reform of financial and 
taxation systems and the specific needs of localities, 
governments of the provinces, autonomous regions, and 
municipalities directly under the central government are allowed 
to collect local taxes exclusively for educational funds. 
Standards for miscellaneous fees for compulsory education and 
tuition charges for noncompulsory education should be adjusted 
in a timely fashion, taking into consideration the extent to 
which the public can afford such fees. Schools of all 
categories are banned from the indiscriminate collection of fees 
under one excuse or another. The state encourages schools to 
run work-study programs or operate school-run industries. A 
preferential tax policy will be continued for school-run 
industries, including those run by vocational schools of all 
kinds. We should continue encouraging industrial and mining 
enterprises, social organizations, and individuals at home or 
abroad to contribute funds for schools. Villages are also 
encouraged to raise funds for running schools. Renovating 
dangerous school buildings and construction of new ones should 
be incorporated into government plans for capital construction. 
Authority for approving fund raising for rural schools resides 
with the county level, and the funds raised should be used 
primarily on renovations and construction of school buildings. 
The indiscriminate raising of educational funds outside the 
aforementioned scope is strictly prohibited. Public-sector 
organizations are also banned from collecting illegal donations 
from schools. 
  Improve the competence of the ranks of teachers and 
raise the teacher's material benefits. Building up a 
contingent of teachers who are professionally competent and 
ideologically and morally sound is crucial to the development of 
educational undertakings. One of the fundamental starting 
points of China's education policy is to rely on and fully 
utilize the initiative and creativity of teachers. Since China 
started reform and opening to the outside world, the party and 
government has upheld the policy of respecting education and 
teachers and made great headway in building up the ranks of 
teachers and in continuously improving their social status and 
material benefits. Progress has been, however, insufficient in 
many areas. We must now take effective steps to implement the 
following practical tasks in earnest: 
  We should strive to improve the quality of teachers. Earnest 
efforts should be made to make a success of teachers' schools of 
all kinds and encourage outstanding students to apply for 
admission to teachers' colleges. Graduates of teachers' schools 
should willingly dedicate themselves to education. Teachers' 
training should be carried out in a well-planned way to raise 
teachers' ideological and political quality and professional 
level. 
  Teachers' pay should be raised in accordance with the law. 
The "Teachers Law" provides that the average wages of teachers 
shall be equal to or higher than those of government employees. 
Personnel, financial, and education departments at all levels 
must formulate effective measures to implement this provision in 
earnest. Effective mechanisms should be introduced to put to an 
end to the arrears in teacher's salary payments. Infringements 
on teachers' legitimate rights and interests and diversion of 
educational funds should be investigated to determine 
culpability. 
  It is necessary to improve housing for teachers. 
Construction 
of urban teachers' quarters should be incorporated into the 
overall urban development plans. We should implement a 
preferential policy for teachers so that families of teachers 
and other school employees in cities will have houses of a size 
equivalent to the average size of urban residents' homes. 
  Practical steps should be taken to solve problems in regard 
to medical services for teachers, especially teachers in rural 
areas. Medical benefits for teachers should be equivalent to 
those of local government employees. 
  Efforts must be made to properly solve problems of 
locally-run school teachers. Teachers of middle and primary 
schools run by local people in the Chinese countryside have made 
important contributions to developing education in rural areas. 
Governments of all localities should adopt effective measures 
to raise the remuneration of locally-run school teachers to 
gradually ensure that they receive the same pay for the same 
work as teachers of publicly-run schools. Qualified teachers of 
locally-run schools should be evaluated and transferred to 
publicly-run schools; and those who are not qualified should be 
reshuffled. Departments concerned should work out plans and 
implement them on a yearly basis, striving to basically solve 
problems of locally-run school teachers within the next six or 
seven years. Teachers must be employed on the basis of their 
qualifications and the authorized number of teachers, which must 
not be increased in the name of substitute teachers or other 
pretexts. 
  We should energetically commend and reward outstanding 
teachers. Governments at all levels must commend and reward 
outstanding teachers so that teachers and educators who perform 
meritorious deeds in education shall receive due spiritual and 
material rewards. We should continue to adopt various measures 
to foster a prevailing social atmosphere of respecting teachers 
and valuing education. We should improve the work related to 
retired teachers and administrators. 
  Strengthen the construction of the education legal 
system. The establishment and improvement of socialist 
market economic structure requires the guarantee of a complete 
legal system, while the realization of the goal of educational 
development and reform hinges upon an adequate legal system. 
Since the implementation of reform and opening up, China has 
successively promulgated the "Regulations on Academic Degrees," 
the "Law on Compulsory Education," the "Law on Teachers," and 
other major laws and administrative rules. In the future, we 
should speed up the pace of education legislation and formulate, 
as soon as possible, the "Law on Education" the "Law on 
Vocational Education," the "Law on Higher Education," and 
supplementary rules and regulations for the "Law on Teachers." 
All local governments should also draw up and improve local 
education laws and statutes so as to incrementally set up a 
system of education laws and regulations suitable for China's 
national conditions. Local governments at all levels should 
take the lead in enforcing the laws, while people's congresses 
at various levels should step up the inspection and supervision 
of law enforcement. 
  Comrades! 
  Realizing the goal and tasks set out in the "Outline Program 
for the Reform and Development of Education in China" is a 
glorious and yet arduous mission. Under the guidance of Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line, let us rally closely 
around the party Central Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin as 
the core, work hard, make no empty talk, do more solid work, and 
unswervingly implement the "outline," striving to push the 
reform and development of Chinese education to a new stage and 
making greater contributions to the socialist modernization 
drive! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26874 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tian Jiyun Stresses 5 Principles of Coexistence </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tian Jiyun Stresses 5 Principles of Coexistence </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706192394 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1031 
GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706192394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpt] Beijing, 23 Jun (XINHUA) -- The Foreign Affairs 
Committee of the National People's Congress [NPC] sponsored a 
forum at the Great Hall of the People this morning to mark the 
40th anniversary of the promulgation of the five principles of 
peaceful coexistence. Vice Chairman Tian Jiyun spoke at the 
forum. 
  Tian Jiyun said: The five principles of peaceful coexistence 
were first formulated by China and later advocated by China, 
India, and Burma. These principles represented the common 
aspirations of the newly independent nations and their peoples. 
Over the past 40 years, the five principles have been accepted 
by more and more countries and have played an important role in 
maintaining world peace. Exactly as Comrade Deng Xiaoping 
pointed out: "Reviewing the practice of international relations, 
the five principles of peaceful coexistence proved to have the 
greatest vitality." 
  Tian Jiyun pointed out: The five principles of peaceful 
coexistence are of immediate guiding significance in 
establishing a new international political and economic order. 
The five principles represent a summarization of the most 
fundamental norms of international relations, conform to the 
purpose of the principles of the United Nations Charter, 
illustrate the fundamental characteristics of a new-type of 
international relations. They should be the basis for the 
establishment of a fair and reasonable new international order. 
  He said: Nowadays, some nations flaunt the banner of human 
rights and democracy and use them as a major tool of foreign 
policy to exert pressure on other nations in an attempt to 
impose their will on them. Historical experience told us that 
no matter what banner they flaunt, so long as they pursue such 
practices as the big bullying the small, the strong insulting 
the weak, and the rich suppressing the poor, they will never win 
people's hearts, and they will be condemned and opposed by 
people around the world, and they are doomed to fail in their 
attempt. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26875 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Huang Ju Addresses Education Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Huang Ju Addresses Education Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806043494 Shanghai WEN HUI BAO in Chinese 16 Jun 94 pp 1, 
3 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806043494 </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai WEN HUI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Speaking at a National Education </F>
Conference, Huang Ju Stresses the Need To Seize the Opportunity 
To Deepen Reform and Build a First-Class City and Develop 
First-Class Education"] 
  [Text] Shanghai Mayor Huang Ju, who is attending the 
national education conference, addressed the conference on 15 
June. He said: The aim of the national education conference, 
convened by the party Central Committee and the State Council in 
the new situation of establishing a socialist market economic 
structure, is to mobilize the whole party and all sectors of 
society to implement the "Outline for the Reform and Development 
of Education in China" so as to accelerate the realization of 
China's grand objective of economic and social development in 
the nineties. The current conference will have a profound and 
far-reaching impact on the development of China's education and 
economy. The reports of foresight, made by the leading central 
comrades at the conference, have widened our horizons and 
instilled new ideas in us. We express our total support. 
  Expounding on Shanghai's understanding of the strategic 
position of education, Mayor Huang Ju said: The sustained, 
rapid, and healthy development of the economy in Shanghai in the 
nineties has been, to a large extent, due to the importance it 
attached to education in the eighties. In recent years, 
Shanghai has become the favorite investment hot spot of domestic 
and foreign businesses. In particular, it has attracted many 
world-renowned transnational corporations. This is also mainly 
due to the unique advantage that in Shanghai the quality of 
workers is good, trained personnel are fairly concentrated, and 
education is developed. Practice has shown that an advantage in 
trained personnel constitutes the most important advantage in 
the investment environment. We can truly say that "today's 
education will become the science and technology of tomorrow, 
and the economy of the day after tomorrow." It is precisely 
from these historical experiences that we have learned that it 
is necessary to establish Shanghai's strategic position in 
education, which means the overall leading position in basic 
industries. More importantly, Shanghai, which is marching 
toward the 21st century, must have first-class education to 
match a first-class city. Shanghai belongs to the whole 
country. In establishing Shanghai's reform and education goals, 
we must also embody the strategic idea that Shanghai "serves the 
whole country and is geared to the whole world." It is 
Shanghai's bounden duty and obligation to train tens of 
thousands of high-caliber and high-quality personnel for the 
Chang Jiang basin and for various areas of the country. As an 
international metropolis, Shanghai should open up more channels 
of international cooperation in education, and become one of 
China's showcases with education geared to the world. 
  Huang Ju said: In the past few years, Shanghai, like the 
rest of the country, has made marked progress in education but 
many problems still remain. The major ones are the following 
four contradictions: the contradiction between educational 
supply and the demand for trained personnel by large-scale 
economic and social development; the contradiction between the 
traditional educational system and Shanghai's lead in 
establishing a socialist market economic operating mechanism; 
the contradiction between the existing structure and 
distribution of education on the one hand, and readjustment of 
urban functions on the other; and the contradiction between 
educational barriers between regions and departments on the one 
hand, and the pattern of all-encompassing opening to the outside 
world on the other. To solve these contradictions, we must 
emancipate our minds, seek truth from facts, actively explore 
new ways, and deepen reform. 
  He discussed five aspects of Shanghai's practices and 
exploration in educational reform and development. 
  1. Promote high-standard basic education with a view to 
enhancing the quality of the whole nation. First, while mainly 
depending on government appropriations, Shanghai has ensured a 
steady source and increased the revenues for nine-year 
compulsory education. In the "Measures for Implementing the 
`Law of the People's Republic of China on Compulsory Education' 
in Shanghai," promulgated in 1993, it is stipulated that 
financial appropriations for compulsory education must be 
increased in two ways and that public expenses should be 
adjusted yearly according to changes in the prices of 
commodities. In addition, the measures also urge society to 
increase investment in education. Meanwhile, to strengthen the 
training of more teachers for elementary and middle schools and 
comprehensively upgrade the quality of teachers, we drew up the 
"Provisions for Elementary and Middle School Studies in 
Shanghai" to institutionalize the system for in-service teachers 
to continue their education, and to upgrade the educational 
level of teachers of elementary and middle schools. On the 
basis of reforming the distribution system and raising work 
quality and efficiency, we gradually improved teachers' wages. 
In 1993, the average pay of elementary and middle school 
teachers in Shanghai rose by 10 percent over 1992 after allowing 
for price rises. We have also constantly pushed forward the 
reform of courses and teaching materials. At present, the 
attendance rate of school-age children and the percentage of 
graduates of elementary schools going into middle schools have 
reached 100 percent. Enforcement of nine-year compulsory 
education in the 20 districts and counties of the municipality 
has been completed. 
  2. Enhance the vitality of education by reforming the method 
of running schools and the school investment system. The 
establishment of a socialist market economic structure is bound 
to demand different ways of running schools and result in calls 
for a new system in which schools will be run predominantly by 
the state with the participation of all sectors of society. In 
the past two years, Shanghai has established over 10 middle and 
elementary schools run by private individuals or by individuals 
with the help of the state. It has also approved applications 
for the construction of privately run schools of higher 
learning. In running schools through international cooperation, 
we have established a number of international cooperative 
schools of specialized studies including accountancy, commerce 
and trade, and management. We have also promulgated two 
regulations for the management of civilian-run schools and 
schools of international cooperation. We have explored the 
reform of the education investment system and introduced various 
channels of investment in education. First, we increased 
government investment by stipulating that the annual increase in 
local education expenses must be higher than the increase in the 
gross national product by 2 to 3 percentage points, and that 
budgeted educational expenses must account for over 20 percent 
of the total local revenue; second, we raised the proportion of 
the surtax for urban educational expenses from two to three 
percent. We have also readjusted the surtax for rural education 
expenses, increasing it by 30 percent; third, we adopted 
preferential policies to support industries run by schools. 
Last year, the total profits made by industries run by schools 
were 760 million yuan; fourth, we have established a fund for 
educational development to encourage enterprises, social 
organizations, and individuals to support education. The fund 
will reach 100 million yuan by the end of this year. Through 
the efforts of all concerned, Shanghai's basic education 
expenses increased by 34 percent, and higher education expenses, 
30 percent, last year. 
  3. Optimize the allocation of educational resources through 
"joint construction, cooperative construction, merging, and 
readjustment." Limited by the past system of planned economy, 
there were barriers in Shanghai's schools, and university 
courses leaned heavily toward science and engineering. To deal 
with this contradiction, we carried out major readjustments to 
the structure of schools of higher learning: 1) we actively 
explored ways for joint construction of schools of higher 
learning between Shanghai and the central ministries and 
commissions, and both sides have signed an agreement on joint 
construction of Fudan University, Jiaotong University, and 
Shanghai Foreign Language University; 2) taking advantage of the 
"211" project, we introduced cooperation in running schools. 
The four universities were merged recently to form the new 
Shanghai University; 3) we did a good job in running schools 
through cooperation between central ministries and commissions, 
and Shanghai. The Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation will delegate the management of the Shanghai Foreign 
Trade College to Shanghai. Through this method, Shanghai's 
universities and colleges will be readjusted from around 50 to 
40, of which local universities and colleges will be readjusted 
from 21 to 14 or 15. Applying the market mechanism, and in 
conjunction with large-scale urban construction and reform, we 
also readjusted the distribution of elementary and middle 
schools, and by applying the existing educational resources, we 
have organized the implementation of the "project for training 
badly needed personnel for Shanghai in the nineties." We have 
set up 10 training centers for that purpose. We plan to train, 
in two to three years, tens of thousands of specialized 
personnel in the fields of banking, insurance, overseas 
commerce, high-grade accountancy, and foreign law, all of which 
are urgently needed by Shanghai. 
  4. Reform the student enrollment and graduate employment 
systems. Higher education should be provided mainly but not 
entirely by the government. We have over the past two years 
taken the reform of student enrollment and graduate employment 
systems as a breakthrough in advancing the reform of institutes 
of higher learning, and gradually established a system requiring 
students to pay school fees while in university and 
independently select their own jobs upon graduation. With 
regard to measures, our first was aimed at changing the 
mechanism to establish a fee system and a corresponding 
scholarship and educational loan system. Last year's statistics 
showed fee-paying students accounted for 40 percent of the total 
student enrollment at Shanghai's institutes of higher learning, 
in addition to the 10 percent who were entrusted to the 
institutes by their employers for training. This total figure 
will increase to 60 percent this year, preparing the institutes 
of higher learning for next year's abolition of the division 
between paying and nonpaying students. The second measure was 
the reform-oriented experimentation with independent student 
enrollment at eight institutes of higher learning in Shanghai, 
to give students a greater opportunity to choose their own 
school and profession, and to promote basic education's shift 
from one emphasizing examination to one emphasizing quality. 
The third measure was the breakup of the planned distribution 
system of "unified job assignment" to establish a system of 
independent job selection for most graduates; to expand rather 
considerably the recommendation authority of schools, the 
personnel selection right of employing units, and the job 
selection right of graduates; and to appropriately lift 
restrictions on personnel selection and hiring based on a 
graduate's place of origin. The municipal government will also 
set up a qualified personnel market and the "Shanghai City 
College Graduates' Employment Service Center" to provide 
information and consultation services to graduates and employing 
units. 
  5. Strengthen moral education to comprehensively improve the 
quality of education. Over recent years, the municipal party 
committee and government earnestly implemented Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's instruction that equally strong emphasis be placed on 
both spiritual and material civilizations. First, we 
incorporated school patriotic education and moral education into 
the master plan for promoting Shanghai's spiritual civilization, 
and gave them a prominent place in our work. Second, we 
strengthened organization and coordination, and mobilized the 
strength of the entire society, naming 20 municipal-level 
"youngsters' education bases" and setting up some 1,000 district 
and neighborhood youngsters' education bases to form a good 
atmosphere and environment throughout the city for patriotic 
education. Third, we attentively studied the situation and 
characteristics of opening up to the outside world and adhered 
to the principle of "emphasizing actual results and rejecting 
formalism" to carry out lively, impressive, and well-targeted 
ideological and moral education in various fields, and at 
different levels; to forge a lofty sentiment of cherishing a 
deep love for the motherland and enthusiastically seeking 
advancement; and to promote healthy and strong growth of the new 
socialist generation. In comprehensively improving the teaching 
quality, we, in addition to strengthening curriculum reform, 
emphatically carried out the experimentation and popularization 
of the credit system in institutes of higher learning. 
  Speaking of Shanghai's primary goals in implementing the 
"outline," Mayor Huang Ju said: we must, first of all, study and 
implement the guidelines of the national education conference in 
real earnest. We will ask party committees and governments at 
all levels in Shanghai, top party and government leaders in 
particular, to study the important speeches made by central 
leading comrades, especially the guidelines of making education 
a strategic priority. As they study and relay them, they should 
make comparisons and examination, unify their thinking, act in 
unison, and truly bring forth a new generation of well-educated 
and self-disciplined people with lofty ideals and moral 
integrity. Plans and goals of educational development should be 
incorporated into the overall plan for Shanghai's social and 
economic development, and educational indexes must also be 
incorporated into the system under which the leading cadres at 
various levels are held responsible for the attainment of 
specified objectives. The report on government work submitted 
annually to the people's congress is obligated to set forth 
requirements and review educational work. In evaluating the 
performance of leading cadres we should look at their 
achievements in educational work. Second, we should improve the 
ranks of teachers and see to it that teachers' wages, housing, 
and other material benefits are raised and improved. We should 
work hard to fulfill the goal of raising the average wage of 
teachers to a level that is 10 percent higher than that of 
government employees. We must, in particular, improve the 
material benefits of young and middle-aged backbone teachers. 
We should learn from Beijing's and Dalian's experiences by 
incorporating construction of teachers' quarters into the city's 
urban development plans or quarters development plans. We 
should also adopt a policy that favorably tilts towards the 
teachers in terms of pensions and medical insurance. Third, we 
should concentrate the required financial resources to ensure 
construction of key educational projects. Fourth, we should step 
up educational legislation so that education will be brought 
within the jurisdiction of law. We plan to establish a basic 
framework of educational laws by formulating 40 or so sets of 
regulations within three to five years. We must also enhance 
our awareness of law enforcement and strengthen the supervision 
mechanism. Regulations, once promulgated for implementation, 
must be strictly enforced according to law. 
  Mayor Huang Ju's speech was highly acclaimed by the 
conference participants. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26876 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Session Opens </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806095294 Beijing XINHUA in English 0947 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806095294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Three draft laws -- on 
the People's Bank of China, on auditing and on arbitration -- 
were submitted today to the Standing Committee of the National 
People's Congress for deliberation. 
  Qiao Shi, its chairman, presided over the opening ceremony 
of 
the eight-day session of the Eighth NPC Standing Committee. 
  The Draft Law on the People's Bank of China (PBC) specifies 
the authority and responsibilities of the PBC as the country's 
central bank, to pave the way for China's current financial 
reform, Zhou Zhengqing, a PBC deputy governor, said at the 
meeting. 
  The draft auditing law is intended to maintain the soundness 
of the government budget and protect the value of state 
property, said the auditor-general, Guo Zhenqian. 
  The Draft Arbitration Law provides an arbitration system, in 
line with international practice, to solve economic disputes 
better and to promote the country's economic and trade 
cooperation with other countries, said Gu Angran, director of 
the Legislative Affairs Committee of the NPC Standing Committee. 
  A deputy director of the NPC Law Committee, Li Yining, also 
submitted the revised version of the Draft Securities Law to the 
legislators for further deliberation today. 
  There were 220 items in the current draft, 50 items more 
than 
in the previous one, Li said. The "major changes" were based on 
the previous review by the lawmakers and opinion from relevant 
government agencies, localities, legal and financial experts, he 
said. 
  Three reports on the review results of the Draft Labor Law, 
the Draft Law on Urban Real Estate and the Draft Regulation on 
Punishing Copyright Violators were given to the meeting by Cai 
Cheng, Xiang Chunyi and Wang Shuwen respectively, each a deputy 
director of the NPC Law Committee. 
  The current Draft Labor Law puts more emphasis on protecting 
the legal rights of workers, according to Cai. 
  The current Draft Regulation on Punishing Copyright 
Violators 
raises the maximum penalty for them from five years in prison to 
seven years, Wang said. 
  Vice-Foreign Minister Liu Huaqiu submitted a border treaty 
with Laos to the legislature for approval. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26877 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Qiao Shi Presides </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806101494 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0902 
GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806101494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Zhang Sutang (1728 1372 1016) and Liu Siyang </F>
(0491 1835 2254)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 28 Jun (XINHUA) -- The Eighth National 
People's Congress [NPC] Standing Committee opened its eighth 
meeting at the Great Hall of the People this morning. 
  Chairman Qiao Shi presided over the meeting. 
  The meeting began by approving the current meeting's agenda 
suggested by the chairmanship conference. 
  In accordance with the agenda, Cai Cheng, Xiang Chunyi, and 
Wang Shuwen, vice chairmen of the NPC Law Committee, 
respectively made reports on the results of the Law Committee's 
examination of three draft laws, namely the Labor Law, the Law 
on Housing and Real Estate Management in Cities, and the NPC 
Standing Committee's decision on punishing crimes of violating 
copyright. Li Yining, vice chairman of the NPC Law Committee, 
and Gu Angran, chairman of the NPC Standing Committee's 
Legislative Affairs Commission, explained the progress in 
amending the Draft Securities Law and the Draft Arbitration Law 
respectively. 
  State Council Premier Li Peng submitted the State Council's 
motions requesting the current Standing Committee meeting 
examine two draft laws -- the Law on the People's Bank of China 
and the Auditing Law -- as well as another motion requesting 
approval for the Treaty on the Boundary System between China and 
Laos. Entrusted by the State Council, Vice Governor Zhou 
Zhengqing of the People's Bank of China, Auditor General Guo 
Zhenqian, and Vice Foreign Minister Liu Huaqiu explained these 
three motions respectively. 
  Standing Committee members began group discussions in the 
afternoon. 
  Vice Chairmen Tian Jiyun, Wang Hanbin, Ni Zhifu, Chen Muhua, 
Fei Xiaotong, Sun Qimeng, Lei Jieqiong, Qin Jiwei, Li Ximing, 
Wang Bingqian, Pagbalha Geleg Namgyai, Wang Guangying, Cheng 
Siyuan, Lu Jiaxi, Buhe, Tomur Dawamat, Li Peiyao, and Wu 
Jieping; as well as Secretary General Cao Zhi attended the 
meeting. State councillor Ismail Amat, President Ren Jianxin of 
the Supreme People's Court, and Procurator General Zhang Siqing 
of the Supreme People's Procuratorate observed the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26878 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft Laws To Be Considered </H4>

<F P=102> HK2606050394 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 25 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2606050394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Chang Hong: "Draft Law To Bolster Lead Bank's Policy </F>
Role"] 
  [Text] The National People's Congress (NPC) Standing 
Committee, the country's top legislature, will review three new 
draft laws, including one which clarifies the role of the 
central bank, next Tuesday in Beijing. 
  NPC Standing Committee spokesman Zhou Chengkui yesterday 
made 
public the draft Law on the People's Bank of China (PBC), which 
took 15 years to put together. 
  Its principal goals are to legalize the bank's 
responsibilities, intensify its supervision and management over 
the financial industry, and ensure sound monetary policies. 
  Two other draft laws to be considered by the NPC cover 
arbitration and auditing. 
  The PBC said that major international financial institutions 
like the International Monetary Fund, Asian Development Bank and 
World Bank had been consulted about the bank law. 
  "The law will specify the role of the central bank in the 
country's financial affairs and benefit China's overall 
financial reform," Zhou said. 
  China will have a banking system administered by the PBC, 
with State commercial banks forming the backbone and other 
financial institutions playing a part. 
  The draft central bank law contains 46 articles in eight 
chapters. 
  It spells out the organizational setup of the central bank, 
its business scope, relations with other departments and its 
supervision over financial bodies. 
  One chapter covers issuing, circulating and protecting 
renminbi. 
  A PBC official said that other financial laws, including a 
commercial bank law and an invoice law, are in the draft stage. 
<H5>  Legal Moves </H5>
  Meanwhile, Zhou Chengkui said that the Standing Committee 
would continue to deliberate over a Labour Law, an Urban Real 
Estate Management Law and measures to introduce tough penalties 
against copyright violations. 
  The arbitration law aims at improving the system for solving 
economic disputes and maintaining social economic order, he said. 
  During its eight-day session, the legislature will for the 
third time review a draft securities law. 
  Zhou said that major changes were made to the first version 
of the draft law, which now contains more than 200 articles. 
  Also on the agenda are the examination of the final report 
on 
1993 State finance, a review of the State Council reports on 
China's forestry industry and NPC special committee reports on 
the implementation of a Statistics Law and a Teachers Law, 
according to Zhou. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26879 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft Central Bank Law Submitted </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806075694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0729 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806075694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The draft law on the 
People's Bank of China (PBC), was submitted today to the 
country's top legislature, the Standing Committee of the 
National People's Congress (NPC) for deliberation. 
  PBC Deputy Governor Zhou Zhengqing told the Eighth Session 
of 
the NPC Standing Committee, which opened today, that "it is an 
important law for China's current reform of its monetary system." 
  The PBC is given the legal status in the draft of being the 
country's central bank. Under the direct leadership of the 
State Council, it is entitled to issue currency and oversee the 
nation's monetary organizations. 
  "The PBC, under the leadership of the State Council, 
formulates and implements monetary policies independently and in 
accordance with the law, and supervises and manages the national 
finance industry free from interference from any other 
administrative department, local government, social organization 
or individual," the draft law says. 
  The PBC possesses capital and property, and is allowed to 
operate businesses in accordance with the law. It enjoys civil 
rights and has to fulfill civil duties, according to the draft. 
  The draft law determines that the PBC monetary policies 
should aim at stabilizing the value of the national currency, 
and shore up national industrial policies and development 
schemes on the basis of the stable value of renminbi. 
  It provides six indirect macro-control measures the PBC can 
make use of to reach its monetary goals. They include setting 
the benchmark interest rates for the central bank, loaning to 
national commercial banks, buying or selling state bonds or 
foreign currencies, demanding financial institutes to pay in 
reserves for deposits, and providing re-discount for the 
financial institutes with accounts in the central bank. 
  Zhou said, "these powers will suffice for the central bank 
to 
control and adjust the currency supply and credit volume based 
on the needs of national economic development, and guarantee the 
overall balance of supply and demand." 
  The PBC will no longer extend credit to or receive deposits 
from non-financial organizations or individuals, the draft 
provides. 
  In addition, the draft law designates renminbi as the only 
legal currency in the country, and it is issued only by the PBC. 
  The draft prohibits faking or intentionally destroying the 
currency. 
  The draft law provides in principle that the PBC is 
empowered 
to ratify financial organizations, verify and inspect these 
organizations and their business operations, and punish those 
who violate financial laws and regulations. 
  "The supervision and control of the financial industry is 
necessary because financial organizations deal in special goods, 
i.e. money, and this has a great impact on the country's social 
and economic development," he said. 
  The draft, containing eight chapters and 46 clauses, also 
specifies the internal structure of the PBC. 
  According to Zhou, the law has been in preparation for 15 
years. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26880 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft IPR Penalty Law Submitted </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806095594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0950 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806095594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China plans to increase 
the maximum term of imprisonment for copyright violators from 
five years to seven, in a revised version of a draft regulation. 
  This was revealed today by Wang Shuwen, deputy director of 
the Law Committee of the National People's Congress (NPC), at 
the eighth session of the NPC Standing Committee, which opened 
today. 
  He was speaking on the revised version of the Draft 
Regulation on Penalties for Copyright Infringement, based on the 
previous review by the NPC Standing Committee and opinions from 
relevant government departments, localities, legal and financial 
experts. 
  The original draft provided that people who obtain 
"extremely 
big sums" of illicit money from the crime, or whose crimes are 
"especially serious," will be sentenced to two to five years in 
prison or dealt with administratively, and/or will be fined. 
  The new draft changes the prison term to three to seven 
years. 
  The former draft said that the lesser criminals of this kind 
will be sentenced to less than two years in prison, and/or 
fined. This ceiling is raised to three years in the latest 
draft. 
  Wang asked the NPC Standing Committee to further review the 
draft for an early promulgation. 
  "The draft is now basically feasible," Wang said. 
  The revised draft also lists what constitutes criminal 
copyright violation, including pirating books, movies, 
videotapes, computer software and producing and selling forged 
paintings. 
  Wang said that the revised draft would better protect the 
legal rights of the copyright owners and promote the management 
of the cultural market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26881 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft Labor Law Submitted </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806092894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0902 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806092894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese workers' rights 
and interests will be better protected if the present draft 
labor law is approved by the country's legislators. 
  The revised draft law places more emphasis on workers' 
interests than did the first version. It is to be further 
deliberated at the current session of the Standing Committee of 
China's National People's Congress, which opened here today. 
  The revised draft suggests that when an enterprise has to 
lay 
people off in face of difficulties in production or on the brink 
of bankruptcy, the management should inform the trade union or 
all of its employees 30 days in advance and seek their consensus. 
  The dismissed workers should be given first priority when 
the 
enterprise wants to recruit any staff within six months after 
the lay-off. 
  The draft law puts a 44 hours per month ceiling on extended 
working hours, compared with the 48-hour ceiling in the first 
draft. 
  Workers who work overtime, work on days off or during their 
holidays should be paid at time-and-a-half, double-time or 
treble-time rates, the draft says. 
  The revised draft has explicit stipulations on labor 
disputes. For example, a dispute could be patched up by the 
enterprise's mediation committee. 
  But a worker is entitled to ask for arbitration from the 
relevant authorities. He or she could bring the case to court 
when disagreeing with the arbitration. 
  The labor dispute mediation committee should be jointly 
formed by representatives of employees, enterprise management 
and trade union. The chairman of the committee, however, should 
come from the trade union, the draft says. The first version of 
the draft law demanded that a labor contract system should be 
adopted in all state enterprise. 
  But the revised draft describes the contract system as the 
right direction and the final goal, which may need to be reached 
step by step in some provinces and cities where the social 
welfare network has yet to be built up and improved. 
  China now has 35 million workers on contracts, about a third 
of the workforce in state enterprises. 
  To ensure workers on a contract have a relatively secure 
job, 
especially when they are past their prime, the draft says that 
when the employer and employee agree to extend the contract, the 
worker has the right to stipulate the length of the extension. 
  But to have this right, the worker will need to have worked 
in the enterprise for at least ten years without a gap. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26882 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighth NPC Standing Committee 8th Session Held </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft Auditing Law Submitted </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806065694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0620 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806065694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China is taking steps 
to intensify its auditing supervision over government revenues 
and expenditures by legal steps. 
  In the process it will retreat from overall examinations of 
all financial accounts of state-owned enterprises, but focus on 
key industries and aspects relevant to government interests. 
  This was revealed by Guo Zhenqian, auditor-general of the 
State Auditing Administration (SAA), at the Eighth Standing 
Committee meeting of the National People's Congress, which 
opened here today. 
  He was submitting the country's first draft auditing law for 
deliberation. 
  These measures are intended to safeguard the soundness of 
the 
state treasury and promote the establishment of a modern 
corporate system as the nation pursues a drive toward a market 
economy, he said. 
  Currently, auditing organizations only supervise and audit 
treasury accounts of government branches or subordinate local 
governments. 
  In the new draft law they are entitled to examine the 
treasury accounts of government branches of their same rank. 
  Guo said this will help safeguard government budgets by 
strengthening control and supervision over their implementation, 
and will make it easier for governments at various levels to 
locate financial problems and solve them. The draft auditing 
law, with seven chapters and 46 clauses, also makes stipulations 
on other aspects of China's auditing system, auditing 
organizations, auditors' rights and duties, auditing procedures, 
legal responsibilities and others. 
  Guo said that the draft law conforms to the relevant item in 
China's Constitution. It is based on the experience of the 
country's auditing work, with reference to foreign auditing 
legislation experience. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26883 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dissident Lin Muchen Comments on Arrest, Detention </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Dissident Lin Muchen Comments on Arrest, Detention </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706131094 Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 26 Jun 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706131094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on "special interview" by Tseng Hui-yen (2582 1979 </F>
3601) in New York; date not given: "Mainland Dissident Lin 
Muchen Discloses Details of His Detention in Shanghai"] 
  [Text] New York, 24 Jun (LIEN HO PAO)--Lin Muchen, one of 
the mainland drafters of the "19 Articles of the 1994 Political 
Program for Political Democratization," had planned to fly from 
Shanghai to the United States to pursue further education on 6 
May, but was unexpectedly arrested by the authorities before 
boarding the plane and detained for nearly 50 days. On 24 June, 
the mainland authorities, giving no sign of his release 
beforehand as they did in Wang Juntao's case, sent him in a 
police car directly from the detention center to a plane bound 
for New York and hinted that he had better not return home. 
  Lin Muchen's Korean Airlines plane arrived in Kennedy 
Airport, New York at 1945 on 24 June. 
  In a special interview with this staff reporter, he 
disclosed 
for the first time the entire course of his arrest and detention 
which lasted nearly 50 days. He said: The most useful weapon 
used by mainland pro-democracy activists at the present time is 
that they can use the mainland's laws for protection and that 
all resistance remains within the scope allowed by the 
Constitution. They are becoming increasingly open, legalized, 
and organized and are an acute headache for the authorities. 
  Lin Muchen said: On 6 May, as I waited to pass customs at 
Shanghai Hongqiao International Airport, someone standing on the 
other side of the channel suddenly filmed me with a video 
camera. I did not pay much attention to him because I thought 
that he would use the video for reference only. Then, several 
persons unexpectedly came up to me and brought me into a small 
room. They then produced a summons and got me to sign it. The 
reason for summoning me was that "I was involved in a case." 
Later, they brought me to a public security sub-bureau, 
searched me, and carefully inspected the baggage I was about to 
bring to the United States, but they found nothing unusual. 
  That night, the public security personnel arranged to have 
him stay in Lufeng Inn, which is near Shanghai Railway Station, 
and produced a document which subjected him to "living under 
surveillance." The next day, they brought him to another inn, 
which had been rebuilt from an air-raid shelter and was run by 
the Zhabei Public Security Sub-bureau. A dozen or more public 
security personnel worked shifts 24 hours a day to keep watch on 
him, four persons per shift. They followed him even when he 
went to toilet or took a shower. Lin Muchen said he did not 
know whether they feared he would escape or commit suicide. 
  He said that during the period of detention, the 
surveillance 
personnel would repeatedly ask him the same old questions about 
such things as the "Preparatory Committee for the Human 
Association," which he and the other Shanghai pro-democracy 
activists Yang Zhou, Wang Fuchen, and Li Guotao were preparing 
to set up in the summer of 1993. He was very frank about this 
because they did not violate the current law. The authorities 
only made a vain attempt. 
  He said: There is a huge potential danger behind the 
mainland authorities' nature of knowingly violating the law and 
not observing the law. The little pain I suffered was nothing. 
I have always clearly expressed my attitude of "being willing 
to endure it to the end." I am determined not to make any 
requests to the authorities nor agree to any of their terms. I 
guess from their conversations that Yang Zhou, Wang Fuchen, and 
the others have also been arrested. I even involved myself in 
matters and finally angered the surveillance personnel so much 
that they said "I was too brotherly" and blamed me for being 
"too bad to be corrected." 
  After repeated requests by Lin Muchen's wife, Mao Jianfang, 
she and Lin were allowed to see each other under surveillance on 
1 June. The authorities repeatedly warned her not to disclose 
anything about Lin Muchen to the outside. 
  On the morning of 24 June, after giving no signs beforehand, 
the surveillance personnel suddenly ordered him to pack two 
pieces of baggage, which were detained with him earlier, and 
told him that his wife had brought him a bag of clothes. When 
Lin Muchen heard this, he knew he was about to be released. 
Later, the surveillance personnel brought him out of the inn 
where he had stayed under surveillance for nearly 50 days. He 
hurriedly said goodbye to his wife, who had arranged to wait in 
the office of the public security bureau, and she was so sad 
that she had a good cry. 
  Later, Lin Muchen was escorted to a police car prepared by 
the authorities. The car ran smoothly all the way to the 
airport. Under "special care," he boarded a plane bound for the 
United States that same day. 
  Lin Muchen said that the public security personnel had 
repeatedly asked him whether he would return home in the future. 
He said affirmatively that he surely would not settle in the 
United States. However, they hinted that he had better not 
return home. He solemnly declared that he had both the right 
and obligation to return and that he would not easily give up 
under any circumstances. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26884 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Promises Workers To Remain `Masters' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Promises Workers To Remain `Masters' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806034294 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806034294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Zhang Xia: "Employee Rights Get Boost From Labour Chief"] </F>
  [Text] Shijiazhuang -- Workers' rights must be guaranteed 
as their enterprises develop under a modern corporate system, a 
leading labour official said over the weekend. 
  Workers will remain "the masters of State-owned enterprises" 
when they are converted into limited-liability companies, said 
Yang Xingfu, vice-chairman of the All-China Federation of Trade 
Unions (ACTFU). Their rights to participate in the firms' 
management should not be deprived, Yang added. 
  "It is a misunderstanding that the system of employees' 
congress--a proven effective way for workers to be involved in 
management supervision--belongs only to the planned economy and 
is not suitable to the modern enterprise system," Yang said. 
  Employee enthusiasm and creativity are necessary components 
of the switch from state-owned firms to corporations. This 
ensures greater profits and leads to top value of State assets. 
<H5>  Congress </H5>
  The employees' congress, therefore, has an even more 
important role to play, he said. 
  "The employees' congress should not be replaced by the board 
of directors," Yang said. "The two should coexist in 
corporations." 
  Congresses are the governing body of enterprises, elected by 
its workers. All important decisions, including managerial 
appointments and enterprise plans, should be submitted to 
employees' congresses for approval, Yang said. 
  Labour relations within state firms will undergo great 
changes when the corporate system is introduced. Workers now 
need to sign labour contracts with their enterprises. 
  The contracts should guarantee that workers enjoy rational 
pay, work hours, safety, insurance and welfare, he said. 
  In contract-signing, negotiations should be carried out 
between the trade unions on behalf of workers and the board of 
directors. Disputes which cannot be resolved through 
negotiations should be settled according to relevant laws, Yang 
said. 
  Wei Jianxing, chairman of ACFTU, also stressed workers' 
rights in decisionmaking must be guaranteed when the firm's 
management mechanism is transformed. 
  At the ACTFU four-day conference, which ended yesterday, 
representatives from more than 20 state enterprises also 
exchanged their experiences in promoting trade unions and 
individual workers in carrying out reforms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26885 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   RENMIN RIBAO Applauds Coexistence Principles </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    RENMIN RIBAO Applauds Coexistence Principles </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806042794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0321 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806042794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The formulation of the 
Five Principles of Peaceful Co-existence is applauded as a great 
invention in the history of international relations with 
historical and realistic significance by a PEOPLE'S DAILY 
editorial today. 
  Today, June 28, is the 40th anniversary of the proclamation 
of the Five Principles of Peaceful Co-existence, namely, mutual 
respect for sovereignty and territorial integrity, mutual 
non-aggression, non-interference in each other's internal 
affairs, equality and mutual benefit, and peaceful co-existence. 
  The five principles, co-initiated by China, India and 
Myanmar 
(Burma), were born at a time of rising national independence, 
the editorial says. "The five principles, following the new 
trend of international relations after the Second World War, 
reflected the newly-independent countries' common aspirations, 
which were to preserve sovereignty, oppose aggression and 
maintain peace." 
  The past 40 years have shown that the five principles, 
summarizing the fundamental tenets in world affairs in simple, 
clear language and in line with the United Nations Charter, 
embodied the basic features of the new international relations, 
the article explains. 
  As noted by Deng Xiaoping, observing the five principles is 
the best way to handle state-to-state relations, the article 
says. The five principles have stronger vitality than "big 
family", political grouping and sphere of influence ideas among 
all norms directing international ties. 
  Now, with the end of the Cold War, a new international 
pattern is emerging, featuring multi-polarization. The world is 
undergoing profound changes and great adjustments, so all 
countries have an urgent need to establish new international 
political and economic order which is fair and reasonable. 
  Mutual respect of sovereignty and non-interference in each 
other's internal affairs are at the core of setting up the new 
international order. Every country's people have the right to 
choose their own social system and life style. Only the five 
principles, not hegemonism and power politics, can stand trials 
and work to build the new world order, the article stresses. 
  Equality and mutual benefit are important parts of the five 
principles, and are of major realistic significance in 
concerting international economic relations. 
  At present, each country, in order to formulate the new 
international order, should adhere to the five principles to 
strengthen co-operation, as the world economy coalesces and 
economic factors play an even more important role in 
international ties. 
  China, initiator and loyal observer and defender of the five 
principles, has enormously enriched the spirit of the five 
principles by pursuing an independent foreign policy of peace, 
the article points out. 
  From norms regulating relations between countries with 
different social systems, China has developed the five 
principles into standards guiding and dealing with affairs 
concerning all other countries. 
  In conclusion, the article says, the five principles will be 
honored in the future for their contribution to constructing a 
better world. 
  The Chinese people have made up their mind, it notes, to 
continue their efforts together with other peoples to carry 
forward the Five Principles of Peaceful Co-existence. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26886 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Special ID Cards Proposed for Foreign Experts </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Special ID Cards Proposed for Foreign Experts </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806034194 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806034194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Xu Yang: "ID Card Aids Foreign Experts"] </F>
  [Text] The State Bureau of Foreign Experts (SBFE) is 
drafting a regulation to ensure sound management of foreign 
experts employed by the country. 
  According to the bureau, the State is now issuing a special 
ID-like certificate to the growing number of foreign experts 
that will enable them to make more convenient purchases and 
money exchanges. 
  The regulation's main content is the ID certificate which is 
designed to make life more convenient for foreign experts. 
  With it, experts can bring into China such working tools as 
personal computers without paying custom duties. 
  They can also exchange foreign currencies at the Bank of 
China. 
  Foreign experts are hired by the state for such things as 
teaching at universities or editing for newspapers or publishing 
houses. In most cases their contracts stipulate that they are 
paid a percentage of their salary in renminbi. 
  According to Ma Junru, director-general of SBFE, more than 
50,000 foreigners worked for China last year, including 11,000 
experts in universities, newspapers, and publishing houses. 
There were also 4,500 special economic and technical experts, 
more than 20,000 foreign engineers for big construction 
contracts, and 10,000 overseas staff in foreign-funded 
enterprises, Ma said. 
  They will all receive the new identification certificate. 
  Foreign professionals have been invited to China since the 
founding of the People's Republic. But they shied away from 
China until the 1980's. 
  The experts in university and journalistic units earn 2,000 
yuan ($230) to 4,800 yuan ($552) a month plus free housing, a 
vacation bonus, and round-trip plane tickets. 
  But the 4,500 economic and technical experts actually 
receive 
no salary apart from stipends. Usually retirees, they 
voluntarily help with their knowledge and experience. 
  Foreign engineers earn $300 to $1,200 a day working on 
construction sites of power plants, expressways, and chemical 
complexes in line with their contracts. 
  According to Ma, foreigners now work in every province, 
municipality, and autonomous region including landlocked regions 
like Tibet and Xinjiang. 
  "Foreign intellectual resources have instilled great 
momentum 
into China's modernization drive," he said. 
  Foreign experts have helped in "establishing a market system 
in China, solving technical difficulties in important 
construction projects, industrial and agricultural production, 
and spreading advanced technology," he added. 
  Meanwhile, Ma told China Daily that SBFE will help import 
more fruit and vegetables from Europe and South America to 
enrich the national dinner table variety. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26887 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vice Minister Comments on Disguised Sex Trade </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vice Minister Comments on Disguised Sex Trade </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706184694 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0843 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706184694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zhou Lixian (0719 4539 2009)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 27 Jun (XINHUA) -- Vice Minister of Public 
Security Mou Xinsheng pointed out during an interview with this 
reporter: "Three-companionship [san pei 0005 7111 -- serving as 
someone's companion at dinner, drinking, and dancing]" activity 
is a decadent phenomenon and its spread has aggravated 
prostitution and other crimes. So, it must be resolutely 
investigated and dealt with. 
  Mou Xinsheng said: In recent years, cultural and 
recreational facilities have developed rapidly in China, greatly 
enriching the people's cultural life and promoting spiritual 
civilization. At the same time, however, the 
"three-companionship" phenomenon has occurred in some singing 
and dancing recreational establishments. The public security 
organs have investigated and found that the 
"three-companionship" activity is for sexual excitement and even 
leads to prostitution and other crimes. In 1993 police records, 
one-half of the prostitutes and those who visited them were 
detected at recreational spots with the "three-companionship" 
activity. This indicates that recreational spots with the 
"three-companionship" activity are hotbeds of prostitution. The 
"three-companionship" activity seriously pollutes the social 
environment, corrupts social values, and causes strong 
resentment in all circles of society. It is extremely wrong to 
regard the "three-companionship" activity as something conducive 
to attracting outside investment. 
  On the measures to be taken by public security organs 
against 
the "three-companionship" activity, Mou Xinsheng said: The 
Ministry of Public Security has repeatedly called on local 
public security organs to adopt measures to ban it resolutely. 
Recently, the Ministry of Public Security has issued a 
"circular on resolutely investigating and dealing with the 
`three-companionship' activity at recreational establishments." 
The ministry urges local public security organs to 
conscientiously correct the poor management of social order at 
public recreational establishments, and to join the cultural, 
and the industry and commerce departments in improving 
management, seriously investigating and dealing with the 
"three-companionship" activity, and resolutely correcting it. 
Public security organs shall impose harsh punishment according 
to the law on anyone who engages in pornographic activity or 
prostitution in the name of "three-companionship" activity. At 
the same time, public security organs at various levels shall 
not be permitted to connive with and shield 
"three-companionship" activity under any pretext and in any way. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26888 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   New `Reading Activities' Paper To Be Published </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New `Reading Activities' Paper To Be Published </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706122194 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 2102 
GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706122194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zhang Dawei (1728 1129 3634)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 25 Jun (XINHUA) -- ZHONGHUA DUSHU BAO [0022 
5478 6236 2579 1032--CHINESE READERS NEWS] will be published in 
July. A national newspaper catering to reading activities, it 
is jointly managed by the Press and Publication Administration 
and GUANGMING RIBAO publishers under the cosponsorship of the 
latter and the Chinese Publishers' Association. To increase the 
newspaper's popularity, to heighten public interest in reading, 
and to promote the development of reading activities, the 
publishers and the Shenzhen Gelan Information Company have given 
free copies of the newspaper to 20,000 readers throghout the 
country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26889 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong's Flood-Hit Areas Struggle To Recover </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong's Flood-Hit Areas Struggle To Recover </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806080094 Beijing XINHUA in English 0732 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806080094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Guangzhou, June 28 (XINHUA) -- South China's 
Guangdong Province is doing its best to help its flood-hit areas 
resume production and rebuild ruined houses. 
  At a news briefing held here yesterday, Deputy Governor of 
the province Ou Guangyuan said that Guangdong had allocated and 
transferred 300 million kg of grain to flood-stricken areas and 
invested 870 million yuan, including 740 million yuan in loans, 
to help production resume in the flood-hit areas. 
  At the same time, the province has also decided to send 
three 
special working groups to seriously affected areas of Qingyuan 
county, and Shaoguan and Zhaoqing cities to oversee the work of 
resuming production there. 
  Due to strong tropical rainstorms and successive torrential 
rains in Guangdong's western and northern areas since early 
June, floods, which were believed to be the worst in 100 years, 
occurred when the Beijiang and Xijiang Rivers overflowed. 
  The floods hit nine cities and 60 counties, destroyed 
thousands of homes and ruined crops on about 706,667 ha of 
farmland, leaving more than 660,000 people homeless and causing 
direct economic losses estimated at 14.6 billion yuan. 
  But thanks to help from the central government and from 
other 
Chinese provinces, local people, and officers and men of the 
People's Liberation Army co-operated closely in fighting the 
floods and won temporary victory, as the floods have receded 
under the danger mark. 
  Ou said the most urgent task for the time being is to 
guarantee basic living conditions for flood-affected residents 
and work hard to prevent epidemics. 
  Communities in other parts of China and compatriots from 
Hong 
Kong and Macao have donated a total of 50 million yuan to 
Guangdong's flood-hit areas. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26890 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Governor Chairs Executive Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Governor Chairs Executive Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706152894 Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 22 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706152894 </F>
<F P=104>  Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The 36th provincial people's government executive 
meeting was convened on the morning of 21 June and was chaired 
by Governor Ruan Chongwu. 
  The meeting discussed a draft of the Hainan Special Economic 
Region Regulations on Protection of Old People, People Injured 
on the Job, and Unemployed People. It also made proposals on 
levying civil aviation and airport management and construction 
fees. 
  Executive Vice Governor Wang Xiaofeng; Vice Governors Wang 
Xueping, Mao Zhijun, and Liu Mingqi; and provincial people's 
government Secretary General Cui Hongjun attended the meeting, 
which also was attended as guests by persons in charge of 
various provincial people's government departments and units 
concerned. 
  The meeting adopted in principle and decided to promulgate 
as 
a provincial government order for implementation the 
abovementioned Hainan Special Economic Region Regulations on 
Protection of Old People, People Injured on the Job, and 
Unemployed People. The promulgation of these regulations is 
believed to be exerting a positive impact on the development of 
the province's social security system. 
  Since becoming a province, Hainan has witnessed rapid 
aviation and civil aviation development. In order to further 
strengthen the province's airport management and construction, 
and to introduce airport management and construction fees, the 
meeting deliberated and studied all the relevant issues in this 
regard and decided to levy airport management and construction 
fees on foreign and domestic flight routes, well as foreign and 
domestic passengers. However, no airport management and 
construction fees will be levied on flight routes inside the 
province. The airport management and construction fees thus 
collected are to be used for improving airport safety 
facilities, airport technical renovation, as well as the 
construction of new airports. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26891 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Congress Convenes Standing Committee </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Congress Convenes Standing Committee </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706152694 Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 22 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706152694 </F>
<F P=104>  Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The first provincial people's congress convened its 
ninth standing committee meeting at the provincial people's 
government headquarters yesterday [22 June]. The meeting was 
attended by some 23 provincial people's congress standing 
committee members, including Du Qinglin, chairman of the 
provincial people's congress standing committee; Wei Zefang, 
Yang Wengui, Wang Xintian, Wu Kuiguang, and Xin Yejiang, vice 
chairmen of the provincial people's congress standing committee; 
and Mao Ping, secretary general of the provincial people's 
congress standing committee. Du Qinglin presided over the 
meeting, which was also attended by some 75 guests, including 
Vice Governor Wang Xueping, member of the standing committee of 
the provincial party committee; Tian Zhongmu, president of the 
provincial higher people's court; Qin Xingmin, chief procurator 
of the provincial people's procuratorate; and others. 
  The meeting listened to the following reports: 1) Report on 
Deliberation of Hainan Special Economic Region Land Management 
Regulations (Draft); 2) Explanations on Haikou City Formulating 
Regulations on Banning Production, Marketing, and Setting-Off of 
Fireworks and Firecrackers; 3) Report on Deliberation and 
Examination of Haikou City Regulations on Banning Production, 
Marketing, and Setting-Off of Fireworks and Firecrackers; 4) 
Report on Hainan Procuratorial Organs Investigating and Handling 
Such Economic Crimes as Graft, Bribery, and So On in the 
Anticorruption Struggle; 5) Report on Proposed Personnel 
Appointments and Removals Concerning Cadres. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26892 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Seeks To Connect Transport System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Seeks To Connect Transport System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706134594 Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 16 Jun 94 p 22 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706134594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report from Hong Kong by Wang Man-na (3769 2581 1226): </F>
"Hainan To Build China's Longest Undersea Tunnel"] 
  [Text] Hainan recently gained State Council approval for 
the development of the mainland's first train-ferry service 
between Haikou and Zhanjiang which will connect transportation 
between Hainan and the interior. In addition, Hainan also plans 
to build China's longest undersea tunnel. A British undersea 
tunnel corporation is now holding talks with the province on 
investing in the undersea tunnel, which is similar to the one 
that runs across the English Channel. 
  Sun Lijun, deputy secretary general of the Hainan 
Government, 
disclosed to this reporter yesterday that the State Council 
recently gave its approval for Hainan to lay out a plan for the 
train-ferry from Hainan to the interior. There were two 
original schemes for the project: The first one runs from 
Haikou to Guangdong's Haian, while the second runs from Hainan's 
Yangpu to Guangxi's Beihai. There were two schemes because 
Hainan could not reach agreement with Guangdong at first. 
Guangdong was not willing to invest in the building of the 
railway from Haian to Zhanjiang. As a result, Hainan had to 
make a second choice. Nevertheless, the length from Haikou to 
Hainan is only 18 nautical miles, while that from Yangpu to 
Beihai is 80 nautical miles. To connect Hainan's railway with 
the interior network through the sea ferry to Guangdong, Hainan 
eventually made a compromise and was willing to invest in the 
Haian- Zhanjiang railway in Guangdong and give up the second 
option. 
  Sun said that the sea ferry will be divided into three 
stages: The first will be the 18.6-nautical-mile railway ferry 
from Haikou to Haian; the second will be the 430-km railway from 
Sanya to Haikou; and the third will be the 160-km railway from 
Guangdong's Haian to Zhanjiang. A feasibility study currently 
is being conducted, and it is estimated that total investment in 
the sea ferry (not including railway construction) will reach $1 
billion. Construction of the Sanya-Haikou railway, which will 
take four years to complete, has already begun. 
  Gu Yuanyang, deputy director of the Hainan Economic 
Cooperation Department, also disclosed to LIEN HO PAO that 
Hainan plans to build an undersea tunnel from Haikou to Haian so 
as to connect Hainan's transportation network with that of the 
mainland. 
  Total investment in the undersea tunnel is estimated to 
exceed 6 billion yuan. After completing the undersea tunnel 
across the English Channel, the British undersea tunnel 
corporation intends to move the available equipment to Hainan 
and participate in the project, which will help reduce the 
investment cost. 
  As Hainan's undersea tunnel is 18.6 nautical miles long and 
is China's longest undersea tunnel, Hainan hopes that the 
British corporation will build the tunnel like the one they did 
across the English Channel. The talks are still under way. 
Feasibility studies and plans have not yet been made. It is 
estimated that the project will start after 9 years and 
construction will last 15 years. 
  As the tunnel is to be located at a deep valley, Gu Yuanyang 
said, we will encounter technical difficulties in the 
construction. Hainan and the British corporation now are 
studying ways to build a bridge in the deep valley so that 
vehicles can use pass through the tunnel on this bridge under 
the sea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26893 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Henan Governor Comments on Enterprise Deficits </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Henan Governor Comments on Enterprise Deficits </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806005094 Zhengzhou Henan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1030 GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806005094 </F>
<F P=104>  Zhengzhou Henan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] A provincial economic meeting, aimed primarily 
at studying and solving the problem of state-owned enterprises 
turning deficits into profits, opened in Zhengzhou this morning. 
Provincial party Secretary Li Changchun and Governor Ma 
Zhongchen made important speeches at the meeting. 
  While analyzing the economic situation in our province, Ma 
Zhongchen said: At present, economic operations in our province 
are normal, and the situation is stable as a whole. Various 
kinds of reforms are progressing smoothly. In particular, 
although we have encountered enormous difficulties in 
implementing a new tax system and a reform plan for the 
purchasing and selling prices of grain, sharp fluctuations have 
been avoided. The masses have made a good response to this. 
Judging from our economic operations, our rural economy has 
been developing in a all-round way. There is a fairly good 
harvest of summer grain. Our industrial production has been 
developing in a sustained and rapid manner. From January to May 
this year, industrial production output value at and above the 
township level was 21 percent higher than in the same period 
last year. This margin of increase was 1.97 percentage points 
higher than the average national level. Sales value increased 
by 21 percent, and the production and marketing rate was 24 
percent. At the end of last May, various kinds of deposit 
amounts in various financial organs throughout the province were 
15.7 billion yuan more than in same period last year. Local 
financial revenues of the whole province were 25.5 percent 
higher than in the same period last year. Urban and rural 
retail markets throughout the province were prosperous and 
brisk, and supplies of consumer goods were ample. There was 
brisk buying and selling. From January to May, incomes in 
foreign exchange through foreign trade reached $80 million, an 
increase of 28.5 percent over the same period last year. 
  Ma Zhongchen pointed out: In the course of reform and 
opening up, we also have faced new situations and new problems, 
which have been reflected mainly in tight finances. Many 
localities are unable to pay wages to cadres and workers on 
schedule. The margin of price increases on the markets is too 
high. The number of liquidated enterprises, and enterprises 
that suspended production, or are operating below capacity has 
increased. At the end of last May, the accumulated profits of 
industrial enterprise covered by budgets were 26.5 percent lower 
than in the same period last year. Forty key enterprises -- 
including Angang, Xinfei, Pinglian, Luoguo and others -- have 
still increased their profits. However, the majority of 
industrial enterprises have made deficits. Of the six major 
industries -- including metallurgy, machinery, the chemical and 
textile industries, building materials, and light industry -- 
the profits of five industries have dropped, with the exception 
of metallurgy. Of the 17 cities and prefectures, only the city 
of Pingdingshan and Zhoukou Prefecture have increased their 
profits. 
  Ma Zhongchen stressed: The losses of industrial enterprises 
covered by budgets have increased. The key reason for this is 
that our enterprises have been slow in transforming their 
operational mechanisms, that their capability in conforming with 
the market demand is weak, and that their product mix has not 
yet been adjusted properly. They have lacked the capability to 
conform with market demand. Another important reason for this 
is that leading bodies in enterprises have failed to work in a 
coordinated way, and their internal management has been chaotic. 
If we fail to solve these problems, the general situation of 
reform, development and stability will be directly affected. We 
must on no account treat them lightly. 
  Ma Zhongchen added: The present focus of our work should be 
on further deepening enterprise reform, transforming enterprise 
operational mechanisms, and firmly grasping deficit-ridden 
enterprises' work to turn from deficits to profits. We must 
vigorously promote preproduction structural reform. In the 
future, we must take the shareholding system and the 
shareholding cooperative system as an emphasis of preproduction 
structural reform. We must take active measures to conduct 
experimental work and speed up development. In the meantime, in 
the course of development, we must not forget standardization 
and improvement. We must fully vest our enterprises with 
decisionmaking powers. Various cities, prefectures, and 
departments must delegate their power on hand as early as 
possible. [words indistinct] Various enterprises must 
vigorously carry out the activities of grasping the changes in 
their operational mechanisms, improving management, and 
enhancing their capability and efficiency. They must devote 
their main efforts to improving their product quality and 
upgrading their products. Relevant departments must actively 
guide deficit-making enterprises to adjust their product mix 
according to market demand so as to actively manufacture new 
products, products in short supply, and marketable products. 
They also must manufacture products that require high 
technology, as well as new, profit-making products that require 
low investment. We must support them in terms of funds, 
techniques, and management. [passage omitted including 
indistinct portion] 
  In conclusion, Ma Zhongchen emphasized: Various departments 
and units must further change their administrative functions, 
energetically encourage the practice of conducting 
investigations and studies, and help enterprises and grass-roots 
levels truly solve practical difficulties and problems through 
investigation and study. He hoped that they would unite as one 
to struggle hard to fight the battle of turning from deficits to 
profits. 
  At the meeting, (Cui Chenggong), deputy secretary general of 
the provincial party committee and director of the policy study 
institute, read several opinions of the provincial party 
committee and government on turning enterprises' deficits to 
profits. 
  Leading comrades who attended the meeting included Ren Keli, 
Zheng Zengmao, Zhang Deguang, (Ma Jianzhang), Zhong Lisheng, 
Zhang Shiying, Zhang Honghua, Yu Jiahua, Zhu Shuquan, and others. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26894 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hubei Capital Prepares To Combat Flooding </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hubei Capital Prepares To Combat Flooding </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806092594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0832 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806092594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 28 (XINHUA) -- This capital of central 
China's Hubei Province is making full preparations for combating 
any possible major floods on the Chang Jiang River, China's 
longest. 
  The city, situated on the middle reaches of the Chang Jiang, 
is divided into three parts -- Hankou (the business center), 
Wuchang, (the political and educational center) and Hanyang -- 
by the river and its tributary, the Hanshui River. 
  When the spring flood arrived this year local officials led 
workers in different groups to check the 286.2 km of embankments 
along the Chang Jiang and removed a dozen hidden perils. 
  By early June different localities had already invested 
300,000 yuan to buy gunny sacks and straw bags, and prepared 
more than 650 tons of petrol, diesel oil, and rolled steel. In 
addition, they mobilized some 50,000 people to fight possible 
big floods. 
  Major floods on the Chang Jiang usually occur in late July 
and early August. 
  While summing up past experiences in fighting floods and 
improving some of the rules concerning flood control, this year 
the city started to assign local officials to participate in 
concrete flood fighting work to different sections of the 
embankments, with clear tasks and targets. 
  In addition, areas and institutions which exercise 
jurisdiction over some sections of embankments are also given 
concrete tasks in the case of severe floods. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26895 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Compatriots Fund `Taiwan Street' in Hubei Province </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Compatriots Fund `Taiwan Street' in Hubei Province </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706122794 Beijing XINHUA in English 1155 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706122794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 27 (XINHUA) -- A Taiwan street has come 
into being in the poverty-stricken dabie mountains in central 
China. 
  It is a street full of enterprises jointly funded by 
compatriots from Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao, overseas Chinese in 
foreign countries and their relatives, and other private 
businesses. 
  The street got its name of "Taiwan Jie (Street)" because 
most 
of the investors in it are from Taiwan. Its construction in 
Macheng city, in central China's Hubei Province, started a year 
ago. 
  Its creation has attracted considerable attention to 
Macheng, 
which has a 1,000-year history. 
  The Dabie mountains were said to have been formed in ancient 
times by a god-like soft-shelled turtle. Streets in Macheng, 
located high in the Dabie mountains, are narrow and small, 
having been constructed in long-ago centuries. 
  Over the past three years, the city has built, or rebuilt, 
twelve streets, totalling 12 km. The 1.2 km Taiwan Street is 
just one of the newly-constructed streets. 
  According to local officials, more than 380 households have 
approval to build in Taiwan Street, and work has started on two 
thirds of them. 
  Among more than 100 households who have finished their 
building, more than half have started different kinds of 
commercial operations in their newly-built houses. 
  Without costing the central government a penny, the 
construction of the street has so far cost more than 20 million 
yuan, most of it directly contributed by compatriots from 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao and from abroad. 
  More than 5,000 people whose origins lie in the city still 
live in Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao and in foreign countries. 
Their relatives still living in Macheng now number 30,000. 
  About 1,000 compatriots from Taiwan and from foreign lands 
who have Macheng origins have returned to the hometown for 
visits over the past years. 
  Encouraged by the local government, relatives of Taiwan 
compatriots have started more than 100 enterprises or businesses. 
  The officials said the construction of Taiwan street is 
aimed 
to cater for the demands to start more enterprises funded by 
relatives of Taiwan compatriots, and for improving the 
investment environment. 
  It also caters for the convenience of compatriots from 
Taiwan 
and other overseas Chinese during their visits to the hometown. 
  Houses in Taiwan architectural style, many of them 
three-storeyed, line the two sides of the 24-meter-wide Taiwan 
Street. Service facilities such as amusement centers, shopping 
mart, hotels, restaurants and banks have also be constructed. 
  According to the officials, when the first phase of building 
the street is finished, it will attract 45 million yuan for 
construction, see the establishment of more than 400 private 
businesses or shops, and the annual volume of business or output 
value is expected to surpass 80 million yuan. 
  The local government of Macheng not only hopes that the 
building of Taiwan Street will help strengthen its urban 
economy, but also that the street will help to promote exchanges 
in various fields across the Taiwan Strait. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26896 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hubei's Wuhan Project Aims for `Houses for All' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hubei's Wuhan Project Aims for `Houses for All' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706112294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1011 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706112294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 27 (XINHUA) -- A "houses for all" estate 
project has been launched here in the old industrial city of 
Wuhan, which reportedly has a fifth of its residents short of 
homes. 
  Zhang Kexiao, a senior official in charge of housing 
development, said the plan is to build 3.19-million-sq.-m of 
fully serviced homes by 1997 on the eastern outskirts of the 
city, the capital of central China's Hubei Province. 
  Zhang said these houses will be able to accommodate about 
200,000 people, each currently having less than eight sq. m of 
housing area, the minimum figure prescribed by the central 
government. 
  "The site levelling, the building of roads, water and 
electricity facilities for the whole area have now been 
completed, and we expect to complete the 800,000 sq. m of houses 
of the first phase by the end of the year," he said 
  The whole project will cost nine billion yuan, he added. 
Some 30 to 40 percent will be financed by the Hong Kong-based 
New World Group, the rest by the city government. 
  He noted that the government has reduced or remitted part of 
the taxes and charges for the project, such as the land rent, to 
ensure the houses will be affordable to low-income residents. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26897 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenzhen's Inflation `Does Not Allow Optimism' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenzhen's Inflation `Does Not Allow Optimism' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706153194 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1056 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706153194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenzhen 27 June (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE) -- 
Shenzhen's inflation this year does not allow optimism, Shao 
Hanqing, member of the Shenzhen City CPC Committee Standing 
Committee and concurrently director of the propaganda 
department, stated here today. 
  According to Shao Hanqing, between January and May this 
year, 
the general consumer price index for Shenzhen residents went up 
by 18.1 percent over the same period last year; in May, it went 
up by 16.2 percent over the same period last year. Compared 
with the other 35 large- and medium cities in China, Shenzhen's 
inflation rate is comparatively low; however, the retail price 
index in May went up by 15.3 percent over the same period last 
year. In addition, Shenzhen's original price index base led the 
whole country, and the present inflation rate has aroused 
residents' resentment somewhat. 
  Shao Hanqing said that because the price issue involves 
every 
household, the Shenzhen City government will adopt a series of 
measures while doing its best to keep prices controlled at a 
rational level. The measures include, first, strictly 
controlling the presentation of various price-regulating items 
and readjusting prices for 36 categories of goods listed as 
being under the control of price administrations at various 
levels, while price-regulating plans which can be halted should 
not be presented, and those that can be postponed will be 
presented as late as possible. Second, strictly monitoring 
prices of people's daily necessities and service items; Shenzhen 
will monitor prices for some 20 items, including rice, to insure 
stable prices for people's daily necessities and services. 
Third, implement the system of attaching explicit price tags to 
all commodities and price lists for services. And fourth, do a 
good job of the great examination of market prices; crack down 
on lawbreakers who practice cheating, monopolizing the market to 
jack up prices, and forced purchases or marketing; and ban 
unlicensed peddling and the practice of arbitrarily setting up 
stalls to sell things. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26898 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   17,000 Grams of Heroin Burned in Sichuan Province </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    17,000 Grams of Heroin Burned in Sichuan Province </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2306154294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1523 GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2306154294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Chengdu, June 23 (XINHUA) -- Some 17,000 grams of 
confiscated heroin was burned this morning at the Pixian Sports 
Stadium in Chengdu, capital of southwest China's Sichuan 
Province. 
  This was an important anti-drug operation by Sichuan 
Province 
just before June 26, the International Anti-Drugs Day. 
  Sichuan Province is a passage and transfer station for 
international drug smugglers. In the first five months of this 
year, public security organizations cracked 531 cases of drug 
abuse and smuggling, arrested 706 suspects and confiscated 
46,300 grams of heroin and 13,000 grams of opium. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26899 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tibet Chairman on Struggle Against `Separatists' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tibet Chairman on Struggle Against `Separatists' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806031794 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 27 Jun 94 p a2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806031794 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by staff reporter Yang Yung-nian (2799 3057 1628) </F>
stationed in Southwest China: "Tibet Further Stabilizes 
Situation, Determined To Deal With Separatists According to Law"] 
  [Text] Lhasa, 26 Jun (WEN WEI PO) -- In an exclusive 
interview with this reporter in Lhasa a few days ago, Gyaincain 
Norbu, chairman of the Tibet Autonomous Regional People's 
Government, pointed out: "The situation in Tibet has been 
further stabilized, national unity has been further solidified, 
and public security has further improved." 
  While expressing profound confidence in the struggle against 
Tibetan separatists, Gyaincain Norbu emphatically pointed out 
the necessity of maintaining vigilance amid the atmosphere of 
optimism. He said: "The struggle between separatists and 
antiseparatists in the region is a protracted, acute, and 
complicated one." The regional government leader went on to 
explain: "With the support of the international anti-Chinese 
forces, the Dalai clique took advantage of some social hot spots 
in the hinterland, such as the problems of commodity prices and 
taxation, to try its utmost to disrupt unity and stability and 
obstruct reform and development in Tibet." He added: 
"Certainly, we maintain a high degree of vigilance. Whether 
the separatists, particularly the plotters behind the scenes, 
take advantage of the hot spots in society or directly flaunt 
the banner of `Tibet independence,' we will adopt resolute and 
decisive measures to deal with them according to the law." 
  Recently, when interviewed by this reporter on another 
occasion, Tudeng, head of the Public Health Department of the 
Tibet Autonomous Region, said that the period between 1997 and 
2000 will see a baby boom in Tibet, so it is anticipated that 
the population of Tibet will exceed 2.5 million by the year 
2000. The birth rate in Tibet last year was 23.4 per thousand, 
and allowing for the number of deaths, the natural growth rate 
was 15.6 per thousand, while the natural growth rate across the 
country during the same period was approximately 11 per 
thousand. By the end of last year, there were some 2.2 million 
people in the entire region, a net increase of 36,000 people 
over 1992, and more than double as compared with the population 
in the 1950's. The average life-span of Tibetans has also 
increased to 65 from 36 in the 1950's. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26900 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Drug Trafficker in Tibet Executed, Others Sentenced </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Drug Trafficker in Tibet Executed, Others Sentenced </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2606132094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1248 GMT 26 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2606132094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Lhasa, June 26 (XINHUA) -- One drug trafficker in 
the Tibet Autonomous Region was publicly sentenced to death and 
three others were sentenced to imprisonment today by the Lhasa 
City Intermediate People's Court. 
  Qamjig, the principal criminal, was sentenced to death for 
having purchased more than 1,000 grams of narcotics in Yunnan 
Province and resold them in Tibet at high profits. After the 
judgement was announced, Qamjig lodged an appeal. The Tibet 
Autonomous Regional Supreme People's Court reviewed the case, 
rejected Qamjig's appeal and reported to the Supreme People's 
Court of the People's Republic of China (PRC). According to the 
order of the president of the Supreme People's Court of the PRC, 
Qamjig was executed. 
  Another principal criminal in the case was Dojie, who was 
sentenced to life imprisonment. 
  The two accessories in the case were Huang Tinghong and 
Losang Soinam were sentenced to 15 years imprisonment. [sentence 
as received] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26901 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tibet To Use More Hydroelectric Power </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tibet To Use More Hydroelectric Power </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706103294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1004 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706103294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Lhasa, June 27 (XINHUA) -- The Tibet Autonomous 
Region will use hydro-power in a bid to quadruple its current 
electric power generating capacity by the end of the century, 
according to local government sources. 
  Figures from the regional industrial electricity department 
show that Tibet has one-eighth of China's total area, but its 
entire electric power generation is only 173,400 kw, 0.096 
percent of the country's total. 
  The lack of power is attributed to the underdeveloped social 
and economic conditions in Tibet, especially the low 
industrialisation, according to Liao Ximing, vice-director of 
the department. 
  One of the region's leading electricity projects under way 
is 
a 90,000-kw pumped hydro-electric storage station at the Yamzhog 
Yum Lake. When completed, it will raise the total installed 
capacity in Tibet by 50 percent. The first 25,000-kw generating 
unit will go into operation by the end of next year. 
  Tibet now has 405 small electric power stations, but most of 
them have a generating capacity of only hundreds of kilowatts. 
  "The vastness of land and dispersion of population and 
natural resources in Tibet have led to having these small-scale 
and scattered stations," the vice-director said. In the coming 
years, more stress will be put on the construction of big 
hydro-power stations above 10,000 kw of generating capacity. 
  Tibet is rich in water resources. The region's potential 
water energy is 200 million kw, 30 percent of the country's 
total, and 56 million of this is exploitable. The Yarlung 
Sangbo River and the eastern mountainous areas possess most of 
the energy. 
  A 10,800-kw station is going to generate power next year, 
and 
the design work for several electric power projects are well 
under way. 
  In addition to hydro-electric power, the region will also 
promote the development of solar and geothermal power. 
  So far, more than 600 places which have underground heat 
have 
been found, with an estimated prospect of 800,000 kw installed 
capacity. 
  The 25,000-kw Yangbajain geothermal power station near Lhasa 
is the biggest power station in Tibet. Geological prospectors 
are exploring terrestrial heat 2,600 m underground nearby, and 
local electric power officials estimate that a new 50,000-kw 
geothermal station might be set up. 
  Not long ago, the United Nations Development Programme 
helped 
build a 1,000-kw geothermal power station which went into 
operation last year. 
  Situated on a plateau dubbed "the roof of the world", the 
region also enjoys abundant sunlight all the year round. Now 
Tibet is applying for international aid to establish a modern 
30,000-50,000 kw solar power station near Lhasa. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26902 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan Official Discusses Drug Enforcement Efforts </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yunnan Official Discusses Drug Enforcement Efforts </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806004994 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 0343 GMT 
24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806004994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on interview with Peng Jianfei, secretary of the </F>
Yunnan Provincial Drug Enforcement Commission, by correspondents 
Na Jiahua (4780 1367 7520) and Li Yirong (2621 1355 5816) on 
Seventh International No-Drug Day; place not given: "Plug the 
Sources and Stop the Flow, the Situation Is Grim -- Peng Jianfei 
(1756 1696 7378) on Drug Enforcement in Yunnan"] 
  [Text] Kunming 24 Jun (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE) -- Peng 
Jianfei, secretary of the Yunnan Provincial Drug Enforcement 
Commission, gave an interview on the eve of the Seventh 
International No-Drug Day. 
  Peng Jianfei said: The "Golden Triangle" lying outside 
Yunnan Province is one of the world's key narcotics-producing 
areas. A narcotics production base close to Yunnan's border 
accounts for over 60 percent of the "Golden Triangle's" entire 
output. The source lies outside Yunnan and drug traffickers 
cross into the province to ply their trade. Drug proliferation 
in Yunnan is very serious. 
  Peng Jianfei said: Yunnan's border is some 4,000 km long and 
completely devoid of any natural barrier. With very busy border 
travel, it is ideal for drug smuggling. In the early 1980's, 
there were about 20,000 drug addicts from along Yunnan's 
borders, all of them opium-smokers. By 1990, drug addicts 
throughout the province had increased to some 57,000, most of 
them smoking highly concentrated heroin instead of opium. These 
drug addicts are spending all their money on drugs, their health 
is gone, and most of them are completely unscrupulous. Over 70 
percent of them have committed crimes of various sorts, such as 
theft, prostitution, burglary, and murder, which pose a great 
threat to society. Society as a whole is deeply troubled by 
this phenomenon. State President Jiang Zemin pointed out in all 
seriousness that in a sense, the problem of drug abuse and drug 
trafficking is threatening the prosperity of the whole Chinese 
people, and he warned that this was no alarmist talk. 
  Peng Jianfei told us that Yunnan has been strengthening its 
power to fight against narcotics over last 10 years or so, and 
especially in the past few years, and has scored increasingly 
outstanding results. By 1993, the province's drug population 
had been put under control. Annual drug cases solved rose from 
hundreds to thousands, and drugs seized were measured in tonnes 
instead of grams. From January to May this year, the province 
solved 1,955 drug cases, seizing 2,118.6 kg of heroin, opium, 
and other drugs, and 13.16 million yuan in drug money; and 
arresting 2,808 drug criminals. It also seized 21 guns of 
various kinds, as well as large quantities of stolen goods. The 
number of cases solved, the number of arrests, and the amount of 
heroin seized rose 29, 15, and 27 percent, respectively. 
  Peng Jianfei continued: Drug crime over the last few years 
has acquired a number of new characteristics: More and more 
such crimes are committed by gangs; criminals are becoming more 
professional; more crimes are being committed outside the 
borders; and the means of crime are becoming more covert, 
secretive, and modernized. There has been a sharp increase in 
bribery involving huge amounts of money, arms trafficking, and 
violent resistance of inspections. A total of some 40 such 
cases have been reported since last year. The Yunnan police are 
targeting these criminals, cracking down on them mercilessly, 
and meting out just punishments. 
  Secretary Peng stressed that narcotics will remain a problem 
unless their supply is cut. Aimed at the problem of drugs 
filtering through its borders, the Chinese Government and police 
have held talks on many different levels with the governments 
and police authorities of its neighboring countries concerning 
drug enforcement. Statements were issued from these border 
meetings that anyone breaking Chinese drug laws will be subject 
to punishment by Chinese law! Meanwhile, international 
cooperation in drug enforcement has made progress. On 24 May, 
China, Burma, and the UN Commission on Narcotic Drugs held a 
meeting in Kunming, where they reached consensus and achieved 
substantive results in the areas of pooling information, joint 
investigation of cases, and substitute crops. The meeting will 
prove a motive force for future drug enforcement. 
  Peng Jianfei said: Yunnan's efforts against narcotics have 
caught the world's attention. In recent years, senior 
government officials from many countries, delegates from 
international organizations, and domestic and foreign reporters 
have come to Yunnan to take a personal look at the province's 
antidrug achievements. The trip sharpened their originally dim 
understanding, and they all agreed that Yunnan's antidrug work 
had made an important contribution to the international 
community. It was even truer when the visitors were visibly 
touched by the loyalty of the police officers when they saw them 
camping in the rough and manning their posts under extremely 
difficult onditions. On a fact-finding tour of Kunming early 
this year, Robert Gelbard, U.S. assistant secretary of state for 
international narcotics matters, said that "the Yunnan police 
are on the frontline of the international drug fight," 
expressing his hope for close cooperation with China in drug 
enforcement. Visiting officials suggested promoting China's 
antidrug experience all over the world. 
  In conclusion, Peng Jianfei stated that the antidrug effort 
will not stop for a moment as long as drugs are still around. 
It is the sacred duty of the Yunnan police to stem the tide and 
plug sources of supply, eliminate drugs, and stop them from 
harming China and the world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26903 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_q_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan's Light Industry Output Exceeds Heavy Output </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yunnan's Light Industry Output Exceeds Heavy Output </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806022594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0130 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806022594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Kunming, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Light industrial output 
value has finally surpassed that of heavy industry in Yunnan, 
and the province boasts ample supplies of grain and meat instead 
of relying on other provinces, marking the success of economic 
readjustment in the remote southwest province. 
  Over the past 15 years, the province's financial revenue has 
shown 17-fold growth, well above the national average. The 
province, which makes 70 percent of China's top quality 
cigarettes, has also stepped up technological renovation of its 
tobacco industry. 
  Meanwhile, the province has become China's third largest 
sugar producer and its tea production alone earns 30 million 
U.S. dollars in hard currency for the province. 
  According to local sources, the province produces 10 percent 
of China's nonferrous metals. Such sectors as machine-building, 
electronics, rubber and phosphochemicals have also developed 
rapidly. 
  Meanwhile, new sectors such as power, food processing, 
animal 
husbandry and medicine are expected to emerge as the province's 
major industries. 
  The construction of a group of major hydroelectric power 
stations like Lubuge, Manwan and Dachaoshan, with a total 
investment of 20 billion yuan, will push Yunnan's electricity 
capacity from the existing 3.07 million kw to nine million kw by 
the year 2000. 
  To further enhance economic readjustment in the province, 
Yunnan will pour a total of 13 billion yuan into the 
construction of water conservancy projects. Ambitious plans are 
being mapped out to build highways, airports and large 
telecommunications projects to modernize this remote Chinese 
province. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26904 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_r_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Sets Up Security Association To Aid Police </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Sets Up Security Association To Aid Police </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806012994 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in English 1201 GMT 
27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806012994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (CNS) -- The China Security 
Association is set up today here with the aim of helping the 
police to maintain public security. Former Minister of Public 
Security, Mr. Wang Fang, and former Chief Procurator of the 
Supreme People's Procuratorate, Mr. Liu Fuzhi, have attended the 
meeting as its honorary presidents. 
  Security service as an auxiliary force for the police to 
prevent crime and safeguard the social order has developed into 
a new mass organization. There are to date some 1,000 security 
companies across the country, with employment of 200,000. 
  Speaking at the first meeting of representatives of the 
association, Vice Minister of Public Security Mou Xinsheng said 
that China saw so much change in public order since the 
implementation of reform and the opening to the outside world 
with the rise in criminal activities and various kinds of 
problems of social order. The police alone, according to the 
security official, is unable to shoulder the task to safeguard 
the public order, and security companies can help in this 
regard. Prospects for this profession are therefore very 
promising. 
  The security companies have to give priority to social 
benefits, according to the president of the association, Mr. Gao 
Xu. He added that the business scope had to be centred on 
offering security service and strictly following regulations 
which prohibited the running of firearms and police uniform 
business. The association will persistently improve its service 
and the quality of its ranks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26905 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_r_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Developing Technological Zones </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Developing Technological Zones </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806081894 Beijing BEIJING RIBAO in Chinese 16 Jun 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806081894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BEIJING RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Reporter Zhao Jingyun (6392 7231 0061): "The </F>
Construction of the New-Tech Industrial Development Experimental 
Zone, the Beijing Economic and Technological Development Zone, 
and the District and County Small Industrial Zones Has 
Preliminarily Taken Shape"] 
  [Excerpts] Reporter learned of the fact from the foreign 
capital work conference of the new-tech industrial development 
experimental zone, the Beijing economic and technological 
development zone, and the district and county small industrial 
zones that the construction of these "three zones" has 
preliminarily taken shape, and these three zones will become new 
growing points, sources of radiation, and productive forces for 
urban and rural economic development. 
  The development and construction of these "three zones" are 
a 
major strategic policy decision for deepening reform and 
expanding the scale of opening up, a key way for realizing the 
overall urban and rural plan and accelerating the readjustment 
of the overall urban and rural arrangement, and a key way for 
coordinating urban areas with rural ones and reducing the 
differences between urban and rural areas; and will play an 
extremely important role in readjusting the industrial structure 
and the product mix. At present, the municipality has had a 
state-level new-tech industrial development experimental zone, a 
municipal-level economic and technological development zone, and 
22 district- and county-level small industrial zones; and an 
open-typed economic development pattern characterized by urban 
areas and rural areas' combination, rational distribution, 
mutual reliance, and coordinate development has preliminarily 
taken shape. Last year, the total industrial output value of 
the "three zones" surpassed 4.5 billion yuan. Thus, the "three 
zones" play an increasingly more noticeable role in the 
municipality's economic construction. [passage omitted] 
  At the time of firmly grasping the construction of 
infrastructural facilities, the "three zones," being popular 
areas with investment by internationally trans-national 
companies, have positively opened for business and introduced 
capital. So far, more than 5,000 enterprises have entered the 
zones. Of this, there are about 1,100 foreign-funded 
enterprises of three types, and nearly $1 billion foreign 
capital have been introduced according to agreements. Some 6.9 
square kilometers of land, valued at 2 billion yuan, have been 
transferred to the enterprises that have entered the "three 
zones." More than 20 internationally famous trans-national 
companies built plants in these "three zones." More than 10 
large trans-national companies are holding talks with the zones. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26906 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_r_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  13 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hebei Secretary Discusses Party School Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hebei Secretary Discusses Party School Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806065094 Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO in Chinese 13 Jun 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806065094 </F>
<F P=104>  Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Cheng Weigao, secretary of the provincial party 
committee and president of the party school of the provincial 
party committee, led the comrades of concerned departments 
directly under the province, in handling work on the spot at the 
party school of the provincial party committee. After hearing 
reports by the party school of the provincial party committee, 
Cheng Weigao stated his views about issues of how to strengthen 
the party school and solve the problems in cadres' education. 
He stressed that to develop the economy, emphasis should be 
placed on cadres; and that to improve cadres, emphasis should be 
placed on party schools. 
  Cheng Weigao said that at present, attention should be paid 
to four aspects of party school work. 
  First, we should conscientiously carry out the guiding 
spirit 
of the central instructions concerning the strengthening of the 
party school work and further clarify the nature, 
characteristics, obligations, reform direction, and objectives 
of the party school. Under the leadership of the party 
committee, party school is the school to educate and train the 
party's cadres according to the requirements of the socialist 
modernization, is an important front for training leading cadres 
at all levels, developing the theoretical backbone, and studying 
and doing research of Marxism-Leninism-Mao Zedong Thought, and 
is also the furnace for cadres to strengthen the tempering of 
the party spirit. Party schools at all levels should place 
their work emphasis on enhancing the quality of cadres, 
especially the quality of party and government leading cadres at 
all levels, and, through party school education, further turn 
party and government cadres, especially leading cadres, into 
ones who meet the needs in developing the socialist market 
economy and who have political integrity and ability, strong 
party spirit, and good work style. Party schools at all levels 
should conscientiously carry out the spirit of the "opinions of 
the CPC Central Committee on strengthening the party school work 
under the new situation" and successfully conduct party school 
reform closely, in line with the actual conditions of Hebei and 
guided by the theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics put forward by Comrade Deng Xiaoping. This 
overall principle must be firmly adhered to. What kind of 
talented persons should party schools train, what are the 
problems of the persons to be trained, and what problems should 
we emphatically solve in developing these types of talented 
persons? If this question and the objective of training are not 
clarified, the reform of the teaching of party schools will not 
succeed. There are three main tasks for the party school of the 
provincial party committee: 1) To cultivate leading cadres, 2) 
to play a teacher-training role among party schools and train 
teachers for party schools at all levels, and 3) to conduct 
theoretical study. The first two points are the main focus. 
Reform is the way to successfully build the two civilizations 
in Hebei, and the crux is cadres. The party school assumes the 
main responsibility of enhancing the quality and the level of 
cadres. 
  Second, in the reform of the education of the party school, 
we should emphasize mastery of one theory, learning of two 
knowledges, establishment of one concept, and initiation of one 
spirit. The one theory is the theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics put forward by Comrade Deng Xiaoping. 
At present, many cadres in Hebei still have a long way to go to 
thoroughly understand and comprehensively master Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. For example, they often fail in handling the 
three cardinal issues on work practice. 1) They fail to uphold 
well the cardinal viewpoint that "development is the essential 
criterion." 2) They fail to uphold the criterion of "three 
advantages." When anything comes up, some cadres still 
contemplate first upon whether it belongs to socialism or 
capitalism and banish the "three advantages" from their minds. 
3) They fail to successfully adhere to the policy of "attaching 
equal importance to two tasks and never wavering in either." 
One manifestation is "doing well in one task but not in the 
other;" and the other is that both tasks are not done well. 
Even persons in charge of the spiritual civilization do not do 
tasks well and lack boldness and assurance. Hence, party 
schools at all levels should regard the theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics as the central substance 
of their teaching, adhere to arming leading cadres at all 
levels and the whole party with this theory without wavering, 
work with perseverance, and, by our effort, enable party and 
government leading cadres at all levels to have a comprehensive, 
in-depth, and correct understanding of the scientific system of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and to firmly and consciously adhere to 
the party's basic line. 
  Knowledge of the socialist market economy and knowledge 
of modern science and technology comprise the two knowledges. A 
large number of our comrades are influenced by the system of the 
planned economy and are accustomed to the old, stereotypical way 
of thinking and working. They apply lots of old thinking and 
very little new knowledge. For young cadres, the socialist 
market economy and modern scientific and technological knowledge 
are also a new field of knowledge. Therefore, unless the vast 
number of cadres across the province take the learning of the 
two knowledges as a priority, they cannot meet the requirements 
of reform, opening up, and the development of the socialist 
market economy. Party schools at all levels should make the 
"two knowledges" an essential element in teaching. 
  One concept refers to the concept of the party spirit. Some 
of our leading cadres, with few years of party standing and 
little party nurturing, joined the party without any test or 
risk. Some cadres lack revolutionary steadfastness, and their 
party spirit and sense of the party are vague. They have not 
established a correct outlook on the world, life, and values, 
and they cannot adopt the correct attitude towards the relations 
between the individual and the organization and between the 
individual and the masses. Some cadres do not even know the 
party's elementary rules. Thus it can be seen that the 
political quality of the cadre contingent is in need of prompt 
improvement. As party schools are the schools of the party, 
they should stress the education on the party spirit and give 
priority to strengthening the cultivation and tempering of 
cadres with party spirit. 
  One spirit is the spirit of arduous effort in pioneering a 
new cause. Some cadres are influenced by the ideas of money 
worship, pleasure-seeking, and extreme individualism. They seek 
fame and gain, covet comfort, and lack the spirit of sacrifice, 
solid work, arduous efforts, and pioneering of an undertaking. 
They lack arduous efforts in work, in thinking, and in style, 
their spirit in making painstaking and enterprising efforts is 
weak, and they have thrown away the fine traditions and work 
styles of the party. In view of the actual ideological level of 
cadres, party schools should intensify the education on arduous 
effort to call back the cadres' spirit of pioneering an 
undertaking through arduous effort so that their political 
quality can be improved significantly. 
  Third, the crux of running party schools well is to pay 
attention to the teaching and research contingent. Party school 
teachers are the backbone force of party school education. All 
party school teachers, backbone force of teaching, and 
administrative leading cadres must possess higher political and 
vocational quality. Above all, they should be tempered well 
with party spirit to continuously upgrade their level of party 
spirit. Party schools should stick to the policy of integrating 
theory with practice in their teaching. Teaching from book to 
book and from theory to theory without knowing practice and the 
ideological trend of cadres, they cannot solve problems. The 
organization department and the propaganda department should 
often study party school work with the party school of the 
provincial party committee and provide it with the materials 
concerning the ideological and the working conditions of the 
cadre contingent. The organization department and the actual 
working department must give support and convenience for party 
school teachers to conduct social survey and investigation and 
study. Party school teachers may work in departments, bureaus, 
cities, counties, and enterprises. The party school of the 
provincial party committee may also organize and send groups to 
outside the border and outside the country to conduct 
observation activities or undergo training in order to widen 
their field of vision and constantly strengthen the ability of 
integrating theory with practice. 
  Fourth, party committees at all levels must conscientiously 
attach importance to party school work and really solve the 
practical problems in the construction of party schools. The 
primary task of party committees at all levels is to pay 
attention to the building of the cadre contingent; and to 
improve the cadre contingent, party schools should be improved. 
To develop the economy, emphasis should be placed on cadres; 
and to improve cadres, emphasis should be placed on party 
schools. Two points should be focused in building the party 
school. 1) We should build a good contingent of the party 
school, stabilize it, and continuously improve its overall 
quality. We should make sure that this contingent is improving 
and be concerned about its work and life. 2) We should build the 
infrastructure of party schools well, improve the condition of 
running schools, and continuously enhance the ability of running 
schools. The construction of the party school is an important 
aspect of party building, and there should be no grudge in 
investing in this aspect and spending money on party building 
and the spiritual civilization. 
  With regard to teaching, capital construction projects, the 
teachers and the students' work, and some specific problems in 
learning, Cheng Weigao along with the comrades of the 
departments directly under the province studied the opinions on 
ways to deal with them and resolved a batch of problems in need 
of urgent solutions. 
  Li Zhanshu, standing committee member and secretary general 
of the provincial party committee, attended the on-the-spot 
handling of work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26907 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_r_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  20 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hebei Reports Personnel Appointments, Dismissals </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hebei Reports Personnel Appointments, Dismissals </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806081494 Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO in Chinese 20 Jun 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806081494 </F>
<F P=104>  Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpt] The provincial government decided to appoint the 
following functionaries on 1 June 1994: 
  Zou Benzhen [6760 2609 4176] was appointed vice chairman of 
the provincial economic and trade committee; Zhang Baorui [1728 
1405 3843] was appointed director of the provincial 
pharmaceutical management bureau; Deng Guohua [6772 0948 5478] 
and Ning Zhongyi [1337 1813 5030] were appointed deputy 
directors of the provincial pharmaceutical management bureau; 
Xuan Zhenfu [1357 2182 1381] was appointed deputy director of 
the provincial tourist bureau; Zhang Yingjie [1728 5391 2638] 
was appointed deputy director of the provincial national defense 
scientific and technological industrial office; Han Naiyi [7281 
0035 5030] was appointed deputy director of the provincial water 
resources department; and Chen Benjin [7115 2609 6855] was 
appointed deputy director of the provincial public security 
department. 
  It also decided to remove Cheng Guangwen [4453 1639 2429] 
from his post as deputy director of the provincial public 
security department, and appoint Wu Jiaxiang [0702 1367 7534] 
vice chairman of the provincial education committee. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26908 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_u_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PRC MEDIA ON TAIWAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qiandahu Case Leads To Study of Cross-Strait Relations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qiandahu Case Leads To Study of Cross-Strait Relations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706125094 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1334 GMT 
16 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706125094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by special correspondent Li Lun (2621 0243): </F>
"Refuting Lies With Facts, Promoting Cooperation With Sincerity"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 16 Jun (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE) -- Recently 
some people in the Taiwan "Mainland Affairs Committee" and 
Straits Exchange Foundation [SEF] have unreasonably accused the 
mainland's Association for Relations Across the Taiwan Strait 
[ARATS] of not maintaining smooth communications with SEF in 
handling the "Qiandaohu case." They also have attacked ARATS as 
an "obstacle" to cross-strait relations because it did not allow 
the SEF to send personnel to accompany the Taiwan victims' 
family members to the site of the incident. The material 
published by ARATS today clarifies the truth by presenting a 
host of facts, thus fully and effectively refuting these 
people's wanton distortions and wicked slanders. 
  As everyone knows, respecting and earnestly implementing 
agreements reached between ARATS and the SEF is a precondition 
and important basis for establishing mutual trust and 
cooperation between these two organizations. In terms of the 
two organizations' relations and cooperation, strict observance 
and loyal implementation of the relevant agreements involve two 
mutually related aspects: One is that both sides must do what 
must be done according to the provisions of the relevant 
agreements; the other is that neither side should overstep, 
under any pretext, the provisions of the agreements or make 
arbitrary demands that embarrass the other side. In handling 
the aftermath of the "Qiandaohu incident," ARATS strictly abided 
by the relevant agreements, did a lot of work, and kept the 
communications lines open. This reporter learned that at the 
talks between Wang Daohan [ARATS chairman] and Koo Cheng-fu [SEF 
board chairman] last year, they discussed how to handle the 
problem of one side's personnel proceeding to the site of an 
incident on the other side in case of emergency. As an incident 
must be handled by the side on which it breaks out, no agreement 
was reached at the talks on how one side should authorize a 
delegation to proceed to the site of the incident. The SEF's 
request to send personnel to accompany the victims' family 
members to the site of the "Qiandaohu incident" obviously went 
beyond the agreements between the two sides, so it is 
understandable that ARATS did not agree with the request. What 
is noteworthy is that some people in Taiwan made requests 
contrary to the agreements, purposely damaged the solemnness of 
the agreements, and took advantage of the incident to exaggerate 
other issues. This constituted disrespect for the agreements 
reached by ARATS and the SEF, and was aimed at instigating some 
people who were not clear about the truth to oppose the mainland 
and viciously attack ARATS. This fully portrayed their rudeness 
and recklessness, and the fact that they had ulterior motives. 
Compatriots on both sides of the strait must take precautions 
against this. 
  ARATS and the SEF are authorized mass organizations that 
undertake the heavy responsibility of promoting exchanges 
between the two sides. Compatriots on both sides strongly hope 
that the two organizations can sincerely cooperate in promoting 
the two sides' relations. Some people's vicious attacks on 
ARATS are not in the least advantageous to the two 
organizations' cooperation, but will only cause serious harm to 
this cooperation and to relations between the two sides of the 
strait. Whether or not facts are honestly respected and the two 
organizations' agreements are strictly observed are important 
points determining whether cooperation can be smoothly carried 
out between the two organizations. If some people in Taiwan 
still regard the agreements as trifling matters and take 
advantage of contingencies to force others to implement their 
unilateral ideas, this will ruin the two organizations' mutual 
trust and cooperation, instead of achieving good results. We 
will wait and see whether these people will continue to create 
obstacles to the two organizations' cooperation or will 
cooperate with the mainland and do something practical for the 
two sides' exchanges. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26909 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_u_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PRC MEDIA ON TAIWAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former Taiwan Premier Criticizes `Separatist Tendency' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Former Taiwan Premier Criticizes `Separatist Tendency' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806053194 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
28 Jun 94 p 7 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806053194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Daniel Kwan, recently in Taipei] </F>
  [Text] The separatist tendency within Taiwan's leadership 
is far more dangerous to cross-strait relations than the Qiandao 
Lake murders, according to former premier Hau Pei-tsun. Mr Hau, 
vice-chairman of the Kuomintang (KMT), lamented the decline of 
the ruling party and expressed worry that the KMT might lose to 
the opposition Democratic Progressive Party in the 1996 
presidential election if its leadership failed to "wake up and 
face up to" its problems. 
  In an interview with Hong Kong journalists, the former 
premier said the separatist arguments expressed by individual 
political leaders in Taiwan hurt cross-strait relations more 
than the Qiandao Lake murders. The murders, when three 
mainlanders killed 24 Taiwanese tourists on board a pleasure 
boat in the Qiandao Lake in Zhejiang Province in March, at one 
point almost brought Taiwan- mainland exchanges to a standstill. 
  Although Mr Hau did not identify the political leaders, 
political analysts said he was referring to President Li 
Teng-hui who caused an uproar in the island last month when he 
described the KMT as a "foreign regime" and compared his 
government in Taiwan with those of Moses leading the Israelites 
out of Egypt in an interview with Japanese writer Ryotaro Shiba. 
  When asked to comment on Mr Li's remarks, Mr Hau said: "Oh! 
All I can say is that I can hardly understand. I can't agree 
with this kind of talk. But I am not in power and I take no 
responsibility. These (arguments) are the most important reason 
behind the present poor relationship between the mainland and 
Taiwan," he said. "They are even far more harmful than the 
Qiandao Lake incident," he added. 
  The former premier, who stepped down last year, also greatly 
disapproved of the rise of the so-called "strongman-like 
politics" in the KMT and did not hide his frustration in the 
interview that the KMT was no longer the same political party 
founded by the national father Dr Sun Yat-sen a century ago. 
  Instead, it was the New Party -- a spin-off from the KMT 
last 
year -- that could truly claim to be the real KMT, he said. "In 
reality, it is the New Party which represents the traditional 
value of the KMT... But I can't join the New Party, as a real 
KMT, (I believe) one must stay in the party and try to do 
something to reform the party," he said. "The problem we (KMT) 
face today is that we can't find a consensus within the party. 
This is very unhealthy and this struggle for (political) power 
got mixed with the lust for (personal) gains. This is a 
fundamental problem facing the KMT today and we need to look 
into it seriously," he said. And Mr Li, who is the KMT 
chairman, could not deny responsibility for the present poor 
shape of the party, Mr Hau said. 
  Although the former premier said he was optimistic Taiwan 
and 
the mainland would eventually be reunited, he made it clear 
Taipei could not accept the "one-country-two-system" formula 
suggested by Beijing. Instead of bullying Taiwan, Beijing 
should resume political reform and democratisation before both 
sides could engage in meaningful discussions on reunification. 
  But Mr Hau said both Taiwan and the mainland must first 
accept the principles of "one China, (reunification) through 
peaceful and democratic means" as the "basis for negotiation." 
"In my view, cross-strait relations can improve gradually if we 
(can accept) these principles." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26910 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Medical Team Completes Service in Ethiopia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Medical Team Completes Service in Ethiopia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2606203694 Beijing XINHUA in English 2019 GMT 26 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2606203694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Addis ababa, June 26 (XINHUA) -- A Chinese medical 
team composed of 15 doctors left here today for home after 
completing its two-year service here. 
  This is the 7th Chinese medical team which has worked in 
Ethiopia in accordance with an agreement between China and 
Ethiopia. 
  Since their arrival here in June 1992, the Chinese doctors 
have treated patients of various descriptions amounting to some 
100,000. The Chinese doctors were commended very much by 
Ethiopian people for their outstanding work and contribution to 
the Ethiopian health service. 
  The Chinese doctors were from Henan Province in central 
China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26911 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Party on Six Day Visit </H4>

<F P=102> OW2606082094 Beijing XINHUA in English 0747 GMT 26 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2606082094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 26 (XINHUA) -- President Cassam Uteem 
of the Republic of Mauritius and his party arrived here this 
afternoon for a six-day state visit to China. 
  They were greeted at the airport by Liu Deyou, chairman of 
the Chinese Government Reception Committee and vice minister of 
culture, and Wang Changyi, assistant foreign minister. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26912 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets With Jiang Zemin </H4>

<F P=102> OW2706144294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1429 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706144294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- Chinese President Jiang 
Z.Emin met with Cassam Uteem, visiting president of the Republic 
of Mauritius, here this afternoon. 
  The two exchanged views on bilateral relations as well as 
other issues of common concern. 
  Welcoming uteem as the first Mauritian president to visit 
China, Jiang said that he is confident that the current visit by 
Uteem will surely promote bilateral friendship. 
  Jiang expressed satisfaction over the development of 
bilateral cooperative relations, saying that China appreciates 
the Mauritian Government's stand of "one China" and establishing 
no official relations with Taiwan. 
  Jiang pointed out that China and Mauritius enjoy traditional 
friendship and that the friendly exchanges and economic 
cooperation between the two countries have witnessed tremendous 
progress. 
  China is willing to work with Mauritius to further 
strengthen 
such friendship and cooperation, Jiang added. 
  Jiang spoke highly of Mauritius' social stability, its 
sustained economic development and the harmonious relations 
between various nationalities in the country. 
  The Mauritian Government and people have made unremitting 
efforts and achieved a lot in seeking peace and development, 
Jiang said. 
  Noting that among African nations, Mauritius is the country 
with the largest Chinese minority population, Jiang expressed 
his hope that the Chinese with Mauritian citizenship will abide 
by the laws of Mauritius, pay respect to the country's customs 
and religion, get along well with the other nationalities, and 
thus become a bridge linking friendship between China and 
Mauritius. 
  Uteem said that China was one of the earliest countries for 
Mauritius to set up diplomatic relations with, and that he 
cherishes the traditional friendship between the two countries. 
  The president said that the Mauritian people regard the 
Chinese people as their brothers and hoped to further strengthen 
the friendly relations between them. 
  Uteem said that under the guidance of Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics, great 
changes have taken place in China and attracted worldwide 
attention. 
  He said the Mauritian people are very happy to see that 
China 
is getting stronger and stronger. 
  To show the friendly feelings the Mauritian people have 
toward the Chinese, Uteem, on behalf of the Mauritian 
Government, donated 500,000 Mauritius rupees to flood-stricken 
areas in south China. Jiang expressed his thanks. 
  Prior to the meeting, Jiang presided over a ceremony 
welcoming President Uteem. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26913 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mauritius President Cassam Uteem Arrives in Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets With Qiao Shi </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806052494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0435 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806052494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China is willing to 
further develop its friendship and enhance its co-operation in 
all fields with Mauritius on the basis of equality and mutual 
benefit. 
  Qiao Shi, chairman of China's National People's Congress 
(NPC) Standing Committee, said this here today when meeting with 
Mauritian President Cassam Uteem. 
  During their meeting in the Great Hall of the People Qiao 
and 
Uteem expressed their mutual wish to expand the bilateral co- 
operation. 
  Qiao praised the great efforts made by President Uteem and 
the Mauritian Government in developing the Indian Ocean 
country's national economy and raising its people's living 
standards. 
  The experience of Mauritius shows that, Qiao said, so long 
as 
a country maintains political stability and national unity, and 
concentrates on developing its economy in accordance with its 
national conditions, it will surely keep its economy 
continuously developing and its people's living standards 
continuously rising. 
  President Uteem said that he believed that his present trip 
to China would further enhance the friendly relations between 
the two countries. 
  China's rapid development has aroused great attention in 
Mauritius, the president said. 
  He added, "We believe that China will play a more important 
role in the future in international affairs." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26914 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Navy Delegation Visits Tanzania, Holds Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Navy Delegation Visits Tanzania, Holds Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2606125894 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0506 
GMT 22 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2606125894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Pei Shanqin (5952 0810 0530)] </F>
  [Text] Dar es Salaam, 21 Jun (XINHUA) -- Kinana, minister 
of state for defense and national service of the Tanzanian 
President's Office, said today that deep-rooted friendship had 
been established between the Tanzanian and Chinese armed forces 
and the friendly and cooperative relations between the two armed 
forces had developed extensively. He hoped the relations will 
further develop and be strengthened in the new situation. 
  Kinana made these remarks during a meeting with a Chinese 
Navy delegation led by Vice Admiral Chen Mingshan, deputy 
commander of the Chinese Navy. 
  Recalling his visit to China in October last year, Kinana 
said China had enjoyed political stability and economic 
prosperity, its military was also very powerful, and that he was 
deeply impressed by all this. He said: "We feel happy for 
China's prosperity and development. China's power is an 
important factor for maintaining world stability and 
development." 
  Chen Mingshan also held formal talks on 20 June with General 
(Muboma) and Commodore (Sander,) respectively commander of the 
National Defense Forces and commander of the Navy of Tanzania, 
on further strengthening cooperation between the two navies. 
  The five-member delegation led by Vice Admiral Chen Mingshan 
arrived in Dar es Salaam on 18 June for a six-day goodwill visit 
to Tanzania. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26915 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_g_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Firm Signs Contract for Tanzanian Power Project </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Firm Signs Contract for Tanzanian Power Project </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706180594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1724 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706180594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Pei Shanqin] </F>
  [Text] Dar es Salaam, June 27 (XINHUA) -- The Chinese 
Sichuan Corporation for International Techno-Economic 
Co-Operation (Sietco) and the Tanzania Electric Supply Company 
(Tanesco) signed here today a contract for phase one of the 
multi-million dollar Kihansi hydro-power station in Iringa 
region, central Tanzania. 
  Sietco was among the 12 international companies bidding for 
the 30 million U.S. dollar first phase contract. The tender 
documents were opened last September in Dar es Salaam. 
  Under the contract, the Chinese firm will start preparations 
for the power station, which include the construction of a 17 
kilometers access road, air strip, camps, treated water supply, 
power supply and telecommunication facilities. 
  The Kihansi hydropower project is for the construction of 
180mw power plant at the Kihansi River falls situated in Iring 
region. The whole project is split into 10 different contracts. 
  The project is part of the Power VI program being financed 
by 
the World Bank and other donors including Norway, European 
Investment Bank, Germany, the United Kingdom and Sweden. The 
total financing package of the Power VI program is 340.5 million 
U.S. dollars, of which the International Development Association 
(IDA) of the World Bank, has already committed 200 million U.S. 
dollars. 
  The managing director of the project said when putting into 
full operation in 1998, the Kihansi hydropower plant would feed 
all its power into the national grid. The project was part of 
the efforts by Tanesco to satisfy the national power demand 
which has been growing tremendously over the years, he added. 
  Sietco, which came to Tanzania more than three years ago, 
has 
so far won seven tenders here, including road rehabilitation 
projects, house building of houses and national park lodges. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26916 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_f_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East &amp; South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mixed Reaction to Report on Hebron Massacre Inquiry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mixed Reaction to Report on Hebron Massacre Inquiry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706124394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1158 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706124394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Xie Dongfeng] </F>
  [Text] June 27, Jerusalem (XINHUA) -- The supreme court 
commission's report on inquiry into the Hebron massacre has 
drawn mixed reactions, with right-wing groups laughing and 
left-wing movements dismayed over the too much leniency toward 
Jewish settlers. 
  Almost with no exception, politicians on the left Sunday [26 
Jun] decried the fact that the commission did not blame or 
penalize the West Bank Jewish settlers. 
  The Meretz Party's Knesset (Israeli Parliament) faction 
chairman Ran Cohen expressed "deep disappointment in view of the 
commission's leniency toward the extremist settlers." "The 
fact that they continue to do as they please in Hebron attests 
to the failure of this commission," he said. 
  Another Meretz member of Knesset (MK) Dedi Zucker charged 
that the commission only dealt with the massacre itself and not 
with the conditions of occupation. It should have reached 
conclusions about the occupation and the settlers, he said. 
  Mk Abdul Wahab Darawshe from the Democratic Arab Party 
complained that the commission "was too easy on the settlers, 
who are the villains here." He said the commission should 
recommend disarming all the settlers immediately. 
  The commission released its report Sunday, stating that the 
massacre on February 25 was "premeditated and carried out alone" 
by Kiryat Arba settler Baruch Goldstein. Goldstein opened fire 
and killed some 30 Muslim worshippers at the Ibrahimi Mosque 
inside the Machpela cave of Hebron. 
  The report criticized the security forces who should have 
been present inside the cave for failing to be there at the time 
when the massacre occurred. 
  To upgrade security around the cave, the commission 
recommended in the report a ban on Jewish settlers and soldiers 
to enter the site with weapons. 
  It also recommended that security around and in the cave be 
provided with special guard units. 
  Obviously, the opposition Likud Party and the National 
Religious Party (NRP), which both advocate expanding settlement 
in the occupied territories, were pleased Sunday with the 
report's dealing with the settlers. 
  Likud leader Binyamin Netanyahu said he was pleased that the 
commission cleared the Jewish settlers of the responsibility for 
the massacre "after they have been so maligned and vilified." 
  The NRP said that the report "totally removes the basis for 
the unruly incitement against the settlers as a group who were 
unjustly accused of being guilty collectively for an 
individual's crime." 
  Jewish settlement leaders Sunday gave a partial sigh of 
relief over the report. They were satisfied that blame was not 
placed on the whole settlement community and that the commission 
did not recommend restricting Jewish worship in the Machpela 
cave. 
  Zvi Katsover, head of the Kiryat Arba local council, said 
the 
report was "much less harsh" than he expected, and said "a 
weight has been taken off our shoulders." 
  Meanwhile, Hebron Mayor Mustafa Natshe said he accepted the 
report's conclusion that Goldstein acted alone, but said he was 
upset that the report did not mention the atmosphere in which 
Goldstein committed his crime. 
  "The harassment by settlers continued for months or years 
before, creating the atmosphere in which Goldstein committed his 
crime," he said. 
  Peace groups in Israel, which expressed disappointment over 
the report, have already renewed their calls for the removal of 
Jewish settlements from Hebron. Among the 80,000 residents in 
Hebron, 450 are Jewish settlers. 
  Nevertheless, the Israeli cabinet Sunday night accepted the 
report's conclusions and recommendations. 
  Prime Minister and Defense Minister Yitzhak Rabin has 
pledged 
to fully implement the recommendations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26917 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_f_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East &amp; South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPPCC Vice Chairman Receives Jordanian Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPPCC Vice Chairman Receives Jordanian Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806052594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0451 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806052594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Wan Guoquan, 
vice-chairman of the National Committee of the Chinese People's 
Political Consultative Conference (CPPCC), met with a delegation 
headed by Khalid Tarawne [name as received], vice-president of 
the Jordan- China Friendship Association, here this morning. 
  The four-member delegation arrived here on June 25 as guests 
of the Chinese People's Association for Friendship With Foreign 
Countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26918 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_f_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East &amp; South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qadhdhafi Meets State Councillor Luo Gan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qadhdhafi Meets State Councillor Luo Gan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806110194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1045 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806110194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Sirte, libya, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Libyan leader 
Mu'ammar Qadhdhafi had friendly talks with Luo Gan, Chinese 
State Councillor, here Monday [27 Jun] on bilateral ties between 
the two countries and a number of international issues of mutual 
interest. 
  During the meeting, the Chinese official, who arrived here 
Saturday on a four-day visit to Libya, conveyed the compliments 
and good wishes of Chinese President Jiang Zemin to Colonel 
Qadhdhafi. 
  Luo Gan expressed satisfaction at the development of ties of 
friendship and cooperation between China and Libya, saying that 
the Chinese Government was willing to boost these ties on the 
basis of the five principles of coexistence. 
  Colonel Qadhdhafi welcomed warmly Luo Gan's visit to Libya, 
saying that there are wide prospects for economic cooperation 
between the two countries. 
  The Libyan leader expressed high appreciation for the role 
China played at international assemblies and hoped that China 
would play a greater role in this connection. 
  Qadhdhafi praised the way China is developing its national 
economy. 
  Luo Gan emphasized that the Chinese Government is seeking to 
promote cooperation and solidarity with all developing nations 
and it would make joint efforts with them for the establishment 
of a fair world political and economic order. 
  Also on Monday, Secretary General of Libya's General 
People's 
Commission (Prime Minister) 'Abd-al-Majid al-Qu'ud met with with 
Luo Gan and expressed high appreciation for the remarkable 
achievements secured by China in its economic reform. 
  Al-Qu'ud expressed his belief that it is possible for Libya 
to benefit from China's experiment in this respect. 
  Luo Gan said that developing nations have to learn from each 
other and to benefit from each other's experiments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26919 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_f_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East &amp; South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Opening of Sino-Libya Joint Committee Session </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Opening of Sino-Libya Joint Committee Session </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   LD2706160094 Tripoli JANA in English 1436 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD2706160094 </F>
<F P=104>  Tripoli JANA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 27 Jun (JANA) -- The activities of the 
fifth session of the Joint Libyan-Chinese Committee began this 
morning in Beijing attended by the secretary of the General 
Peoples Committee for Industry and Minerals and Wu Yi, the 
Chinese minister for foreign trade and economic co-operation. 
  The secretary gave a speech at the opening session in which 
he reaffirmed the depth of the cooperation and friendship 
between the two friendly nations and applauded the progress in 
relatioms between the two countries, whose foundations were 
established when the leader of the great Al Fatih revolution 
visited China. 
  In his speech, the secretary indicated that the Great 
Jamahiriyah was directing its efforts towards economic and 
commercial cooperation with Asia, particularly China. 
  The Chinese minister for foreign trade and economic 
cooperation also gave a speech in which she applauded the 
relationship between the two countries and said that the holding 
of the meeting of the Joint Libyan-Chinese Committee in Beijing 
and the visit by the Chinese State Council advisor to the Great 
Jamahiriyah in the same period were a strong indiation of the 
strength of this relationship and the two countries' 
determination to strengthen and develop these relations. The 
minister ended her speech by saying that this cooperation had 
made noticeable progress over the last two years. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26920 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_m_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhang Wannian Views Reform of Military-Run Businesses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhang Wannian Views Reform of Military-Run Businesses </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706115094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1013 
GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706115094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Xu Jingyue (1776 0079 6460) and correspondent </F>
Zhou Xiangyu (0719 7449 3768)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 23 Jun (XINHUA) -- At a forum on 
consolidation and reform of business operations sponsored by the 
General Staff Department today, Zhang Wannian, member of the 
Central Military Commission [CMC] and chief of general staff, 
stressed that consolidation and reform of military-run business 
operations represents a major policy decision the CMC has 
adopted on the basis of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's ideas on army 
building, the overall interests of the party and state, the 
military's fundamental functions, and its long-term development. 
The General Staff Department must play an exemplary leading 
role in the consolidation and reform. 
  Zhang Wannian said: Consolidation and reform of business 
operations has a bearing on the preservance of our military's 
nature and objectives and on the overall interest of army 
building and national development. It is a solemn political 
task. We must unswervingly attend to this task with a high 
sense of responsibility for the army, the state, and the people 
and carry out this task through to the end until success. 
  Zheng Wannian pointed out: The CMC and its chairman Jiang 
Zemin have emphasized repeatedly that it is necessary to run the 
military with strict discipline. The crux of the various tasks 
in the military lies in implementation. We must implement the 
guidelines of the various CMC decisions to the letter and 
accomplish the task of consolidating and reforming production 
and operations with high quality work and high standards. While 
enhancing discipline in production and operations, efforts 
should be made to conduct education or rectification in regard 
to weak points in work of military organs. Special attention 
should be paid to units that are not supposed to engage in 
business operations as well as consolidation and reform of 
business operations run by army units stationed in the special 
economic zones. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26921 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_m_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Commander Attends Militia Work Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Commander Attends Militia Work Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2606033494 Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 25 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2606033494 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] On 25 June in Linyi, the provincial government and 
the provincial military district cosponsored a work conference 
on construction and management of militia equipment, warehouses, 
and (?arms repair centers). 
  Yi Yuanqiu, commander of the provincial military district, 
pointed out at the conference: At present and in the 
foreseeable future, we should achieve the development and 
readjustment of militia arms and equipment; ceaselessly upgrade 
their technological guaranteeing capability; realistically 
strengthen the safety in their management; make the militia arms 
and equipment attain, on a step-by-step basis, the goals of 
higher quality, reasonable distribution, good technology, and 
safety in storage; and enhance the militiamen's ability in 
supporting the Army's operations and shouldering the task of 
safeguarding social order. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26922 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_m_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   PLA Adopts System for Promoting High-Ranking Cadres </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PLA Adopts System for Promoting High-Ranking Cadres </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706124594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0502 
GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706124594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Xu Jingyue (1776 0079 6460) and correspondent </F>
Jing Shuzhan (2529 2118 1455)] 
  (Text] Beijing, 24 Jun (XINHUA) -- The People's Liberation 
Army [PLA] has established a motivation and control mechanism in 
the selection and promotion of high-ranking cadres who received 
training at military academies. Thanks to this mechanism, a 
large number of high-ranking military cadres have been promoted 
after receiving systematic training at the National Defense 
University [NDU] and going through rigorous performance 
evaluation. Some 330 of them have been promoted to military 
district or region posts. 
  Assigning cadres to military academies for later promotion 
is 
a basic cadre training and promotion system established by the 
Central Military Commission [CMC] for the Army in the new 
period. It is also the route a high-ranking cadre must go 
through to cultivate a high degree of political awareness, 
master modern military technology, and acquire the art of 
command in modern warfare in the new situation. The NDU, which 
shoulders the task of training high-ranking cadres for the 
entire Army, has fully displayed the role of a collective cadres 
headquarters called for by Comrade Deng Xiaoping. In the last 
eight years, it has run 23 different kinds of classes and 
trained 4,400 students. Some 4,080 students have graduated 
(completed the courses). Among those who graduated (completed 
the course) from the command training classes and high-ranking 
cadres training classes, 147 have been promoted to deputy army 
leadership posts, 119 to army leadership posts, 51 to deputy 
leadership posts in military regions, and 13 to leadership posts 
in military regions. 
  In operating the school, the NDU upholds Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics as its basic guide; earnestly implements the 
CMC's military strategic principles in the new period; works 
hard to raise the students' political, theoretical, and 
leadership standards; and enhances the students' organizational 
and command skills. To more successfully implement this school 
operation concept, it established, based on the instruction 
issued by CMC leaders, a complete performance evaluation system 
for students from enrollment until graduation. This has brought 
the work of training high-ranking military cadres to a regular, 
systematic path. 
  The NDU makes persistent efforts to bring into play the 
overall superiority of the military academy's performance 
evaluation system, uphold the implementation of the various 
evaluation rules and regulations, integrate comprehensive 
performance evaluations with training and education, and 
objectively and fairly evaluate and recommend students. This 
kind of evaluation is comprehensive. For instance, evaluation 
of students at command training classes includes political, 
military, science and cultural standards, intellectual 
standards, progress in study, personality and moral 
characteristics, physical fitness standards, and potential for 
development. Based on the results of an evaluation, a 
recommendation containing views on the students will be 
presented. Students who are rated outstanding will be 
recommended for promotion on a priority basis or for promotion 
outside the normal routes. Students who are rated ordinary will 
be recommended for regular assignment. Students who are rated 
poor will be criticized and educated. Those who fail to improve 
after being criticized and educated will be eliminated. In the 
past two years, the NDU has sent evaluation materials and 
recommendation views on more than 300 high-ranking 
cadre-students to the CMC and the General Political Department, 
playing an important role in the assignment of outstanding 
high-ranking cadres who are have both political awareness and 
professional competence. 
  The performance evaluation system also possesses notable 
motivation power for high-ranking cadres studying at the 
academy. The proportion of outstanding students in the academy 
has gradually increased in recent years, and the quality of 
instruction has also notably improved. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26923 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll Questions Governor's Role in Run-Up to 1997 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Poll Questions Governor's Role in Run-Up to 1997 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2606075894 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING POST in 
English 26 Jun 94 pp 1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> HK2606075894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Political Editor Danny Gittings and Queenie Wang] </F>
  [Text] Chris Patten, preparing for the most important week 
of his governorship, has been told by Hong Kong people that he 
has no useful role to play in the territory's affairs once 
Wednesday's crucial vote on his political reforms is over. 
While an apathetic public is prepared to let Legislative 
Councillors decide the future course of the territory's 
constitution, an exclusive SUNDAY MORNING POST poll also reveals 
a majority believe Mr Patten's job here is now done... whatever 
the outcome of the vote. 
  Government House last night rejected the poll's findings, 
with spokesman Mike Hanson saying: "The Governor has a very 
full agenda in the final three years and Mr Patten will be 
staying here to see it through." But it is bound to be a blow 
to Mr Patten, who today launches a last-minute campaign to swing 
wavering legislators round to his political blueprint. 
  The SUNDAY MORNING POST telephone survey of 1,013 people 
reveals 52 per cent of those polled believe Mr Patten no longer 
has a useful role to play here. Thirty-two per cent disagree 
and the remaining 16 per cent are unsure. It also reveals that 
most people believe China will dismantle whatever electoral 
model legislators endorse this week, with a small majority 
saying Beijing is justified in doing so. But the overwhelming 
impression is of a lack of interest in the final chapter to the 
two-year-long political reform saga. Few people have any 
preference for Mr Patten's bill, or the amendments legislators 
have suggested. 
  Writing in today's Sunday Morning Post, Mr Patten attacks in 
particular the Liberal Party's "1994 package" -- the only rival 
electoral model considered to have any chance of success. He 
accuses the party of putting forward proposals "which, to put it 
gently, remove some of the uncertainty from the outcome of the 
democratic process". "There are serious doubts about the 
fairness of the arrangements proposed by the Liberal Party," he 
warns. 
  The poll, conducted by Hong Kong Polling and Business 
Research [PBR] last Wednesday and Thursday, found only 15 per 
cent of those surveyed were interested in the outcome of this 
week's debate, while 69 per cent were not, with 16 per cent 
unsure. The Governor admits, in today's article, that he 
"detects a weariness" among the public on the refortms issue. 
Most admit the debate matters for Hong Kong's future: 55 per 
cent of respondents said it did, while 14 per cent disagreed, 
with 31 per cent unsure. But few seem to care which political 
model is voted through. Only 14 per cent want to see the 
Governor's proposals adopted, while 13 per cent support the 
Liberal Party's "1994 package", proposing smaller functional 
constituencies and a four-sector election committee, similar to 
that contained in the Basic Law. Fifteen per cent backed 
independent legislator Emily Lau Wai-hing's bill for a fully 
directly elected Legislative Council, while one per cent 
supported other models. However they were far outnumbered by 
the 56 per cent who had no preference. 
  An overwhelming 68 per cent are convinced China will carry 
out its threat to dismantle the council in 1997, while only 17 
per cent disagree, with 15 per cent unsure. More worryingly for 
the Governor, 36 per cent believed China would be justified in 
doing so, while 35 per cent disagreed, with 29 per cent unsure. 
  Mr Patten's personal popularity also remained low: with an 
average score of 5.6 -- measured on a scale from one to 10 -- 
lower than that recorded in previous polls. "This shows the 
Governor's popularity has yet to bottom out," said PBR managing 
director Citi Hung Ching-tin, who conducted the survey, which 
had a 54 per cent response rate. 
  The Liberal Party last night hit back at the Governor's 
attack, saying Mr Patten should leave the decision in the hands 
of Hong Kong people, rather than entering the political fray. 
"Six million people will still be here after Mr Patten has 
left." said party spokesman Howard Young, who will propose the 
"1994 package" in the council on Wednesday. "I think he 
specifically attacked us because our amendment has a better 
chance of passing than any other. But he should not be taking 
sides. He should remain neutral. "We are seeking to protect 
the stability of Hong Kong. We do not want a complete change in 
the system in 1995 or 1997," Mr Young added. 
  In other poll findings, eighty-three per cent said Hong Kong 
needed a human rights commission while 10 per cent objected to 
its creation, with seven per cent unsure. Sixty-nine per cent 
said the Government should lift its ban on formal contacts 
between civil servants and members of the Beijing-appointed 
Preliminary Working Committee. Only seven per cent wanted to 
continue the prohibition, while 24 per cent expressed no 
opinion. Fifty-six per cent said they would vote in September's 
District Board polls. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26924 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Party Councillor: Proposals Closer to Basic Law </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Party Councillor: Proposals Closer to Basic Law </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2606074994 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING POST in 
English 26 Jun 94 p 17 </F>

<F P=103> HK2606074994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Opposition view from Howard Young," member of the Liberal </F>
Party Central Committee and legislative councillor for the 
tourism functional constituency: "Liberal Alternative Only 
Viable Choice"] 
  [Text] Our draft, often quoted as the "Liberal Party 1994 
package" is the result of a much wider cross-section of 
Legislative Council members than those of the Liberal Party. It 
stands a reasonable chance of passing the council as an 
alternative to Governor Chris Patten's 1992 measures. There is 
no other viable choice. Hong Kong people want to see compromise 
and stability. Amid signs of a possible thaw in Sino-British 
relations, we do not want to see the arguments of the past two 
years rekindled again on Wednesday. 
  Our measures propose two things which are essential if we 
are 
to have a legislature which converges with the system after 
1997. First, we must create nine new functional constituencies 
to add to the existing 21 as per the Basic Law. Secondly, an 
election committee must be set up to elect 10 Legislative 
Council members, also similar to the system enshrined in the 
Basic Law. 
  Before the promulgation of the Basic Law in 1990, the 
British 
and Chinese governments, through the subsequently revealed 
exchange of diplomatic letters, saw great merit in making the 
pre- and post-1997 Legislative Council dovetail with each other. 
Certain understandings of good faith were in those letters. 
Our package is trying to stick to the essence of those 
understandings. Our draft follows the same principles adopted 
when functional constituencies were introduced by the Hong Kong 
Government. This is fundamentally different from Mr Patten's 
'92 offering which gives new meaning to functional 
constituencies by extending the electorate to everyone who works 
in one of nine broad categories of industries. This type of 
franchise extension is a form of direct election. Calling it 
functional is not calling a spade a spade. We see no reason for 
the nine new functional constituencies to be different in 
concept from the existing 21. The present system is well known 
and understood. It provides stability and balance without 
jeopardising the ultimate goal of achieving full direct 
elections in the long run, which incidentally is also written 
into the Basic Law. 
  The nine new functional constituencies we propose are: 
agriculture and fisheries; textiles and garments; sport, culture 
and entertainment; transport; retail, import and export; 
insurance; electronics and information technology; and two more 
seats for labour. The first five were proposed by both sides 
before the Sino- British talks collapsed. We are just picking 
up where they left off. The expected electorate of these nine 
is about 122,000, compared with only 107,000 spread over the 
existing 21. The average size of new constituencies in our 
package is 2 1/2 times the existing ones. And if the total 
electorate is raised by giving each corporation six directors' 
votes, which we would not object to, if my colleague James Tien 
Pei-chun's amendment to maintain "one company one vote" is not 
accepted, the electorate for these nine is 223,000 -- more than 
twice the total of the current 21. 
  The election committee is something new for Hong Kong, but 
it 
is spelt out clearly in the Basic Law how it is to be composed 
from 1997. Mr Patten's package proposes an election committee 
comprising 346 district board members. Our amendment calls for 
a committee with four equal parts, like the Basic Law, totalling 
396 members, all elected separately by more than 30 different 
sectors of voters. This is not just larger, but also more 
representative than the '92 proposals. What's more, our scheme 
is close to the Basic Law, while Mr Patten's is miles away.We 
notice another non-Liberal Party member Frederick Fung Kin-kee 
has also put forward an amendment to bring the election 
committee more in line with the Basic Law. Our motives are the 
same: convergence and a smooth transition. 
  Mr Patten has, since proposing his '92 draft, said it is up 
to the Legislative Council to decide. Our party chairman Allen 
Lee Peng-fei will meet the Governor tomorrow to re-emphasise our 
call for the three government officials to abstain in 
Wednesday's voting. There will be no constitutional place for 
government officials in the council from 1995 onwards. Since we 
are deciding the composition of our own Legislative Council for 
1995 and the views are divided with so many amendments, it will 
look bad for the British Government if those three votes turn 
out to be the swinging votes in Wednesday's toss-up, because of 
instructions from the last Governor from London. So we're 
saying: leave us alone to make our own choice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26925 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Uncertainty' Growing Over Reform Package Vote </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Uncertainty' Growing Over Reform Package Vote </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806060194 Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD in English 28 Jun 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806060194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Michael Smith] </F>
  [Text] A core of independent legislators look set to 
bolster a direct challenge to Governor Chris Patten's 
constitutional reform package amid growing uncertainty over the 
outcome of tomorrow's historic vote. 
  The margin between success or failure for Mr Patten's push 
for greater democracy in Hong Kong narrowed yesterday with 
independent legislator Eric Li confirming he would support the 
Liberal Party's alternative amendments. Mr Li, spokesman for 
the Breakfast Club--a group of 10 conservative independent 
legislators--said he would give his first preference vote to the 
Liberal Party package. He stressed he was not speaking on 
behalf of other non-aligned legislators but admitted there was 
some "peer group pressure amongst these few legislators who 
commonly come together". 
  The vote, which will determine Hong Kong's political future 
and end the two-year-old Sino-British row over electoral reform, 
now hinges on the decision of a handful of pro-China 
legislators. If they abstain from voting Mr Patten's package is 
expected to pass by a narrow vote, with latest estimates 
predicting Mr Patten has 26 votes of support and 23 against. 
  Legislator Tam Yiu-chung, of the Democratic Alliance for the 
Betterment of Hong Kong, whose vote is expected to be followed 
by other pro-China members, gave no clues as to whether he would 
vote for the Liberals. On Sunday he said he would consider 
supporting any amendments in line with the Basic Law but last 
night refused to comment on individual amendments. 
  Legislators said privately yesterday the Liberal Party had a 
"fifty-fifty" chance of success. "Chris Patten must be 
shivering in his pants," one legislator said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26926 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Urges Vote For Ex Officio Council Members </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Urges Vote For Ex Officio Council Members </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806053994 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
28 Jun 94 p 18 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806053994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] It is true the Governor would feel less sure of 
pushing his electoral package through the Legislative Council 
[Legco] if the three ex officio members were not allowed to 
vote. It is also true they represent the government, not the 
people of Hong Kong, and that their right to vote is an 
anachronism which distorts the democratic process. Both the 
present and future sovereign powers recognise this. 
  But the demand from some in the Liberal Party that they be 
banned from voting on the electoral package tomorrow is 
self-serving. The main proponents of this attempt at rigging 
the vote in the opposite direction are Henry Tang Ying-yen, an 
appointee (who represents nobody) and Howard Young, who as 
tourism representative can hardly claim to speak for the people 
of Hong Kong. If those who argue against allowing 
unrepresentative members to vote were consistent, they would 
demand the abstention of all 10 appointed members. They might 
also urge the abstention of unrepresentative Functional 
Constituency members as well. 
  Legco is not representative. That is why appointed members 
and the officials will be dumped on the scrap heap next year. 
It is also why Chris Patten is trying to extend the franchise 
and why the Basic Law recognises future advances in electoral 
representation. 
  But it is simply not sensible, or desirable, to try to 
change 
the rules of the Legco game according to a standard of 
democratic representation which has never been applied in the 
past. Legco as it is currently constituted, flaws and all, is 
the only body which can decide on the competing electoral reform 
plans. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26927 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   HKMA Pumps $2.67 Billion Into Banking System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    HKMA Pumps $2.67 Billion Into Banking System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806054494 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS 
POST) in English 28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806054494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS 
POST) </F>

<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Noel Fung] </F>
  [Text] The plunging U.S. dollar sent the Hong Kong dollar 
bond and equity markets tumbling yesterday and prompted the 
territory's Monetary Authority to pump $2.67 billion into the 
banking system. The injection was the biggest in Hong Kong's 
history. 
  The overnight inter-bank market rate was pushed up to 4.5 
percent because of the excessive demand for funds, causing the 
Hong Kong Monetary Authority (HKMA) to pump $2.676 billion into 
the banking system at about 3.30 pm. The move softened the 
overnight rate to 3.5 per cent at yesterday's close. The 
banking sector ended up placing $225 million in surplus funds 
with the HKMA when the market closed. 
  The stock market fared no better. The Hang Seng Index dived 
233.52 points to close at 8,647.48, on the back of world market 
crashes last Friday. Aggravating the situation was the weak 
U.S. dollar, which has brokers fearing the U.S. Federal Reserve 
might raise interest rates as a last-ditch attempt to shore up 
the currency. 
  It was the third time in less than a week that the Monetary 
Authority had moved to inject liquidity into the market, after 
the overnight lending rate repeatedly touched the 4.5 per cent 
offer rate of the Liquidity Adjustment Facility (LAF) -- the 
discount window facility run by the authority. The LAF offer 
rate was kept at the same level as the Fed's discount rate so as 
to maintain the stability of the territory's pegged exchange 
rate system. 
  The HKMA injected $1.36 billion into the market last Friday 
and $1.57 billion last Wednesday. 
  Although the exchange rate remained stable, hovering at 
about 
$7.728-$7.729 to the US dollar, the injections are considered 
preemptive strikes to prevent the rising interbank market rates 
from affecting the stability of the peg. "If the interbank 
market rates are higher than in the U.S., then money will start 
coming in," said HKMA chief executive Joseph Yam Chi-kwong. 
  The Hong Kong dollar bond market mirrored the fall in the 
U.S., with the two-year government bond price dropping 37 basis 
points and the three-year bond shedding 44 basis points. One 
dealer said: "The yield spread between the three-year Hong Kong 
dollar bond and three-year U.S. dollar bond, which usually 
ranges between 30 and 50 basis points, has widened to a 
historical level of 75 basis points." He attributed bearish 
sentiment in the bond market to the upward pressure on U.S. 
interest rates. "One famous economist in the US even predicted 
that the yield on the 30-year Treasury bond would climb to 10 
percent by the end of the year," he said. 
  However, Mr Yam said the tight interbank market condition 
was 
only temporary, caused by expectations on U.S. interest rates 
and banks' need to shore up funds in preparation for mid-year 
accounting. "Banks that expect U.S. interest rates to go up 
will borrow more in advance and sit on it," he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26928 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Views Impact of Dollar's Devaluation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Views Impact of Dollar's Devaluation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706134394 Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese 27 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706134394 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "U.S. Dollar Declines, Hong Kong Dollar Also </F>
Declines"] 
  [Text] Last week, global money and stock markets 
experienced major fluctuations. The U.S. dollar hit a record 
post-war low and fell below 100 yen. Although there was 
certainly some rebound afterwards, the market is still generally 
taking a bearish view of the dollar. Even after the central 
banks of the major industrial countries joined hands to 
intervene, little result was achieved in reversing the trend. 
Due to a chain reaction, the world's stock markets generally 
slumped. It seems that the central banks may again take action 
after the market reopens today. The situation is noteworthy. 
  After the end of World War II, the exchange rate of the U.S. 
dollar against the Japanese yen was pegged at 1 to 360. Some 
people said that this was because the United States deliberately 
arranged a low exchange rate for the yen in order to boost 
Japan's exports and help Japan's economic recovery. Some people 
said that the rate was set by MacArthur to seek a "perfect 
circle" for the yen, because 360 represents the number of 
degrees in a circle. Anyhow, the fixed exchange rate mechanism 
was maintained until 1973. After that, the dollar has declined 
continuously. It has fallen below the symbolic 100 yen mark and 
has reached another significant milestone. 
  Last August, the dollar once dropped to the low level of 100 
yen. Two days after this fall, the U.S. Federal Reserve 
intervened in the market and forced the dollar to rebound by 5 
yen after selling only $100 million of its reserves. However, 
the present situation is quite different. 
  First, the United States was quite indifferent to the 
dollar's decline, and only Japan's central bank intervened. 
While the market watched for U.S. action, people could only 
hear Clinton, Greenspan, and Bentsen making irrelevant remarks. 
Three days later, when the central banks of the major countries 
took joint action, the dollar had become too weak to recover. 
The Federal Reserve alone spent more then $1 billion of its 
reserves fund, but the result could hardly compare with last 
year. This made people more worried that the United States will 
have to raise interest rates again to support the dollar, and 
that this would have an adverse impact on stock markets and 
cause substantial falls. 
  The United States has shaken off economic recession ahead of 
the other Western countries this time. It is generally believed 
that the economic recovery in the United States is still 
stronger than that in Japan. However, the dollar exchange rate 
continues to face downward pressure, and this seems to be 
contrary to the country's actual economic conditions. 
  Some economists say that the United States has shown 
symptoms 
of the "British disease." Britain used to be an economic power 
in the past. However, after its colonies gained independence in 
the post-war period, overseas markets for British products began 
to shrink in the 1960's. Every time strong economic growth 
arose in Britain, the nation increased its imports and the trade 
deficit increased too. Then, the government was forced to apply 
the brake, and this slowed growth. After three such cycles, 
Britain finally announced the devaluation of the pound, although 
this did not fundamentally solve the problem. At present, there 
is high consumption inside the United States, and the savings 
rate of the American people is very low. The competitive power 
of American goods in overseas markets is rather weak. What is 
accompanying economic recovery is an increasing trade deficit. 
  Facing a weakening U.S. dollar, Clinton could only say that 
the foundation of the U.S. economy was healthy and the United 
States would continue to strengthen its economy in order to seek 
a favorable reaction from the markets. He did not express his 
determination to stabilize the dollar, and did not even show an 
understanding of the market. The outside world does not 
understand U.S. monetary policy and foreign exchange policy 
either. 
  The United States has reopened the trade talks, but people 
still suspect that the United States has not given up its 
practice of pushing up the yen in order to restrain Japanese 
exports and reduce its own trade deficit. On the part of Japan, 
a further revaluation of the yen is certainly a bitter 
experience. When the Japanese economy, which has been insipid 
for a long time, was just showing certain signs of improvement, 
the continuing revaluation of the Yen (the market looks forward 
to a level of 1 dollar to 95 yen) has dealt heavy blows at the 
weak recovery. Japan could not but take solo action to support 
the dollar. 
  The current round of yen revaluation has coincided with 
instability in the Japanese political situation and also 
precedes the G-7 summit. This has caused people to speculate 
that the United States has deliberately taken this opportunity 
to exert pressure on Japan. 
  On the other hand, the role of the U.S. Federal Reserve is 
also under suspicion. Earlier this month, the famous American 
journalist Bob Woodward, who revealed the Watergate scandal, 
published a new book entitled "The Agenda." In it, he exposed 
many of the Clinton administration's scandals [as published] and 
mentioned that Greenspan "in some aspects was the ghostwriter of 
Clinton's economics." If this is true, the independent position 
of the Federal Reserve has changed, and it might have changed by 
relying on spending cuts and deficit reduction to achieve its 
purpose. The recent weakness of the dollar began precisely from 
the revelation of this inside story on the front page of THE 
WASHINGTON POST. 
  While the market remains unclear about the orientation of 
U.S. monetary policy, it seems that the U.S. dollar will 
continue to fluctuate sharply in the near future. Because the 
Hong Kong dollar is pegged to the U.S. dollar, the weakness of 
the U.S. dollar will cause the exchange rate of the Hong Kong 
currency to fall against other major currencies. As a result, 
in order to avoid losses caused by fluctuating exchange rates, 
foreign capital and ordinary investors have decided to reduce 
their holdings of Hong Kong stocks. This is a major reason for 
the fall in the Hong Kong stock market. 
  The pegged exchange rate system has undoubtedly played a 
positive role in stabilizing the Hong Kong currency. However, 
there is no panacea in the economic field. Before the 1960's, 
the Hong Kong dollar was pegged to sterling, and the peg was 
removed after sterling's devaluation. Future changes in the 
value of the U.S. dollar and its impact on Hong Kong's economy 
are something we should pay close attention to. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26929 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Ruihuan Meets Hong Kong Entreprenuer </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Ruihuan Meets Hong Kong Entreprenuer </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806104994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1019 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806104994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Top Chinese leader Li 
Ruihuan had an hour-long discussion here today with Kwok 
Ping-sheung, chairman of Sun Hung Kai, one of the biggest real 
estate companies in Hong Kong. 
  Sun Hung Kai and the Beijing Dongan Group have decided to 
invest 300 million U.S. dollars to rebuild the Dongan market in 
downtown Beijing into a modern business center. The new market 
is scheduled to open in 1996. 
  Li, a standing committee member of the Political Bureau of 
the Chinese Communist Party Central Committee and chairman of 
the National Committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference, praised Sun Hung Kai for making 
investment in the mainland. 
  Li also praised Kwok and other Hong Kong residents for their 
efforts in upholding Hong Kong's prosperity and stability, 
hoping that they will work together for Hong Kong's smooth 
transition and its prosperity and stability after July 1, 1997. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26930 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Negotiators Adjourn Talks on Handover of Military Sites </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Negotiators Adjourn Talks on Handover of Military Sites </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806052594 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
28 Jun 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806052594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Chris Yeung and Linda Choy] </F>
  [Text] Sino-British negotiators adjourned talks on the 
handover of military sites yesterday for the second time. The 
meeting will be continued on Thursday -- the day after the 
Legislative Council [Legco] vote on the territory's democratic 
reforms. 
  Yesterday's Sino-British Joint Liaison Group [JLG] talks 
followed an inconclusive three-day session of the JLG last week, 
during which the two sides failed to finalise a deal on the 
handover of defence sites. Further delays in ending the 
seven-year wrangle sparked speculation that China was attempting 
to block a deal until after the Legco debate on Governor Chris 
Patten's reform tomorrow. 
  Independent legislator Emily Lau Wai-hing said: "This sort 
of action would send a signal to Hong Kong and to the world, 
that `now I (China) am watching you, so you'd better behave, and 
you'd better vote the way we want, otherwise there could be 
serious economic consequences.' If you vote against Mr Patten's 
proposal, you would be rewarded and if you don't, you could be 
punished," she said. 
  However, British officials denied a link between the Legco 
debate and the defence talks. Officials maintained there were 
no fundamental differences between the views of the two 
governments. 
  Speaking after yesterday's meeting, China's chief negotiator 
at the JLG, Guo Fengmin, said: "Our experts have accomplished 
significant progress but some technical issues remain to be 
dealt with." 
  Before the talks, British chief negotiator Hugh Davies had 
said he hoped the JLG session would be completed at the meeting. 
Later, he said: "Until we have an agreement I'm not counting my 
chickens." He said the meeting had been adjourned "to allow us 
to complete work on the defence lands and on the remaining 
issues on the agenda." 
  It is understood experts from both sides had round-the-clock 
discussions at the weekend on the draft agreement on the 
handover of military sites. 
  Both Mr Guo and Mr Davies said they expected they could 
finalise the agreement on Thursday. 
  In separate talks on the draft agreement on how to finance 
the Chek Lap Kok Airport, experts from the two governments met 
yesterday morning to tackle outstanding differences. Officials 
said they had no idea when the deal could be finalised but 
indicated there were no major obstacles. 
  Sources close to the negotiations said the Chinese had made 
no new demands on their British counterparts about a completion 
date for the airport project. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26931 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jailed Reporter's Friends Continue To `Pressure' PRC </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jailed Reporter's Friends Continue To `Pressure' PRC </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806060394 Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD in English 28 Jun 
94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806060394 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Clara Chan] </F>
  [Text] Colleagues and friends of jailed Ming Pao reporter 
Xi Yang are continuing to put pressure on the Chinese Government 
to release him. Yesterday, eight Ming Pao reporters tied yellow 
ribbons outside the official Xinhua news agency and handed in a 
letter demanding his release. 
  Mr Xi's father, Xi Ling-sheng, has visited his son twice. 
He said he was receiving "compulsory political education" but 
was painting and doing computer studies in his spare time. He 
was sharing a cell with three others. 
  The United Democrats of Hong Kong also sent about 20 members 
to protest at Xinhua. "We will continue to fight for the 
release of Xi until he is back, and for (his) safety in the 
mainland," a spokesman said. 
  Over the weekend Mr Xi, who was charged with "stealing state 
secrets," was given an award for outstanding journalistic 
performance by the Newspaper Society of Hong Kong--which 
regretted he was not on hand to receive it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26932 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Yi on Foreign Trade Development, Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wu Yi on Foreign Trade Development, Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806094894 Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 29 May 94 pp 1, 
3 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806094894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Wu Yi, minister of foreign trade and </F>
economic cooperation, by correspondent Qiu Xichun (6726 1585 
3196) and staff reporter Li Zhengping (2621 3630 1627); place 
and date not given: "Strong Momentum of Development, Heavy Tasks 
in Reform"--first paragraph is JINGJI RIBAO introduction] 
  [Text] The magnificent objective of China's reforms in the 
management system of foreign trade is to set up a new foreign 
trade system in line with China's actual conditions and the 
rules and customs common in international economic activities. 
On 12 May the "Foreign Trade Law of the PRC" was adopted by the 
NPC Standing Committee and will be put into effect on 1 July, 
thus putting China's foreign trade management on a legal 
footing. How is the current situation with China's foreign 
trade and with the reforms in the foreign trade management 
system? What are the prospects? All these issues have 
attracted the greatest attention from China's economic circles. 
Reporters from this newspaper interviewed Wu Yi, minister of 
foreign trade and economic cooperation, asking her to express 
her views on these issues. 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] Minister Wu, the first four months this year 
saw a good foreign trade situation. According to relevant 
statistics, foreign trade grew in an all-round way. In 
particular export trade grew more rapidly, thus increasing 
China's foreign exchange reserves. In 1993, China's foreign 
trade volume accounted for 37 percent of its gross domestic 
product. The people are very concerned about the development of 
foreign trade, because it closely relates to their interests. 
Will you please give a detailed account of the situation? 
  [Wu] In the first four months of this year, China's foreign 
trade developed in a rapid, coordinated, and sound way. In my 
view, there were four characteristics: One, import and export 
trade grew in a comprehensive way. According to statistics 
provided by Customs, the total foreign trade value was $57.84 
billion, up 21.1 percent over the figure for the same period 
last year. This growth rate is higher than the figures for the 
same periods of previous years. The situations in various areas 
indicated that apart from one or two provinces and autonomous 
regions which registered a decrease in foreign trade volume, 
most provinces, municipalities, and autonomous regions chalked 
up increases in foreign trade volume. Two, export trade grew at 
a greater pace. The export volume for the four months was 
$28.04 billion, up 22 percent over the figure for the same 
period last year. What merits special attention is that the 
general export business [yi ban mao yi chu kou 0001 5301 6319 
2496 0427 0656], which had achieved less satisfactory results 
over the last few years, grew rapidly by 30.5 percent, bigger 
than the growth rate of 22.1 percent achieved by processing 
export. This is the first laudable trend seen in the last few 
years and more. Three, there was a decrease in the growth rate 
of the import volume, which was $29.79 billion, up 20.3 percent. 
In terms of absolute value, the export volume has approached 
the import volume. The current tendency suggests that we are 
likely to strike a balance between imports and exports in the 
future. Four, we earned more foreign exchange than we sold. 
The national situation with foreign exchange is quite good. We 
have a bigger foreign exchange reserve than we did at the 
beginning of the year. Of course there are some difficulties 
and problems with our foreign trade business. The fairly 
spectacular problems are: A shortage of circulating funds, a 
sharp rise in the purchase price of exports, and insufficient 
potential for future development of export trade. 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] The situation with foreign trade has been 
relatively good since the beginning of this year. Is this the 
result of accelerated reform of the foreign trade management 
system? 
  [Wu] I think so. Reform has promoted the development of 
foreign trade. Since the beginning of this year, we have made a 
very important step forward in the reform of the foreign trade 
management system. In particular the reforms of the exchange 
rate mechanism and of the export quota distribution system laid 
a sound foundation for the long-term development of foreign 
trade. It should be said that the situation of foreign trade in 
the first four months this year showed the positive effect of 
the reform of the foreign trade management system. This accords 
with our expectations. 
  Under the new foreign trade system, exchange rates, 
taxation, 
and credit have become important economic means for regulating 
foreign economic activities. Since the beginning of this year, 
the exchange rate of the renminbi has been stable. This created 
a favorable environment for foreign trade. I also believe that 
the stable exchange rate gives expression to the sound 
development in foreign trade, in export trade in particular, 
seen since the beginning of the year. The current exchange rate 
mechanism has already become a market mechanism. Basically 
speaking, a stable exchange rate depends on the balanced and 
sound development of national foreign trade. 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] The reform of the export quota distribution 
system you mentioned is a main topic of conversation regarding 
the reform of foreign trade this year. The experiment with open 
bidding for quotas for 13 export commodities, including logs and 
ginseng, carried out since April this year has had a great 
impact on enterprises engaged in the export of these commodities 
and has aroused popular concern. Would you please talk about 
its significance? 
  [Wu] The plan to have bidding, auctions, and formula 
allocation of import and export quotas is contained in the 
"Decision of the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee on Issues Concerning the Establishment of a Socialist 
Market Economic Structure." This represents the orientation of 
the reform of the quota management system. This year, we had 
bidding for 13 selected export commodities with active quotas 
[zhu dong pei e 0031 0520 6792 7345] on a trial basis. The 
export value of these commodities accounted for about 7 percent 
of that of all export commodities subject to quota control. The 
bidding proved successful and it was conducted in accordance 
with the principle of ensuring economic returns, fairness, and 
openness. A significant phenomenon was that the enterprises to 
which no or only a few quotas had been given before 
enthusiastically welcomed the new measure, while the companies 
which had enjoyed quotas before displayed apathy about the 
reform because their privileges had been axed. In my opinion 
such a reaction is normal. What matters is that those companies 
which lost "privileges" must adapt themselves to the law of 
competition under the market economy and reestablish their 
superiority through competition on an equal footing. In the 
future, on the basis of the experiment, we will have bidding for 
more commodities with quotas. 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] At present large and medium-sized state-owned 
enterprises are encountering many difficulties. How to deepen 
reform to enliven these enterprises has once again become a 
major problem of public concern. Apart from foreign-funded 
enterprises, a total of 7,000 enterprises have been granted the 
right to engage in foreign trade. They are all state-owned 
enterprises, among which quite a lot are large and medium-sized 
enterprises. How do matters stand with these enterprises? 
  [Wu] Since the beginning of this year, foreign trade 
enterprises nationwide have fared well. The reform policies put 
into effect this year are beneficial to state foreign trade 
companies, large and medium-sized companies in particular. By 
applying the measure for making unified settlement of foreign 
exchange accounts payable and doing away with the practice of 
turning in a fixed amount of foreign exchange to the central 
government with or without compensation, the central government 
has lessened the burden of state foreign trade companies so that 
they can enter fair competition. This will help these companies 
develop into efficient companies. 
  The process of the reform in the foreign trade management 
system over the last few years shows that we have always put the 
reform of foreign trade companies in an important position. 
From 1988 to 1990, by introducing the contracted managerial 
responsibility system, foreign trade companies solved the 
problem resulting from "eating from the same big pot," regaining 
their vitality and increasing their strength. The 1991 reform 
aimed at abolishing subsidies and making enterprises responsible 
for their profits and losses enabled foreign trade companies to 
develop into companies which make their own management decisions 
and are responsible for their own profits and losses. The 
reform this year is being carried out on the basis of previous 
reforms, so it will give an extremely big stimulus to foreign 
trade companies. As required by our principle for reform, 
foreign trade companies should deepen reform in light of the 
modern enterprise system. In this way, they will make greater 
contributions to the development of foreign trade. 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] There was information that the new tax reform 
had increased the burden on foreign-funded enterprises. What is 
your comment on this? 
  [Wu] I believe the information is incorrect. We have 
consistently seen to it that the foreign businessmen's 
legitimate rights and interests are respected and protected. In 
the latest round of reform of the foreign trade management 
system we introduced the system of earning and selling foreign 
exchange into state foreign trade enterprises while we only 
introduced transitional measures into foreign-funded 
enterprises, allowing them to keep foreign exchange accounts to 
facilitate their operations, including foreign trade. As a 
whole, the tax reform has not brought a greater burden to 
foreign-funded enterprises. For one or two foreign-funded 
enterprises which will have a greater tax burden, we have worked 
out regulations for providing subsidies to ensure that foreign 
businessmen enjoy the preferential policies laid down in China's 
laws and cooperation agreements. The preferential policies 
toward foreign investors remain unchanged. We will continue to 
improve the environment for investment and create conditions to 
grant foreign- funded enterprises "national treatment." 
  [JINGJI RIBAO] You, as minister of foreign trade and 
economic cooperation, are responsible for promoting the 
country's foreign trade and economic cooperation with foreign 
countries. It is an arduous duty. At present what is your 
greatest concern? 
  [Wu] My work covers an extensive area and I have many "major 
problems" to solve. To be frank, I feel the pressure of my 
work. My greatest concern, it should be said, is China's export 
business. Can the momentum over the last four months continue? 
While realizing the active effect brought about by reform, we 
should have a sober understanding of the factors detrimental to 
export. The two major problems are: A sharp increase in the 
price of export commodities and a shortage of funds. Many 
products exported early this year were purchased last year or 
made from the raw materials purchased last year, when their 
prices were low. But the prices of export commodities purchased 
this year were much higher. Many foreign trade companies have 
reported that their business is greatly affected. I believe my 
ministry cannot solve these problems on its own. 
  To promote China's foreign trade, we must carry out a "grand 
economic and trade" strategy based on foreign trade, under which 
operations concerning commodities, funds, technology, service, 
and labor service abroad will interpenetrate and develop in a 
coordinated way, and which will involve departments responsible 
for foreign trade, production, science and technology, and 
financial affairs. 
  In the meantime, to meet the needs of economic development, 
foreign trade enterprises should introduce intensive management, 
carrying out the strategy of "increasing sales by improving the 
quality of their products," focusing on optimizing the product 
mix, promoting technological progress, and improving their 
economic performance so that they change their main products 
from textile and other light industrial goods, primary 
processing products, and products with low added value to 
machinery and electrical appliances, heavy industry products, 
chemicals, high-tech products, intensive processing products, 
and products with high added value by 2000. This is essential 
to developing China's foreign trade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26933 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister Says `Low Efficiency' Major Economic Problem </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Minister Says `Low Efficiency' Major Economic Problem </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806082494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0801 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806082494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Low economic efficiency 
of many enterprises was now a major problem in China's economy, 
Chen Jinhua, minister in charge of the State Planning 
Commission, recently told a group of economic reporters here. 
  He pointed out that such low efficiency in particular 
enterprises could be termed micro-economics -- but this had 
great macro-economic effects. 
  To solve some of these problems, the reform of enterprises 
will be top of the agenda in China next year. 
  He said that his commission is in charge of the macro 
economy, but it also pays attention to the study of 
micro-economic activities. 
  The minister said that the government's structural reforms 
this year had far-reaching effects on large and medium-sized 
enterprises. But it was not enough to carry out the reform 
measures -- the reform of the enterprises should also be 
promoted. 
  He said that now many of the enterprises have no access to 
the market, which has affected their viability. They needed to 
push for access to the market and become a major part of the 
market. 
  This was the fundamental way out for enterprises to reduce 
losses and increase profits, he said. 
  The minister said that some noted foreign specialists had 
said that the development of enterprises depended on two wheels, 
technological progress and scientific management. But in China, 
the two wheels can operate only through reform of enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26934 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Says Inflation Slowing Down </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Says Inflation Slowing Down </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706184794 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0822 
GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706184794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 23 Jun (XINHUA) -- Zou Xiangqun, deputy 
secretary general of the State Planning Commission, told a 
XINHUA reporter that since March, the momemtum of price rises 
throughout the country has weakened and the margin of price 
rises has begun to drop thanks to the gradual implementation of 
the major reform measures as well as measures to strengthen 
macroeconomic regulation and control adopted by the party 
Central Committee and the State Council. 
  Zou Xiangqun said: According to statistics, in May the 
general retail price level rose 18.9 percent over the same 
period last year, while the price rise margin dropped 0.6 
percentage points compared with April. In May, retail price 
rises in the country's 35 large and medium-sized cities were 1.3 
percentage points lower than in April. According to an analysis 
of the changes in the residents' consumption price index, rises 
in the prices of various kinds of commodities, except clothing, 
were slower in May than in April. Among these, the price rise 
margins for food; household equipment; medical care; means of 
transport and communications; articles for recreational, 
educational, and cultural use; housing, and services dropped 
0.3, 0.5, 0.5, 0.9, 0.4, 1.7, and 0.8 percentage points, 
respectively. This shows that the state supervision of the 
prices of daily necessities, the requirement for prices to be 
clearly marked, and the launching of a general price check have 
begun to yield results. 
  From the current situation in the development of the 
macroeconomy, it can be predicted that the rise in the general 
price level of the whole country will continue to weaken, and 
the price rise margin will drop further. 
  According to an analysis by Zou Xiangqun -- he based his 
prediction on the following facts: 
  -- The serious effect of last year's inflation will dwindle 
graudally. In 1993, the general price level throughout the 
county began to rise every month from the beginning of the year 
and reached its peak in December. Because prices rose in a 
step-like pattern; because the prices of electricity, railway 
transport were readjusted; and because the prices of a large 
number of steel products, coal, and grain were decontrolled, 
inflation mainly occurred in the second half of last year, and 
particularly the prices of grain and edible oil fluctuated in 
the fourth quarter of last year. This had a serious effect on 
price rises this year. This effect will gradually weaken with 
the passage of time and will dwindle markedly in the fourth 
quarter of this year. 
  -- The macroeconomic environment is improving. The financial 
situation is stable. From January through May, the amount of 
currency withdrawn from circulation was 54.57 billion yuan more 
than the same period last year; residents' savings deposits rose 
by 151.8 billion yuan over last year; revenue increased by 24.3 
percent over the same period of last year. The margin of 
increase in fixed assets investment continued to drop because 
management over loans for fixed assets investment was 
strengthened and because a general inspection of investment was 
launched. From January to May, the size of the increase in the 
amount of investment by state-owned units dropped 35.1 
percentage points over the same period last year. 
  -- The supply of important commodities is turning for the 
better. At present, the supply of and demand for commodities in 
the domestic market are basically balanced, and the acreage 
planted in grain this year is expected to be the same as last 
year's level, but the acreage planted in rape seeds is nearly 8 
million mu more than last year. This will lay a foundation for 
the stable growth of grain and oil-bearing crops. With the 
advent of the brisk vegetable growing season, the supplies of 
vegetables will increase, and prices will drop further. 
  -- The practice of raising prices arbitrarily and collecting 
various types of fees indiscriminately is beginning to be 
checked. The practice of noninterference in market prices has 
been gradually reversed through the launching of a general price 
checkup and the implementation of state measures on establishing 
grain risk funds, on price monitoring, and on marking prices 
clearly. 
  Zou Xiangqun said that in accordance with the above 
comprehensive analysis of the four aspects of the macroeconomic 
situation, it is estimated that from now on price rises will 
gradually weaken, but prices will still remain at a 
comparatively high level. In other words, there is a tendency 
that prices will gradually drop from a comparatively high level, 
prices of some commodities might rise again for a short while. 
Therefore, we must resolutely continue to implement the various 
regulation and control measures to stabilize market prices and 
to create a good economic and social environment for reform and 
development. 
  Zou Xiangqun pointed out: To further stabilize prices, we 
must do the following tasks well: 
  1. We should grasp agricultural production and strive to 
increase grain and cotton production this year. We should work 
hard to grasp the production of grain, cotton, and other major 
farm products and successfully carry out the "vegetable basket" 
project. We should strive for a bumper agricultural harvest to 
increase the supply of essential products in the market. 
  2. We must strictly control the scale of investment in fixed 
assets and put a stop to the excessive increase of consumption 
funds. We must keep bank loans under control and strictly 
forbid loans other than those approved by the state for 
investment in fixed assets. 
  3. We should continue to strengthen management over price 
regulation and control and strive to stabilize the prices of 
life's daily necessities for the people. We should ensure an 
ample supply of goods, keep prices down, and prevent drastic 
price fluctuations. We should speed up the process of price 
legislation. The State Planning Commission is drawing up 
provisions against price swindling and seeking staggering 
profits. It will strive to promulgate them as soon as possible 
to protect the legitimate rights and interests of consumers. 
  4. We should continue to launch general price inspections to 
check price violations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26935 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Says Inflation Easing in Guangdong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Says Inflation Easing in Guangdong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706152594 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1227 GMT 
26 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706152594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Wang Dongyun (3769 0392 0061)] </F>
  [Text] Guangzhou 26 Jun (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE) -- Jiang 
Shanli, director of the Guangdong Provincial Price 
Administration Bureau, stressed here recently that it is 
necessary to correctly view the current price situation. The 
fact that Guangdong's price rise situation has tended to ease 
since April is the initial result of a series of regulatory and 
control measures; however, Guangdong's market prices remain at a 
high level, and by no means should we be careless about this. 
  Jiang Shanli indicated that the scope of Guangdong's price 
rises in April and May were 19 and 17.3 percent respectively. 
Relatively speaking, they have tended to ease compared with the 
first three months of this year; however, the margin of rises 
remains very high, and is a threat to the province's reform, 
development, and stability. 
  Jiang said that since the beginning of this year, 
Guangdong's 
relevant departments have adopted a series of measures to 
strengthen macroeconomic regulation and control, as well as 
price controls, and have scored initial results. The major 
provincial price checks that began in March have played an 
important role in halting excessive price rises. 
  Jiang Shanli analyzed the characteristics of recent changes 
in market prices in Guangdong: First, the range of price rises 
has tended to ease; however, the general price level remains 
high. Second, the price rise range of foodstuffs and 
agricultural production materials has tended to ease, while the 
range of price rises for services is comparatively great. And 
third, the margin of price rises is on par with the national 
average. 
  He reminded people that, presently, many potential price 
rise 
factors exist. For example, various places have raised power 
prices at every tier since the merger of dual-track power prices 
at the beginning of this year; consequently, users have found 
power prices on the high side, with production costs rising. 
The effects of the petroleum products price reform in May, the 
grain price reform presented recently, and the soon to be 
implemented price reforms for chemical fertilizers will 
gradually make themselves felt. At the same time, wage reform 
in the province's administrative units and institutions have 
been effective one after another only recently, and some of the 
wage increases will be diverted to the consumer market, so 
directly affecting market prices. Besides, some areas in the 
province suffered drought earlier and now there is flooding. 
Agricultural production is suffering losses, which will directly 
affect market supply and people's livelihood. 
  This being the case, he required Guangdong's price 
administrations at all levels to increase the magnitude of the 
great price check and to work hard to realize 90 percent 
coverage in adding explicit price tags to commodities by the end 
of July, earnestly implementing various price regulation and 
control measures, and strengthening the consolidation of power 
prices to lower the level of power prices in rural areas. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26936 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Company Law To Become Effective 1 July </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Company Law To Become Effective 1 July </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806013094 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in English 1226 GMT 
27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806013094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (CNS) -- Company Law, the first of 
its kind in China since 1949, will come into force on July 1. 
It is aimed at governing the running of companies and helping 
the country to set up a modern enterprises system, according to 
a press conference held by the Standing Committee of the 
National People's Congress (NPC). 
  The Company Law, which was appraised and approved by the 
standing committee late last year, confirmed that companies were 
entitled to an independent legal status and enjoyed legal person 
status. Such regulations lead to the separation of a company 
from subordination to an administrative body, while at the same 
time preventing excessive intervention by an administrative 
organ in a company. They are beneficial to the running of a 
company in accordance with the Law. The Company Law also 
relieves the state of shouldering unlimited liability for 
enterprises, a practice advantageous to increasing the vigour 
shown by enterprises for competition. 
  The Vice Director of the Commission of Legislative Affairs 
of 
NPC, Mr. Bian Yaowu, said that the drafting of the law, which 
was undertaken by the commission, began in September, 1992 and 
underwent discussion on three occasions by the standing 
committee of NPC before the final approval. 
  The Company Law governs registration of companies and other 
corresponding matters. It is very important because it 
indicates that the enterprise reform is now under the legal 
standardization for some 1.2 million companies across the 
country, which increased from 1.03 million by the end of last 
year and from a mere 480,000 in late 1992. 
  Mr. Bian said that, following the implementation of the Law, 
companies running counter to this Law would have to make changes 
to meet the requirements of the Law. Otherwise, they would be 
seriously dealt with according to the Law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26937 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trade Commission Minister on Enterprise Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trade Commission Minister on Enterprise Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806065294 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 5 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806065294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Wang Zhongyu (3769 1813 4416), minister of the State </F>
Economic and Trade Commission: "Unswervingly Carry Out 
Enterprise Reform"] 
  [Text] The main content of the present reform is 
continued implementation of the "Regulations"; clear definition 
of the ownership of the property rights of enterprises; 
establishment of a system of modern enterprises with a perfect 
legal person system as the basis, limited liability as the 
feature, and companies as the main form; and strengthen 
enterprise legislation 
  The 14th National Congress of the Chinese Communist Party 
set 
forth the goal of establishing a socialist market economic 
structure. This has attracted wide attention in the world. The 
nucleus of China's reform of its economic system is the reform 
of enterprises. Where shall Chinese enterprises, especially 
state-owned enterprises, go? This is an issue that the people 
are most concerned about. China's socialist market economic 
structure is a new system combined with the basic socialist 
system. It is suited to China's national conditions and is 
conducive to the development of its productive forces. In 
reforming China's state-owned enterprises we should consistently 
adhere to the principle of taking public ownership as the main 
body and developing other sectors of the economy at the same 
time. Therefore, whether at present or in the future, China's 
state-owned enterprises cannot take the road of privatization. 
In the country as a whole, the position and role of the 
state-owned economy cannot be replaced by any other economic 
sector, nor will there be major changes in the overall setup. 
In carrying out enterprise reform we should look for a way to 
speed up development of enterprises and an effective form of 
public ownership, with the premise of adhering it. 
  China's large and medium state-owned enterprises always take 
an important position in the national economy. Since 1978, 
although the world economy has been increasing slowly, China's 
GNP has been growing at a rate of 9 1.326369e-315very year, and the output 
value of state-owned enterprises has been increasing at a rate 
of 8 1.326369e-315ach year. In 1992, of all industrial enterprises, 
state-owned enterprises were only 0.162000060100f the total, but their 
production value accounted for 36.672000060100f the total, and the 
profit and taxes they handed to the state accounted for 51.62000060100f 
the total. This shows that the state-owned large and medium 
enterprises are the mainstay of the national economy. The 
reform of state-owned enterprises is the basis for establishing 
the system of socialist market economy. 
  In the past decade and more, the reform of enterprises, 
especially state-owned enterprises, has been the key to China's 
economic restructuring. Ever since the 4th plenary session of 
the 12th National Congress of the CPC in 1984, we have realized 
that the reform of state-owned enterprises is the most important 
and essential issue of the reform of the entire economic 
structure, and have adopted a series of policies and measures 
for the reform of state-owned enterprises. Last year, the 
question of the establishment of a basic framework for a 
socialist market economy was raised at the 3rd plenary session 
of the 14th National Congress of the CPC. The session also 
clearly pointed out that we should change the operational system 
of state-owned enterprises, establish a modern enterprise 
system, and continuously deepen reform of state-owned 
enterprises. This has made us deeply aware that enterprises are 
the basic economic units and the main elements for competition 
in the market. To confirm the principal position of enterprises 
and to remold the micro-basis of the market economy are the 
major topics in the establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure. 
  The strategic concepts for the reform of Chinese enterprises 
are: Centering on the general goal of establishing a socialist 
market economic structure, strengthen enterprise legislation to 
move enterprise reform onto a legal track; centering on reform 
of property rights of state-owned enterprises, further improve 
the legal entity system; with the establishment of a system of 
modern enterprises as a basic direction, further change 
enterprise operational mechanisms; and closely combine 
enterprise reform, establishment of a market system, reform of 
the macro economic management system, and establishment of a 
social security system to create a good environment for 
deepening enterprise reform. The fundamental purpose of 
enterprise reform is to strengthen the vitality of enterprises 
and to increase, to the greatest extent, the economic efficiency 
of enterprises. 
  The main elements of the reform of China's enterprises are: 
  1. At present, all state-owned enterprises should continue 
to implement the "Regulations Governing the Change of Enterprise 
Operational Mechanism" and the "Regulations Concerning the 
Supervision and Control of the Assets of State-Owned 
Enterprises," which are to be issued soon; carry out in a 
planned way the work of reappraising the stocks and assets of 
enterprises, defining property rights, clearing up debts, 
evaluating assets, and setting up standard internal management 
structures; and do a good job of experiments in establishing a 
system of modern enterprises, accumulating experience, creating 
good conditions, and gradually popularizing it. 
  2. Clearly define the property rights of enterprises. 
There are two problems which should be solved well: 1) The 
separation of the ownership of assets from the legal person's 
rights to enterprise property to enable them to become 
independent of government administration, release the state from 
undertaking unlimited responsibility toward enterprises, and 
turn state-owned enterprises into commodity producers and 
dealers owning all legal property and independently undertaking 
business activities. 2) Solving well the relationship between 
property rights and managerial rights within an enterprise. The 
representative of the legal person of an enterprise should truly 
give managerial rights to the manager, with the manager only 
reporting to the legal person of the enterprise and having 
independent managerial rights to turn the enterprise into an 
independent legal entity. 
  3. Establish a system of modern enterprises with a perfect 
legal person system as the basis, limited responsibility as the 
feature, and company as the main form. The organizational forms 
of enterprises are not classified according to the nature of 
ownership but by the organizational form of property and the 
legal responsibility they undertake. Promoting the system of 
modern enterprises in state-owned enterprises is of major 
significance in changing operational systems, raising managerial 
and competitive abilities, and bringing their lead in the 
national economy into full play. According to China's practical 
conditions, adopting the corporate system for state-owned 
enterprises is a beneficial experiment in establishing a modern 
enterprise system. Through the experiment in limited liability 
and joint-stock companies in recent years, we have seen the good 
points of enterprises having a corporate form. But new 
contradictions have arisen in these experiments, which tell us 
that it is quite difficult to turn enterprises into ones having 
a corporate form. Thus, we should not institute changes too 
widely or for all enterprises, but should gradually, step by 
step, promote it. Therefore, we experiment on a portion of the 
large and medium state-owned enterprises to practice a modern 
enterprise system, and at the same time standardize existing 
companies with limited liability and joint-stock companies 
according to corporate law. 
  4. Strengthen legislation on enterprises. Laws and 
regulations concerning the market, except for the already 
promulgated corporate law, are now in preparation. These laws 
and regulations include those concerning single-investor 
enterprises, partnerships, and cooperative share companies. 
Other laws for standardizing the market and perfecting social 
security are also in preparation, such as the law against 
monopoly, and commercial act, contract, labor, insurance, and 
social security laws. So that the laws can be smoothly 
implemented and actually followed, further efforts should be 
made to enforce the execution and jurisdiction of the laws. 
  5. Clearly define the relationship between the government 
and enterprises, and conscientiously change the function of 
government. The government executes its administration of the 
national economy mainly by economic and legal means, aided by 
some necessary administrative means. Generally, the government 
undertakes the functions of macroeconomic regulation and 
control, overall coordination, and administration of society, 
rather than directly interfering with the production and 
management of enterprises. 
  6. Current state-owned enterprises will be administrated or 
reformed according to their classifications. Enterprises which 
have something to do with state security, national defense, 
sophisticated sciences and technology, and some special trades, 
and enterprises which manufacture special products, will still 
have the state-owned enterprise form and can be converted into 
solely state-funded companies. Large and medium enterprises 
which are strongly competitive can gradually develop into 
enterprises in the form of stock companies controlled by the 
state. Small state-owned enterprises can be turned into 
companies with limited liability or cooperative share companies; 
some can be contracted or leased and some can be sold at auction. 
  7. Speed up the structural adjustment of enterprises. With 
regard to the many old state-owned enterprises whose product 
structures are irrational, economic results are not good, and 
debts are high, the state needs to make fairly major structural 
changes. For instance, all sorts of methods, such as merging, 
liquidation, joint ventures, peeling off, and reorganization, 
will be used to make the structure of enterprises more rational. 
This year, the state plans to gain experience through 
experiments with the liquidation of enterprises and making a 
major breakthrough in the standardization of enterprise 
liquidation. 
  8. Create a better environment for the reform of 
enterprises. We must enthusiastically do a good job in reform of 
the fiscal and tax, banking, investment, and foreign trade 
systems, set up and perfect market and social security systems, 
do our best to nurture and bring up a contingent of 
high-quality, professional entrepreneurs to lay social and 
economic foundations for the development of enterprises. 
  9. Encourage all sectors of the economy to set up and run 
single-investor enterprises, partnership businesses, cooperative 
share companies, and corporations in accordance with relevant 
state policies and regulations, and encourage the promotion of 
the modern enterprise system in foreign-invested, township and 
town, and urban collective enterprises where conditions are ripe. 
  The situation of the reform of Chinese enterprises is good, 
and opportunities for reform are hard to come by. Though there 
are difficulties and problems, they are what all enterprises 
meet in their development. So long as we fully foresee the 
difficulties, carefully design our reform plans, and 
consistently carry out the reform, we will be certain to reach 
our goal. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26938 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Real Estate Investment Up 52.8 Percent in 1st Half </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Real Estate Investment Up 52.8 Percent in 1st Half </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706121094 Beijing CEI Database in English 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706121094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- China reported 28.692 billion yuan 
of investments in commodity buildings from January to May, an 
increase of 52.8 percent over the same 1993 period. 
  According to Statistics of the State Statistical Bureau, the 
country's total investment in real estate development in the 
first five months amounted to 31.747 billion yuan, including 
3.056 billion yuan in land development. 
  Of the investments in commodity buildings, 24.501 billion 
yuan were pumped into commodity residential buildings, up 55.6 
percent over the year earlier period. 
  In terms of regions, Guangdong province alone invested 7.785 
billion yuan in commodity buildings, up 63.8 percent. Zhejiang 
and Jiangsu Provinces and Beijing each saw an investment of over 
2 billion yuan in commodity buildings, while Fujian, Liaoning, 
Shanghai, Shandong and Sichuan over 1 billion yuan. 
  The provinces, regions and municipalities with a growth rate 
of over 100 percent included Yunnan, Guangxi, Fujian and 
Shanghai, and those with declining investments included Shanxi, 
Inner Mongolia, Jilin and Henan. 
  In January-May period, the space of commodity buildings 
under 
construction went up 34.6 percent to 168.162 million square 
meters, of which, 17.3 percent or 29.015 million square meters 
of buildings started construction this year. Meanwhile, 10.5111 
million square meters of commodity buildings were completed, a 
big rise of 72 percent over the same period of 1993. Of this, 
8.93 million square meters of space were attributed to the 
residential buildings. 
  In the meantime, 9.008 million square meters of commodity 
buildings were sold with a sales volume of 7.627 billion yuan. 
Guangdong province headed the country with the sales volume 
reaching 2.098 billion yuan. The sales volume of Liaoning, 
Zhejiang and Jiangsu Provinces each was about 600-700 million 
yuan, while that of Guangxi and Hainan, though remaining low, 
surged over 100 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26939 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Leaders Visit Telecommunications Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Leaders Visit Telecommunications Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706132094 Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706132094 </F>
<F P=104>  Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] A national posts and telecommunications personnel 
meeting was held in Hainan on 21 June. Before the meeting, 
Governor Ruan Chongwu, secretary of the provincial party, and 
Vice Governor Wang Xiaofeng, deputy secretary of the provincial 
party committee, met with Wu Jichuan, minister of posts and 
telecommunications, and (Zhang Changhua), director of the Youth 
Cadres Bureau of the Central Organization Department, and their 
party, who were attending the meeting, and extended their 
congratulations on the opening of the meeting in Hainan. Cai 
Changsong, member of the standing committee of the provincial 
party committee and director of its organization department, 
attended the meeting by invitation. 
  The current meeting's main topic of discussion was to study 
-- based on the state's macroclimate and the market economy -- 
the issues of accelerating the process of making cadres younger 
in average age, with the goal of establishing leading bodies 
that will carry forward our cause beyond this century, and with 
a sense of responsibility for building a contingent of key 
professional technicians who have the training of highly 
qualified personnel and who can cross into the next century. 
The meeting also discussed and probed such issues as the 
strategy for posts and telecommunications personnel work. 
  Posts and Telecommunications Minister Wu Jichuan spoke at 
the 
meeting. One hundred and twenty two persons -- including 
directors of posts and telecommunications bureaus in provinces, 
autonomous regions, and municipalities, and principal persons in 
charge of departments directly under the jurisdiction of the 
ministry -- attended the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26940 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   SCRES Official on Economic System Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    SCRES Official on Economic System Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806054794 Beijing BEIJING REVIEW in English No 26, 27 
Jun-3 Jul 94 pp 11-15 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806054794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BEIJING REVIEW </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Recently, our staff reporter Wu Naitao conducted an 
exclusive interview with Feng Bing, deputy secretary-general of 
the State Commission for Restructuring the Economic System 
(SCRES). Feng answered a number of questions raised by our staff 
reporter concerning China's economic system reform. 
  QUESTION: What influence will the 1994 reform measures exert 
on China's economy and social stability? 
  ANSWER: This year will be crucial for China's economic 
system 
reform, and a series of reform measures for the finance, 
taxation, banking, foreign trade, enterprise and social security 
systems have been published and put into practice. The 
difficulty, complexity and importance of the work have in no way 
been underestimated. The programs per se and the influence 
which may be exerted by the reform measures have been 
comprehensively considered and countermeasures have been worked 
out by relevant departments. 
  For instance, implementation of the system whereby tax 
revenues are shared by central and local authorities will 
undoubtedly be of great importance for bringing about a better 
balance in the distribution relations between the central and 
local authorities. It will also promote the rational growth of 
government revenue and properly strengthen the financial might 
and macro-economic control ability of the central government. 
The reform fully considers the interests of both local 
governments and enterprises. The existing interest pattern of 
local governments will be maintained and the goal of reform will 
be gradually reached. The amount of tax revenues to be returned 
to the local governments by the central authorities will be 
based on 1993 figures. Subsidies of the central authorities, 
the amount of tax revenues turned over to the higher authorities 
by the local governments and the settlement of accounts involved 
in the original systems will temporarily remain unchanged 
following implementation of the new revenue sharing system. 
After a period of time, the items will gradually be 
standardized and supplemented by other auxiliary measures to 
ensure smooth implementation of the new system. 
  Implementation of a unified 33 percent income tax rate for 
domestic enterprises will naturally have a positive impact on 
fair tax burdens and opportunities for equal competition among 
enterprises, and will bring about orderly competition and stable 
growth of the Chinese economy. In consideration of the actual 
situation in regard to the low profits earned by some 
enterprises, various appropriate transitional and preferential 
measures have been adopted. In terms of other reform measures, 
transitional measures for the continuity of policies have been 
planned and special consideration has been given to vested 
interests. The reform will furnish a relatively stable interest 
mechanism for the smooth establishment of the new system. 
  In short, following 10-odd years of economic system reform, 
the psychological tolerance of the Chinese people has been 
greatly enhanced. In terms of the relative advantages or 
scientific nature of the new system, consideration contained in 
the reform measures for vested interests and appropriate 
transitional arrangements provide ample conditions for 
implementing the new system. Necessary measures will be adopted 
to overcome certain problems that may surface, such as the 
latent losses of enterprises becoming open losses, low profits 
turning into losses, and enterprises finding it difficult to 
raise funds. The measures will also ensure the smooth 
establishment of the new system. 
  Q: What is the role of China's public economy, and what is 
the target for reform of public ownership? 
  A: China is a socialist society, and the essence of 
socialism 
is to liberate and develop productive forces, eradicate 
exploitation, remove polarization and in the end to attain the 
goal of common prosperity. The establishment of socialist 
public ownership is designed to liberate productive forces and 
attain the goal of common prosperity. Whether or not the 
superiority can be brought into full play depends on the 
flexibility of the allocation of resources and efficiency. 
Prior to reform and opening to the outside world, China 
basically implemented a system based on a planned economy, and 
the system was characterized by a high degree of centralism and 
a rejection of the functions of market mechanisms. The system 
led to the irrational allocation of resources and low economic 
returns which seriously hampered the enhancement of the 
comprehensive might of the state and the vitality of 
enterprises. Practice of reform and opening over the past 
decade and more has proved that the substitution of the market 
economy for the planned economy signifies the further liberation 
of productive forces. This aspect, plus the effective 
macro-economic control of the government, will further bring the 
superiority of the socialist public economy into play. Socialist 
public ownership is indeed harmonious with the market economy. 
The orientation of reform is to enable socialist public 
ownership to better suit the demands of the market economy and 
to meet the objective demands of market competition. 
  China's market economic structure has merged with the basic 
system of socialism. Along with the deepening of reform and 
continued improvement of the socialist market economy, in terms 
of the structure of ownership, a pattern will be shaped which 
features the long-term common development of various economic 
sectors, with public ownership serving as the main body and the 
national economy as the leading factor and which is supplemented 
by the individual, private and foreign-funded economies. 
Different economic sectors can voluntarily engage in various 
forms of associated operations, and state-owned, collective and 
other enterprises can enter into the market. State-owned 
enterprises will play a leading role in the practice of equal 
competition. 
  Q: What measures will China take to reduce the imbalance 
in development between different regions, and how will China 
solve any negative impact which may arise? 
  A: The Decision of the CPC Central Committee on Some Issues 
Concerning the Establishment of a Socialist Market Economic 
Structure has, in a sense, offered various avenues and real 
possibilities for narrowing the imbalance between various 
regions throughout the country. At present, most of the vast 
economically underdeveloped regions in China are sparsely 
populated and are rich in natural resources. In line with the 
goals of reform, development of the basic role of market 
mechanisms in the allocation of resources will help the regions 
have access to more extensive and fair earnings and gain 
compensation through market exchanges. The central government 
will, as always, place top priority on the economic and social 
development of these regions. For example, during the financial 
and tax system reform, the financial payment ability of various 
localities has been appropriately balanced by using the methods 
of the financial transfer payments. By instituting tax 
regulation, the establishment of a social security system and 
various other social redistribution means, central authorities 
have solved problems related to extensive gaps caused by the 
preliminary distribution. In terms of price system reform, 
prices of a few products such as the means of production, coal, 
crude oil and natural gas covered by the state plans have been 
gradually decontrolled, and have in turn benefited inland 
regions. Through the investment system reform, the government 
has mainly implemented preferential industrial policies and 
steered domestic and foreign funds toward investments in 
infrastructure facilities and basic industries, particularly 
those related to improving the transport and telecommunications 
sectors and strengthening energy production in the central and 
western regions. With regard to opening to the outside world 
and to supporting economic development in various remote border 
regions, preferential policies common in international practice 
that suit market economic demands will be adopted toward these 
regions. 
  Fundamentally speaking, however, development of the central 
and western regions will be realized through market competition. 
They will gradually attain common prosperity by relying on 
their own efforts and enhancing efficiency. The government 
encourages developed regions to cooperate with less developed 
regions. Each will supply the needs of the other, bring their 
advantages into play, and in the unified market, compete and 
support each other for common progress and prosperity. 
  Q: China's economic reform has been successful and the 
country has adopted numerous other major measures for economic 
reform in 1994. However, will China coordinate political 
restructuring with economic reform? 
  A: Over the past 15 years, China has not only scored 
remarkable achievements in economic reform, but has also made 
great headway in restructuring the political system and 
strengthening construction of the democratic and legal system. 
For instance, we have formulated and promulgated more than 140 
important laws and regulations and have continuously improved 
the people's congress system. People's congresses at all levels 
are playing an increasingly important role in legislation, 
supervision, and decision-making on important matters, as well 
as the appointment and removal of personnel. The Communist 
Party of China, the ruling party, has implemented a system of 
multiparty cooperation and democratic consultations with the 
country's eight democratic parties, which have also taken part 
in discussions of state affairs. The system has constantly been 
improved in recent years. We are restructuring the government 
administration, separating the functions of the government from 
those of enterprises, and implementing the public service 
system. Success in these areas is inseparable from our economic 
reform. Economic reforms have indeed brought changes in both the 
political and social structure. Along with the deepening of the 
economic reform, we will continue to promote reform of the 
political system. Our unswerving goal is to implement democratic 
politics and we will continue to vigorously promote the 
construction of democratic politics. At the same time, we hold 
that China's political restructuring can only be conducted in 
light of China's specific conditions. In terms of democratic 
and legal construction, we will use the experience of other 
countries for reference, but will refrain from indiscriminately 
copying the patterns of other countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26941 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Democratic Association Holds National Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Democratic Association Holds National Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706193094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0804 
GMT 25 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706193094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 25 Jun (XINHUA) -- The Seventh Meeting of 
the Ninth Central Committee of the Standing Committee of the 
China Association for Promoting Democracy [CAPD] was held in 
Beijing from 23 June to 25 June. At the meeting, all levels of 
party organizations and party members were urged to continuously 
study Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics; to study theory on socialist market 
economy; to study modern scientific knowledge; to rally even 
more closely around the CPC Central Committee; to voluntarily 
implement the basic line of "one central task, two basic 
points;" to be enterprising; to have a pioneering spirit; to be 
innovative; to make self-improvement; and to actively contribute 
to the deepening of reform, promoting of development, and 
maintenance of stability. 
  Agricultural and rural work issues topped the discussion at 
the CAPD meeting. While describing the current state of China's 
agriculture and the situation in rural areas as excellent, the 
meeting's participants recognized the existence of some problems 
which need to be solved speedily. They advanced many opinions 
and suggestions. They include: enhancing macroeconomic control 
and regulation over agriculture; increasing investment funds for 
agriculture; curbing the use of arable land for other purposes; 
increasing the number of agronomists; reinforcing the building 
of grass-roots organizations in rural areas; stepping up 
management of public order in rural areas; raising laborers' 
quality; and improving education in rural areas. 
  Lei Jieqiong, vice chairwoman of the National People's 
Congress Standing Committee and chairwoman of the CAPD Standing 
Committee, spoke at the opening ceremony. She said China is now 
in the process of comprehensively promoting a socialist market 
economic system as well as of trying to achieve some major 
breaktroughs in practicing the socialist market economic system. 
We will be confronted with many problems and difficulties in 
fulfilling these tasks. Very often, the replacement of an old 
system with a new one produces contradictions and brings forth 
both benefits and shortcomings. In the course of deepening 
reform and developing the economy, vested interests will 
inevitably be affected, relationships of interest will be 
readjusted, people's concepts will change, and deep-seated 
contradictions will be exposed. Only by adopting proper 
measures to solve these contradictions and problems, can we 
expect to help maintain social stability, promote reform, and 
bring about the development of the economy. 
  Lei Jieqiong said the main areas of the CAPD's political 
work 
lie in education, culture, and publishing, which she pointed out 
are in line with the characteristics of the CAPD and with the 
principle of seeking truth from facts. She said the CAPD needs 
to continuously develop this superiority. She continued, saying 
that in addition to seeking major breakthroughs in political 
work, the CAPD should emancipate the mind and energetically 
explore new fields. 
  Zhao Puchu, vice chairman of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference and honorary chairman of the CAPD 
Central Committee, attended the meeting. Chen Shunli, Ge 
Zhicheng, Chu Zhuang, Ye Zhishan, Mei Xiangming, Chen Nanxian, 
Deng Weizhi, and Xu Jialu, vice chairmen of the CAPD Central 
Committee, also attended. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26942 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator Article on Development of Land Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentator Article on Development of Land Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806051494 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806051494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentator's article: "Actively and Properly Develop the </F>
Land Market"] 
  [Text] Today we hail the arrival of the fourth "Land Day." 
The theme of "Land Day" this year is "land and market." 
  As an element of production simultaneously boasting the duel 
properties of resource and asset, land is of particularly vital 
significance to social and economic development in China. Over 
the past few years, along with the establishment and development 
of a socialist market economic structure, and impelled by the 
land use structural reform, China's land market has grown out of 
nothing and has gradually taken shape. In some key cities of 
the developed regions, its development has been even faster. 
Land, having been sluggish for a long time, began to be 
enlivened as an important element of production, and the right 
to use it began its compensatory flow as a special commodity 
between owner and user and among users. The proportion of land 
transferred through the market rather than administrative 
allocation is increasingly larger. 
  The formation and development of the land market with 
compensatory use of land as its core content has played a 
vigorous role of promotion in China in such aspects as effecting 
rational allocation of land resources, increasing government 
financial revenues, accelerating urban construction, developing 
secondary and tertiary industries, improving the investment 
environment, absorbing foreign capital, and so on. The 
formation and development of the land market is the product of 
China's economic structural reform on the one hand, and has 
energetically pushed forward other related in-depth reforms on 
the other. For example, the achievements attained in the 
structural reforms in planning, banking, housing, and farm land, 
as well as in the establishment of a modern enterprise system 
and the invigoration of large and medium-sized state 
enterprises, for which the entire people, from top to bottom, 
have shown great concern, are all closely related to the reform 
of the land use system and the construction and cultivation of 
the land market. The newly emerging land market in China has 
become part and parcel of the socialist market economic 
structure. 
  In the meantime, we should also soberly note that the time 
for reforming China's land use system is short, and the problems 
left over from the old land use system are numerous. The land 
market is still in a growing and shaping stage, so it is 
immature and has yet to be standardized. Therefore, it is 
unavoidable that some problems exist, though they should not be 
neglected. Take, for example, the phenomena of giving 
overlapping approval of land and of approving land ultra vires 
in violation of the law, which have emerged in some localities 
in large multitude. Market transparency is low, administrative 
interventions are excessively numerous, and there is a tendency 
of unstandardized development in the land market. A 
considerable portion of organizations and individuals engaging 
in land development and operation have not conducted normal 
market trading activities in accordance with laws and 
regulations. On the other hand, they have been keen on 
speculation in land and projects in order to reap exorbitant 
profits, which has stimulated the speculative activities in land 
and intervened in the normal order of the land market. In 
addition, the land supply plan has not been carried out 
conscientiously, the land taxation system has yet to be 
straightened out, the building of the law regarding the land 
market is in urgent need of augmentation, and the unified 
management structure of land should be further enhanced. 
  The above problems indicate that while positively pushing 
forward and cultivating the land market, we should also make 
necessary preparations in structure, policy, and law in order to 
positively and properly cultivate the land market. Only by so 
doing can the building of the land market in China advance to a 
healthy and smooth orbit. With regard to the problems existing 
in the development of the land market, the party Central 
Committee and State Council have taken them very seriously, have 
issued to lower levels a series of relevant policies and 
documents since the latter half of 1992, and have taken the 
standardization of the land market as a major aspect of 
macroeconomic regulation and control. After nearly a year of 
rectification of these problems the land market has been 
standardized to some extent. In spite of this, some deep-rooted 
problems in the development of the land market still have to be 
resolved through the in-depth reform of the land use system and 
the cultivation and standardization of the land market. 
  An important issue at present is the necessity to work hard 
to expedite the building of a socialist land market system and 
to form a standardized and perfect land market as quickly as 
possible. In addition, it is necessary to further increase the 
intensity of allocating land resources by way of the market 
mechanism, increase the proportion of land supplied via the 
modes of selling by tender and auction, and tighten the 
management of land which was allocated previously; to bring into 
full play the role of regulation and control in planning, 
banking, taxation, and other means, and put into effect the 
macroeconomic regulation and control of the land market; and to 
intensify the management of land prices, perfect the land price 
assessment system, improve and amplify the land registration 
system as quickly as possible, and institute a sound legal 
system in the land market. Moreover, it is necessary to further 
reinforce the in-depth structural reform of land management in a 
bid to suit the requirements of the ever-growing land market 
construction. Governments at all levels and pertinent 
functional departments should pay serious attention to and 
coordinate with one another closely in performing the above 
tasks well, so that China's land market will head for maturity 
at an early date on an open, fair, just, orderly, and 
standardized basis. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26943 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Development Bank Finances Key Projects </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Development Bank Finances Key Projects </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706154394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1513 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706154394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- The State Development 
Bank of China (SDBC) has granted 32 billion yuan in loans since 
it was founded three months ago, SDBC spokesman Chen Tielin said 
here today. 
  Ninety percent of the loans have gone to state key projects 
in basic industries and infrastructure, he said. 
  "The 257 large and medium-sized projects covered by the 
bank's loan scheme have all received 50 per cent of their 
current year loan total of 57 billion yuan," said Chen. 
  The bank, which began operation on March 17, was responsible 
for providing loans to finance state key construction projects. 
  The bank plans to provide 2.8 billion yuan loans to the 
Beijing-Kowloon railway which is under construction and it has 
so far provided 2.1 billion yuan to the project. 
  It has also pumped 1.25 billion yuan into the Three-Gorges 
project, 42 percent of the total lending the bank has promised 
for 1994. 
  The operational capital of the bank comes mainly from bonds 
it issues to state specialized banks and other non-banking 
financial institutions. It plans to issue 65 billion yuan of 
financial bonds this year. 
  It has raised 28 billion yuan so far and another 37 billion 
yuan will be raised in the latter half of this year. 
  The bank has formed a special committee to conduct studies 
on 
the 16 projects applying for loans, including the electrified 
railway from Wuhan to Guangzhou and a Chang Jiang River bridge 
at Wuhu, Anhui Province. 
  Chen revealed that the bank is considering extending working 
capital loans to projects completed this year. 
  A dozen groups organized by the bank and the People's 
Construction Bank of China have been dispatched to provinces and 
major cities to find out the actual situation in the demand for 
working capital, Chen noted. 
  The bank is also exploring other ways of raising funds, 
including issuing of bonds abroad, in order to secure long-term 
and stable sources of funds, Chen said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26944 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bank To Provide `Huge Sum' To Aid Satellite Launches </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bank To Provide `Huge Sum' To Aid Satellite Launches </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706140494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1351 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706140494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- The Bank of China 
(BOC), the country's state foreign trade and exchange bank, has 
agreed to provide a huge sum in export seller's credit to 
finance the launching of foreign satellites. 
  BOC officials said the 900 million yuan loan (about 100 
million U.S. dollars) is the biggest single export seller's 
credit the bank has ever provided since it started such business 
in 1980. 
  The second biggest sum of export seller's credit was made to 
China Machinery and Equipment Import and Export Corporation in 
December 1993, at a total amount of 690 million yuan. 
  The deal was sealed here today between the Bank of China and 
the Great Wall Industry Corporation, which specializes in 
research and production of carrier rockets. 
  China announced last month that it will launch some 30 
foreign satellites of different types from 1994 to around the 
year 2000. 
  The Great Wall Industry Corporation will send three foreign 
satellites into space in 1994, according to an official with the 
corporation. 
  The corporation is also negotiating with the newly 
established Import and Export Bank of China for more financial 
support for its satellite launching business. 
  As a main export credit provider, the Bank of China has so 
far provided 13 billion yuan export seller's credits to support 
the production and export of complete sets of equipment, cargo 
ships, aircraft, and automobiles to international satellite 
launching. 
  It has also provided export buyer's credits totaling 160 
million U.S. dollars. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26945 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   More Surplus Farm Workers Transfer to Nonfarm Jobs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    More Surplus Farm Workers Transfer to Nonfarm Jobs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806094694 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0814 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806094694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Lu Yongjian (7773 3057 1696)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 27 Jun (XINHUA) -- According to the latest 
information provided by the State Statistical Bureau, the shift 
of surplus farm labor to nonfarm jobs has accelerated noticeably 
in China. In 1993, farm workers engaged in secondary and 
tertiary industries accounted for 29.8 percent of the total 
rural work force, an increase of 9.6 percentage points from 
1992. This demonstrates China's new achievements in rural 
industrialization. 
  Since the introduction of reform and opening up, large 
numbers of rural workers have abandoned crop planting to work in 
village and town enterprises or to engage in industrial, 
commercial, and service businesses in other regions. This shift 
of labor to other sectors has improved peasants' quality and 
incomes, helping to bring capital, technology, and information 
to the countryside. Last year was an important year in which 
rural China, or even the entire socioeconomic structure, turned 
in the direction of the market. It also saw the quickest 
transfer of surplus farm labor to nonfarm jobs. The number of 
workers thus transferred represented 8.6 percent of the total 
rural work force, an increase of 4.3 percentage points from 1992. 
  Sectorally, industry, construction, commerce, and catering 
are the main industries where farm labor is headed. Among farm 
workers who shifted to nonfarm jobs in 1993, 31.1 percent went 
to the industrial sector, 25.1 percent to the construction 
industry, and 17 percent to commercial and catering businesses. 
Some also joined the communications and transportation sector, 
postal and telecommunications services, and sports, cultural, 
and art establishments as job opportunities for these workers 
multiplied. 
  Although men account for most of the workers who transfer to 
nonfarm jobs, the number of women involved in such transfers is 
increasing. In 1993, women accounted for 33.2 percent of 
surplus farm workers who transferred to nonfarm jobs, an 
increase of 4.8 percentage points from 1992. 
  Geographically, the shift within a province decreased in 
1993 
but that across provincial lines increased. Statistics show 
that nationwide, workers who switched to nonfarm jobs within 
provinces last year accounted for 80.6 percent of the total work 
force thus transferred, while those who shifted to nonfarm jobs 
outside their provinces represented 19.4 percent. Judging by 
the distribution of such labor in east, central, and west China, 
74.1 percent of farm workers went to the east in ever-increasing 
numbers, while the percentage of workers moving to central and 
west China declined. 
  In 1993, more farm labor transferred to nonfarm jobs in west 
China at a markedly accelerated pace; however, the number of 
such workers was still below the national average. Rural 
workers engaged in secondary and tertiary industries in all of 
west China accounted for 18 percent of the total rural work 
force, an increase of 6.7 percentage points from 1992. In 1993, 
the number of workers which transferred to nonfarm jobs in west 
China represented 7.8 percent of the total work force. 
  Village and town enterprises continued to expand rapidly, 
becoming the main reason for last year's accelerated shift of 
surplus farm labor to nonfarm jobs. Nationwide, village and 
town enterprises numbered 24 million in 1993, an 18-percent 
increase from 1992, and employed 120 million workers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26946 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Methods To Train Laborers To Serve Abroad </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Methods To Train Laborers To Serve Abroad </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706142494 Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 8 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706142494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Provisional Methods for Training Laborers Who Will Serve </F>
Abroad"] 
  [Text] Article 1 
  Aim: To improve the quality of Chinese laborers (including 
postgraduates, the same hereinafter) who will serve abroad, to 
meet international labor service market demands, and to improve 
management over these laborers, methods have been formulated as 
follows: 
<H5>  Article 2 </H5>
  Units responsible for training and organizing these 
laborers: 
The Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation [MOFTEC] 
will exercise management over Chinese laborers who will serve 
abroad, in line with their relevant trades, and will guide and 
coordinate the formation of all levels of training centers, as 
well as the training of Chinese laborers who will serve abroad. 
Departments in charge of foreign trade and economic cooperation 
under the ministries and commissions of the State Council, and 
the foreign trade and economic commissions (departments and 
bureaus) (hereinafter called departments in charge) of 
provinces, autonomous regions, cities directly under the central 
authorities, and cities on separate listing, are responsible for 
organizing and guiding the training of laborers in their 
departments (localities) who will serve abroad. 
<H5>  Article 3 </H5>
  The establishment of training centers: The departments in 
charge or the companies entitled to send laborers abroad 
(hereinafter called entitled companies) must establish training 
centers according to their specific conditions. They may 
establish training centers according to different professions 
and trades -- depending on their different conditions -- or they 
may establish comprehensive training centers. These training 
centers must possess the necessary educational conditions, 
teachers, mathematical equipment, and teaching programs, and 
must submit all these to MOFTEC for approval. 
<H5>  Article 4 </H5>
  People to be trained: All kinds of laborers (including 
ordinary or senior laborers and postgraduates) who will be sent 
abroad (or outside the borders) by the entitled companies must 
be given training. 
<H5>  Article 5 </H5>
  What to be taught: 1) The relevant state laws, regulations, 
principles, and policies; patriotism; and foreign-related 
discipline. 
  2) Courses on foreign languages, adaptability, and the 
relevant countries' (regions') basic situations, to be provided 
according to the countries' (regions') characteristics and 
requirements. 
  3) The relevant countries' laws, regulations, financial 
knowledge, customs, habits, and manners. 
  4) Education on transforming concepts, on establishing a 
correct concept of labor and professional ethics, on abiding by 
the relevant countries' labor system, on studying advanced 
foreign production technology and managerial experience, on 
obeying management, and on seriously fulfilling contracts. 
<H5>  Article 6 </H5>
  Teaching material: 1) State laws, regulations, principles, 
and policies; foreign-related discipline and rules; the relevant 
countries' laws, regulations, customs, habits, and manners 
(hereinafter called the general material); the general training 
program to be worked out by MOFTEC. 
  2) Language-teaching material will be compiled by training 
centers in accordance with the relevant countries' requirements. 
  3) Professional and technical teaching material will be 
compiled by different departments in strict accordance with 
state criteria. To cope with the technical requirements of the 
relevant countries or foreign employers, MOFTEC can invite some 
experts to provide additions to professional and technical 
teaching material. 
<H5>  Article 7 </H5>
  Training methods: Chinese laborers who will serve abroad 
must be given examinations or assessments on their 
qualifications before attending training courses. Relevant 
training methods must be adopted in accordance with laborers' 
different levels and with different countries' requirements 
concerning foreign laborers: 1) Technical laborers with junior 
title or above who have mastered the relevant skills and the 
expressions for daily use in the official languages of the 
relevant countries (regions) will be exempted from technical and 
foreign language courses, provided they can produce technical 
position title certificates and foreign language examination 
certificates (school reports). They need to attend only 
training on common subjects at an appointed time. 
  2) Ordinary technical laborers must be given assessments 
before being recruited. They must attend appropriate technical 
training, courses on simple expressions for daily use and work, 
and courses on common subjects. 
  3) The professional and technical assessments of laborers 
(including managerial personnel) sent abroad under a project 
contract system (usually involving 15 people or more) must be 
supervised by the contract-performing unit or by the unit that 
sends these personnel; their training and examination on common 
subjects will be carried out by appointed training centers. 
  Article 8 
  Training period: The course on the general material should 
be conducted for not less than a week; the period for language 
training must be arranged according to the requirements of the 
relevant countries to which the laborers will be sent, but at 
least a week of intensified training must be provided on simple 
expressions for daily use and work, as well as on professional 
skills. Training centers must give examinations in accordance 
with international practice and the technical requirements of 
the relevant countries, or they may arrange training courses on 
appropriate skills in light of the actual situation. 
<H5>  Article 9 </H5>
  Training fee: In principle, either the participants or the 
units that will send laborers abroad are responsible for paying 
the training fee. The arbitrary collection of charges is 
strictly prohibited. MOFTEC will adjust the training fee. 
<H5>  Article 10 </H5>
  Examination and end of training: Examination must be 
conducted before training ends. Examination questions must be 
set according to the general program and detailed criteria must 
be provided so as to ensure training quality. Upon fulfillment 
of training targets and being proved qualified through 
examination, a "certificate of qualification for laborers who 
will serve abroad" will be issued by MOFTEC or an authorized 
training center. 
<H5>  Article 11 </H5>
  Dispatching procedures: From now on, a "certificate of 
qualification for laborers who will serve abroad" gradually will 
be introduced when laborers submit procedures for exits to 
foreign countries (regions). Without this certificate, no 
laborer can be sent abroad. The foreign countries (regions) to 
which Chinese laborers can be sent will be determined by MOFTEC 
after consulting with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the 
Ministry of Public Security. 
<H5>  Article 12 </H5>
  Punishment: MOFTEC will conduct regular inspections of 
training centers. If a training center provides poor quality 
training, resorts to deception, or arbitrarily issues 
"certificates of qualification," and depending on the merits of 
each case, it will be criticized, given an economic punishment, 
suspended from business for three to six months, ordered to 
correct its mistakes, or disqualified from the status of being a 
training center. 
<H5>  Article 13 </H5>
  By-Regulations: These methods will come into force on 1 
October 1994, and MOFTEC is responsible for explaining the 
relevant provisions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26947 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  21 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Special Column' Views Foreign Investment Malpractices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Special Column' Views Foreign Investment Malpractices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806064094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 2118 
GMT 21 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806064094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Special column" by reporter Li Yafei (2621 0068 7236): </F>
"Capital Games and Profit Losses -- Investigating and 
Considering the Performance of Some Partly or Wholly 
Foreign-Owned Enterprises"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 22 Jun (XINHUA) -- Fake foreign investment 
is commonplace in China. Playing on China's eagerness for 
foreign capital, some foreign businessmen have exploited China's 
policy and management loopholes to engage in fraudulent 
practices and put up false fronts during the investment process 
in an attempt to seek profits by hook or by crook. During a 
recent investigation of some partly or wholly foreign-owned 
enterprises, this reporter found a whole range of falsehoods in 
the entire capital circulating process encompassing investment, 
operation, production, marketing, and profit distribution. To 
put it bluntly, these are "capital games" played by foreign 
businessmen. Such economic games cannot bring us real benefits. 
<H5>  I. Where Have the Profits Gone? </H5>
  China's phenomenal success in using foreign capital since 
reform and opening up should be recognized. While foreign 
capital has largely been used in a healthy manner in various 
localities, we must take note of new circumstances and problems 
that have surfaced. 
  According to incomplete statistics compiled by relevant 
departments, losses incurred by partly or wholly foreign-owned 
enterprises in China totaled 7 billion yuan in 1992, twice the 
amount of 1990. Their total losses from 1990-92 came to 16.2 
billion yuan. Cumulative losses in some enterprises outstripped 
their registered capital, causing their debts to exceed their 
capital. It is reported that the losses were caused by many 
factors, chief among them being the false reporting of losses. 
Since its founding in 1986, a joint venture in Guangdong has 
reported losses every year and chalked up 920,000 yuan in total 
losses. However, it increased its capital by $3 million on 
three occasions in recent years. 
  How did it manage to increase capital despite its losses? 
Behind this anomaly is the "business savvy" exhibited by some 
foreign businessmen in secretly diverting their profits. 
  Profit diversion is a practice widely adopted by investors 
the world over to seek excessive profits and evade taxes, and 
examples of this practice abound among foreign investors in 
China. Some of these foreign investors provide high price 
quotations for the equipment with which they make investments in 
an attempt to disguise inferior quality, reap some profits early 
in the game, or exaggerate the investment-dividend ratio. Some 
control export and import channels, and divert profits to the 
companies in their home countries by providing high price 
quotations on imported raw and semifinished materials, and by 
depressing the prices of export goods. Some ask their partners 
to share unreasonable charges and fraudulently increase capital 
so that they can divert profits and increase their losses for 
purposes of tax evasion. Using the regulation that exempts 
partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises from income tax 
within the first two years of profit-making, or that grants them 
income tax reductions within the first three years of 
profit-making, some foreign investors misreport their losses and 
intentionally delay their profit-making year to evade taxes. 
Still others set up "dummy companies" in tax havens around the 
world and divert their profits to such companies in what amounts 
to an international tax evasion exercise. The list of such 
practices goes on and on. 
  Relevant experts have estimated that foreign joint-venture 
partners have spirited profits totaling several billion U.S. 
dollars out of China by resorting to two practices alone: 
importing equipment at high prices, and exporting goods at low 
prices. 
<H5>  II. The Secret of "Contracted Capital": Large Sums of </H5>
Contracted Capital but Small Sums of Actual Investment 
  Although they sign many investment contracts covering 
sizable 
amounts of capital, some foreign businessmen make far smaller 
investments in reality, do not pay their registered capital, and 
default on payments in violation of contractual obligations, 
thus creating an illusory, bubble phenomenon. 
  According to an investigation by relevant departments of 
1,187 partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises whose 
contractually stipulated deadline for paying capital was up, 668 
of them, or 56 percent, failed to pay their registered capital 
in violation of contractual obligations. The defaulted capital 
totaled $900 million, or 53 percent of payable capital. 
According to the contract, the foreign partner of a joint 
venture which was set up in Beijing in November of 1991 is 
supposed to invest $100,000 in cash but has thus far failed to 
pay a single cent. The enterprise in question has become a 
joint venture in name. Real estate companies account for a high 
percentage of enterprises which have failed to pay their 
registered capital. 
  In making investments, many foreign businessmen make every 
effort to keep their registered capital down. After making 
small capital contributions, they raise capital by taking out 
loans from domestic banks in the name of the joint ventures, 
with their Chinese partners undertaking all risks pertaining to 
their loans. Loans obtained by a foreign-funded enterprise in a 
certain province totaled $1.7 billion, or 46 percent of the 
paid-in capital, at the end of 1992. Using massive amounts of 
domestic capital to set up partly or wholly foreign-owned 
enterprises is contrary to China's goals of using foreign 
capital. Some foreign businessmen who use equipment as 
investment capital provide high price quotations for their 
low-cost equipment and fraudulently increase their paid-in 
capital. In evaluating some equipment whose prices were 
reported by foreign businessmen, relevant departments found that 
83 percent of the prices were misrepresented and were 
substantially lower than the actual prices; some were even 
over-reported by several times. 
<H5>  III. Being "Dummy" Means Lacking Foreign Capital </H5>
  Partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises enjoy some 
policy-related preferential treatment, prompting some people to 
employ this loophole. The result is some "dummy partly or 
wholly foreign-owned" enterprises. 
  According to one tactic employed by these people, they 
enlist 
the assistance of their foreign partners in completing relevant 
formalities without asking the latter to make capital 
contributions. A wholly foreign-owned enterprise in Inner 
Mongolia, for example, is actually a dummy one set up by local 
businessmen who pose as foreign investors. In east China, some 
foreign businessmen, using their passports and some assets 
certificates issued abroad, do business without capital 
investment, sign joint-venture contracts, and collect "service 
charges." According to another tactic, foreign partners make 
themselves available for relevant formalities while their 
Chinese partners remit foreign exchange out of China on their 
behalf. Some Hong Kong-registered enterprises or foreign 
representative offices in China make themselves available for 
relevant formalities while their Chinese partners remit foreign 
exchange out of the country so that the enterprises outside of 
China can reinvest those foreign exchange remittances in China. 
Still other foreign businessmen bring in capital in accordance 
with relevant provisions, and after obtaining capital 
verification certificates and joint-venture licenses, both the 
Chinese and foreign partners remit foreign capital contributions 
out of China under various pretexts in accordance with privately 
concluded agreements. Even more outrageous is that some foreign 
businessmen produce false capital verification certificates and 
false bank receipts. Last year, capital verification 
certificates and bank receipts produced by eight wholly 
foreign-owned enterprises in Haikou City were found to be fake. 
  IV. Profiting From the Chinese With Their Foreign 
Exchange Receipts 
  Virtually all foreign businessmen undertake in their 
contracts to balance their foreign exchange and to set ratios 
for sales to their home countries and for exports. Departments 
in charge of examining and approving their applications also 
specifically require them to do so. In reality, many partly or 
wholly foreign-owned enterprises only undertake to do so on 
paper. According to an analysis by relevant departments on the 
sales performance of partly or wholly foreign-owned, 
production-oriented enterprises, only 15 of them met the 
contractually stipulated export ratios in selling their products 
while the rest failed to meet those ratios. A significant 
number of those enterprises sold all their products on the 
domestic market. To solve the problem of balancing their foreign 
exchange, they brought in foreign currency through foreign 
exchange markets, imported raw and semifinished materials for 
processing and sale in China, earned large amounts of renminbi, 
and converted it into foreign currency in foreign exchange 
markets, thus giving rise to the bizarre phenomenon of 
"profiting from the Chinese with their foreign exchange 
receipts." Such actions not only have had an adverse effect on 
China's still fragile foreign exchange markets but also have 
compounded the country's balance of payments. 
  Some foreign businessmen abuse their exclusive selling 
rights 
to quote unit prices or issue invoices on their own for export 
goods, which they sell at low prices to their parent companies, 
subsidiaries, or other affiliates abroad. Some foreign 
businessmen appropriate their Chinese partners' funds, default 
on payments, or swindle their Chinese partners of their money 
under the pretext of exporting goods. They also chronically 
refuse to remit their payments for goods. Consequently, a 
growing amount of outbound joint-venture capital fails to make 
its way back to China, an amount which sometimes even vastly 
outstrips the foreign partners' total capital contributions. 
<H5>  V. Dispelling Illusions and Stressing Practical Results </H5>
  Faced with problems of every description in connection with 
foreign investment, people should seriously consider and study 
solutions to such problems. 
  The first issue to be considered is how to stress practical 
results in using foreign capital and to pay attention to 
studying capital-related issues. 
  In recent years, many localities evaluated their leaders' 
job 
performances in light of the number of joint ventures set up 
locally. They determined the number of new joint ventures to 
set up in any given year. This practice has fueled some 
illusory, bubble phenomena in the course of developing partly or 
wholly foreign-owned enterprises. At present, we should set our 
sights on improving the quality and efficiency of introducing 
foreign capital, focusing on solving such crucial problems as 
small actual foreign capital input, failure to pay registered 
capital, small numbers of joint ventures which eventually become 
operational, large numbers of deficit-ridden joint ventures, and 
capital flight. In evaluating the results of foreign capital 
utilization, we should consider actual foreign capital input and 
the resultant economic benefits. Activities involving dealings 
with foreign businessmen and setting up enterprises are 
graphically reflected in capital flow. Therefore, we should 
thoroughly study and explore capital-related issues within the 
context of the actual status of foreign capital utilization. 
This carries strong implications for China's current economic 
activity. 
  The second issue to be considered is how to strengthen the 
legal system and improve the state's macroeconomic regulation 
and control. 
  We should devise scientifically conceived plans regarding 
the 
development of partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises to 
reduce the degree of recklessness in setting up such 
enterprises. Banks should develop rules governing loans for 
foreign-funded enterprises at an early date so that foreign 
capital will be truly used in China instead of letting foreign 
businessmen use domestic capital. We should explicitly forbid 
banks to grant loans for use as capital contributions by Chinese 
partners in state-controlled projects, so that our limited 
capital will only be used for projects badly needed by the 
country. 
  The third issue to be considered is how to exercise strict 
management in accordance with the law and how to devise relevant 
preventive measures. 
  We should earnestly carry out work pertaining to capital 
investment and resolutely plug the channels through which dummy 
joint ventures are set up. As a rule, we should revoke the 
business licenses of partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises 
if their foreign partners have failed to invest capital or have 
made investments in renminbi without justifiable reasons after 
the joint ventures have been registered for more than one year. 
To prevent foreign businessmen from providing high price 
quotations on low-cost imported equipment in an attempt to 
disguise inferior quality, we should evaluate non-capital 
investments made by foreign businessmen. Economic, trade, 
industrial, commercial, customs, commodity inspection, foreign 
exchange, and taxation departments, as well as banks, should 
institute sweeping preventive measures regarding the capital of 
partly or wholly foreign-owned enterprises, so that an 
integrated and strictly regulated administrative system will 
take shape. 
  The fourth issue to be considered is how to actively fight 
against tax evasion. 
  Profit diversion and tax evasion involving international 
capital in multinational transactions demand urgent attention 
from tax offices. Currently, we need to urgently devise laws 
and regulations on fighting tax evasion and study the methods of 
combating tax evasion. 
  The fifth issue to be considered is how Chinese enterprises 
should master the law of foreign capital utilization to reduce 
the degree of recklessness in using foreign capital. 
  As China opens wider to the outside world, its enterprises 
should quickly learn the secrets of international capital flow, 
master the law of foreign capital utilization, and reduce the 
degree of recklessness in all stages of using foreign capital 
ranging from finding investment partners, determining 
joint-venture projects, and conducting feasibility studies to 
signing contracts, building and launching projects, engaging in 
production and marketing, and distributing profits. We should 
encourage a scientific and practical approach. In the volatile 
market economy, we should constantly sum up our experiences and 
learn from our mistakes in managing foreign capital so that our 
enterprises will operate more efficiently as they gain more 
experience. 
  The sixth issue to be considered is how to deal with illegal 
foreign businessmen in strict accordance with the law. 
  We should never accommodate foreign businessmen who amass 
ill-gotten wealth by hook or by crook in violation of Chinese 
law. We should let the whole world know that China welcomes 
foreign investment and protects foreign businessmen's legitimate 
rights and interests. However, we should never allow foreign 
businessmen to seek staggering profits by hook or by crook in 
violation of Chinese law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26948 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  15 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Conference on Foreign-Funded Enterprises Held </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Conference on Foreign-Funded Enterprises Held </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806031894 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0902 
GMT 15 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806031894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 15 Jun (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--It is 
learned from the national conference on registration and 
administration of foreign-funded enterprises held in Beijing 
several days ago that the State Administration for Industry and 
Commerce will take a series of measures to strengthen 
registration and administration of foreign-funded enterprises. 
The specific measures are as follows. 
  Strengthening and improving registration and examination of 
the setting up of foreign-funded enterprises, examining the 
investment they have made, investigating and prosecuting cases 
involving their violations of laws and regulations, and carrying 
out annual examination of their operations. 
  A Chinese-foreign joint-venture enterprise to which the 
Chinese side only contributes its existing assets is required to 
produce the Chinese side's assets assessment report confirmed by 
the department in charge of administering state-owned 
enterprises when it registers with the proper authorities. 
  For a Chinese-foreign joint-venture enterprise to which the 
foreign side contributes equipment and goods, the actual prices 
of the equipment and goods must be clearly stated in the 
contract and confirmed by a notary office acceptable to both 
sides. 
  If the articles of association or the contract submitted by 
the Chinese-foreign joint venture violates the principle of both 
sides sharing profits and risks or fails to state that both 
sides will provide guarantees for their investment in loans [tou 
zi dai kuan dan bao 2121 6327 6313 2949 2137 0202] in proportion 
to their investment or that the Chinese side will guarantee the 
rate of return on foreign investment with loans, bonds, or the 
like, the relevant authority has the right to require both sides 
to amend their contract; if they refuse to do so, they shall not 
register. 
  Strengthening inspection of the supply of capital by 
investors of foreign-funded enterprises. The investors must 
supply the capital in full within six months of the date of 
issue of their licenses if their registered capital amounts to 
$2 million or less; within one year for registered capital 
between $2 million and $5 million; two years for registered 
capital between $5 million and $10 million; three years for 
registered capital between $10 million and $30 million; and 
longer for registered capital of more than $30 million subject 
to the approval of the relevant authority. If the investors 
fail to do so, their licenses shall be revoked. 
  If the Chinese side of a foreign-funded enterprise supplies 
the registered capital on behalf of the foreign side, it is 
unacceptable and the foreign side shall be prosecuted for 
failing to supply the registered capital. If the Chinese side 
obtains a license by using the name of a foreign businessman or 
materials supplied by him and gives him free shares as a reward, 
the license shall be revoked and the offender punished once the 
offense is confirmed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26949 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   `All 13' Free Trade Zones Now in Operation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `All 13' Free Trade Zones Now in Operation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706140794 Beijing XINHUA in English 1357 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706140794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Tianjin, June 27 (XINHUA) -- All 13 bonded zones or 
free trade zones in the coastal areas are in operation, 
attracting an increasing influx of foreign investment and 
fast-growing export processing and transit trade, according to a 
national forum on national bonded areas. 
  The latest report from the customs authorities shows that 
China's bonded zones have played a vital role over the past few 
years in the development of export processing, overseas trade 
and services, such as packaging, transport, storage and 
exhibition. 
  It also shows that up to the end of March this year, of the 
5,813 firms approved to enter the zones, 3,404 are 
foreign-funded ones, accounting for 59 percent of the total, 
with an overall investment of 8.8 billion U.S. dollars including 
3.4 billion of foreign investment. 
  Total exports and imports in the 13 zones have reached 1.74 
billion U.S. dollars, including 100 million U.S. dollars in 
transit trade; goods processed in the zones were worth 200 
million U.S. dollars, including one billion U.S. dollar worth of 
goods in bonded warehouses. 
  Starting in 1991, China has built tax-free zones in 13 
coastal cities, covering a total of 17.62 sq km. 
  According to the forum, great achievements have been made 
since the founding of bonded zones, but much remains to be done 
to abide by international practices. 
  Customs authorities and relevant governmental departments 
urged the streamlining of management institutions according to 
the international rule of free trade and simplifying of customs 
formalities. 
  The forum said that all goods can pass through the zones 
freely except for those banned by the state. The storage of 
commodities such as pesticides, fertilizer and refined oil is 
encouraged. 
  It said that the internal tax levy system will also be 
readjusted and foreign currency is allowed to circulate in the 
bonded zones. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26950 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Copyright Court Accepts 40 Overseas Cases </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Copyright Court Accepts 40 Overseas Cases </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806111894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1048 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806111894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- More than 40 
overseas-related copyright cases have been accepted by the 
intellectual property right tribunal of the Beijing Intermediate 
People's Court since last June, it was announced here today. 
  These lawsuits were mostly launched by overseas companies or 
foreign-funded ventures in China, who complained that their 
rights were being violated by Chinese bodies. 
  But there were also a few Chinese who said their rights had 
been violated by foreign firms. 
  These cases account for 20 percent of the total number of 
copyright cases which the court has accepted since its 
establishment last year. 
  Cases now under investigation include a suit launched by the 
U.S. Disney Company who said its copyright had been violated by 
the Beijing Children's Publishing House, and that launched by 
Microsoft, Auto Desk, Lotus, who alleged that five Chinese 
companies had pirated U.S. computer software technology. 
  There were also several Hong Kong and Taiwan companies 
seeking compensation for copyright losses through the court. 
  "We have sealed up the software and computers in those 
accused Chinese companies last week for preserving evidence," 
said Su Chi, chief of the copyright court. He said these 
companies are all situated in Zhongguanchun, north-west Beijing, 
known as China's silicon valley. 
  "But we cannot yet draw any conclusion at this moment," he 
said, adding that previously a Chinese firm was prosecuted by a 
foreign company based on false evidence. 
  Professor Su, 37, who has studied law in Germany, said his 
court will treat overseas and Chinese parties based on the 
principle of fair judgement. "The judge is just a machine to 
execute laws at our court," he said. "We exclude any personal 
feelings." 
  Judgements will be made according to China's Civil 
Prosecution Law and Copyright Law, which su said are in line 
with German laws and international copyright conventions. 
  In the court, litigants have equal chances to air their case 
and no illegal interference will be allowed. Media and experts 
will be invited to hear the judgement if the case contains 
nothing confidential. 
  According to Su, most cases were tried by his court 
successfully and the litigants felt satisfied. 
  Recently, the court has tried a case concerning a 
Sino-French 
food firm and a Beijing supermarket. The supermarket illegally 
used the foreign-invested firm's well-known brand, "Vie de 
France", to sell Chinese-made bread. The Chinese firm was fined 
15,000 yuan for copyright violation, though the illegal profit 
was only 700 yuan. 
  "This is a warning to any copyright violators," Su said. 
"And the French boss told me his investment confidence has 
become stronger after the trial and he was preparing to set up 
new branches this year in China." 
  China never favors local protectionism in court, he added. 
  Su's court was the first copyright court in China. Now it 
has 16 full-time workers, including a computer software expert. 
All the judges have court working experience of at least five 
years and know English. 
  Cases tried by the court covered the fields of patents, 
brand-names, publications, illegal competition, and pilfering of 
commercial secrets. The largest compensation stood at 31 
million yuan. 
  Copyright courts have also been established in some other 
major Chinese cities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26951 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPPCC Leaders Stress Importance of Agriculture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPPCC Leaders Stress Importance of Agriculture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806112694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1116 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806112694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Three leaders of the 
National Committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference (CPPCC) called today for efforts to 
protect farmers' interests and arouse their initiative. 
  The leaders of the CPPCC, known as the leading think-tank in 
China, agreed that the question of agriculture was essential to 
the success of China's modernization drive. 
  Addressing a meeting of the Standing Committee of the CPPCC 
National Committee, they outlined a number of deep-rooted 
problems in China's farming sector and the rural economy. 
  These included a slow rise in farmers' incomes, the widening 
of earnings between urban and rural residents and between 
coastal areas and land-locked interior areas, and indications of 
possible shortages of major farm products, such as grain, 
cotton, cooking oil and sugar. 
  Yang Rudai, vice-chairman of the CPPCC National Committee, 
said that the slow increase in farmers' incomes was due 
primarily to the ever-rising financial burdens of farmers and 
excessive rises in farming-related goods, including fertilizers, 
fuel and pesticides. 
  He said: "Without rural growth and the prosperity of 
farmers, it would be impossible for China to expand its economy. 
Without rural stability, it would be impossible for China to 
enjoy stability. 
  "For this reason, each reform measure we plan to take must 
not be at the expense of the interests of more than 800 million 
farmers," he told the meeting. 
  Qian Zhengying, another vice-chairman of the CPPCC National 
Committee, stressed the importance of reinforcing agriculture as 
the foundation of the country's economy, in line with the needs 
of modernization and a market economy. 
  She proposed that in drawing up economic development plans, 
the government should set appropriate growth rates both for 
industrial and agricultural production. 
  Agriculture should account for seven or eight percent of the 
government's investments in fixed assets, she said, adding that 
funding for agricultural research should rise to one percent of 
agricultural production value. 
  To this end, the government should earmark an extra 10 
billion yuan a year for agricultural infrastructure and 
research, and farm- related industries. 
  Wang Yuzhao, a Standing Committee member of the CPPCC 
National Committee, said that by purely relying on accumulation 
by farmers, it would be impossible for China to achieve 
sustained agricultural growth and modernize agriculture. 
  Therefore, the government should institute a system in 
support of all links of agriculture, such as production, 
construction, techniques and circulation, he noted. 
  He proposed that the government introduce a system to 
protect 
prices of farm and sideline products by setting the minimum and 
maximum prices. 
  "I think we should gradually introduce a system under which 
prices of grain, cotton and other major farm and sideline 
products will be formed in a rational manner," he said. 
  The government should also establish farm price risk-related 
funds and a grain reserve system, he added. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26952 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Control Eases Financial Burdens on Farmers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Control Eases Financial Burdens on Farmers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806045494 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806045494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Fu Jian: "State Lightens Burden of Farmers"] </F>
  [Text] Unfair financial burdens of farmers have been 
reduced since the central government tightened its control over 
random charges last year but there is still some way to go 
before the problem is completely resolved. 
  Following measures taken by the state, illegal levies and 
labour duties imposed on farmers dropped for the first time last 
year since the mid-1980's, according to the State Statistics 
Bureau (SSB) and the Ministry of Agriculture. 
  Illegal levies--including various kinds of committee 
charges, 
administrative fees, and fines--dropped from 12.4 billion yuan 
($1.4 billion) in 1991 to 7 billion yuan ($804 million) last 
year. Labour duties dropped to a maximum of 20 working days for 
the average individual farmer. 
  Fees imposed on farmers for "collective funds"--to pay for 
administration costs and welfare projects--declined from more 
than 7 percent to 5 percent of farmers' income, the legal figure 
stipulated by the central government in 1991. 
  In total, the reforms cut farmers' tax bills and fees by 1.2 
yuan ($0.14) last year, a 2.5 percent reduction. At the same 
time, farmers' per capita income in 1993 rose 14 percent, 
reaching 921 yuan ($106), according to the SSB. 
  Before last year's reform, farmers had to spend 5 to 8 
percent of their income on illegal charges, according to a 
national survey by the Ministry of Agriculture. Their tax 
payments totalled 10 per cent. 
  "Farmers have contributed a great deal to the nation's 
economy but they have not received their due share of rewards," 
said Li Xiangang, division chief with the Department of Rural 
Co-operative Economy under the Agricultural Ministry. 
  For years, the government's allocations, investment and 
price 
policies had focused on industrialization instead of agriculture. 
<H5>  Disadvantage </H5>
  Economic reform has delivered higher income to farmers since 
the early 1980's, but much of that has been offset by various 
levies imposed simultaneously. This has left farmers with a 
sharp disadvantage in the distribution of national wealth. 
  Many local governments demanded collective funds exceeding 
the stipulated maximum 5 percent rate. Many collected extra 
fees for constructing public welfare projects, although the 
farmers had already paid collective funds for them. In some 
areas, farmers used to have as many as 130 different fees and 
taxes to pay. 
  Illegal financial burdens have taken much away from farmers' 
funds that could have been used to finance farm work. This has 
disrupted normal agricultural production. In some areas, taxes 
and fees intensified the contradiction between farmers and local 
leaders. 
  The State Council passed an urgent circular early last year 
to have local governments eliminate unfair levies imposed on 
farmers. Officials from the State Council, State Planning 
Commission, Ministry of Agriculture, Ministry of Finance, and 
Ministry of Supervision checked all state documents on fee 
collecting from farmers to see if they were legal. 
  Following the survey, the State Council cancelled 80 levies 
and modified another 24 last July. 
  Similar examinations of local government documents involving 
financial charges imposed on farmers have since been conducted 
nationwide. 
  By the end of 1993, the items cancelled by central and 
provincial governments reduced the total burden by 10 billion 
yuan ($1.1 billion) nationwide, or 10.28 yuan ($1.18) for each 
farmer, according to statistics from the Ministry of Agriculture. 
  Cutting fees, however, does not remove the root of the 
problem, said Li. 
  "If local governments' motivation for collecting excess 
levies is not eliminated, illegal burdens may worsen again in 
coming years," he said. 
  Local officials' achievements have been assessed mainly by 
counting their regions' total output value, or the number of 
construction projects completed, encouraging local authorities 
to emphasize local industries, instead of agriculture. This 
naturally resulted in the collection of funds from farmers for 
industrial projects. If the evaluation system remains 
unchanged, excessive levies in the countryside cannot be cured. 
  Statistics from the SSB also show that most farmers worry 
about a renewed increase in illegal levies this year. Besides, 
the invisible burden of the price scissors--the gap between 
administratively imposed high prices for industrial products and 
low agricultural goods--also constricts farmers. Agricultural 
experts say it is crucial for the nation to reform systems for 
redistribution and investment. 
  Chen Jiyuan, director of the Rural Development Institute 
under the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, said that national 
policies for fiscal expenditures and wealth redistributing 
should place greater emphasis on agriculture. 
  "Agriculture needs more investments," he said. "The prices 
of 
farm products should be increased while those of agricultural 
machinery and fertilizers should be dropped." 
  The government has made some efforts to narrow the price 
scissors. During the last 10 years the government has 
substantially increased the prices of farm products three times. 
The most recent one was implemented on June 10. 
  Both Li and Chen suggested that local cadres should be 
evaluated according to more realistic figures, such as regional 
grain output and farmers living standards. 
  Efforts should also be made to help strengthen the farmer's 
abilities to protect themselves, said Li. 
  Many farmers have followed every requirement of their local 
officials. They are unable to judge whether requirements are 
legal or not. 
  The central government issued a regulation on the farmers' 
charges and labour duties in 1991, stipulating that the total 
amount of collective funds imposed on the farmers should not be 
more than 5 percent of their previous year's total income. 
  But as much as 43 per cent of farmers in Northwest China's 
Shaanxi Province know nothing about the regulation, according to 
an SSB sample survey. About one-third of them do not know that 
they can reject fines unless proper legal papers are provided. 
  Farmers should be better informed, said Li. 
  The Agricultural Ministry plans to broaden public 
understanding of the nation's legal requirements. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26953 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Council Issues Circular on Grain Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Council Issues Circular on Grain Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806083594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0640 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806083594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The General Office of 
the State Council, Chinese "cabinet", has issued a circular 
demanding that all provincial, autonomous regional and municipal 
governments as well as the leadership at the ministerial level 
improve the administration of the grain market so as to keep it 
stable. 
  The circular notes that grain is a special commodity with 
strategic significance, and that the stability of the grain 
market has an important bearing on the overall situation. 
  It says that strengthened administration of the grain market 
is an important content of and a necessary measure for the 
state's macro control of grain. 
  In order to maintain regular order in the circulation of 
grain and keep the prices of grain and edible oils basically 
stable, the circular says, the General Office of the State 
Council has demanded that governments at all levels pay close 
attention to the following six aspects: 
  First, they should attach great importance to the purchase 
of 
grain. State-owned grain enterprises should take an active part 
in purchasing grain according to their purchasing quotas and the 
relevant policies. Except for those given approval to purchase 
grain and engage in the wholesale of grain, no other units or 
individuals are allowed to purchase grain directly from the 
countryside. 
  Second, when the enterprises engaging in grain wholesale and 
grain-consuming units in grain-purchasing areas go to buy grain 
in grain-production areas, they are only allowed to buy grain on 
the wholesale grain markets above the county level. 
Transactions outside the grain market are banned. 
  Third, enterprises engaging in grain wholesale should be 
re-organized and re-registered. Those engaging in grain 
business without licenses and those hoarding or speculating in 
grain will be strictly punished. 
  Fourth, it is necessary to make appropriate arrangements for 
the transport of grain from the grain production areas to the 
purchasing areas. 
  Fifth, it is imperative to raise enough funds for the 
purchase and transportation of grain. 
  Sixth, efforts should be made to set up and perfect 
wholesale 
grain markets in both supplying and purchasing areas. Measures 
should be taken to gradually standardize, legalize and modernize 
the grain and oil wholesale markets. Supervision and control of 
the prices in and transactions in grain and oil in the wholesale 
and free-trade markets should be strengthened. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26954 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Provincial Reporters Comment on Agriculture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Provincial Reporters Comment on Agriculture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806030094 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 6 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806030094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report compiled by editor Jiang Xia (3068 1115): "Changes </F>
Take Place Quietly in the Rural Areas--Some Provincial Newspaper 
Reporters Talk About Agriculture Upon Returning From 
News-Covering Mission"] 
  [Text] Recently, our paper invited editors and reporters 
from some provincial, municipal, and autonomous regional 
newspapers, who are responsible for reporting on rural areas, to 
a symposium in Beijing. Coming from all corners of the country, 
they sat together for the purpose of discussing the question of 
reporting on rural areas, but the discussions easily moved to 
what they saw and heard on their news-gathering trips and their 
own responses and feelings. Carried here are excerpts from 
their talks. Though their feelings about the rural areas 
now were mixed excitement and worry, they reached a consensus on 
the following: 
<H5>  The Situation: Development and Changes Are Predominant </H5>
  Gong Junchun [7895 0193 4783] (LIAONING RIBAO): Changes in 
Liaoning in the past few years are really encouraging. In the 
past, when people from the northeast traveled southward, they 
purchased rice, meat, and eggs to take home. They were known 
throughout the country for this. Now agriculture is much more 
developed in Liaoning. For the fourth successive year, grain 
output in the province exceeded 15 billion kilograms. Not only 
is this enough for local consumption but there is also some for 
export. At the beginning of this year, for the first time in 
history, 500 million kgs of husked and unhusked rice were sold 
to Japan, and more than 600,000 live pigs and several hundred 
million kgs of vegetables were sold to neighboring provinces. 
Township and town enterprises have also experienced a speedy 
development. Their total output value last year was 146 billion 
yuan, an increase of 50 billion yuan over the previous year. 
This is the result of the province adhering to the idea of 
urban and rural areas serving each other and complementing each 
other with their strong points. 
  Chen Taixiang [7115 3141 4382] (JILIN RIBAO): There used to 
be more worries than joys in the situation in Jilin's rural 
areas but lately there have been both worries and joys. This 
year there has been a new turning point in which the joys have 
outstripped the worries. The acreage of crops, investment in 
agriculture, and the input of capital goods have all experienced 
an increase this year over the same period last year. Peasants 
are satisfied with the stability of the land contract policy, 
readjustments of grain prices by the state, immediate payment in 
cash by the state rather than IOUs for purchasing grain from 
peasants, and measures to reduce financial burdens on peasants. 
  Han Zhi [7281 2535] and Xu Dongyang [1776 2639 3152] 
(NEIMENGGU RIBAO): In the past, there was a drought in Inner 
Mongolia nine out of 10 years. Sandstorms were almost 
continuous disasters. Since the introduction of reform and 
opening up, especially in the last few years, production 
conditions have undergone tremendous changes. Bumper harvests 
have been registered for several successive years in agriculture 
and animal husbandry. Last year saw the highest grain output and 
number of livestock, and the end of a 20-odd-year-long history 
of importing grain from other provinces. peasants and herdsmen 
are very enthusiastic in production. Last year alone, peasants 
invested 280 million yuan in water conservation projects, and 
herdsmen have also put 190 million yuan into the building of 
natural-disaster-proof bases. The money they have invested 
amounts to 70 percent of total investment. 
  Li Yanhui [2621 5333 6540] (TIANJIN RIBAO): Agriculture in 
Tianjin is concentrated in suburban areas and its guiding idea 
is to serve the city and enrich the peasants. Township and town 
enterprises which were rather scattered and underdeveloped in 
the past now have made overall progress. In some areas, 
presentable industrial parks have taken shape and urbanization 
has basically been realized in some other places. 
  Zeng Xianghui [2582 4382 1920] (HUBEI RIBAO): I have just 
returned from a news-gathering trip to the rural areas. The 
increase in the output of summer grain and oil-bearing crops 
this year is expected to be the biggest in the province in 
recent years. Since last year, much solid work has been done to 
reduce peasant financial burdens, pay cash for grain purchased 
by the state, and increase incomes. The increase in grain 
prices at the end of last year has contributed to the increase 
in the acreage of grain and oil-bearing crops this year. 
Recently, there are signs of some kind of increase in peasant 
burdens. In some parts, there is a shortage of cash to pay for 
summer grain. Naturally, peasants have some worries. They are 
afraid that there will be a deliberate downgrading of the grain 
they sell and that they will re-experience difficulties in 
selling grain. 
  Pang Dianxun [7894 3013 8113] (XINHUA RIBAO): The 
comprehensive economic strength of Jiangsu's rural areas has 
increased. The total output value of township and town 
enterprises has exceeded 300 billion yuan, overtaking the output 
value of urban industry for the first time. Engagement in 
diversified undertakings has seen strong development. In 1993, 
the average per capita income among peasants throughout the 
province was more than 1,200 yuan. In the past two years, 
Jiangsu was also troubled by the problem of shortages in rice 
and cotton produced locally. The main reason was the low 
comparative effectiveness and peasants felt that it did not pay 
to grow grain and cotton. According to investigations, the 
number of peasants who want to increase their income by 
increasing acreage are less and less. In fact, 59 percent of 
peasants want to cultivate farmland only to produce enough for 
their own consumption. 
  Xu Shouli [1776 1343 4409] (DAZHONG RIBAO): Agriculture 
and the rural economy are doing well in Shandong Province. By 
last year, Shandong for the third year led the country in summer 
grain production. It was also among the largest producers of 
apples, peanuts, meat, eggs, dairy products, and aquatic 
products. The province is also faced with difficulties. 
Peasants, for example, find it difficult to deal with the 
market. When making production plans and deciding projects, 
they always do what others are doing and the result is that 
within a given region, people are doing the same trade and 
producing the same thing, causing great rises and falls in the 
yield of certain products. 
  Wang Liya [3769 0448 0068] (HUNAN RIBAO): There are many 
problems in rural areas, but if we look at the principal aspect 
and the major trend, we must admit that the situation is good. 
An important indication is that peasants are much more 
conscious of commodities and the market and "hundreds respond to 
a single call" in the market. Last year, there was virtually no 
piling up of meat, poultry, eggs, aquatic products, and other 
farm and sideline products. 
  Zhao Ruiquan [6392 3843 3123] (HEBEI RIBAO): I was also very 
much impressed when I went to the rural areas. Peasants may not 
understand the term "restructuring," but they are well-versed in 
cultivating vegetables in plastic sheds and tending fruit trees. 
If one household in a village takes the lead, the entire 
village will quickly follow. Why is this? Because the economic 
results are highly attractive. It is progress when peasants 
proceed from this point in making production plans and 
considering matters. It is also where the hope of rural 
economic development lies. 
  Impressive progress has taken place in the rural areas. 
Achievements, however, do not mean there are no problems and no 
potential crises. Participants feel that the most urgent and 
important thing is: 
<H5>  Solid Attention Should Be Paid to Agriculture </H5>
  Zhou Sixian [0719 1835 6343] (JIANGXI RIBAO): Agriculture 
makes up an important proportion of the economy of Jiangxi. In 
the last few decades, more than 50 billion kgs of grain has been 
exported out of the province, which was a major contribution to 
the country. The situation is pretty good now. In the past 
year and more, leaders of the CPC Central Committee and the 
State Council have discussed the issue of agriculture with 
provincial, autonomous regional, and municipal leaders on 
numerous occasions. As a result, over a dozen documents 
concerning agriculture have been issued, indicating the 
finalization of major principles and policies on agriculture and 
rural work. This, however, cannot solve all the problems. Some 
departments openly profess that agriculture should be 
strengthened, but they are more enthusiastic in building 
guesthouses and buying sedans. Many favorable policies by the 
central authorities on supporting major grain and cotton 
producing regions have not really been carried out. To really 
strengthen the status of agriculture as the foundation of the 
national economy, it is important to readjust policies so that 
industry will be supportive of agriculture. 
  Wei Zhangguan [7614 4545 1351] (FUJIAN RIBAO): Breakthroughs 
in the comprehensive development of hilly areas have been made 
in Fujian in the past two years. Peasants cultivate crops to 
solve the problem of food and clothing but make use of the 
mountains to become well-off. There are also cases of empty 
talk in developing agriculture. Some grass-roots local cadres 
feel the cultivation of grain brings in very little income, and 
that it is hard to produce real achievements in their official 
careers. Opening up factories along the road, they believe, is 
a much better alternative. The question is not just to arouse 
the enthusiasm of peasants to grow grain but also to arouse the 
enthusiasm of cadres at all levels to grasp agriculture and the 
enthusiasm of agriculture-related departments in supporting 
agriculture. 
  Chen Taixiang: The spirit of many policies from the central 
government are not really carried out. In some areas, 
grass-roots local organizations are very loose. Coverage by 
wired broadcast systems has declined from 97 to 45 percent in 
rural areas. Places for propagating spiritual civilization have 
been reduced. At the same time, not enough work has been done 
to preserve the enthusiasm of rural cadres. There are also the 
tendencies of giving little publicity to what are reasonable 
financial burdens for peasants. 
  Du Shiguo [2629 2514 0948] (HENAN RIBAO): Henan is a large 
agricultural province and the general situation is pretty good. 
Some areas work hard at building up agricultural production 
bases to lead peasants to produce more. Rural areas face some 
common problems and, in particular, people should be on special 
guard against the rise of boasting and exaggeration and 
formalism. There are areas that report bloated production 
figures to get more favorable treatment. 
  Xu Shouli: One thing we should not neglect is that within 
the same province, uneven economic development between different 
regions is becoming more obvious. The annual income level 
between peasants from the more developed areas in east Shandong 
is about 1,000 yuan higher than that in underdeveloped west 
Shandong. In fact, the annual income for 14 percent of the 
peasants is under 500 yuan. 
  Li Dan [2621 0030] and Huang Shu [7806 3219] (HAINAN RIBAO): 
In Hainan, the gap between the advanced and backward, the rich 
and the poor is also very great. Though tremendous changes have 
taken place in Hainan after the establishment of the province 
and the special economic region, the job of helping poor 
peasants is still a heavy one in this province, which is the 
smallest in land area, the largest in sea area, and has an 80 
percent peasant population. Many peasants still live in 
thatched houses, and their living standard is below the poverty 
line. Much of the land on the island still lies idle. 
Actually, the province is most advantageously located in 
developing marine products and out-of-season melons. The key is 
that governments at all levels in the province should build up 
crisscrossing "flyovers" between the peasants and the market. 
In April this year, more than 30,000 tonnes of watermelon from 
Wenchang County were sold to the north, Hong Kong, and Macao, 
bringing in an income of over 50 million yuan. This alone 
raised the income of the peasants and the county's revenue by 60 
percent and 30 percent respectively over the same period last 
year. 
  Wang Yuhuai [3769 3768 2037] (SHANXI RIBAO): Peasants still 
run into many difficulties in entering the market with their 
produce. Carrying goods to sell over a long distance, for 
instance, is often based on verbal agreements instead of formal 
written contracts. If changes occur in the market, they suffer 
losses and find they would have been better off to sell the 
produce right at their home, rather than transporting them a 
long way to the market. 
  Gong Junchun: It is certainly not easy to solve the many 
problems in rural areas. The greatest difficulty is not that 
there are too many problems, nor does it lie in the obscurity of 
central policies. It lies in the thinking, concepts, and 
working style of some leaders. They "remember agriculture when 
they are hungry but forget it they are full." They admit the 
importance of developing agriculture in their speeches, but 
attach little importance to it in their actions. Empty talk 
will never really push agriculture to a higher level. 
  How do the scattered and individual farming families 
enter the market? What should be done to ensure a smooth 
transfer to a socialist market economy? Different areas have 
different solutions. However, participants in the symposium felt 
the basic way out is: 
<H5>  The Means Must Be Found Among Peasants </H5>
  Xu Shouli: In a large country like China, it is always 
difficult to have leaders at any level come up with a universal 
solution that can embrace and solve all problems. If leaders go 
to the rural areas and go among the peasants, they will, 
however, find solutions to some of the seemingly very difficult 
problems. It may be very practical for leaders to learn from 
the peasants. Of course, respecting peasant creativity does not 
mean leaving them alone without any care. The responsibility of 
leaders is to create favorable conditions for peasants to 
explore and practice, and to be good at discovering and helping 
peasants sum up and improve their experiences to guide and push 
forward the overall situation. 
  Du Shiguo: Practice in Henan suggests that bringing 
industry, agriculture, and trade together, and making 
production, processing, and sales into one system are the most 
effective measures to solve the contradictions between 
small-scale farming and a large market. There are a number of 
ways to do this, such as peasant households plus companies, or 
factories plus peasant households, or processing enterprises 
plus peasant households, or service organizations plus peasant 
households, or specialized associations plus peasant households. 
All these forms have one thing in common, i.e., they are joined 
together by a production and sales contracts, a production based 
system, and a service system. Wherever industry, farming, and 
trade are integrated, people rarely rush for goods or find it 
difficult to sell what they produce. The income of peasants in 
such places has certainly increased. 
  Luo Xiaogang [5012 2556 1511] (SICHUAN RIBAO): In taking 
their products to the market, peasants have been highly 
creative. Those in Yuanba District, Guangyuan City, for 
example, have established village-level companies that link 
production with sales. Peasants in Nanbin District, Shizhu 
County, have set up market information centers away from home to 
open up markets for their home products. Sichuan is a large 
agricultural province, with a farming population of 90 million. 
If work is done well in agriculture, the whole province will be 
doing well, and if peasants are well off, the entire province 
will be rich. Therefore, how to increase the earnings of 
peasants is a major issue. Restructuring agriculture is the key 
to this issue. It means that, while guaranteeing a stable grain 
yield, we should grasp well diversified undertakings and animal 
husbandry. Raising live pigs is a pillar industry in increasing 
peasant income, and there is great room for developing 
high-quality farm produce. There are, indeed, conditions for 
building Sichuan into China's largest meat and vegetable 
producer. Restructuring agriculture also means great efforts 
should be made to develop township and town enterprises. The 
provincial government has decided to experiment with township 
and town enterprises in 100 small cities and towns to pave the 
way for the industrialization of rural areas and the integration 
of urban and rural areas. 
  Chen Zhinong [7115 1807 6593] (ZHEJIANG RIBAO): In many 
parts of Zhejiang, peasants have spontaneously decided to go in 
for large-scale farming. Along with the development of 
secondary and tertiary industries, many peasants want to leave 
farmwork and subcontract their land to others. On the other 
hand, some very experienced peasants wish to contract more land. 
For the same patch of 20 mu of rice paddies, the per capita 
income of one family cultivating it will obviously be several 
times higher than 10 families. In Wenzhou, where large-scale 
farming was done first, over 300,000 mu of land, or 15 percent 
of total farmland, has been cultivated with large-scale farming 
methods. More than 200,000 households, 14 percent, have 
subcontracted their land. The number of experienced farming 
families who wish to develop more land is on the rise, and the 
scale of their farming is also increasing. Besides, to define 
the property rights, invigorate small enterprises, and change 
the losing situation in others, township and town enterprises 
have carried out mergers, auctions, or annexation. Half of the 
enterprises have adopted the share-holding system. 
  Pang Dianxun: In southern Jiangsu, 80 percent of peasants 
have moved into the secondary and tertiary industries. As a 
result, farms run by families and farms operated on the 
share-holding system have become the trend. Successes in this 
respect have been seen in Wuxi, Changshu, and Wuxian. In 
northern Jiangsu, diversified undertakings have fattened peasant 
purses. In 1993, diversified undertakings alone added 150 yuan 
per capita in Yancheng. 
  Zeng Xianghui: Diversified undertakings have also been money 
earners for peasants in Hubei. Last year, peasants in Hubei for 
the first time caught up with the national average income level. 
Much of the money came from diversified undertakings. 
  Wei Zhangguan: In more developed areas along the coast of 
Fujian, land is becoming more concentrated under the operation 
of experienced peasants. And a group of peasants operating on a 
large scale, known as "mini-Hintons" (like farming families in 
the United States represented by William Hinton), have emerged. 
In the comprehensive land system reform experiment in eastern 
Fujian, industrial parks with all kinds of township and town 
enterprises operated by the state, overseas Chinese, and local 
people have appeared. 
  Luo Xiaogang: Large numbers of laborers from Sichuan are 
working in other provinces. Last year, more than 5 million 
Sichuan laborers worked away from their home province. From a 
long-term point of view, this movement of laborers has brought 
gigantic changes to the employment structure and the entire 
economic situation. The drift of laborers has become a 
transcentury movement. It needs a certain period of time to 
become more regular and should not be criticized all the time. 
Much more should be done to guide the flow of laborers. The 
provincial government views it as something of strategic 
importance in revitalizing the rural economy in Sichuan and 
proceeds from this understanding in tackling the issue. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26955 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Commentary' Urges North To Prepare for Floods </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Commentary' Urges North To Prepare for Floods </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706192494 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0546 
GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706192494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Short commentary" by XINHUA reporter Lu Yongjian (7773 </F>
3057 1696): "The North Must Not Ignore Anti-Flood Preparations 
While Combating Serious Droughts"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 24 Jun (XINHUA) -- In addition to doing all 
it can in combating drought and executing the three summer jobs 
[planting, harvesting, and field management], experts have 
pointed out that north China must also pay close attention to 
keeping flood-control projects in good repair and implementing 
various antiflood measures. They must, in particular, rush 
repairs of unsafe sections and remove obstacles in river 
courses. Experience tells us that if we make full use of every 
minute now, we will be able to achieve maximum results with 
little efforts. 
  Experience also tells us that localities that have done a 
good job in building water control projects are better prepared 
to prevent and combat floods, and they are in a better position 
to minimize losses of life and property. 
  Currently, combating drought is an urgent task in the north. 
They must, however, prepare against the possibility that "a 
serious drought suddenly turns into a big flood." Experts noted 
that late July and early August are the peak days of the flood 
season. Harder days still lie ahead insofar as prevention is 
concerned, and localities in the north should conduct a review 
of their flood prevention efforts. As the rainy season has 
begun gradually moving northward from the Zhu Jiang valley, a 
countdown has started for the north in terms of the time it has 
to make preparations; they must make every minute count. 
  There are such major rivers as the Huai He, Huang He, Hai 
He, 
Liao He, and Songhua Jiang and countless smaller streams and 
tributaries north of the Chang Jiang. Government at all levels 
must maintain high vigilance. 
  There have been reports that the north will experience 
heavier rainfall during this year's flood season. Localities in 
the north should make early preparations and see to it that 
adequate attention is paid both to combating drought and 
preventing floods. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26956 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Forestry Minister Views Environment, Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Forestry Minister Views Environment, Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2706135094 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in 
Chinese 6 Jun 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> HK2706135094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on interview with Forestry Minister Xu Youfang by </F>
staff reporter Lu Peifa (7120 1014 3127) on World Environment 
Day; place not given: "Heavy Responsibilities for Environmental 
Protection and Development--Interviewing Forestry Minister Xu 
Youfang on World Environment Day"] 
  [Text] It is one of China's basic national policies to 
plant trees, make the country green, and improve the natural 
environment. To develop forestry, China has enacted and carried 
out a series policies, laws, regulations, and measures, which 
enable China's forestry construction to embark on a course of 
steady development. On World Environment Day, this correspondent 
interviewed Forestry Minister Xu Youfang to hear his views on 
environmental protection and development. 
  Every year for more than a decade, leaders of the central 
government, in their capacity as ordinary citizens, have taken 
the lead to participate in afforestation activities, and their 
acts have set a good example for people throughout the country. 
The joint efforts of people throughout the country have brought 
about great and historic changes in the construction of China's 
forest industry, and great achievements have been made in 
afforestation and forest protection. Since 1981, a total of 3.4 
billion people have taken part in tree-planting activities on 
various occasions and 18 billion trees have been planted. Over 
the past few years, some 80 million mu of land have been 
afforested each year. By now, three provinces -- Guangdong, 
Fujian, and Hunan -- have afforested all barren land that can be 
planted with trees, and they have been commended by the party 
Central Committee and the State Council. This year, some other 
provinces will accomplish the task, too. Major achievements 
have been made in the construction of a 100-million-mu base of 
fast-growing timber, the "three norths" (north China, northeast 
China, and northwest China) shelterbelt networks, the 
shelterbelt networks in the middle and upper reaches of the 
Chang Jiang, the coastal shelterbelt networks, the farmland 
shelterbelt networks on the plains, the Taihang Shan 
afforestation project, and the national desert control project, 
all of which form the basic framework of China's ecological 
improvement efforts. While the scale of afforestation is 
expanding continuously, close attention also has been given to 
raising its quality. The verified total acreage of man-made 
forests that are up to the state requirements has reached 285 
million mu, and the yield has gone up from 65.6 percent in 1988 
to 84.5 percent in 1992. The consumption of forest resources 
also has been brought under effective control. According to the 
second national survey of forest resources (1977-81), the annual 
average consumption of forest resources was 294 million cubic 
meters, while annual average growth was 275 million cubic 
meters, with an annual average deficit of 18.75 million cubic 
meters. In the third national survey of forest resources 
(1984-88), annual average consumption was 344 million cubic 
meters and annual average growth was 366 million cubic meters. 
By the time of the fourth national survey (1989-93), annual 
average consumption was down to 320 million cubic meters, while 
annual average growth went up to 400 million cubic meters. 
These figures show that China's forest resources are increasing 
steadily. In a situation in which forest resources in the world 
as a whole are on the decrease, the increase in China's forest 
resources can be considered an important contribution China has 
made to the development of forestry and the protection of the 
world's natural environment. 
  China, however, still faces an arduous task in building up 
its forest industry. On the one hand, it is still a country 
with a shortage of forests. Its percentage of forest coverage 
is 13.92 percent, lower than the world average, and its per 
capita average of forests is even lower. There are still large 
tracts of mountains and wasteland which need to be afforested, 
and large areas of desert and land threatened by desert which 
need to be improved. On the other hand, owing to the 
insufficient forest coverage, the problem of the natural 
environment remains serious. Taking the country as a whole, 
half of the population, one-third of the cultivated land, and 
one-third of the major cities are situated below the 
flood-warning line of rivers, and areas that generate two-thirds 
of the country's total industrial and agricultural output value 
are threatened by floods. According to statistics, there is an 
average of about 500 million mu of farmland under the constant 
menace of natural disaster, of which that caused by drought 
accounts for 61 percent; that by flooding, 24 percent; that by 
hailstorms, 9 percent; and that by frost, 6 percent. In 
addition, there are the calamities of dry and hot winds and low 
temperatures. To effect a fundamental change in this situation, 
the most important thing is to further sharpen the whole 
society's sense of ecology and a better environment, make great 
efforts to develop the forest industry, continuously expand the 
green canopy, and bring into full play the role of forests as an 
ecological shelterbelt with their multiple functions. 
  Minister Xu pointed out: In the world today, the cry for the 
development of forestry is growing louder and louder, and 
China's modernization drive has imposed higher and higher 
demands on the forest industry. As a major task and the chief 
content of environmental construction, forestry must make its 
contribution not only to the improvement of the natural 
environment, but also -- in conjunction with the readjustment of 
the industrial setup in the countryside and the local economy -- 
to improving the livelihood of people in mountainous areas, to 
improving the investment environment in the drive to open up to 
the outside world, and to promoting spiritual civilization. 
China will adhere to its own road for the development of the 
forest industry, and taking as its objective the development of 
highly efficient and sustained forestry that provides greater 
and better yields and focusing closely on the two major tasks of 
reform and development, will comprehensively accomplish the goal 
for the development of forestry in the 1990s -- that is, to 
fulfill the predetermined national afforestation tasks one or 
two years before the turn of this century. By 1995, 13 
provinces (autonomous regions and municipalities) will basically 
accomplish the task of afforesting all their barren mountains 
where trees can be planted, and by 2000, the number of provinces 
(autonomous regions and municipalities) will reach 21, and the 
percentage of forest coverage in the country will be raised to 
around 15.3 percent. By then, the total output value of the 
forest industry will increase from the current 140 billion yuan 
to 304 billion yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26957 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_v_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Views Trade Deficit With Japan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Views Trade Deficit With Japan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806075394 Taipei CNA in English 0658 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806075394 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Danielle Yang] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, June 28 (CNA) -- Taiwan's trade deficit with 
Japan will be difficult to correct if current trade trends 
continue, a Board of Foreign Trade (BOFT) official said Tuesday 
[28 Jun]. 
  Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan topped U.S.$14.2 billion 
in 
1993, mainly because of a 45 percent import growth from Japan in 
the past three years and a poor performance by made-in-Taiwan 
products on the Japanese market, the official said. 
  Taiwan's major export to Japan, electric machinery, saw a 
2.7 
percent decline in its market share over the past three years. 
Other Taiwan goods, including wood products, knitwear, steel, 
toys, sporting goods, furniture and plastic products have also 
lost market share to imports from Mainland China and Southeast 
Asian nations, he said. 
  Despite the appreciation of the Japanese yen, which 
benefited 
Taiwan exporters, the loss of competitiveness of Taiwan products 
makes the increasing trade deficit hard to control, the official 
said. 
  Japan imported U.S.$9.7 billion worth of products from 
Taiwan 
in 1993, accounting for 4 percent of total imports of U.S.$240.7 
billion, he added. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26958 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_v_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hsiao Says Farm Sector Employment To Be Trimmed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hsiao Says Farm Sector Employment To Be Trimmed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706142294 Taipei CNA in English 1350 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706142294 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Flor Wang] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, June 27 (CNA) -- Chairman Hsiao Wan-chang of 
the Council for Economic Planning and Development said Monday 
[27 Jun] the government will make moves to reduce the number of 
farm workers in Taiwan within the next 10 years as part of its 
efforts to lessen the impact Taiwan's membership in the General 
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade [GATT] will have on them. 
  Speaking at the Third National Agricultural Conference, 
Hsiao 
said the government has set a series of measures targeted to 
help the agricultural industry, which he said will be the sector 
most affected by Taiwan's GATT entry. 
  The principal countermeasures to be taken will include 
grooming farm workers for nonfarm jobs and releasing land 
currently used for agricultural production for other purposes. 
  Hsiao said the government expects to cut the ratio of 
agricultural workers in Taiwan from the current 12 percent to 
three percent in 10 years. If that goal is reached, a total of 
between 700,000 and 800,000 farm workers will have to find work 
in other fields, Hsiao noted. 
  The government in the future will also earmark a sufficient 
budget to help the agricultural sector resolve problems that may 
hinder the upgrading and the rise of productivity of the sector, 
he added. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26959 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_v_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey: Firms Find Mainland Investment Profitable </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Survey: Firms Find Mainland Investment Profitable </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706143594 Taipei CNA in English 1400 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706143594 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Sofia Wu] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, June 27 (CNA) -- Nearly 60 percent of 
Taiwan-owned companies in Mainland China have made profits, 
according to a recent government survey. 
  The survey also found more than half of production 
technologies, machinery and raw materials needed by those firms 
have come from Taiwan and their product distribution channels 
are still controlled by their Taiwan parent companies. 
  The survey was conducted by several local industry 
associations at the request of the Ministry of Economic Affairs. 
The questionnaires were distributed to 2,800 Mainland 
China-based Taiwan companies which have legally registered with 
the ministry's investment commission. About 410 valid replies 
were collected. 
  Thirty-one percent of the respondents publicly admitted that 
they have earned money from their mainland ventures; 26 percent 
said their mainland ventures have managed to make ends meet; 
39.1 percent said their mainland ventures have lost money. 
  The industry associations responsible for taking the survey 
said local businessmen are usually reserved in recorting their 
profitability in Mainland China. Many of those who said their 
mainland ventures can just break even have admitted in private 
that they have made small profits from their mainland 
subsidiaries. 
  The associations have thus concluded that nearly 60 percent 
of Taiwan investors have made profits from their mainland 
ventures. 
  As high as 70 percent of the respondents said they believe 
the Mainland Chinese market will be further liberalized 
following Beijing's economic reforms; 15 percent said they 
expect the mainland market situation will remain almost the same 
in the next few years; less than 10 percent said the mainland 
market will be further tightened. 
  The survey found most respondents are optimistic about their 
business prospects on the mainland, with 58 percent believing 
their mainland ventures will make profits in the coming year, 25 
percent saying they will be able to break even, and only 15 
percent saying they may lose money. 
  The survey also showed 33 percent plan to expand their 
mainland operations in the coming year. 
  Only 5.81 percent said they have shipped back to Taiwan 
products manufactured by their mainland plants, but they 
stressed that most of those items are semi-finished goods. 
About 58.4 percent said their mainland-produced goods are 
mainly for exports to other countries, and 35.79 percent said 
their products are sold in mainland markets. 
  Major export markets for mainland-based Taiwan firms include 
the United States (30 percent), Japan (20 percent), Europe (17 
percent) and southeast Asia (16 percent), according to the 
survey. 
  More than 50 percent said they have remitted their earnings 
back to Taiwan while 28 percent said they have used such 
earnings for expanding their mainland operations. 
  The survey was completed in early April. The government did 
not immediately make public the results because of the Qiandao 
Lake travel disaster in which 24 Taiwan tourists were robbed and 
murdered. With cross-strait exchanges gradually resuming, the 
survey results will be released in the near future, government 
sources said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26960 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_v_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sources Say Consumer Imports To Hit `All-Time High' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sources Say Consumer Imports To Hit `All-Time High' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706142394 Taipei CNA in English 1346 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706142394 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Y.C. Tsai] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, June 27 (CNA) -- Taiwan's bid to join the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT, is expected to 
push up imports of consumer goods to an all-time high, trade 
sources said Monday [27 Jun]. 
  The sources forecast that imports of consumer products will 
reach U.S.$11 billion this year, mostly attributable to relaxed 
tariff restrictions. 
  They said further import-duty reductions are a must if 
Taiwan 
expects to gain membership in the Geneva-based world trade 
regulating body by the end of the year. Taiwan now has observer 
status with GATT. 
  With lower tariffs, they pointed out, a substantial increase 
in imports, epecially of consumer products, is almost a 
certainty. When the government slashed import duties in 1988 and 
1992, imports of consumer goods jumped 64.2 percent and 35.7 
percent to U.S.$5.68 billion and U.S.$9.27 billion, 
respectively, they said. 
  Government statistics show that consumer imports totaled 
U.S.$4.65 billion in the first five months of the year, 
accounting for 13.6 percent of Taiwan's aggregate imports and an 
increase of 1.8 percent from the year-earlier level. 
  The officials attributed the growth to the tariff reductions 
that occurred earlier this year, when import duties on 70 items 
were cut. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26961 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Australian Acting Prime Minister Meets Li Tieying </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Australian Acting Prime Minister Meets Li Tieying </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706143494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1403 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706143494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Canberra, June 27 (XINHUA) -- Acting Australian 
Prime Minister Gareth Evans met visiting Chinese State Councilor 
Li Tieying here this afternoon and exchanged views with him on 
the bilateral ties and regional issues. 
  Li, also minister in charge of the State Commission for 
Restructuring the Economic Systems, is now heading a delegation 
on a visit to Australia. 
  Evans, in the capacity of acting prime minister while Prime 
Minister Paul Keating and Vice Prime Minister Brian Howe are on 
a visit to Indonesia, expressed his welcome to Li for his visit 
to the country. 
  Describing the relations between Australian and China as 
"very warm and close," Evans said he hoped that the two 
countries would further expand cooperation and exchanges. 
  He also stressed the importance of China's markets to 
Australia's wool export, saying that this "is an important 
component in our trade." 
  Evens, reiterating Australia's support for resuming China's 
signatory status in the General Agreement of the Tariffs and 
Trade (GATT), said that he "hoped very much the talks would 
solve the problems." 
  On the regional issue, evans expressed his hope that the two 
countries "can continue work closely" in the Asia-Pacific 
Economic Cooperation, particularly in the second APEC leaders 
meeting slated for Indonesia in November. 
  Li also spoke highly of Sino-Australian relations, adding 
that Australia is one of the largest trading partner of China. 
  He said that the purpose of his visit is to increase the 
understanding of Australia and to learn from some experience in 
Australia's economic development. 
  He also expressed his thanks for Australia's support for 
China's re-entry into the GATT. 
  On the regional issue, he said that China is very positive 
on 
the regional economic cooperation in the Asia-Pacific region." 
  Li also briefed evans on China's latest economic 
developments 
and new reform measures introduced by the Chinese Government 
this year. 
  This morning, Li and his entourage had talks with officials 
of the treasury on macro-economic regulation, the tax 
relationship between the central and local as well as the 
restructuring of the state-run enterprises. 
  He also met Finance Minister Kim Beazley and Treasurer Ralph 
Willis late this afternoon. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26962 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_c_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Qian Qichen Arrives in Moscow for Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Minister Qian Qichen Arrives in Moscow for Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Focus On `Urgent' International Issues </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806004494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0025 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806004494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 27 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Deputy Premier 
and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen arrived in Moscow this evening 
for a three-day official visit to Russia. 
  In Moscow, Qian is expected to meet with Russian leaders 
including President Boris Yeltsin, chairman of the parliament's 
upper house Vladimir Shumeyko and Prime Minister Viktor 
Chernomyrdin. 
  The two sides are expected to focus on bilateral relations 
and some urgent international issues during their talks. 
  Qian will also hold talks with Russian Foreign Minister 
Andrey Kozyrev on bilateral cooperation. 
  During his trip, the Chinese deputy premier is scheduled to 
give a lecture at Moscow State University. 
  He will leave Moscow for Minsk on Wednesday [29 June] for a 
visit to Belarus. Afterwards, he will visit Lithuania, Estonia 
and Finland during his current Europe tour which will last till 
July 3. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26963 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_a_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Yi on Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation Organization </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wu Yi on Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation Organization </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806061094 Beijing QIUSHI in Chinese No 11, 1 Jun 94 pp 
7-10, 16 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806061094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing QIUSHI </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Yi (0702 0308), Minister of Foreign Trade and </F>
Economic Cooperation: "Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation Should 
be Developed on the Basis of Equality and Mutual Benefit"] 
  [Text] The Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation Organization 
(hereafter referred to as APECO) has now 17 members including 
the United States, Canada, Mexico, Australia, New Zealand, Papua 
New Guinea, six ASEAN nations, Japan, Korea, China, Hong Kong 
region, and Chinese Taipei (the title of China's Taiwan Province 
in APECO). It covers a land area of 42,794,200 square 
kilometers, occupying approximately 31 percent of total living 
space of the world; in 1992 it had a population of 2.094 
billion, accounting for about 40 percent of the world's 
population. Compared with the scene of collapse after a setback 
in the world economy in recent years, a considerable number of 
countries and regions in this district have maintained an annual 
average growth rate of over 7 percent for more than 10 years in 
succession, and so far there has been no slow-down in the 
momentum of growth. In 1992, the gross domestic product (GDP) 
of 17 APECO members totalled 12.22745 trillion dollars, which 
accounted for 50 percent of the world's total; the same year, 
the total volume of their import and export trade amounted to 
3.07145 trillion dollars, which accounted for 43.5 percent of 
total volume of world trade. Trade among members already 
occupied 67 percent of total volume of their import and export 
trade, nearly 50 percent higher than the percentage of trade 
among European Community members. APECO is the largest regional 
organization of economic cooperation. 
  The emergence of APECO, fundamentally speaking, is an 
inevitable outcome of the vigorous development of regional 
economic integration in the world arena. Following the 
independence of developing countries one after another in the 
vast areas of Asia, Africa, and Latin America in the postwar 
period, economic development became a major problem they faced 
together. However, the old international economic order still 
fettered and impeded the economic development of developing 
countries whose emphases were on agriculture and the production 
of raw materials and other primary products. They came to 
realize that the limited "favor" and "sympathy" given by their 
original suzerain states could not change the features of their 
economic backwardness, and that the only effective choice for 
them was developing south-south cooperation and strengthening 
collective self-reliance and collective negotiation in dealing 
with developed countries to improve the environment for economic 
development and achieve economic progress. Soon afterwards, the 
Latin American Free Trade Association, the Association of 
Southeast Asian Nations, the West African Economic Community, 
the Caribbean Community, and other regional economic integration 
organizations of developing countries came into being. After 
the 1970's, the struggle to set up a new international economic 
order reached a high ebb, and regional, sub-regional, and 
inter-regional economic integration organizations of developing 
countries were built. Currently, there are nearly 30 different 
governmental regional economic integration organizations and 
economic cooperation arrangements which include a few developed 
countries but mainly consist of developing countries. 
  In the last ten years, the rapidly developing progress of 
regional economic and trade cooperation in the world arena, the 
enlarged scale of cooperation, and the drastic growth of the 
extent of integration also promoted the rapid emergence of 
APECO. In particular, a big united European market already 
started operation on January 1, 1993, and is moving toward the 
European Union with economic, currency, and political union as 
the final goal. Prior to this, the European Economic Zone built 
up in the form of agreement by the European Community and the 
European Free Trade Association (except Switzerland), and the 
new development of multi-lateral economic and trade cooperation 
arrangements between the EEC countries and some central and east 
European countries posed fierce challenges to various countries. 
After many setbacks, the North American Free Trade Agreement 
went into effect on January 1, 1994, and became the largest free 
trade zone in the world. Regional economic integration 
organizations of developing countries in Central and South 
America, the Caribbean, Southeast Asia, and various places in 
central, east, and west Africa started developing from loose to 
close economic cooperation. While continuing to emphasize 
collective self-reliance, they actively explored the possibility 
of developing regional or trans-regional economic cooperation 
with nearby or related developed countries to avoid being 
excluded from cooperation arrangements and loss of trade 
opportunities. This proves that with the development of the 
world economy toward integration and conglomeration, 
international economic ties have become increasingly close, and 
strengthening cooperation and exchange with each other has 
become an indispensable part of economic development. It was 
precisely under the push by this tide that APECO was set up to 
better meet global and regional economic and trade challenges, 
and to make use of and create more opportunities to develop and 
promote economic prosperity in the Asia-Pacific region. 
  APECO has developed rapidly in the last three years. The 
most important reason lies in consensus brought about among 
various member states on the basis of joint economic 
development, with the same goal of and identical steps toward 
cooperation. The "Seoul Declaration," adopted at the Third 
APECO Conference at ministerial level, defined the purpose and 
goal of reducing barriers, upholding opening-up, 
interdependence, and developing common interests. In the past 
few years, to achieve these goals, APECO did fruitful jobs at 
multiple levels. The ministerial-level conference held every 
year has provided a place for high-level consultation and 
exchanges of views among members on Asia-Pacific economic issues 
and trends, the strengthening of the multi-lateral trade 
structure, regional free trade, and other issues of common 
concern, thereby deepening mutual understanding and exchanging 
information. The results of the conferences at ministerial 
level have not only provided policy guidance, supervision, and 
inspection for all kinds of work and activities of APECO, but 
also directly promoted the strengthening of a multi-lateral 
trade structure for the whole world, and become a catalytic 
agent for the successful completion of the Uruguay round 
multi-lateral trade negotiations. The "APECO Trade and 
Investments Framework Declaration" adopted at the fifth 
ministerial-level conference laid down a firm foundation and 
principles for developing substantial economic cooperation among 
members in the sphere of trade and investments and formulated 
working plans. If this "Framework Declaration" can be 
effectively carried out, it will be favorable to the balanced 
development of APECO economic and trade cooperation and to 
enlarging economic and trade exchanges among members. At the 
working team level, trade, investments, science and technology, 
energy, human resources development, and other departments were 
bustling with activities which included all sorts of specific 
items of economic cooperation among members. In the sphere of 
trade alone, a large amount of cooperation has been developed in 
a few short years in trade statistics among members, setting up 
trade and investments data bases, building an Asia-Pacific 
information communications system, compiling a guidebook to 
Asia-Pacific investments systems, examination and approval of 
administrative measures related to market admission, 
coordination of procedures for passing through customs, setting 
up Asia-Pacific tax rate data base, unanimity of standards, and 
promotion of trade for small and medium enterprises. Positive 
preliminary results have been achieved. 
  The convening of an unofficial meeting of APECO leaders in 
November, 1993, pushed economic cooperation of the organization 
to an unprecedented height. Leaders of the original 15 members 
gathered in Seattle to discuss principles and matters of vital 
importance concerning Asia-Pacific economic cooperation and to 
promote economic co-prosperity among members. The "Economic 
Prospects Declaration" adopted at the meeting once again 
emphasized that an open multi-lateral trade structure was the 
basis of economic growth in Asia-Pacific region, and it was 
determined at the meeting to continue dismantling trade and 
investment barriers by partnership and in an open spirit to 
promote greater free flow of commodities, services, and funds 
among members and between APECO members and other regions in the 
world. The "Declaration" reiterated its support for developing 
APECO into a forum devoted to creating practical economic 
interests for the region, encouraging broadening of economic 
dialogue among members, strengthening specific cooperation 
items, and initiating entrepreneurial spirit and a market 
guidance policy. Feeling no need for reticence, this unofficial 
meeting of leaders has achieved the results that leaders of most 
members had expected. However, the convening of this meeting 
itself is of more profound significance and more far- reaching 
influence than the specific results achieved at the meeting. 
The gathering of leaders showed the high degree of concern for 
and importance attached to APECO and its activities and their 
determination and confidence in successfully developing 
Asia-Pacific economic cooperation. The convening of the meeting 
of leaders has evoked strong repercussions in the world. People 
are watching closely the movements of APECO and the impact they 
may possibly have on the world. 
  China is a large developing country in Asia with 9.6 
million square kilometers of area and a 1.17 billion population. 
Since China began the policy of reform and opening-up in 1979, 
its economic development has advanced full steam ahead and 
presented a scene of prosperity. In 1992, China's gross 
domestic product (GDP) amounted to 424 billion dollars, ranking 
fourth after the United States, Japan, and Canada among APECO 
members; total volume of China's import and export trade reached 
165.6 billion dollars, ranking fifth after the United States, 
Japan, Canada, and Hong Kong region. In the total volume, 
China's trade with APECO members amounted to 126.3 billion 
dollars, accounting for 76 percent of China's total volume of 
foreign trade. The same year, China actually drew a total of 11 
billion dollars of direct investments from outside, of which 
10.26 billion dollars from APECO members, 93.2 percent of 
China's total of direct investments China from outside; the 
contracted amount of China's technological transfer with APECO 
members was 3.5 billion dollars, 44 percent of China's total 
technological trade that year. It can thus be seen: Whether 
judged by land, population, or by economic scale, including 
market, China occupies an extremely important position in APECO, 
and without China's partial or full participation, Asia-Pacific 
economic cooperation will not be complete and truly effective. 
On the other hand, APECO is also in extremely important 
strategic position with regard to China's expansion of foreign 
economic relations and trade. The prosperity of the Asia-Pacific 
economy depends to a very large extent on development of China's 
economy, and development of China's economy must also have the 
Asia-Pacific economy as an important support. 
  China has traditional and close economic and trade relations 
with vast numbers of countries and regions in Asia-Pacific 
district. We attach importance to economic and trade 
cooperation with all APECO members, and are willing to 
constantly push such cooperation to further develop in depth. 
Since joining APECO in 1991, then, and again in 1992, China 
sent Qian Qichen, state councillor and foreign minister, and Li 
Lanqing, economic relations and trade minister, at the head of 
Chinese delegations attending the third and the fourth 
ministerial-level conferences held respectively in Seoul and 
Bangkok. In 1993, as foreign economic relations and trade 
minister, I accompanied Qian in leading a delegation to attend 
the fifth APECO ministerial-level conference held in Seattle, 
and set forth the principles and position of the Chinese 
Government on Asia-Pacific economic trends, the Uruguay Round 
multi-lateral trade negotiations, progress of free trade in the 
region, and future movements and the direction of development of 
APECO. 
  China also actively participated in projects organized and 
sponsored by other APECO members and did constructive work. In 
shenzhen in June last year, the first APECO cooperation project 
in China was held -- a seminar on promotion of export by small 
and medium enterprises. In May and June this year, China will 
hold in Beijing an APECO scientific and technological strategic 
development industrial park seminar and a trade promotion 
training class. In May and June, 1995, the official conference 
of APECO trade promotion working teams among governments will be 
held by China for the first time, also in Beijing. To the above 
projects and conferences China has already undertaken or 
promised to undertake, other APECO members respond actively and 
showed immense interest. They unanimously believe that the 
activities we hold in China deal with concrete matters related 
to work and play an important role in promoting visible economic 
cooperation in Asia-Pacific region. 
  In November, 1993, at the invitation of President Clinton of 
the United States, President Jiang Zemin went to Seattle to 
attend the unofficial meeting of APECO economic leaders, which 
indicated the high importance and enthusiasm attached by the 
Chinese Government to the cause of Asia-Pacific economic 
cooperation and its concern about the future development of 
APECO. During the meeting, President Jiang Zemin met officially 
with President Clinton. This meeting between the chinese and 
U.S. heads of state has enhanced understanding between China and 
the United States, is conducive to the development of Sino-U.S. 
relations and shows that Sino-U.S. relations have entered a new 
stage. President Jiang also met with the leaders of nine 
countries, Australia, Canada, Indonesia, Japan, Korea, New 
Zealand, the Philippines, Singapore, and Thailand, exchanged 
views with them extensively on how to promote Asia-Pacific 
economic cooperation and on other matters of common concern, and 
further strengthened China's bilateral relations and economic 
and trade exchanges with these members. 
  Five years have elapsed since APECO was set up, and there is 
still a long long way to go. In the large environment of the 
world today, along what direction and how APECO will further 
develop economic cooperation among members plays a very 
important part in whether or not Asia-Pacific economic 
cooperation can be carried out on a long-term basis, healthily, 
and effectively. Therefore, this has also become the focus of 
attention of the fifth APECO ministerial-level conference and an 
unofficial meeting among leaders. During the Seattle meeting, 
President Jiang put forward the 16-character policy that should 
be followed for developing Asia- Pacific economic cooperation: 
"Mutual respect, equality, mutual benefit, opening-up to each 
other, and common prosperity", and proposed that "Asia-Pacific 
nations should be geared to the needs of both the Asia-Pacific 
region and the world; they should be open up to both inside and 
outside the region"; to develop Asia-Pacific economic 
cooperation, one "should proceed from the practical situation 
and characteristics of the region itself, and follow in order 
and advance step by step," and "APECO should be an open, 
flexible, and practical forum of economic cooperation and an 
organization for consultations, and not a closed economic group 
of mechanisms" and a number of other important propositions. 
  APECO members include both developed countries in the 
north, with the world's most powerful economic strength, and 
newly emerging industrialized countries in the south, as well as 
other developing countries and regions that are rising 
economically; they each have their own advantages in funds, 
technology, management experiences, places of investments, labor 
resources, consumer markets, and other fields. Therefore, they 
are economically highly compatible with each other and 
complementary to each other, and have extensive and broad 
prospects of cooperation. Similarly, compared with economic 
cooperation arrangements of other regions in the world, APECO 
also has characteristics that are extremely diversified. The 17 
members are varied in size and have great disparity in wealth; 
there are both sovereign states and regional economies; there 
are both oriental civilizations and western cultures, and there 
are immense differences in national tradition and historical 
backgrounds among members. It is precisely because of such 
diversity that we are required to adhere to equality and mutual 
benefits, following in order and advancing step by step, and 
other important principles, which are both the basis for 
developing Asia-Pacific economic cooperation and the fundamental 
guarantee for maintaining long-term and healthy cooperation. 
  Except for the fact that it is impossible for sovereign 
states and regional economies to be completely equal politically 
and legally, APECO members should uphold the principle of 
equality and mutual benefit in every aspect related to economic 
cooperation. Equality means that each member has the same say on 
all issues of economic cooperation in which it is interested, 
and such a say should be respected by other members; in 
decision-making involving economic cooperation and 
organizational matters, APECO members should follow the 
principle of reaching unanimity through consultation on the 
basis fully developing democracy, and no member should be 
allowed to control and manipulate any major decision- making or 
resort to power politics. Disputes arising from cooperation 
among members should be resolved through every effort of 
friendly consultation without resorting to wielding and using 
sanctions or a unilateralist baton. Mutual benefit means that 
all activities carried out within APECO should be beneficial to 
all APECO members and not just one party or a small number of 
members, and not harm the interests of other members. In this 
respect, we should especially be opposed to the despotic conduct 
of openly violating the standards of international economic and 
trade relations by any member to meet the needs of its domestic 
policies. To develop Asia-Pacific economic cooperation, it is 
necessary first of all to pursue various important principles 
laid down in multi-lateral trade structure of GATT, including 
that of granting each other member unconditional MFN treatment, 
and it is also necessary to take into full account the actual 
difficulties of members with low levels of economic development 
and grant them differential favored treatment. In APECO, if 
some members set up artificial barriers in their economic and 
trade relations with other members, and are unwilling even to 
respect and follow the basic principles of global trade 
structure and even to grant trading partners in the same 
regional organization the most minimum treatment laid down in 
multi-lateral trade structure, then how can we talk about 
equality and mutual benefit, and about strengthening regional 
economic cooperation? 
  Regarding opening-up, so far as regional economic 
cooperation 
organization is concerned, it is to pursue open regional 
cooperation. APECO members should first of all open up to each 
other economically. They should not endlessly demand others to 
abolish administrative measures and open up their markets to 
them, while they themselves set up quotas, "automatic export 
restrictions", and other non-tariff barriers, and close their 
own markets to others. APECO should not only adhere to 
opening-up internally, but also to opening-up to the outside 
world. We must not build ourselves into a closed economic and 
trading group open only internally and look upon the outside 
world as competition and objects of contention. The criterion 
for judging whether or not APECO is open is to see whether or 
not its code of conduct and activities match with the principles 
of GATT. Open regional cooperation upheld by APECO is not to go 
our own way while deviating from the global multi-lateral trade 
structure, but should coincide with the principles of GATT and 
the world trade organization that will come into being. All 
APECO conduct should be based on the global multi-lateral trade 
structure, and as an important supplement to this structure, 
APECO should promote its improvement and strengthening. 
Economic cooperation among APECO members must not affect 
economic and trade exchanges between its members and other 
partners outside the organization. The two should supplement 
and complement each other. 
  The basis of Asia-Pacific economic cooperation is neither 
common social and political systems, nor common political 
viewpoints and ideas of value, but the common economic interests 
of various parties working together. However, when we decide on 
the mode of cooperation, its growth rate, its direction, and the 
final structural goals, we cannot but seriously consider and 
make allowance for the level of development, differences in 
social and cultural background, and other factors. Within 
APECO, we neither maintain formulating impractical working plans 
and goals that aim too high, nor favor designing working speed 
and a structural frame divorced from reality, and we are all the 
more opposed to introducing into the sphere of economic 
cooperation so-called "democracy," "human rights," and other 
ideas that are not in the least related to economic cooperation. 
At present and even in the foreseeable future, on the basis of 
full consultation and seeking common ground while reserving 
differences, and within the sphere unanimously approved, we 
should take some feasible action and measures, following in 
order and advancing step by step, and steadily push forward 
development of Asia-Pacific economic cooperation. Changes and 
developments in the cooperation mechanism of APECO should also 
respect and be in accord with the will of all members, and 
accomplish the situation that when a melon is ripe, it falls off 
its stem, and that where water flows, a channel is formed. If we 
go against the will of most members, and push setting up by 
force some kind of structure when conditions are not yet ripe, 
it would be in the end like water without a source, or a tree 
without roots, and it will do harm to the healthy operation and 
development of Asia-Pacific regional economic cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26964 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hong Kong Paper Claims Deng `Did Visit Shanghai' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hong Kong Paper Claims Deng `Did Visit Shanghai' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806024894 Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 28 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806024894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by staff reporters from Taipei and Shanghai: "Deng </F>
Xiaoping Did Go to Shanghai in April"] 
  [Text] An informed source in Shanghai has confirmed that 
Deng Xiaoping, mainland "chief architect of reform and opening 
up," did visit Shanghai in April this year and stayed in the 
city for two weeks. 
  Deng Xiaoping stayed at the Shanghai Xijiao Hotel and, 
because the hotel was heavily guarded, ordinary people did not 
know that the "revered Mr. Deng" had arrived, the informed 
source pointed out. CPC General Secretary Jiang Zemin inspected 
Shanghai from 26 April to 6 May, during which time Deng Xiaoping 
was in Shanghai. A XINHUA report said that Jiang Zemin went to 
Shanghai to carry out investigations and study in grass-roots 
units on reform, opening up, economic development, and social 
stability. Obviously, this had something to do with Deng 
Xiaoping's tour of Shanghai. 
  While in Shanghai, Jiang Zemin stressed that the CPC Central 
Committee's policy of supporting Pudong's opening up and 
development would not change. When inspecting Guangdong from 
mid to late June, he also expressed important views on special 
economic zones' economic development. Shanghai and special 
economic zones in Guangdong are the focus of economic 
development in south China, to which Deng Xiaoping pays much 
attention. The "revered Mr. Deng," we believe, fully supports 
Jiang Zemin's speech which represents the central policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26965 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_k_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin Inspects Fujian 22-27 June </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin Inspects Fujian 22-27 June </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806090594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0856 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806090594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By XINHUA reporter Xu Yiming (6079 0001 7686), RENMIN RIBAO </F>
reporter Pan Didu (3382 1593 6757), and FUJIAN RIBAO reporter 
Huang Zhongsheng (7806 4429 3932)] 
  [Text] Fuzhou, 27 Jun (XINHUA) -- During an inspection of 
Fujian, Jiang Zemin, CPC Central Committee general secretary, 
Central Military Commission chairman, and president of the 
state, called on leading cadres at all levels, under the 
guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism 
with Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line, to 
correctly size up the situation focusing on the party and 
government's overall work and to pay close attention to major 
tasks, especially the two major economic tasks related to 
agriculture and state enterprises. He said: By taking a firm 
and effective grip on these two major tasks -- that is, by 
strengthening the position of agriculture as the foundation of 
the national economy and building up the economic strength of 
state enterprises -- and, on the basis of accomplishing these 
two tasks, by ensuring a good job in other fields -- that is, by 
closely relying on the working class and uniting peasants with 
the other masses of people -- we will be able to further 
stabilize the party and the government's overall work and 
provide a reliable guarantee of reform and development. 
  From 22 through 27 June, General Secretary Jiang Zemin -- 
accompanied by Fujian Provincial Party Secretary Jia Qinglin, 
Governor Chen Mingyi, Nanjing Military Region Commander Gu Hui, 
and Fujian Provincial Military District Commander Ren Yonggui -- 
defied sweltering summer heat in inspecting state enterprises, 
foreign-funded enterprises, and village and township enterprises 
in Xiamen, Quanzhou, Putian, and Fuzhou prefectures and cities 
along the west coast of the strait, familiarizing himself with 
agriculture and party building, and attending discussions with 
cadres and ordinary people in various localities. He also 
showed deep concern about flooding in Sanming and Nanping, 
repeatedly inquiring about the disaster situation and asking the 
provincial party committee to convey his solicitude to people in 
the disaster areas. 
  Jiang Zemin fully affirmed Fujian's impressive achievements 
and contributions to the national economic and social 
development since the implementation of reform and opening up. 
He said: Fujian is experiencing tremendous changes, developing 
rapidly and witnessing an excellent situation. What has 
impressed people the most is that by bringing into play Fujian's 
advantages, you have basically carved out a path with your own 
development characteristics, which is suitable for the 
province's realities in opening up to the outside world and 
economic development. These achievements and experiences have 
been obtained by cadres and people throughout the province who, 
led by the provincial party committee and provincial government, 
have persisted in taking Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the party's 
basic line as the guide in implementing the party Central 
Committee's various important decisions, principles, and 
policies; and, on the basis of Fujian's actual conditions, have 
seized the opportunity for reform and development in 
emancipating minds, seeking truth from facts, making active 
exploration, and working hard to start an undertaking. The party 
Central Committee is pleased with Fujian's accomplishment. 
  While attending discussions with cadres in various 
localities, General Secretary Jiang set forth a four-point plan 
for Fujian's future development. First, Fujian should 
accelerate the pace of various reform programs, focusing on the 
establishment of the basic framework of socialist market 
economic structure. As Fujian has been designated by the 
central authorities one of the pilot regions for comprehensive 
reform, the province is tasked with numerous pilot programs. 
Therefore, it should persistently proceed from realities in 
everything, seek truth from facts, boldly experiment with new 
reforms, and dare to make innovation in order to provide more 
and better fresh experiences for deepening reform nationwide. 
Second, Fujian should step up efforts to readjust economic 
structure and industrial patterns and accelerate the upgrading 
of a number of key industries and products, striving to improve 
the overall performance level of the export-oriented economy. 
It should also import new and high-technology, raise the 
quality of laborers, strengthen comprehensive management, and 
improve product quality in order to constantly build up the 
competitiveness of export-oriented enterprises in international 
markets. Third, Fujian should continue to promote rapid, 
healthy, sustained economic development by bringing into play 
its advantages in neighboring Taiwan and in having a large 
number of Overseas Chinese, special economic zones, a long 
coastline, and numerous ports. After more than a decade of 
reform and development, the coastal area has a better 
infrastructure and other conditions and can be developed at a 
faster pace if deemed necessary. Southeastern Fujian should be 
built into a prosperous area on the west coast of the strait to 
bring along the development of the inland mountainous areas. In 
inducing and utilizing Taiwan, Overseas Chinese, and foreign 
capital, it is necessary to pay attention not only to the volume 
of funds but, more importantly, the improvement of utilization 
efficiency and returns. Fourth, Fujian should adhere to the 
principle of grasping two links at the same time. He said: 
Under no circumstances should we sacrifice spiritual 
civilization to achieve economic growth. As I stated at the 
National Propaganda and Ideological Work Conference, we should 
arm people with a scientific mind, guide people with the correct 
public opinion, portray people in a noble spirit, and inspire 
people with outstanding works. If you agree with my statement 
and do things accordingly, the construction of socialist 
spiritual civilization can be continuously strengthened. 
  On the afternoon of 26 June, after listening to the 
provincial party committee's work report, General Secretary 
Jiang Zemin made an important suggestion concerning the current 
situation and economic development work. 
  Discussing the issue of strengthening agriculture's 
position, 
Jiang Zemin emphatically pointed out: As ours is a large 
country with a vast population, we should always strive not only 
to be self-sufficient but also to have surplus grain in order to 
protected against poor harvests and famines. All provinces and 
regions should, in principle, be basically self-sufficient in 
grain. They should adopt effective measures to ensure "three 
stabilities" in grain, i.e., to stabilize grain-crops areas, 
grain output, and grain reserves, while resolutely protecting 
cultivated land. This issue should merit more attention in some 
coastal provinces which have developed more quickly in industry 
and the tertiary trades. He added: To strengthen the position 
of agriculture as the foundation of the national economy, we 
previously called for "relying, first, on the policy; second, on 
science and technology; and third, on investment." Practice has 
proved that this is a correct approach which should be continued 
in the future. Today, based on the new situation of 
establishing a socialist market economic structure and on the 
actual condition of agriculture nationwide, we should add two 
more ingredients to the approach, that is, the reliance on 
protection and work. As agriculture faces the risk of markets 
and natural disasters, the state must adopt measures to protect 
and assist agriculture. Moreover, in view of the realities of 
weak work in quite a few rural areas, party committees and 
governments at all levels must strengthen the leadership, 
organization, and service work related to agriculture and the 
rural economy. 
  While commenting on ways to improve state enterprises, 
Jiang Zemin stressed that we should further strengthen our 
concept and reach a common understanding on five issues. First, 
state enterprises, especially large and medium state 
enterprises, have made major contributions to enhancing China's 
economic development, and have been key stimulants [zeng zhang 
dian 1073 7022 7820] for economic progress. Their various 
existing difficulties have been accumulated in previous years 
against a very complicated background. These difficulties should 
not undermine our confidence to revive state enterprises, and we 
should not regard state enterprises as "burdens." Second, as 
the backbone of China's national economy, state enterprises, 
especially large and medium-sized state enterprises, still play 
a leading role in developing the socialist market economy. 
After decades of effort, we have established a comprehensive 
system of state-owned industries. It is a unique advantage in 
China's economy and we should fully understand its importance. 
Third, we allow and encourage individual, private, and 
foreign-funded enterprises to develop and to actively play their 
supplementary roles in the national economy. This requirement 
must be unwaveringly and absolutely upheld for a long time. 
Meanwhile, we should also notice that even though the 
nonstate-owned economic sector is an important integral part of 
China's national economy and is an important economic stimulant, 
it only plays a supplementary role in the national economy. On 
the other hand, the state-owned economic sector, including state 
and collectively owned enterprises, has always played a leading 
role and maintained a key position in China's national economy. 
Therefore, party committees and governments at various levels 
and economic departments must make major efforts to properly 
develop state enterprises. Fourth, while deepening reform and 
changing operating mechanisms, state enterprises can choose 
suitable operational formats in accordance with their own actual 
conditions. Various state enterprises with different conditions 
can have different operational formats. However, no matter which 
operational format they adopt, state enterprises must ensure 
they maintain or raise the value of their assets. They are, 
under no circumstances, allowed to cause the value of state 
assets to deteriorate. Fifth, the key to improving state 
enterprises is to accelerate the change in their operating 
mechanisms and to establish a modern enterprise system that has 
specific ownership and responsibilities, separate government and 
enterprise functions, and scientific management. Governments at 
various levels should strive to create an internal and external 
environment in which state enterprises can change their 
operating mechanisms and establish the modern enterprise system, 
and should properly handle the experimental work in this regard. 
After taking into account their own actual conditions, various 
localities should send separate groups of competent cadres to 
state enterprises where they will investigate, study, and 
strengthen guidance according to different conditions. Jiang 
Zemin also stressed: The fundamental way to improve state 
enterprises is to deepen enterprise reform. Facilitating 
microeconomic reform in enterprises is the foundation for 
macroeconomic reform whereby a state system of macroeconomic 
regulation and control is established and improved. If 
microeconomic reform is inadequate or mishandled, we may find it 
hard to implement measures for macroeconomic reform. Such 
inadequacy and mishandling may even adversely affect the ongoing 
fruitful macroeconomic reform. Therefore, while carrying out 
microeconomic reform in enterprises and state macroeconomic 
reform, we must coordinate and integrate the transactions so 
that they are mutually adaptable and complement each other. The 
key tasks for economic restructuring in 1995 are to 
expeditiously deepen reform in enterprises and to study and 
promote various relevant comprehensive reform measures in an 
effort to make new breakthroughs in changing enterprise 
operating mechanisms and in establishing a modern enterprise 
system. 
  While commenting on the correct handling of development in 
coastal and inland regions, Jiang Zemin pointed out: Since 
reform and opening-up policies were implemented, we have been 
pursuing policies whereby some localities are allowed to get 
rich earlier than others. Practice has shown that such measures 
are absolutely necessary and correct. China is such a vast 
country. Conditions in various localities differ very much and 
the localities have encountered very unbalanced progress. We 
should let some localities with better conditions and 
foundations to get rich earlier than others. Later, with their 
actual achievements and successful experiences, they should lead 
and help other, poorer localities to become rich gradually. 
Eventually, all China's localities will be rich. Such a 
concept suits the objective conditions of China's economy and 
the law of development. The central authorities' stance has 
been very specific: We resolutely uphold policies that allow 
some localities to get rich earlier than others. In accordance 
with their actual conditions and foundations, the coastal 
regions can develop as fast as possible. Naturally we must 
insist that the higher speed brings greater results and that 
speedier progress should be accomplished within our capability. 
By utilizing their own advantages and striving to create 
favorable conditions, the inland regions should also gradually 
accelerate progress. Eventually all of China's localities will 
be prosperous and rich. Such an objective is an inherent 
requirement of our socialism; it is a requirement of reform, 
opening up, and modernization drive; and it is an important 
condition for safeguarding social stability and consolidating 
China's reunification. Jiang Zemin also pointed out: The 
principal ways that relatively developed coastal regions can 
support development in China's central and western inland 
regions are as follows: They should strengthen horizontal 
economic ties with inland regions; they should transfer advanced 
technology and management experience to inland regions; they 
should invest in inland regions; they should shift 
labor-intensive industries there; they should convey economic 
information; they should set up joint-venture production and 
operational projects; they should join in rectifying some old 
inland enterprises; they should help inland regions to develop 
export-oriented bases; and they should set up corresponding 
projects to help some poor inland localities shake off poverty 
and become rich. In short, coastal and inland regions should 
mutually coordinate and cooperate with one another, and take a 
common stand for joint progress so as to facilitate common 
development, advancement, and prosperity. The whole country 
should apply such measures. Likewise, in a province or an 
autonomous region, relatively developed areas and relatively 
backward areas, including Fujian's coastal and hilly areas, 
should also form and develop such relations. 
  General Secretary Jiang Zemin also urged Fujian to 
strengthen 
economic and trade relations with Taiwan. He said: Fujian has 
been closely linked with Taiwan through geographical proximity 
and blood relations. I hope you will make use of your 
advantages and work harder so as to make more contributions to 
facilitating cross-strait economic and trade relations, enhance 
the development of cross-strait relations, and promote the great 
cause of reuniting the motherland. 
  During his inspection tour in Fujian, Comrade Jiang Zemin 
also called on commanders and fighters of military units, public 
security departments, and the armed police corps in Fujian. He 
urged closer unity between the military and the government, and 
between service members and civilians. He said: Military 
comrades should improve their roles as the mainstay and vital 
new force while continually carrying out urgent, arduous, 
dangerous, and important tasks such as protecting coastal 
defense, supporting the local spiritual and material 
civilization drive, and undertaking rescue and relief work so as 
to make more contributions to enhancing local construction. 
Local comrades should pay more attention to Army building and 
should actively help military units to resolve their actual 
problems in production and daily life. So long as there is firm 
unity between the military and the government, between service 
members and civilians, throughout the party, and among the 
people of various nationalities across China, we shall have a 
reliable guarantee for our reform, development, stability, and 
security. 
  Accompanying Comrade Jiang Zemin during his inspection tour 
in Fujian were responsible figures of relevant departments from 
the central authorities and the State Council, including Liao 
Hui, Zeng Peiyan, Hu Baoguang, Teng Wensheng, and Yu Xiaosong. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26966 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  12 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Governor Interviewed on Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Governor Interviewed on Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806034694 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 12 Jun 94 p B1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806034694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Detailed excerpts" of "exclusive interview" with Guangdong </F>
Governor Zhu Senlin by unidentified WEN WEI PO reporter in 
Guangzhou, 10 June: "Governor Zhu Senlin Answers WEN WEI PO 
Reporter's Questions"] 
  [Text] [WEN WEI PO] Please talk about Guangdong's 
economic development since the reform and opening up. 
  [Zhu Senlin] In 1979 the central authorities decided to 
adopt "special policies and flexible measures toward Guangdong" 
(setting up special economic zones on a trial basis and 
implementing a new economic management structure), calling on 
Guangdong to carry out reform and opening up ahead of others. 
In 1988 the central authorities again designated Guangdong as 
China's comprehensive test region for reform and opening up and 
called on it to boldly explore reform and opening up. Over the 
past 15 years, Guangdong has unswervingly implemented the 
central principles and policies, brought into full play its 
advantages in being close to Hong Kong and Macao and having many 
of its nationals abroad, energetically pushed forward various 
market-oriented reforms, and made great efforts to open wider to 
the outside world, thus enabling the province's national economy 
to enter the best historical period since the founding of the 
People's Republic. With an average annual growth rate of 13.8 
percent GDP, it doubled and quadrupled the 1980 figures in 1987 
and 1992 respectively. In the course of development, the 
industrial structure has also been optimized, with the 
composition of the primary, secondary, and tertiary industries 
readjusted from 30:46:24 to 20:46:34. Guangdong's comprehensive 
economic power has substantially increased and the people's 
living standards have markedly improved. 
<H5>  Guangdong Has Considerably Increased Its Economic Power </H5>
  Since the early 1990's, encouraged by Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's 
important talks during his trip to southern China and by the 
spirit of the 14th Party Congress, we have seized the opportune 
moment to formulate a (draft) development program for the next 
20 years and, with the establishment of a socialist market 
economy in mind, advanced reform, opened wider to the outside 
world, and quickened the pace toward the goal of basically 
achieving modernization in 20 years. In the three years between 
1991 and 1993, we scored substantial achievements. 
  1. Rapid GDP growth. During those three years, Guangdong's 
annual GDP grew at 17.3, 22, and 21 percent respectively, 
surpassing the 12.9 percent annual growth rate laid down in the 
(draft) development program for the next 20 years. The 1993 GDP 
was 314 billion yuan and the per capita GDP was 4,830 yuan. It 
is estimated that Guangdong will octuple the 1980 GDP figure in 
1997 and thus attain the 7,200 yuan per capita GDP quota set for 
the year 2000 ahead of time. 
  2. New developments in the export-oriented economy. During 
those three years, Guangdong's foreign trade volume grew by 
29.6, 34.7, and 11.8 percent respectively and its proportion of 
the nation's export volume rose from one-fifth to one-quarter. 
There was an even bigger increase in the actual use of foreign 
capital with over 40,000 registered foreign-invested enterprises 
and over 30,000 enterprises engaging in the three forms of 
import processing and compensation trade. The export-oriented 
economy has become an important pillar of the Guangdong economy. 
  3. Major steps taken in infrastructural construction. To 
gradually shake off the backward situation in infrastructural 
construction which has restricted Guangdong's development, we 
concentrated our forces on the development of communications, 
energy, telecommunications, and other infrastructure. The last 
three years has seen the largest investment scale and the 
fastest rate of construction since the founding of the People's 
Republic. In 1993 alone, Guangdong increased its generator 
capacity by 3.88 million kw, accounting for 27 percent of the 
nation's newly increased volume, and built or rebuilt 1,349 km 
of first- and second-class highways. The continued improvement 
of the infrastructure has created good conditions for 
Guangdong's future development. 
  4. Marked improvement in the people's living standards. The 
rapid economic growth has brought increased material benefits to 
the people. In 1993 the wage level of workers and staff members 
rose further and, on the basis of a 24.8 percent increase in the 
1992 payroll, grew by another 32.8 percent; the peasant per 
capita net income was 1,675 yuan, an increase of 367 yuan over 
the previous year, which had seen an increase of 165 yuan over 
1991. After allowing for price rises, the income of urban 
residents and peasants rose by 10.1 and 6.1 percent 
respectively. The balance of savings deposits by urban and 
rural residents has grown by about 40 billion yuan annually over 
the past three years. 
  New Developments in Introduction of Foreign Capital 
  [WEN WEI PO] What is the current situation regarding the 
introduction of foreign capital to Guangdong? What does 
Guangdong plan to do in the future? 
  [Zhu] Since the early 1990's, Guangdong has seen an 
unprecedentedly good momentum in the use of foreign capital. 
The amount of foreign capital actually used has risen by a 
large margin annually. According to statistics, it was $2.583 
billion in 1991, an increase of 27.7 percent over the previous 
year; $4.861 billion in 1992, up 88.2 percent; and $9.652 
billion in 1993, up 98.6 percent. In those three years, we 
actually used $17.096 billion, more than the sum total for the 
whole of the 1980's. This has effectively made up for the 
shortfall in Guangdong's construction funds and played an 
important role in the development of Guangdong's national 
economy. 
  Since the early 1990's, Guangdong's use of foreign capital 
has shown the following new features: First, the flow of 
foreign capital has become more rational and the investment 
pattern has further optimized. Foreign investment has spread to 
the primary, secondary, and tertiary industries, involving all 
trades and professions. There are energy, communications, 
telecommunications, and other infrastructural projects, as well 
as crop farming, aquaculture, intensive processing of farm and 
sideline products, and other agricultural development projects; 
technological transformation of old enterprises, new and high 
technology, and capital-intensive projects; and information, 
technological development, engineering design, property agency, 
real estate, advertisement, decoration, insurance, and other 
tertiary industrial projects. The flow of foreign capital to 
communications, energy, and other infrastructure, as well as 
tertiary industry, has markedly increased in recent years. 
Second, the investment scale has expanded and the number of 
large foreign enterprises and consortia investing in Guangdong 
has increased. For example, foreign investment accounts for 40 
percent of the total investment in Plant C of Shajiao Power 
Plant, which comes to $1.965 billion; it accounts for 474 
million yuan of the 1.6 billion yuan in total investment for the 
eastern section of the Shenzhen-Shantou Expressway; and it 
accounts for 40 percent, or 2.32 billion yuan, of the total 
investment in the eastern lane of the Guangzhou-Zhuhai 
Expressway, which comes to 5.8 billion yuan. The U.S. 
consortium, A.G. Corporation, has invested $250 million in the 
Huizhou-Heyuan Expressway; foreign investment accounts for 45 
percent of the total investment in the Zhuhai Power Plant, which 
comes to $1.18 billion. These investments have all been made in 
recent years. Third, the sources of foreign capital are varied. 
The foreign businesses investing in Guangdong are not 
restricted to Hong Kong, Macao, and a handful of countries but 
cover nearly 50 countries and regions in the whole world. A 
pattern of pluralistic sources of investment is gradually taking 
shape. Fourth, the work of using foreign capital in mountain 
areas or underdeveloped areas has developed rapidly. These areas 
are rich in natural resources. With the constant improvement of 
the investment environment, plus the relatively low prices of 
labor and land, these areas have now become new hot spots for 
foreign investments. According to statistics, the six cities 
situated in mountain areas, Shaoguan, Qingyuan, Zhaoqing, 
Heyuan, Meizhou, and Shanwei, actually used a total of $380 
million in foreign capital in 1992, an increase of 150 percent 
over the previous year. The use of foreign capital reached a 
new high in 1993, reaching $801 million, an increase of 110 
percent over the previous year. 
  Now that Guangdong is forging ahead toward the grand 
objective of basically achieving modernization in 20 years, it 
needs to import large amounts of construction funds and 
technology. It has decided to take the following measures: 
  1. In light of the economic development level in the 
different areas of Guangdong, we will match the work of using 
foreign capital to the conditions in the special economic zones, 
the open cities, the coastal open economic zones, and the 
mountain regions, bring their advantages into play, and advance 
comprehensively. As regards the method of using foreign 
capital, we shall use both tangible funds, such as capital and 
equipment, and intangible funds, such as patents, trademarks, 
techniques, and technologies; the channels of using foreign 
capital can be varied, such as direct investment, loans by 
international financial organs and foreign governments, and 
securities investments. The localities and enterprises using 
foreign capital should use capital not only from Hong Kong and 
Macao but also from other countries and regions. In particular, 
they should use as much capital and technology as possible from 
large enterprises and consortia in other countries. 
  2. Boost and accelerate adjustment of the industrial 
structure with the introduction of foreign capital. On the 
basis of doing a good job in evaluating assets and registering 
property rights, some state-owned enterprises and foreign-funded 
enterprises can sell some of their interests to foreign 
businesses. In accordance with the state's industrial 
preferential policy, we will offer corresponding preferential 
treatment to foreign investments which conform to the state's 
industrial policy. Under the present circumstances, we 
particularly encourage foreign businesses to directly invest in 
high and new technology industries, energy projects, ports and 
wharves, highways, airports, and local railway construction 
projects, as well as petrochemical, automobile, electronics, 
metallurgical, construction materials, and other pillar 
industries. Moreover, we shall also systematically absorb 
foreign investment in banking, commerce, communications, 
tourism, and other tertiary industies. We will strive to set up 
more branches of foreign-funded banks and Sino-foreign joint 
venture banks in Guangzhou and Shenzhen. Foreign businesses are 
welcome to invest in and operate real estate and to gradually 
move from the coastal to the interior mountain areas. In 
tourism, we will absorb foreign capital for the development of 
tourism resources and the construction of tourist and holiday 
resorts. Therefore, there are very broad prospects for foreign 
businessmen to invest in Guangdong. 
  Improve the Environment To Attract Foreign Businesses 
  3. Create a more favorable soft and hard environment for 
foreign investment. We should step up the construction of 
power, ports, wharves, expressways, modern telecommunications 
and information networks, and other infrastructure and strive to 
improve the work efficiency and service quality of customs, 
border inspection, commodity inspection, and transport 
departments, raise the benefit of imported projects, and 
maintain a good debt repayment capability. At present, 
particular attention should be paid to the following two 
aspects: First, keep on improving policies. While 
comprehensively pushing ahead with various reforms to establish 
a socialist market economy, in light of the new developments and 
problems that have cropped up in the course of reform and in 
coordination with the actual situation in our province, we 
should promptly formulate support policies and establish a 
perfect set of rules and regulations involving foreign investors 
so that foreign businesses can have rules to go by when 
investing in Guangdong and their legitimate rights and interests 
can be protected. Second, energetically develop a foreign 
investment service system in society as a whole. Further 
efforts should be made to establish and improve, within foreign 
economic relations and trade departments at all levels in 
Guangdong, the foreign investment service establishments which 
practice enterprise-style management, focus on services, charge 
rationally, and win the trust of foreign businesses through 
high-quality service. Foreign investment service establishments 
set up in the departments in charge of major industries will 
coordinate with the service establishments set up in foreign 
economic relations and trade departments. With the coordination 
of the associations of foreign-invested enterprises in the 
province and cities, these establishments will form a service 
network crisscrossing the province and providing policy and 
legal consultancy as well as other services. We will set up 
more enterprises serving foreign-invested enterprises like the 
Shenzhen Capital Goods Service Center. 
  4. Constantly improve the planning and initiative in the 
work of inviting investments. The Guangdong Provincial 
Investment Invitation Bureau has been set up. Its principal 
task is to synthesize and coordinate the province's work of 
inviting investment, act as a go-between for foreign businesses 
investing in Guangdong, and provide foreign businesses with 
efficient services, such as organizing trade talks, arranging 
for investment spots, and examining and approving projects. 
<H5>  Smooth Progress in Various Reforms </H5>
  [WEN WEI PO] What is the main direction of your attack in 
the year of storming heavily-fortified positions in reform? 
What are the measures? 
  [Zhu] This is a crucial year for comprehensively deepening 
the reform. It can also be called a "year of storming heavily 
fortified positions in reform." In line with the state plan to 
"make breakthroughs in some key areas and press ahead with the 
whole project," we will conscientiously do a good job of reform 
in seven aspects: Fiscal and tax, banking, foreign trade, 
enterprise, social security, urban housing, and government 
institutions. Viewed from the practice during the first five 
months of this year, the reforms in our province have made 
smooth progress and have been well coordinated. This has 
boosted Guangdong's national economy. In the first four months 
of this year, Guangdong's total industrial output value was 
125.34 billion yuan, an increase of 22.5 percent over the same 
period of last year; export volume was $11.467 billion, up 115.4 
percent; the foreign capital actually used was $2.187 billion, 
up 37.6 percent; the balance of bank savings deposits was 
273.584 billion yuan, an increase of 25.202 billion yuan over 
the figure at the end of last year; financial revenue was 8.445 
billion yuan, up 46 percent, which includes a 49.5-percent 
increase in industrial and commercial tax income; and the rising 
trend of prices has been curbed. These show that the central 
measures for pressing ahead with the various reforms to 
establish a socialist market economy are correct. In deepening 
various reforms, we should make great headway in three aspects: 
  1. Speed up the change of enterprise operational mechanism 
and establish a modern enterprise system to lay a good 
foundation for the establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure. Do a good job of the various basic tasks for the 
establishment of a modern enterprise system, focusing on 
continued implementation of the "PRC Law on Industrial 
Enterprises Under Ownership by the Whole People" and the State 
Council's "Regulations on the Change of Operational Mechanism in 
Industrial Enterprises Under Ownership by the Whole People" and 
earnestly put into effect enterprise decisionmaking powers in 
operation and management. We should comprehensively implement 
the "General Rule on Enterprise Finance" and the "Criteria for 
Enterprise Accounting" and establish an enterprise financial and 
accounting system in keeping with international practices. 
Guangdong has selected 250 enterprises of different types to 
experiment with the establishment of a modern enterprise system 
and then to gradually popularize the experience we have gained. 
Starting with clarification of property rights, we will launch 
in 1,200 enterprises the work of reappraising the stocks and 
assets, defining property rights, assessing assets, authorizing 
capital, and registering property rights and strive to explore 
the method of diversifying the composition of state-owned 
enterprise property rights. Meanwhile, we should establish and 
perfect a system for managing state-owned assets and an 
effective system of operations to ensure the preservation and 
increase of the value of state assets. In keeping with the 
provisions of the "Corporate Law," we will systematically 
implement a corporate system among existing enterprises in light 
of different conditions and reorganize them into joint-stock 
companies, limited liability companies, and sole corporations; 
all new enterprises should practice the corporate system. The 
process of implementing the modern enterprise system should be 
closely combined with improvements in enterprise quality and the 
promotion of enterprise development. 
  Use Considerable Force To Reform the Fiscal and Tax 
Structure 
  2. Do a good job in reforming the fiscal and tax structure 
to ensure that enterprises can compete on an equal basis and 
that the government macroeconomic regulation and control 
capability can be increased. We started reforming the 
tax-sharing system and the financial management system in 1994. 
That is to say, in line with the division of authority between 
the central and local governments, we have rationally defined 
the scope of financial expenses at different levels and, in line 
with the principle of combining authority which controls 
enterprises and undertakings with financial power, uniformly 
divided the tax categories into central tax, local tax, and tax 
shared by central and local governments and established the 
central tax collection and local tax collection systems. 
Meanwhile, we have also conducted reform of the tax system. Its 
main contents include: Establishing a unified personal income 
tax; unifying the income tax of domestically funded enterprises 
as of 1994 and, as the next step, unifying the income tax of 
domestically funded and foreign-funded enterprises; reforming 
the circulating tax, which consists of the value-add tax, 
consumption tax, and sales tax and is uniformly applicable to 
both domestically funded and foreign-funded enterprises, and 
abolishing the industrial and commercial consolidated tax 
imposed on foreign-funded enterprises; and imposing the land 
value-added tax (not implemented for the time being), securities 
transaction tax, and estate and gift taxes. 
  Due to the strong force of the current fiscal and tax 
reform, 
which involves a wide-ranging area, some enterprises were unable 
to adapt themselves at the beginning and some foreign businesses 
had misgivings. Through publicity and explanations by the 
relevant government departments, large numbers of enterprises, 
cadres, and people have a fairly comprehensive understanding of 
the new fiscal and tax structure, thus ensuring the smooth 
implementation of the new structure. Some aspects of the fiscal 
and tax reform have yet to be improved and coordinated in 
practice and detailed rules and regulations have yet to be 
worked out on certain issues. In short, in conducting this 
reform we should not only expand the financial sources but also 
arouse the enthusiasm of all quarters. 
  3. Steadily push forward banking reform to promote the 
benign cycle of economic construction. We should vigorously 
organize implementation of the state's banking reform program 
and, in light of the state-defined credit scale, ensure the 
correct flow of capital and increase its use efficiency so that 
economic construction can run smoothly. It is necessary to 
bring into fuller play the advantages of existing local banking 
institutions in flexible operations, such as the Guangdong 
International Trust and Investment Corporation and the Guangdong 
Development Bank, and develop overseas business while stepping 
up management. We must speed up the development of Guangdong as 
a financial center and establish a unified and standardized 
financial market across the province. Further efforts should be 
made to improve the Shenzhen Securities Exchange and the 
Guangzhou Nanfang Securities Trading Center and increase the 
number of listed securities. We should strive to list more 
companies in the securities markets outside the border and 
energetically raise fund for the construction of infrastructure 
in Guangdong. 
  To ensure the smooth progress of various reforms, we should 
also speed up implementation of a new, unified social security 
system, establish and improve a system for the socialized 
supervision and service of social security, continue the 
comprehensive implementation of the "Provisional Regulations of 
Guangdong Province on Social Endowment Insurance" and, where 
conditions permit, experiment with an endowment insurance system 
in the rural areas which relies mainly on individual reserves 
and accumulation with a community assistance subsidiary. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26967 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_u_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PRC MEDIA ON TAIWAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Paper Blames Taiwan for Slowing Cross-Strait Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Paper Blames Taiwan for Slowing Cross-Strait Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806073094 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in 
Chinese 22 Jun 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806073094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Xiao Zhiguang (5135 0037 0342): "Who Is Obstructing the </F>
Routine Cross-Strait Talks?"] 
  [Text] Not long ago, a high-ranking figure in the Taiwan 
authorities criticized the mainland for stressing in the routine 
cross-strait talks that "the mainland is the central authority 
whereas Taiwan is the local authority; the mainland has 
sovereignty whereas Taiwan does not have sovereign status"; and 
"adopting this kind of attitude to stifle Taiwan." He also said 
that the parties had failed to reach an agreement in the routine 
talks because "whenever the talks are approaching the end, the 
mainland always advocates taking mainland laws and regulations 
as the basis for handling things." As this figure has distorted 
the concrete situation in the routine cross-strait talks, 
confounded right and wrong, and put the blame on others, we must 
refute what he said to clarify matters for the public. 
<H5>  I. The Taiwan Authorities Exploit the Routine Cross-Strait </H5>
Talks To Set Out Political Demands 
  The first formal meeting between high-ranking figures across 
the straits in their unofficial capacities for over 40 years, 
materialized through the Wang-Koo [Wang Daohan, chairman of the 
mainland's Association for Relations Across the Straits (ARATS), 
and Koo Chen-fu, president of Taiwan's Straits Exchange 
Foundation (SEF]) Talks, which built a system for future 
contacts and talks between the two associations and set various 
items on the agenda in the routine and economic talks. 
Moreover, with the efforts made by the two associations and the 
parties concerned across the straits, both parties stated their 
consensus in the words that "both sides of the strait uphold the 
one-China principle," thus evading the politically sensitive 
question of "the meaning of one China" and, at the same time, 
defining the nature of cross-strait affairs as China's special 
affairs which are different from interstate affairs. Meanwhile, 
working according to the spirit of "mutual respect, seeking 
truth from facts, consultation on the basis of equality, and 
seeking common ground while reserving differences," the two 
associations reached two agreements, namely: The "Agreement on 
Using and Verifying Cross-Strait Notarized Documents" and the 
"Agreement on Inquiry Into Cross-Strait Registered Letters and 
Compensation Matters." If both parties could still uphold the 
abovementioned principle and practice, contact and talks between 
the ARATS and the SEF after the Wang-Koo Talks should have taken 
on a new aspect conducive to promoting cross-strait economic and 
trade cooperation and multisided exchanges and contact. 
  However, soon after the Wang-Koo Talks ended, the Taiwan 
authorities concerned violated the unofficial, economic, and 
routine orientation of the talks and willfully put off 
discussion of the economic and scientific and technological 
agenda listed in the Joint Agreement from the Wang-Koo Talks. 
Meanwhile, in the routine talks, they raised political 
questions such as those concerning "judicial jurisdiction" to 
orient the so-called "splitting, divide-and-rule, and 
reciprocal" cross-strait relations, thus seriously obstructing 
the several rounds of talks called since last August and 
bringing the routine talks, in which the two associations had 
achieved initial success, to a dead end. For example, in the 
Taipei Talks held last December, the authorities concerned in 
Taiwan engaged in double-dealing. On the one hand, they shouted 
for "laying aside the controversy over sovereignty and 
jurisdiction" and, on the other hand, they asked for the 
realization of the so-called political demands, such as "not 
repatriating people of our side" and "having 24 nautical miles 
of jurisdiction," in routine agreements concerning the 
"repatriation of cross-strait hijackers" and the "handling of 
fishing disputes" under the guise of "divorcing legal issues 
from political issues." After failing to realize the political 
demands they imposed on the routine talks, the authorities 
concerned in Taiwan declared once again that "both sides of the 
strait are still in a state of discord and divide-and-rule" and 
that the "mainland does not respect Taiwan's judicial 
jurisdiction" to mislead the public and deceive Taiwan 
compatriots. 
  Last February, leaders of the ARATS and the SEF met in 
Beijing and reached the following consensus: "In the routine 
talks, our two associations should evade political questions in 
a down-to-earth manner." On this basis, they also discussed 
their specific differences of opinion on three agenda items, 
including one on the "repatriation of personnel who violate 
relevant regulations and enter the other's territory," and made 
joint efforts to sum up the consensus discussed and the train of 
thought for solving problems. 
  However, in the fourth routine talks, the Taiwan authorities 
concerned openly repudiated the consensus reached between the 
leaders of the two associations and raised questions of 
divergence again which had been settled. They even broke 
certain promises made in the Taipei Talks and kept arguing about 
sensitive issues. Consequently, the agreements which should have 
been reached fell through again. This not only damaged the 
solemnity of authorizing the talks by leaders of the two 
associations but also undermined sincerity in the talks between 
the two associations, thus making an extremely bad impression 
among compatriots across the strait. 
  Following the occurrence of the "Qiandao Hu Incident," the 
Taiwan authorities concerned unilaterally laid aside talks held 
between the two associations and once again broke the agreements 
reached between the two associations, which was strongly 
criticized by the media in Taiwan. At that time, a high-ranking 
figure who had just wantonly railed against the mainland and 
made separatist remarks, was still saying that "the CPC's 
sovereignty does not cover Taiwan," thus continuing to obstruct 
the progress of the two associations' routine talks and 
high-level talks. 
  II. ARATS Consistently Suggests That the Two 
Associations' Talks Should Avoid Politically Sensitive Issues 
  The mainland authorities concerned and ARATS have been 
consistently striving to uphold the consensus and basis of the 
two associations' talks. Following the close of the Xiamen 
Talks, the ARATS immediately sent a letter to the SEF and 
pointed out that "both parties should continue to observe the 
consensus that both sides of the strait uphold the one-China 
policy; keep upholding the unofficial, economic, routine, and 
functional nature agreed on by the Wang-Koo Talks; and avoid 
political issues so that the two associations' talks can proceed 
smoothly." When leaders of the two associations were exchanging 
views on issues of divergence in the routine talks, Tang Shubei 
further elaborated the ARATS' stand on the routine talks and its 
views on settling differences: First, no party should impose 
its political demands on the other side through routine 
agreements and the mainland is against the idea of working 
through agreements to regularize the state of a temporary cross- 
strait split to reflect the so-called "split and 
divide-and-rule." Second, in order to help us settle concrete 
issues in cross-strait exchanges and contacts, the two 
associations should not be involved in cross-strait political 
differences and should not bring politically sensitive issues 
into the two associations' routine talks. As for the fact that 
clauses about the content of judicial jurisdiction and legal 
jurisdiction are not written in the agreements between the two 
unofficial groups, it neither implies any changes in the current 
stand by the Taiwan authorities nor any changes in the 
mainland's consistent stand. Third, the ARATS is not empowered 
to indicate its stand on "judicial jurisdiction" and other 
issues of a political nature when holding talks with the SEF. 
Hence, the differences between the parties in the talks neither 
concern the question of "respecting or not respecting" Taiwan's 
"judicial jurisdiction" nor the question of how to consider 
Taiwan's "judicial jurisdiction." If the Taiwan side explicitly 
authorizes the SEF to discuss the question of "judicial 
jurisdiction," the ARATS is willing to pass on the news to 
relevant departments so that they can authorize the ARATS to 
hold special talks in this respect under the prerequisite of the 
one-China policy. At that time, the mainland side will also 
raise political questions about which it is concerned. The 
ARATS' abovementioned position is one which entirely 
differentiates political issues from routine matters and which 
fully shows respect for the current state of cross-strait 
relations and for the other side's practical and effective stand 
in solving problems. The cliche of the so-called "stifling" 
Taiwan is simply groundless talk which confounds right and wrong. 
  During the talks, the ARATS always insisted on taking the 
method and thinking of solving routine problems to try to reach 
an agreement. The ARATS suggested that hijackers should all be 
repatriated and handled by the side to which hijacked civil 
airliners belong; however, it also gave full consideration to 
the essential coercive measures applied to hijackers by relevant 
departments in Taiwan and agreed to repatriating hijackers after 
dealing with special situations. Moreover, the ARATS also 
agreed to let the Taiwan side handle the cases wherein Taiwanese 
people hijack mainland civil airliners to Taiwan. As far as the 
repatriation of illegal emigrants is concerned, the ARATS, while 
taking the limitations of Taiwan's current policies into 
consideration, took the initiative in rearranging the 
examination and verification site and the repatriation route. 
In handling fishing disputes, the ARATS suggested that 
cross-strait arbitration organs should arbitrate disputes 
through consultation and implement the result while ensuring its 
enforcement. As for the question of what form should be taken, 
each side should deal with its own case and the practice of any 
side should never be considered as the standard for the other 
party. While making certain suggestions on the key questions of 
the abovementioned three agreements, the ARATS never "called for 
taking mainland laws and regulations as the handling basis." On 
the contrary, the practice of the Taiwan concerned authorities 
precisely "makes it impossible to solve even very simple routine 
problems." For example, in handling fishing disputes, if we 
settle disputes between fishing boats first, the problem will be 
much simpler; but the Taiwan side insisted on putting the 
disputes between public service ships and fishing boats, as well 
as the role of public service ships in fishing disputes, on the 
agenda, thus trying to engender the political controversy of 
"the jurisdiction of waters." 
  According to the "Jinmen Agreement" and the consensus 
reached 
between the two associations on the issue of repatriating 
hijackers, it is entirely possible for the Taiwan side to, 
technically speaking, enforce repatriation but the Taiwan 
authorities use these as counters to strive to achieve certain 
political goals. In this connection, the common people in 
Taiwan have a very clear understanding. Soon after this 
high-ranking Taiwan figure made his remarks, a Taiwanese 
compatriot wrote an article in LIEN HO PAO on 7 June and pointed 
out: "As far as the legal aspect is concerned, if our side take 
a more pragmatic stand, we can actually hold that the hijacking 
cases occur and end in the CPC's civil airliners" and we "can 
avoid the question of judicial jurisdiction in terms of legal 
principle." "After going through a preliminary investigation of 
the facts, hijackers must be repatriated immediately." If the 
Taiwan authorities do not give up their political attempts and 
take a pragmatic stand, it will be difficult for the routine 
cross-strait talks to achieve any concrete results. 
  III. The Taiwan Authorities Should Take Practical 
Actions To Help the Two Associations Discuss Development 
  As cross-strait relations are developing, the Taiwan 
authorities concerned fantasize about using the two 
associations' talks to control or obstruct cross-strait 
exchanges, contacts, and development but such a practice has 
aroused Taiwan compatriots' strong discontent. Likewise, the 
Taiwan authorities are using their "mainland policy" as a means 
of "foreign policy" and relying on the two associations' talks 
to create "two political entities" and "two Chinas" but their 
conspiracy is being attacked by men of insight, including those 
inside the Taiwan authorities. 
  They criticize the Taiwan authorities' routine talks policy 
as a "policy of putting off or rejecting the policy of 
cross-strait communication" and as "trying every possible means 
to strive to build a new Cold War system." 
  They made an appeal to the high-ranking figure from the 
Taiwan authorities," saying that, as he "is trying so hard to 
promote pragmatic diplomacy, we wish he would also set up the 
mainland policy." They also called on the two associations to 
hold high- level meetings and communicate with each other to 
solve problems. Recently, the increasingly fierce conflicts 
between Taiwan's SEF and the "Mainland Affairs Council [MAC]" in 
the idea and strategy of cross-strait consultation, as well as 
the differences between the "Economic Ministry" and the "MAC" in 
cross-strait economic and trade policies, reveal the fact that 
the Taiwan authorities' existing "mainland policy" is unpopular 
and incompatible with present needs. 
  We advise the Taiwan leaders to give up their unrealistic 
illusions and change their rigid and conservative state of mind 
so that the two associations' talks can return to the spirit of 
the Wang-Koo Talks and to the consensus reached at the talks 
held between the leaders of the two associations. After taking 
routine methods to reach the three agreements, we should open 
talks on economic and scientific and technological matters as 
soon as possible and fully implement the Wang-Koo Agreement. In 
particular, as Chairman Wang Daohan, Mr Koo Cheng-fu, and 
scholars and the media on both sides of the strait have jointly 
proposed holding the second Wang-Koo Talks as early as this 
year, we should take concrete actions to bring about the second 
Wang-Koo Talks and to give an impetus to the progressive 
development of cross-strait relations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26968 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_w_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Patten Makes `Last-Ditch Bid' To Persuade Legislators </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Patten Makes `Last-Ditch Bid' To Persuade Legislators </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806045294 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806045294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Chris Yeung and Connie Law] </F>
  [Text] Governor Chris Patten will today make a last-ditch 
bid to persuade two wavering independent legislators to support 
his electoral proposals to fend off the threat posed by the 
Liberal Party's watered-down reform plan. The votes of Marvin 
Cheung Kin-tung and Timothy Ha Wing-ho might decide the fate of 
Mr Patten's two-year battle for greater democracy in the 
territory. Neither could be reached last night. 
  Some Legislative Council [Legco] members admitted that the 
battle between Mr Patten's proposal and the Liberal Party 
package which seeks to bring electoral changes more in line with 
the Basic Law, had become a "neck-and-neck" race. They say the 
margin would be in the range of "one or two votes." 
  The chances of the Liberal Party holding sway in Legco 
tomorrow took a sharp turn for the better yesterday, when seven 
pro-China legislators indicated they had changed their earlier 
position and would lend their support to the watered-down 
proposals. 
  The seven are Tam Yiu-chung, Chim Pui-chung, Philip Wong Yu- 
hong, Peggy Lam Pei Yu-dja, Alfred Tso Shiu-wai, Dr Tang 
Siu-tong, and David Li Kwok-po. 
  A senior mainland official said last night: "The choice is 
clear: the Liberal Party proposal is better than Patten's. 
There are now two proposals on the table. We are in effect 
supporting Patten's if we do not support the Liberal Party's." 
  The official said Beijing would spell out clearly that 
support for the Liberal Party alternative did not mean that its 
political structure would survive after 1997. Beijing, however, 
has not put pressure on pro-China legislators to support the 
package, the official said. "The chances of success for the 
Liberal Party proposal is now 50/50. There might be some 
accidental factors at the debate. We can't say which proposal 
will win... After all, I do believe that Patten will have his 
ways to get his proposals passed," he said. 
  A senior official said last night the government still 
believed that its proposal would win a majority in Legco. 
  The vote, however, hinges on the independents. With 15 votes 
from its members and the seven of pro-China colleagues, the 
Liberal Party needs eight more from independents to impose its 
package. 
  Three independents, Eric Li Ka-cheung, Elsie Tu, and Roger 
Luk Koon-ho, said they would support the Liberal Party 
amendments. It is believed those in favour of the amendments 
include Samuel Wong Ping-wai, Simon Ip Sik-on, Vincent Cheng 
Hoi-chuen and Martin Barrow. 
  The Liberal Party pressed Mr Patten to instruct the three 
officials who sit in Legco not to cast their votes. But in a 
statement issued after Mr Patten's meeting with three Liberal 
Party leaders, a government spokesman said Mr Patten had made it 
clear that the three ex-officio members would vote in support of 
the government proposal. Mr Patten said it would be wrong to 
make artificial distinctions between councillors in the way 
suggested by the Liberal Party. "Every member of the council 
has the right to vote and every vote is of equal weight." 
  The spokesman pointed to the fact that apart from the three 
official members there were another 18 appointed members. Eight 
of these appointed members are also members of the Liberal Party. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26969 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin Stresses Agriculture, State Firms </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin Stresses Agriculture, State Firms </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706161194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1558 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706161194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Fuzhou, June 27 (XINHUA) -- Chinese President Jiang 
Zemin today called for special attention to agriculture and 
state-owned enterprises so as to ensure stability and provide a 
reliable guarantee for reform and development. 
  Jiang made the call during a week-long tour through east 
China's Fujian Province. 
  Jiang, also general secretary of the Chinese Communist Party 
Central Committee, stressed that as a big and the most populous 
country in the world, China has to be self-sufficient or even 
more so in grain supply. 
  He urged greater efforts to guarantee sufficient crop 
growing 
areas, grain output and reserves. He called special attention 
to this problem in the developed coastal areas where the 
industrial and service sectors are developing rapidly. 
  On state-owned enterprises, the president said that the 
public sector is the mainstay of the national economy. 
State-owned enterprises, particularly large and medium-sized 
ones, have played a leading role in the development of a 
socialist market economy, he said, adding that the current 
difficulties are very complicated and they should not be made a 
pretext of losing confidence in them or regarding them as a 
"burden". 
  He urged all government departments to devote their main 
energy to the development of the public sector of industry. 
Although China is encouraging the development of the private 
sector, including foreign-funded enterprises, he said, it is 
after all playing a supplementary role in the national economy. 
  He warned that whatever reform measures are taken to deepen 
the reform and transform the operational mechanism of the 
state-owned enterprises, everything must be done to ensure that 
state property maintains and increases its value. No loss of 
state property should be allowed in the course of reform, Jiang 
stressed. 
  Jiang stressed the necessity of the policy of letting part 
of 
the areas to get prosperous first while persisting in the goal 
of common prosperity. 
  He encouraged the developed coastal areas to help with the 
development in the central and western regions by strengthening 
cooperation and providing advanced technology and management 
experience so as to gradually achieve common prosperity, which, 
he said, is an important condition for safeguarding social 
security and consolidating national unity. 
  Jiang also urged Fujian Province to enhance economic and 
trade ties with Taiwan and contribute more to the peaceful 
reunification of the motherland. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26970 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Says Moves To Cool Economy `Succeeding' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Says Moves To Cool Economy `Succeeding' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806063194 Hong Kong AFP in English 0602 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806063194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (AFP)--Prime Minister Li Peng said 
Tuesday that macro-economic measures taken to cool China's 
overheating economy are succeeding. "The growth rate has been 
slowed down, inflation is also levelling off, the economic 
situation is very good," he said at a press conference before 
leaving on a tour of Austria, Germany and Romania. 
  He said the measures had enabled credit to be controlled, 
and 
put a brake on fixed capital investments and price rises. But 
he admitted the country's growth rate was at present still above 
the nine percent target set by the government for 1994. "We are 
trying to achieve a rapid, sustained and healthy development," 
said Li without making any forecasts. 
  According to latest official estimates the economy grew by 
about 12 percent in the first six months of this year compared 
with the same period last year, against 12.7 percent in the 
first three months of this year and 13 percent in 1993. Many 
Chinese and foreign experts consider that, despite government 
efforts to avoid overheating, the nine percent level will be 
exceeded by the end of the year. 
  The most difficult task for the authorities is to control 
inflation which, although slowing slightly in May, is still 
hovering around the 20 percent mark nationally and above 23 
percent in major cities. The government has set a target of 10 
percent for inflation in 1994 but most economic experts consider 
that inflationary pressures within the economy are too great for 
this to be achieved. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26971 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhu Rongji Inspects Jilin, Liaoning </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhu Rongji Inspects Jilin, Liaoning </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706191994 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0912 
GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706191994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Gao Xin (7559 2946) and He Daxin (0149 1129 </F>
2450)] 
  [Text] Shenyang, 23 Jun (XINHUA) -- During an inspection 
trip to Jilin and Liaoning, Zhu Rongji, member of the CPC 
Central Committee Political Bureau Standing Committee and vice 
premier of the State Council, stated: We must reform the 
distribution system for agricultural means of production, keep 
the prices of such materials stable, and consolidate the gains 
in reforming the grain purchase and marketing system to maintain 
peasants' enthusiasm for growing grain. 
  From 14 to 21 June, Zhu Rongji and officials in charge of 
relevant State Council departments traveling with him heard 
briefings on the economic work of Jilin and Liaoning Provinces. 
Accompanied by He Zhukang, secretary of the Jilin Provincial CPC 
Committee; Jilin Governor Gao Yan; Gu Jinchi, secretary of the 
Liaoning Provincial CPC Committee; and acting Liaoning Governor 
Wen Shizhen, they visited markets for farm produce, granaries, 
and grain production households; held forums on reforming the 
distribution system for agricultural means of production; 
inspected factories; and held informal discussions with the 
leaders of some state-owned large and medium-sized enterprises. 
  Zhu Rongji fully affirmed the achievements of Jilin and 
Liaoning Provinces in economic work. He said: Under the 
leadership of the CPC Central Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin 
as the core, and thanks to careful arrangements by the 
provincial party committees and governments, the economic 
situation in both provinces is favorable as several key reforms 
are functioning normally, agricultural production has generated 
notable results, bumper grain harvests are within reach, diverse 
operations and village and town enterprises are developing 
rapidly, industrial production is increasing steadily, and 
markets are replete with commodities. The situation will get 
even better if people work hard together. 
  Zhu Rongji noted: Reform of the grain purchase and marketing 
system has proceeded smoothly in the two provinces where grain 
market prices are basically stable, peasants are quite satisfied 
and are even more enthusiastic about growing grain, and urban 
residents are understanding and supportive. The situation in 
the two provinces fully attests to the fact that the policy 
decisions of the CPC Central Committee and the State Council are 
correct. Grain prices are at the core of the party's rural 
policy, as well as an important economic lever with which to 
inspire peasants' enthusiasm. Now that peasants' enthusiasm has 
been kindled, we must keep the prices of fertilizer and other 
agricultural means of production stable, and make every effort 
to bring those prices down, so that peasants will genuinely gain 
tangible benefits. This will boost agricultural development to 
a new high. After we have developed agricultural production, 
increased peasants' incomes, and expanded purchasing power in 
rural areas, industrial goods will find wide demand and the 
national economy will develop on a solid basis. Therefore, we 
should not underestimate the profound and far-reaching effects 
of the current reform of the grain purchase and marketing 
system, as well as the current price reform. 
  The main purpose of Zhu Rongji's recent inspection, 
investigative, and fact-finding trip was to find a way to reform 
the distribution system for agricultural means of production and 
to bring under effective control price increases for chemical 
fertilizer and other agricultural means of production. During 
his visits with peasant families and informal discussions with 
cadres at all levels and peasants, he stated: Chemical 
fertilizer prices have risen sharply since the beginning of this 
year because of the acute imbalance between supply and demand, 
price increases for raw and semifinished materials, and the 
untimely supply of chemical fertilizer. The main reasons, 
however, are the existence of many intermediate links in the 
distribution chain, market disorder, the race among some 
production enterprises and operating units for higher prices to 
seek profits in violation of state provisions, and poor 
supervision and management by competent departments. He noted: 
To keep chemical fertilizer prices stable and consolidate gains 
in reforming the grain purchase and marketing system, we should, 
first of all, balance total supply and demand. At present, we 
should go all-out to produce quality chemical fertilizer, 
improve product quality, ensure the delivery and distribution of 
imported chemical fertilizer, and increase supplies to meet 
peasants' demand. Second, we should reform the distribution 
system for agricultural means of production. The state should 
control the supply of most agricultural means of production, 
allow supply and marketing cooperatives to serve as the main 
channel through which such materials are distributed, strictly 
enforce government-set prices, and ensure supplies in rural 
areas. Departments engaged in the supply and management of 
agricultural means of production should reduce intermediate 
links in the distribution chain, streamline their organizations 
and personnel, improve management and administration, and reduce 
circulating costs. We should unify the basic prices of and 
operating charges for chemical fertilizer and other major 
agricultural means of production, and permit seasonal price 
differentials caused by regional and seasonal factors. Third, 
we should earnestly improve market administration and restore 
order in the distribution field. All units must operate 
strictly in accordance with state provisions; those who disrupt 
the market, drive up prices, and seek staggering profits in 
violation of relevant provisions must be investigated and dealt 
with resolutely. The State Council will further study the issue 
of reforming the distribution system for agricultural means of 
production, and intensify efforts to draw up documents to be 
relayed to subordinate units for implementation. 
  Zhu Rongji added: There are signs of opportunistic price 
increases for meats, poultry, eggs, and vegetable oil in a few 
areas, and they merit attention. Corn market prices have not 
risen, nor have feed prices. The price increases for meats, 
poultry, and eggs are not compatible with the laws of the 
market, because these goods are in ample supply. State-run 
commercial departments should organize supplies, sell off 
stockpiles, and roll back prices. Meanwhile, industrial, 
commercial, and commodity price departments should send 
inspection teams to the grass roots to stop indiscriminate price 
increases. This is also an important means of consolidating the 
gains in reforming the grain purchase and marketing system. 
  Speaking of the troubles currently plaguing some state-owned 
enterprises, Zhu Rongji said: On the whole, state-owned 
enterprises are taking a turn for the better. To overcome the 
troubles currently plaguing some enterprises, we must correctly 
analyze the causes of the troubles and develop clear ideas for 
running state- owned enterprises effectively. First, we should 
persistently separate government and enterprise functions so 
that the government will help enterprises strengthen leadership 
bodies, create a good macroeconomic environment for enterprises, 
and oversee the way enterprises implement state principles and 
policies. Second, enterprises should change their operating 
mechanisms, improve their "internal functions," readjust product 
mix in accordance with market demand, and improve product 
quality and their own reputation. Third, we should stress 
investment returns, upgrade enterprises technologically, and 
avoid launching new projects recklessly. 
  Accompanying Zhu Rongji during his inspection trip were Yao 
Zhenyan, Xu Youfang, Sheng Huaren, Luo Zhiling, Yang Changji, 
Hong Hu, Xiang Huicheng, and Chen Yuan, who are comrades in 
charge of relevant State Council departments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26972 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi124_v_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-124 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister, U.S. Officials, Discuss Crime Fighting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Minister, U.S. Officials, Discuss Crime Fighting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806075094 Taipei CNA in English 0722 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806075094 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Bill Wang] </F>
  [Text] Washington, June 27 (CNA) -- Justice Minister Ma 
Ying-jeou of the Republic of China [ROC] Monday [27 Jun] met 
with U.S. officials in Washington to discuss joint 
crime-fighting efforts. 
  Ma, the first ROC justice minister to visit the U.S. capital 
since the two countries severed diplomatic ties in 1979, said 
that he met with U.S. officials from the Justice Department and 
the State Department on proposed mutual legal assistance and 
extradition treaties. 
  The minister said that there is a growing consensus between 
the two sides on the need for such agreements. Ma said that 
some 157 suspects wanted by authorities in Taiwan are either in 
the United States or are believed to be here but cannot be 
brought to justice because there is no extradition treaty 
between the two sides. 
  Ma added that Washington has signed mutual legal assistance 
treaties with 15 different countries and is interested in 
signing a similar agreement with Taipei. 
  Meanwhile, Ma met with officials from the Drug Enforcement 
Agency, the Bureau of Prisons, and the Government Ethics Office 
to discuss anti-drug efforts, prison administration and the 
enforcement of government ethics. 
  Drug use is becoming a sejious problem in Taiwan, Ma told 
the 
officials. In 1933, law enforcement agents in Taiwan seized 
1,110 kilograms of heroin, morphine and marijuana and 3,357 
kilograms of amphetamine, up 133 percent and 17 percent 
respectively from the previous year, he said. 
  He also refuted a State Department report released earlier 
this year which claimed Taiwan is an international drug transit 
point. 
  Ma arrived in the United States last week to attend the 
convention of the National Association of State Attorneys 
General in San Antonio, Texas. He came to Washington Saturday 
and is scheduled to leave here for home Tuesday. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26973 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_m_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  20 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   PLA Leaders Attend Meeting on Night Training </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PLA Leaders Attend Meeting on Night Training </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806142294 Beijing JIEFANGJUN BAO in Chinese 20 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806142294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIEFANGJUN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Yan Jinjiu (7051 6855 0036) and Su Ruozhou </F>
(5685 5387 5297): "Inherit and Develop Our Army's Night 
Fighting Tactics"] 
  [Text] Jinan, 19 Jun (JIEFANGJUN BAO) -- The nine-day 
all-Army on-the-spot meeting on the reform of night training 
came to a satisfactory conclusion yesterday. Liu Huaqing, vice 
chairman of the Central Military Commission, personally arrived 
at the field to instruct and observe an exercise, and make an 
important speech. During the session, Vice Chairman Zhang Zhen 
made a special trip to visit the All-Army Exhibition of 
Renovated Equipment for Night Fighting Training, whereas General 
Chief of Staff Zhang Wannian presided over the meeting. 
  The on-the-spot meeting focused on the theme of resolving 
how 
should night combat and training be conducted under hi-tech 
conditions -- through lectures on night combat theory; 
exchanging experiences; demonstration maneuvers between two 
units, with results scored in tactics, ways of training, 
contents, and logistics -- while playing a role in guidance, 
promotion, and standardization for the whole Army to unfold 
in-depth reform of night exercises. The leading and related 
departments of various military regions and service arms in 
charge of training, and comrades of some command institutes and 
academies universally reflected that the recent on-the-spot 
demonstration and seminar were characterized by inheritance, as 
well as blazing new trails, and were very valuable at that, 
while opening wide the train of thought for developing the 
tradition of night fighting and promoting reform in night 
training. 
  Various troops throughout the Army have deepened training 
reform over the past two years, based on the general design and 
arrangements made by the Central Military Commission and General 
Staff Headquarters. Focusing on the knotty issues in night 
fighting this year, the Army, Navy and Air Force have worked 
together to tackle the bottlenecks through concerted efforts. 
They figured out measures characterized by developing the 
strong points and avoiding weaknesses in order to find 
countermeasures that aim to avoid the opponent's strong points 
and attack its weaknesses. They worked hard at contention in 
intelligence and courage, determined moves giving play to the 
Army's might in integrity, and reformed technological equipment 
while creating new tactics. As a result, a whole range of night 
fighting tactics and ways of night training having 
characteristics of the times, as well as of our Army, gradually 
have taken shape, which brought along the comprehensive study in 
combat and training issues under hi-tech conditions, and 
promoted in-depth development throughout the reform of training. 
The recent on-the-spot demonstration placed the main results of 
night training reform, which reflected the joint efforts and 
pooled wisdom of the officers and men of the whole Army, under 
the test of a live exercise in fighting tactics. For the first 
time in our Army's history of training, live exercises in night 
fighting tactics on the scale of a reinforced infantry division, 
as well as of a reinforced tank regiment, were conducted. For 
the first time, a live ground exercise in fighting tactics was 
conducted with the air arm, airborne troops, and Air Force units 
under ground force command working in coordination. This has 
augmented faith in night combat, while finding solutions to both 
the ways and means. 
  During the meeting, Military Commission Vice Chairmen Liu 
Huaqing and Zhang Zhen, Chief of General Staff Zhang Wannian, 
Deputy Chiefs of Staff Li Jing, and Cao Gangchuan; Xu Caihou, 
deputy director of the General Political Department; Zhao Nanqi, 
commandant of the Academy of Military Sciences; Zhu Dunfa, 
commandant of PLA National Defense University; Wu Quanxu, 
assistant to the chief of general staff; Zhou Liangyou, deputy 
director of the General Logistics Department; and comrades 
participating in the all-Army on-the-spot demonstration of 
reform in night fighting and night training; visited the 
exhibition of all-Army night vision equipment, and renovated 
equipment for night fighting and night training. On display at 
this exhibition were renovated night fighting reconnaissance, 
camouflage, command, and countermeasure equipment with which our 
Army already has been equipped. They all were researched and 
manufactured with the Army's own efforts. All this showed that 
the level of our Army's night combat equipment has greatly 
improved, and the means of night vision and night combat have 
been markedly elevated. 
  In his important speech at the meeting, Vice Chairman Liu 
stressed that all PLA troops must deepen research on issues 
concerning combat under hi-tech conditions. He said: Issues of 
combat under hi-tech conditions are an entirely new topic. What 
we were familiar with in the past was entirely incompatible with 
the demands of future combat. It is imperative to strengthen 
research on this issue, and to think of ways and countermeasures 
to develop our military thinking, strategies and tactics. Focal 
efforts should be exerted on studying and researching hi-tech 
warfare. Regarding hi-tech warfare, general knowledge about it 
is not enough, nor is general research; genuine efforts and hard 
work are called for. Whether in studying high-tech knowledge or 
research in hi-tech warfare, our leading comrades at all levels 
-- especially chief military officers and political commissars 
or instructors -- must do a good job in playing an exemplary 
role, take the lead in study, earnestly think how they should 
plan for the development of army building and improvement of 
army combat effectiveness. Efforts must be made to inherit and 
develop our Army's traditional tactics. The strategies and 
tactics of the people's war were a magic wand for our Army to 
win victory over the enemy; we will always inherit its basic 
concepts. 
  However, regarding specific fighting tactics, we 
must proceed from the characteristics of combat under hi-tech 
conditions, while continuously developing them and blazing new 
trails. It is necessary to grasp those key and difficult points 
that have a bearing on the overall situation, and to tackle 
those bottlenecks with focused efforts, resolving them one after 
another. All sides, departments, and levels should work with 
concerted efforts, pool their wisdom, and grasp implementation 
to seek development. Vice Chairman Liu required officers and 
men of the whole Army to do a good job in bringing forward the 
tradition of the Red Army and of army building in accordance 
with the general requirement of Chairman Jiang's "five-point 
instruction," to provide staunch and powerful security insurance 
for reform, opening up, and modernization, and to live up to the 
trust of the party and people. 
  At the meeting, Chief of General Staff Zhang expounded on 
how 
to deepen reform in night training. He indicated that to 
continue to deepen reform in night training, it is imperative to 
grasp firmly the core issue of developing and creating new night 
combat tactics. To achieve this, it is necessary to do a good 
job of grasping five important links: First, we should proceed 
from the new fighting tactics of our opponent in creating our 
own. Second, we should proceed from giving play to the effects 
of existing weapons and equipment to create new fighting 
tactics. Third, it is necessary to proceed from the 
characteristics of future battlefields in creating new fighting 
tactics. Fourth, we should proceed from resolving the difficult 
point of hi-tech warfare creating new fighting tactics. Fifth, 
it is necessary to proceed from developing our Army's flexible 
strategies and tactics to create new fighting tactics. These 
five links are the chief channels in the reform of fighting 
tactics, as well as the important signs for testing fighting 
tactics. They reflect the organic combination of the subjective 
and the objective, common nature and individuality, and 
inheritance and development; they are interrelated with mutual 
infiltration. Only by analyzing and studying them in synthesis 
will it be possible to create new fighting tactics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26974 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_l_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology </F>
<H3> <TI>   CAS Research Team Developing High-Definition TVs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CAS Research Team Developing High-Definition TVs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2306081694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0712 GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2306081694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 23 (XINHUA) -- China is striving to 
capture a foothold in the high-tech domain of high-definition 
(HD) TV sets. 
  Ye Peida, head of the country's HD TV research team, said, 
"otherwise, China will lose a tremendous TV market and a golden 
opportunity to bolster its overall national strength with new 
technology." 
  Ye is an academician of the Chinese Academy of Sciences 
(CAS). 
  Chinese and foreign experts have predicted that a global 
market worth several billion U.S. dollars for HD TV sets and 
related products will take shape by the end of this century. 
  They expect a Chinese market of some 800,000 sets valued at 
2.4 billion U.S. dollars a year by that time. 
  Ye said that China has mapped out its strategic development 
goal for HD TVs, which stipulates that by around the year 2000 
it will have set up an experimental telecasting station able to 
make some programs. By then China will also have grasped the 
technology necessary for HD TV systems and be able to develop 
and produce, although in small numbers, HD TV receivers. 
  To achieve that goal, Ye said, China has drawn up detailed 
plans for two development stages: From now to 1996 China will 
pool efforts to tackle key technical problems and set up an 
experimental system for HD TV models. The following five years 
will see China go all out to develop HD TVs in an all-round way. 
  He said that China is in a favorable position to develop HD 
TVs, as a digital telecommunications network characterized by 
optic cables, satellites and microwaves has been formed 
nationwide. 
  According to him, the ministry of the electronics industry 
has established an HD TV research center, which conducts 
research on HD TV model receivers and satellite digital-data 
receiving systems in co-operation with the country's 
eight-largest TV enterprises, including the Changhong, Peony and 
Panda TV plants. 
  The study of HD TVs has undergone great changes since Japan 
developed the world's first HD TV system in the 1970s. In 1991 
the United States surprised the world with an all-digital HD TV 
system. 
  Experts predict that hd tvs will become widespread by the 
year 2005. 
  He Zuoxiu, a leading CAS physicist, said that the 
development 
of picture tubes and the manufacturing of macro-integrated 
circuits are the biggest difficulties in developing HD TV 
systems. 
  "Once the technical problems are solved, HD TVs will have an 
immeasurable impact on a wide range of sectors, particularly on 
national defense, telecommunications, scientific research, 
medical science and the electronic printing industry," he noted. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26975 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_l_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Work Starts on Survey, Design for First Express Railway </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Work Starts on Survey, Design for First Express Railway </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706113294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1122 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706113294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 27 (XINHUA) -- China has started survey 
and design projects for the construction of its first express 
railway, to run 1,300 km from Beijing to Shanghai. 
  The survey and design work is being done by the No.4 Survey 
and Design Institute of the Ministry of Railways, and is 
expected to be completed at the end of this year. 
  The institute is now working on the plans for the 631 km 
section from Xuzhou in Jiangsu Province to Shanghai. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26976 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_l_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Seminar on Scientific Progress Opens in Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Seminar on Scientific Progress Opens in Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706112194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1024 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706112194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- More than 1,000 
scientists and technicians from all over China gathered here 
today for the opening of a seminar on the country's scientific 
progress. 
  The three-day seminar, organized by the China Association 
for 
Science and Technology (CAST), is one of the association's most 
important academic activities this year. It is the largest 
multi-discipline high-level academic gathering yet staged by 
CAST, said sources from the seminar organizing committee. 
  The participants will discuss matters like the development 
of 
scientific disciplines and scientific progress in the 21st 
century. Frontier scientific subjects, science policies and 
personal training will also be on the agenda. 
  Experts pointed out that the seminar will provide scientific 
bases for China to draw up short-term and long-term policies and 
strategies for science and technology development, such as the 
ninth five-year-plan (1996-2000), the country's fifteen-year 
development plan and its overall program for science and 
technology. Lu Jiaxi, vice-chairman of the National People's 
Congress, Zhu Guangya, chairman of CAST, and Lu Yongxiang, 
vice-president of the Chinese Academy of Sciences, attented the 
seminar's opening ceremony this afternoon. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26977 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_l_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology </F>
<H3> <TI>   International Phycology Symposium Opens in Qingdao </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    International Phycology Symposium Opens in Qingdao </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706112394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1028 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706112394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Qingdao, June 27 (XINHUA) -- The Fifth International 
Phycology Symposium opened in Qingdao city, Shandong Province, 
today. 
  The symposium -- on the study of algae -- is held once every 
three years. The previous four were held in Canada, Denmark, 
Australia and the United States. 
  Entrusted by the International Phycological Society, the 
six-day fifth symposium was sponsored by the Chinese 
Phycological Society. Some 446 delegates from 37 countries and 
regions are taking part. 
  Phycological study and production in China has achieved a 
world leading position. China has the world's largest output of 
seaweed. The symposium has received 291 theses from 
participants. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26978 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chen Junsheng Inspects Flooded Areas in Guangdong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Chen Junsheng Inspects Flooded Areas in Guangdong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806154994 Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 0400 GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806154994 </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yesterday, State Councillor Chen Junsheng, head of 
the State Flood Control and Drought Relief Headquarters, led a 
central joint work team to go deep into Zhanjiang and Maoming, 
which have been severely hit by floods, in order to visit and 
express sympathy and solicitude to flood victims and to inspect 
the work of restoring production following the calamity. 
  Chen Junshen was satisfied with the work done by Zhanjiang 
and Maoming in dealing with the aftermath of the floods. He 
encouraged flood victims to take active measures to help 
themselves by engaging in production, and to reconstruct their 
homes. At the (Beiganzha) work site, located on the lower 
reaches of the Jiuzhou Jiang, Chen Junsheng spoke to 2,000 
people's militia men who were doing rush repairs of dykes. On 
behalf of the CPC Central Committee, the State Council, and the 
Central Military Commission, he expressed his deep sympathy and 
solicitude to the masses in the flooded areas. He also 
expressed his regards and thanks to officers and men of the 
People's Liberation Army, the officers and men of the People's 
Armed Police Force, public security officers and policemen, and 
cadres and masses who made important contributions to the 
present drive to fight floods and provide disaster relief. 
  In (Jingai) village of (Hetang) administrative area in 
(Hedi) 
town under Lianjiang city, Chen Junsheng and his party walked 
into the makeshift shack of a peasant named Zhang Xifang. Chen 
asked Zhang in detail about his daily life arrangements. When 
he learned that the houses of 32 out of the 38 households in the 
village had collapsed, Chen told Vice Governor Zhong Qixian, who 
was standing beside him: In the future, the government must 
strengthen the work of making plans and providing guidance to 
help peasants build their houses, and reduce the threat of 
calamities to them. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26979 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Li Peng Submits Draft Laws </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806115694 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0936 
GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806115694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Liu Siyang (0491 1835 2254) and Zhang Sutang </F>
(1728 1372 1016)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 28 Jun (XINHUA) -- Premier Li Peng 
submitted to the Eighth Session of the Eighth National People's 
Congress [NPC] Standing Committee, which opened today, two State 
Council proposals asking the session to deliberate two draft 
laws -- the Draft Law on the People's Bank of China [PBC] and 
the Draft Auditing Law. 
  In the proposal on the draft bank law, Li Peng pointed out: 
This law is formulated to meet the need to establish a 
socialist market economic structure, to define the status and 
functional duties of the People's Bank of China, to ensure 
scientific and authoritative formulation and execution of the 
monetary policy, to strengthen supervision over the banking 
industry, to establish and improve the central bank's 
macroeconomic regulation and control system, and to ensure 
reform of the banking system proceeds smoothly. 
  In the proposal on the Draft Auditing Law, Li Peng pointed 
out: This law is formulated to strengthen the auditing over 
state revenue and expenditure and over the financial 
transactions of state-owned organizations, to maintain the 
state's financial and economic order, to enhance economic 
efficiency, to ensure a healthy development of the national 
economy. 
  During today's meeting, PBC Deputy Governor Zhou Zhengqing 
and Auditor-general of the State Auditing Administration Guo 
Zhenqian separately explained the necessity and major contents 
of the two draft laws on behalf of the State Council. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26980 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Draft Law on Arbitration Submitted </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806111294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1103 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806111294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Legislators are 
examining a draft arbitration law designed to facilitate the 
settlement of economic disputes. 
  The draft was submitted to the eighth session of the eighth 
npc standing committee for deliberation today. 
  It provides for a new system under which arbitration and 
administrative organs shall function separately and arbitration 
be undertaken on a voluntary basis. 
  The parties in a dispute may seek a settlement either from 
an 
arbitration office or a court, but shall not resort to both 
simultaneously. The ruling passed by the first round of 
arbitration shall be final. 
  Chairman Gu Rangran of the NPC Standing Committee's 
Legislative Affairs Committee explained that the draft law 
applies to contract and other economic disputes, not to civil 
disputes normally handled by administrative organs, such as 
marriage, inheritance or adoption disputes. 
  Gu added that there will be legislation specially for 
settling labor disputes, which are different from other types of 
economic disputes. 
  The existing system calls for submitting an arbitration 
decision to the higher arbitration authorities or a court for 
examination before it becomes final. 
  After the draft becomes law, he said, this practice will be 
abolished. In its place will be a new system under which an 
arbitration decision is passed either by an arbitration office 
or by a court. 
  The agreement reached between the parties through the first 
round of arbitration is final, and the court will reject any 
lawsuit from any party should disagreements arise on the 
agreement. 
  The rule applies to arbitration rulings as well. Once such a 
ruling is passed, appeals for a re-examination by either an 
arbitration office or a court will be rejected. 
  The principle of voluntary arbitration means that an 
arbitration agreement shall be reached out of the free will of 
the parties involved, and that the parties shall negotiate to 
decide where to have their dispute settled and by what 
arbitrator. 
  Under the draft law, arbitration offices are independent 
legal bodies, not affiliated to any administrative organ. 
Arbitration offices throughout the country shall have the same 
status. 
  That means there will be no "higher" or "lower" arbitration 
offices, nor will there be a division of labor between 
arbitration offices according to the division of administrative 
regions. 
  Courts do not interfere with the work of the arbitration 
offices, but exercises a sort of supervision either by refusing 
to have an arbitration ruling executed or by cancelling the 
ruling. 
  According to Gu, the drafting of the law began in August 
1991. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26981 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NPC Standing Committee Session Continues </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Deng Nan Speaks on Environment </H4>

<F P=102> OW2706121994 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1248 
GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2706121994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zhu Youdi (2612 1635 2769)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 23 Jun (XINHUA) -- Briefing the National 
People's Congress [NPC] on "China's 21st Century Agenda" today, 
Vice Minister of the State Science and Technology Commission 
Deng Nan called for the final solution of environmental 
problems, adding that the economy must develop on a long-term 
basis, but if environmental problems are ignored in the process 
of development, economic development will be seriously hampered. 
  "China's 21st Century Agenda" is "The White Paper on China's 
Population, Environment, and Development in the 21st Century." 
"China's 21st Centuray Agenda," completed after one and a half 
years since its drafting began in August 1992, was compiled in 
line with China's national conditions. It echoes the United 
Nations' "21st Century Agenda." This volume of policy guidance 
documents, compiled like an encyclopedia and approved by the 
Chinese Government, expounds the strategy for sustained 
development in China and will certainly serve as guidance for 
drawing up long- and medium-range economic and social 
development plans for China. 
  Deng Nan said: China has entered a stage in which its 
economy is developing rapidly. This has brought about an 
opportunity for us to solve environmental problems, but it has 
also brought us challenges. The development of the economy and 
technology has made it possible for us to increase investment to 
deal with environmental problems, but economic development in 
China at present is basically resource-oriented. Therefore, it 
is possible that development will bring about destruction of the 
ecology and worsening of the environment. Deng Nan said: We 
should foster an outlook for the comprehensive development of 
the population, the economy, society, resources, and the 
environment, and find a path for sustained development for China 
in accordance with its national conditions. 
  Deng Nan said: The formulation and implementation of 
"China's 21st Century Agenda," as a document to privide guidance 
for the drafting of national economic and social development, 
will make it possible for us to solve the past problem of 
economic development divorced from environmental protection. At 
present, we have drawn up the first batch of priority plans for 
the implementation of the "China's 21st Century Agenda." 
Sixty-two projects in nine areas are included in these plans. 
Of these projects, those that we have successfully striven to 
turn into projects of international cooperation will be included 
in the state's long- and medium-range plans. These projects 
will be developed according to our needs. 
  Deng Nan pointed out: In drawing up their programs for the 
year 2010 and their Ninth Five-Year Plan, various areas and 
departments should pay attention to embodying the idea and 
contents of "China's 21st Century Agenda." Meanwhile, they 
should do a good job in running comprehensive social development 
experimental zones and set up training centers which can train 
international personnel on a sustained basis. We should 
strengthen propaganda and further mobilize and encourage the 
masses to participate in our projects. We should further advance 
the implementation of "China's 21st Century Agenda" by relying 
on science and technology. We should extensively launch 
international cooperation so as to lead China onto the path of 
sustained and sound development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26982 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Reach Consensus on Economic Controls </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Reach Consensus on Economic Controls </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906071694 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
29 Jun 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906071694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Geoffrey Crothall in Beijing and Willy Wo-lap Lam] </F>
  [Text] Top leaders of the Communist Party and Government 
have reached consensus on boosting centralised control over the 
economy, which will be the theme of the upcoming Fourth Plenum 
of the Central Committee. 
  The national press yesterday highlighted a relatively 
conservative speech given by President Jiang Zemin to cadres in 
Fujian Province, which he had visited. 
  Mr Jiang, who is also party chief, admonished local 
officials 
to heed the central line on issues including agriculture, the 
reform of state enterprises, and the relationship between the 
rich coast and impoverished heartland. 
  He said even industrialised cities along the coast should 
contribute to the national goal of self sufficiency in 
agriculture. Each province and district should guarantee the 
acreage devoted to grain stability of grain output and 
sufficient storage. 
  On the transformation of state enterprises, Mr Jiang said 
the 
state sector should continue to be the mainstay of the economy. 
Moreover, in restructuring government units, officials and 
entrepreneurs must guard against excessive privatisation and the 
loss of state assets, he warned. 
  On co-operation between coastal and heartland regions, he 
said everybody must strive to achieve the goal of"common 
prosperity", hinting that Fujian and Guangdong must make more 
contributions to the poorer areas. 
  Chinese sources said a team appointed by Mr Jiang is 
drafting 
the document on "macro-level adjustments and controls" that will 
be passed by the Fourth Plenum. They said many of the ideas 
raised by Mr Jiang during his recent tour of Fujian and 
Guangdong would be incorporated. The plenum also will recommend 
ways to restore fiscal discipline over the economy and to cool 
inflation. 
  It is understood that measures used since mid-1993 by 
Vice-Premier Zhu Rongji, including a tight money policy, will be 
endorsed. 
  Before leaving for Europe yesterday, premier Li Peng 
expressed satisfaction over the efficacy of "macrolevel 
adjustments and controls". 
  China had achieved "initial success" in bringing inflation 
and economic growth under control, he said. "Although the 
growth rate has not yet been reduced to the nine percent target 
level, growth has been slowed down and inflation has also 
levelled off and in some areas has actually declined," he said. 
"Therefore we can say the overall trend of China's economic 
development is quite good.". 
  Mr Li said that to bring down inflation, China had used such 
measures as curbing demand and reducing the scale of capital 
construction. "We have also made vigorous efforts to develop 
agriculture and introduced the so-called vegetable basket 
project in order to bring down the cost of living for the 
people," he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26983 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator on Safeguarding Social, Political Stability </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentator on Safeguarding Social, Political Stability </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806135394 Beijing BAN YUE TAN in Chinese No 10, 25 May 94 
pp 4-5 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806135394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BAN YUE TAN </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentator's article: "Genuine Efforts Should Be Made To </F>
Maintain Stability"] 
  [Text] At the moment, it is a matter of great importance to 
safeguard social and political stability and to promote reform 
and development in a more satisfactory way. 
  Safeguarding stability is neither empty talk, nor 
ostentation, nor simple, passive handling of the contradictions 
and problems in social life. It is a valuable experience and a 
profound lesson we have learned from the smooth practice of 
reform and opening up to the outside world, as well as economic 
construction, over the past dozen years. It requires a clear 
understanding of the overall situation; a sense of mission and 
urgency in maintaining the good developmental trend in reform, 
opening up to the outside world, and economic construction; and 
the courage to blaze new trails and use down-to-earth methods to 
tackle the contradictions and problems cropping up in the course 
of progress. 
  To safeguard social and political stability calls for 
genuine 
efforts. For leading cadres at various levels, first of all 
they must make earnest efforts to improve their style of work. 
  First, it is necessary for them to plunge deep into practice 
in order to undertake investigations and studies, pay close 
attention to the implementation of the policies and measures for 
reform and development already adopted by the central 
authorities, combine general calls with concrete guidance, and 
discuss together with the masses concrete programs for reform 
and development, as well as measures for overcoming difficulties 
and developing the economy. 
  An urgent topic at present is how to imbue state-owned 
enterprises -- especially those state-owned enterprises that are 
incurring losses -- with real vitality in the reform to change 
operational mechanisms and to establish a modern enterprise 
system. For governments at various levels, it is necessary for 
them to actively explore changing their functions, improving the 
management of state-owned assets, establishing a social security 
system, improving the market system, and reducing enterprise 
burdens, so as to continuously create a good environment and 
good conditions for enterprise reform. 
  The steady development of agriculture is also of paramount 
importance. It is imperative for us to strictly carry out the 
party's principles and policies concerning the countryside, 
truly increase the peasants' comparative return on grain crop 
cultivation, provide serialized quality services, help resolve 
specific problems in production, raise the peasants' income, and 
render guidance to them so they can enter the market more 
smoothly. 
  Second, in the spirit of being highly responsible for the 
people, we should always heed the cries of the masses, show 
concern for their hardships, safeguard their personal interests, 
and lead them in overcoming difficulties and solving problems, 
so as to spur on the development of various undertakings. 
  To stabilize the market and keep prices down is a key issue 
in correctly handling the relationship between reform, 
development, and stability; it is also an important task 
confronting governments at all levels. They have adopted a 
series of measures or countermeasures to hold excessively rapid 
price increases in check -- from controlling the scale of 
fixed-asset investment and ensuring food grain and staple food 
supplies, to launching general checks on prices, requiring 
clearly marked prices on goods for sale, and taking measures 
against staggering profits. These measures have reaped initial 
results. New efforts are needed in studying the problem of how 
to establish and improve the price regulation and control system 
under the conditions of a market economy. 
  While making efforts to conduct the reform in depth, it is 
necessary to take into simultaneous consideration the interests 
of all sectors, in both urban and rural areas. In practical 
work, particular attention should be given to that part of the 
masses which is not yet well-off or which even faces 
considerable financial hardship. They should be given earnest 
help in overcoming financial hardship, and their basic needs 
should be guaranteed. At present, some places have adopted a 
compensation system that links basic old-age pensions with the 
cost of living index; others have established help-the-poor 
funds in urban areas to subsidize those families with low 
incomes and those who are extremely poor. 
  Third, it is necessary to be good at observing the people's 
conditions; to pay attention to coordinating interest relations; 
to give correct guidance to and straighten out people's 
feelings; to resolve contradictions in a timely fashion; and to 
guide, protect, and give full scope to the enthusiasm and 
creativity of the masses. 
  The overall advance of reform inevitably will lead to a more 
profound readjustment of all kinds of interests, and will give 
rise to many new situations, new problems, and new 
contradictions. This requires us to pay further attention to 
doing a good job in strengthening communication with all 
sectors; to be aware of the will and demands of the masses; to 
uphold a correct orientation in press coverage; to give 
necessary explanations so as to remove misgivings among the 
people; and to guide the masses to correctly understand the 
necessity, arduous nature, and complexity of the reform; have 
the overall situation of reform and development in mind, 
correctly understand the relationship between personal and 
collective interests, between partial and overall interests, and 
between short-term and long-term interests; and to plunge heart 
and soul into the reform. In addition, it is necessary to do 
painstaking work to solve contradictions among the people and to 
mobilize all positive factors to maintain a sound social mode 
and a sound atmosphere in public opinion. 
  Fourth, it is necessary to adopt specific measures to tackle 
hot social issues for which the broad masses show great concern, 
be honest in performing our official duties, and work 
industriously for the people until good results have been 
achieved. 
  Continuous efforts should be made to do a good job in the 
struggle against corruption and in promoting clean government. 
The Third Plenary Session of the Central Disciplinary Committee 
recently reiterated the "five requirements" for leaders at all 
levels to keep a clean government and be self-disciplined. 
These are rules of behavior that government leaders must 
follow. In terms of society as a whole, greater efforts should 
be made to strengthen discipline and halt unhealthy tendencies. 
Continuous efforts should be made to investigate cases that 
violate the law and discipline -- particularly the major and 
important ones -- and to punish and purge those corrupt elements 
that offend the law and discipline. 
  Social mode has a direct bearing on social stability. It is 
necessary to further encourage healthy social trends, advocate 
the tradition of standing up for justice, and strive for a 
fundamental turn for the better in the social mode. It is 
necessary to explore new and comprehensive ways to maintain 
sound social order, and to improve and perfect the new mechanism 
of mass participation. In addition, severe punishments are 
needed in order to deal resolute blows to law-breakers and to 
create a stable and harmonious social environment for reform and 
development. 
  With stability there will be prosperity, and with stability 
there will be a future. 
  Overall social and political stability should be treasured, 
protected, and maintained by society as a whole. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26984 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentary on Peaceful Coexistence </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentary on Peaceful Coexistence </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906035094 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p </F>
<F P=103> HK2906035094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [CHINA DAILY Commentary: "Time-Tested Norms] </F>
  [Text] Forty years ago today, China and India put forward a 
joint communique setting out the following norms to be observed 
in relations between the nations of the world: Mutual respect 
for sovereignty and territorial integrity; mutual nonaggression; 
noninterference in each other's internal affairs; equality and 
mutual benefit; and peaceful coexistence. 
  Over the past four decades, these norms have become commonly 
known as the Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence. 
  At the end of World War II, a wave of national liberation 
swept across the world. Many nations shook off the yoke of 
colonialism and became independent. They needed a foreign 
policy that could safeguard their hard won freedoms and protect 
the development of their economies. 
  The Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence reflected their 
aspirations and were warmly welcomed by them. 
  China not only participated in the initiation of the five 
principles but has observed these principles as a responsible 
member of the world community. 
  China adheres to these principles not only in its relations 
with the developing countries but also in its relations with 
developed countries, despite differing political systems. 
  By upholding these principles, China has won successive 
diplomatic victories and made more and more friends across the 
world. 
  Owing to the efforts of peace-loving countries such as 
China, 
the Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence have helped to 
preserve world peace, resolve conflicts, and enhance harmonious 
relations among nations over the past 40 years. 
  With the end of the Cold War, the 1990's has witnessed great 
changes on the world political map. 
  However, in the new and fluid political situation, the five 
principles are more important than ever. They embody the spirit 
of the United Nations Charter, reflect the essentials of a new 
and equitable form of relations among the nations, and represent 
the time-tested norms for world dialogue. They are vital in 
establishing the guidelines for a new world political and 
economic order. 
  Nowadays, some nations seek to interfere in the internal 
affairs of others, infringing on the sovereignty of other 
nations under the guise of "human rights" and "democracy." They 
seek to bully the weaker, smaller, and poorer nations in a bid 
to force the latter to accept their values and dance to their 
tune. 
  But history has shown that any arrogant bahaviour on the 
part 
of the big powers which goes against the Five Principles of 
Peaceful Coexistence will never get anywhere. After all, times 
have changed. And the sooner these countries change their 
outdated practices, the better it is for them and for the world 
community. 
  The global community is characterized by its diversity. The 
differences between the nations should be recognized and 
respected. 
  The Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence must be firmly 
upheld in handling the relations between the nations so that 
peace and development can be enhanced. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26985 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hu Sheng on Nature of Socialism </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hu Sheng on Nature of Socialism </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Part 1 </H4>

<F P=102> HK2706123794 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 16 Jun 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706123794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Hu Sheng (5170 4939): "What Is Socialism, How </F>
Should We Build Socialism?--Studying the Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping, Volume 3 -- first of two installments)] 
  [Text] In the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, 
Volume 3, it is said: "In the past, when we Marxists went in 
for revolution, we fought for the lofty ideals of socialism and 
communism. Now, when we are undertaking economic reform, we 
still must insist on taking the socialist path and upholding the 
lofty ideals of communism. The younger generation, in 
particular, must grasp this point. The question, however, is: 
What is socialism, and how should we build socialism? We have 
a lot of experience and lessons, the most important of which is 
to be clear on this question" (Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, Vol 3, p. 116; hereafter only the page number is 
noted when quoting passages from the Selected Works, 
Vol 3). Regarding this question, what important and new 
thinking did Comrade Deng Xiaoping advance? Some preliminary 
studies of this question will be made in this article. 
  Of course, unlike ordinary textbooks, Deng Xiaoping's works 
do not offer any general definition or explanation. Deng 
Xiaoping's purpose does not lie in finding a generally 
applicable formula, but in solving real problems, including real 
problems in China's socialist construction. He said: "Marxism 
must be a Marxism that integrates with China's real conditions, 
and socialism must be a socialism that fits in with China's real 
conditions and has Chinese characteristics" (p. 63). 
  However, we must deliberate on one question: What new 
substance did Deng Xiaoping's expositions on socialism 
contribute to Marxist scientific socialism? Aiming at solving 
real problems, Deng Xiaoping summed up China's historical 
experience in socialism, and also touched the historical 
experience of international socialism, thus advancing a series 
of new Marxist theses. Marxist socialist theories are an 
evergreen that should develop along with practice and be 
constantly enriched. Deng Xiaoping made important contributions 
in this respect. 
  Four issues will be dealt with in the following passages: 1) 
The development of productive forces; 2) The primary stage of 
socialism; 3) Reform -- liberation of productive forces; and 4) 
The socialist market economy. 
<H5>  I. Development of Productive Forces </H5>
  Deng Xiaoping said in 1986: "The first principle of 
socialism is to develop production, and the second is to achieve 
common prosperity" (p. 172). He reaffirmed this point in the 
important remarks made during his inspection of the South in the 
spring of 1992. He said: "The essence of socialism is to 
liberate and develop productive forces, abolish exploitation, 
eliminate polarization, and ultimately achieve common 
prosperity" (p. 373). 
  Deng Xiaoping persistently stressed that concerning the 
question of understanding what socialism is, we must give first 
place to the development of productive forces, and he made this 
point repeatedly for many years. "The fundamental task of the 
stage of socialism is to develop productive forces" (p. 63). 
"The primary task of socialism is to develop productive forces 
and gradually improve the people's material and cultural living 
standard" (p. 116). His thesis on liberating productive forces 
through reform under socialist conditions is linked to the 
requirements for developing productive forces. 
  To counter the fallacies uttered by the "Gang of Four" 
counterrevolutionary clique during the "Cultural Revolution -- 
such as "We prefer impoverished socialism to affluent 
capitalism" -- Deng Xiaoping asserted with his enlightening 
voice that poverty is not socialism. He stressed this point not 
only because he wanted to refute the "Gang of Four," but also to 
counter the shortcomings that had existed in our party's guiding 
ideology for a long time. He said: "If we say that we have 
weaknesses following the founding of our country, they are a 
certain neglect of the development of productive forces" (p. 
63). Hence, he also said: "We are told by 20 years of 
experience, from 1958 to 1978: Poverty is not socialism, and 
socialism must eliminate poverty. We cannot describe ourselves 
as fulfilling socialist requirements if productive forces are 
not developed and the people's living standards are not 
improved" (p. 116). 
  We also can see from our history that the thinking of 
"worrying about inequality rather than scarcity" has a 
longstanding and profound effect. Agrarian revolutions in the 
feudal age always and could only set their goal of struggle on 
implementing egalitarian measures. This sort of egalitarianism 
is also a kind of impoverished socialism, which played a 
progressive role in history, but is absolutely harmful to modern 
life. 
  Of course, putting the development of productive forces in 
the first place is not to say that socialism refers only to the 
development of productive forces. Deng Xiaoping said: 
"Socialism differs from capitalism precisely in its 
characteristic of seeking common prosperity and averting 
polarization. The fortune created belongs first to the State 
and second, to the people, and it will not lead to the emergence 
of new bourgeoisie" (p. 123). As far as socialism is concerned, 
neither public ownership nor the system of distribution 
according to work is nonessential. He said: "Public ownership 
as the main part and common prosperity are the cardinal 
principles of socialism which we must uphold" (p. 111). He also 
said: "A new bourgeoisie will never emerge in our development 
process because our principle of distribution is that of 
distribution according to work" (p. 255). 
  Some people have asked the question: Is socialism aimed 
at the public ownership system or at the development of 
productive forces? One answer to this question is that only 
public ownership is set as the goal from which we can never 
deviate on the track of socialism. Another is that in order to 
attach importance to the development of productive forces, we 
must treat it as the end, and public ownership merely as the 
means. In my view, raising and answering these questions in 
this way is inappropriate. If we talk about the ultimate aim of 
socialism, it is neither public ownership nor the development of 
productive forces, but rather the general improvement of the 
material and cultural living standards of society as a whole and 
of the people (until we can enter communism), which -- in Deng 
Xiaoping's popular language -- is called common prosperity. He 
mentioned on many occasions that common affluence is the goal. 
For example: "The goal of socialism is precisely to help all 
the people achieve common prosperity, but not to make them 
polarized" (pp. 110-111). In order to achieve common 
prosperity, it is necessary to develop productive forces and to 
have public ownership. If public ownership is forsaken, only a 
tiny minority of people will get rich, even if productive forces 
are developed, thus giving rise to polarization. If productive 
forces are not developed, however, it will lead only to common 
poverty, even if there is public ownership. 
  Before the rise of Marxism, every form of utopian socialism 
advocated public ownership. We should say that the ideal of 
socialism is always linked to the demand for public ownership, 
and the so-called socialism does not exist if public ownership 
is forsaken. However, past socialist thought gave consideration 
to public ownership on the basis of low productive forces, and 
almost all of them called for impoverished socialism. The 
characteristic of Marxist scientific socialism lies precisely in 
building public ownership on the basis of highly developed 
productive forces, which are even higher than those of a 
capitalist society. Marx and Engels said as early as the 
Communist Manifesto: After realizing their own political rule, 
the proletariat must try as quickly as possible to increase the 
total volume of productive forces. Deng Xiaoping also said: 
"Marxism pays the greatest attention to developing productive 
forces" (p. 63). Therefore, paying attention to developing 
productive forces and eradicating the worship of impoverished 
public ownership and socialism is completely in line with 
Marxist tenets. 
  On the issue of developing productive forces, Deng Xiaoping 
did not repeat the views of the founders of Marxism, but 
enriched Marxism with new things. He set out the idea of 
treating the development of productive forces as the center, 
while the development of public ownership and the system of 
distribution according to work must be subordinate to the demand 
for the development of productive forces. 
  Deng Xiaoping said: "Comrade Mao Zedong was the greatest 
leader, and the Chinese Revolution was successful under his 
leadership, but he had a major weakness: He neglected the 
development of productive forces. I am not saying that he did 
not want to develop productive forces, but that the method was 
not correct. For example, he did not handle things according to 
the law of social and economic development when dealing with the 
`Great Leap Forward' and people's communes" (p. 116). Here was 
revealed the reason Mao Zedong and our party had, in the past, a 
certain neglect for the development of productive forces. We 
can cite many remarks by Mao Zedong and other leading comrades 
to indicate that they were very eager to develop productive 
forces, but owing to the adoption of an inappropriate method, 
the outcome was that, in reality, they neglected or overlooked 
the development of productive forces. 
  Only when we handle things in accordance with the law of 
social and economic development can productive forces be truly 
developed. Here, questions in the following two respects are 
involved: 
  On the one hand, the development of productive forces has 
its 
own law. The broad masses' political initiative, set off by the 
emergence of the socialist system, can play an important role in 
social development. However, it cannot be transformed into 
modernized productive forces if we do not work through 
scientific technology. Hence, Deng Xiaoping emphatically 
pointed out, as early as 1975, that scientific technology was a 
productive force. He said later that it should be considered 
the primary force. No doubt, the effect of politics on 
productive forces is displayed in rousing the masses' 
enthusiasm, but it lies mainly in inspiring people to strive to 
master scientific technology. When carrying out the "Great Leap 
Forward" movement in 1958, we believed that direct reliance on 
the masses' political initiative and on rousing their enthusiasm 
could lead to a great leap in industrial and agricultural 
productive forces, but the result was contrary to our wishes. 
As a matter of fact, the movement gave first place to politics 
rather than to the development of productive forces, and in 
consequence, we could not fulfill the goal of developing 
productive forces, but only distorted the role of politics. 
  On the other hand lies question concerning the relationship 
between developing social productive forces and developing 
production relations. Regarding the relationship between the 
two, Deng Xiaoping laid stress on the leading position of 
productive forces. This was a breakthrough in the erroneous 
viewpoint prevalent in the international community and in our 
country for decades. According to this viewpoint, since 
production relations of socialist public ownership are advanced 
and superior, they should remain unchanged, having once taken 
shape, and social productive forces can be constantly improved 
by relying on them, and if there is no progress in the 
development of productive forces, we must make production 
relations of public ownership more "advanced." As proved by 
historical practice, this viewpoint does not conform to reality 
and is unfavorable to the development of socialism. 
  Stalin once believed that production relations and 
productive 
forces in a socialist society entirely fit in with each other, 
thus denying the occurrence of the problem of improving 
production relations. Mao Zedong did not agree with Stalin's 
rigid idea, but he still could not solve this problem. When 
exploring ways to solve this problem, he tried to promote 
productive forces with a more advanced form of socialist 
production relations, as displayed, at least, in the policy 
decision of setting up rural people's communes, whereas the 
so-called advanced state referred to "being large-sized and 
collective." As proved by facts, however, people's communes 
were seen only as advanced in form, but could not really play a 
part in promoting productive forces. 
  We should give first place to the development of 
productive forces after establishing socialist production 
relations in a preliminary way. The socialist public ownership 
and its corresponding system of distribution according to work 
are advanced, generally speaking, but the extent to which public 
ownership applies and what is the concrete form to be taken must 
be decided in accordance with the state of development of 
productive forces. That is, the concrete form of socialist 
production relations must be changed in line with the 
development of productive forces and with the demand for 
developing productive forces. Whether or not various concrete 
forms are appropriate cannot be judged by the criterion of being 
large and collective, but depends on whether or not the 
development of social productive forces is promoted. 
  In summing up historical experience, Deng Xiaoping 
courageously set out the viewpoint of giving first place to the 
development of productive forces. This is a creative viewpoint 
in line with Marxism. He emphatically illustrated this 
viewpoint when the rural restructuring started. In 1980, 
several provinces began to transform the people's commune system 
into the contract responsibility system on a household basis 
with remuneration linked to output, and they achieved results. 
Many provinces, howver, had not done the same thing or had just 
began to carry out this kind of reform. In remarks on the rural 
policy issue in late May 1980, he said: "Some comrades worry 
whether or not this way of doing things will affect the 
collective economy. In my opinion, this worry is unnecessary. 
Our overall orientation is to develop the collective 
economy.... We can be sure that as long as our production, our 
rural social division of labor, and our commodity market have 
developed, low-level collectivization will develop into 
high-level collectivization, and those parts of the collective 
economy that are not consolidated will be consolidated. The key 
is to develop productive forces, and we must create conditions 
in this respect for the further development of collectivization" 
(Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982)," p. 
275). That is to say, under the socialist system, the 
development of productive forces can bring about progress in 
production relations. We will only take a wrong path if we 
break away from the development of productive forces and pursue 
"advanced" public ownership according to abstract criteria and 
believe that productive forces can be developed in this way. 
  Under China's historical conditions, setting out such 
prinicples as giving first place to productive forces, suiting 
the development of socialist production relations to the demand 
for the development of productive forces, and displaying the 
superiority of socialism in the development of productive 
forces, has a very important meaning. Although these principles 
may not be suitable only to China and may be universally 
applicable, Deng Xiaoping did not set out these principles in 
general terms, but applied them to practice while closely 
linking them with China's real conditions. He not only urged 
people to unswervingly treat the development of productive 
forces as the work focus of the entire party and country, but 
also put forward a series of important questions related to the 
development of productive forces and of the socialist system 
based on China's national condition of being still at the 
primary stage of socialism. 
<H5>  II. The Primary Stage of Socialism </H5>
  The 13th party congress held in October 1987 treated the 
thesis that our country was still at the primary stage of 
socialism as the starting point for giving consideration to 
every problem. Deng Xiaoping told foreign visitors two months 
before the meeting: "Our 13th party congress is going to 
clarify at what stage China's socialism is, which is the primary 
stage. Socialism itself is the primary stage of communism, 
whereas we -- China -- are at the primary stage of socialism, 
which is an undeveloped stage. Everything must proceed from such 
actual conditions, and we must work out plans according to these 
actual conditions" (p. 252). 
  Over the years, people generally considered a socialist 
society as the brief transition period, which could be 
transformed into a communist society soon, thus there was no 
need to divide a socialist society into several stages. As 
shown by historical practice, this view was erroneous. 
  According to the original idea of Marx and Engels, a 
socialist society was born after going through a revolution in a 
country with a high degree of capitalist development. In such a 
country, whether or not a socialist society should be divided 
into primary and advanced stages still warrants consideration. 
As for countries like China, where original economic 
development was very backward, it is impossible for socialism to 
be a rather short historical period; moreover, China must 
proceed from the primary stage. Therefore, the CPC does not set 
out the scientific concept of the primary stage of socialism in 
a general sense, but proceeds from China's concrete conditions. 
  Mao Zedong and the leaders of his generation once were 
affected by the unrealistic impetuosity of a rapid transition 
from socialism to communism. They also took into account the 
idea that China's socialism would last for a long time, and Mao 
Zedong even suggested that socialism would have a developed 
stage and an undeveloped stage. Overall, however, they failed 
to consider China's problems by proceeding from the actual 
conditions of the primary stage of socialism. Deng Xiaoping 
said: "China did not only endure sufferings in this decade 
(note: refers to the "Cultural Revolution"), before that, from 
the latter half of 1957 on, we committed "leftist" mistakes. 
Overall, it refers precisely to shutting the door against the 
outside world, taking class struggle as the key link in domestic 
affairs, neglecting the development of productive forces, and 
making policies that overstepped the primary stage of socialism" 
(p. 269). A series of new principles and policies implemented 
following the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, held in December 1978, were set out, taking an object 
lesson from the past mistake of overstepping the primary stage 
of socialism. 
  In Deng Xiaoping's view, to help China realize the four 
modernizations, we should notice, at least, the two 
characteristics, that is, having a poor foundation to start 
with, and having a large population, but not many plows. In 
1979, when discussing the point of a poor foundation, he said: 
We achieved great success in economic construction after our 
country's founding, but because our foundation is poor, China 
now is still one of the very poor countries in the world, and 
China's overall scientific and technological level trails that 
of advanced countries in the world by 20 to 30 years. Regarding 
the point that China's socialist construction is conducted on 
the basis of poverty and backwardness, Mao Zedong and leaders of 
his generation also noticed this. Mao Zedong used "poverty and 
blankness" to summarize this situation. However, they often 
underestimated the difficulty in socialist construction under 
such circumstances, and sometimes they even considered that the 
foundation of "poverty and blankness" was more favorable to 
drawing the newest and most beautiful picture. Commenting on the 
"Great Leap Forward" in the "Review of Certain Major Decisions 
and Events" in 1958, Comrade Bo Yibo said that at that time, 
people believed that "in a large country like ours, in which the 
economy and culture were very backward, it seemed that as long 
as we waged an arduous struggle for three years or more, we 
could fulfill the task of socialist construction and begin to 
shift to communism." He also said: "The one-sided viewpoint of 
treating 'poverty and blankness' as our country's merit also 
played a certain role in underestimating the difficulty in 
putting an end to our country's backward face once and for all" 
(see p. 720 of the book). 
  It is unrealistic to believe that we can act freely and draw 
the newest and most beautiful picture of socialism on the 
foundation of "poverty and blankness." If there is a newest and 
most beautiful picture of socialism, it is definitely linked to 
the extremely high productive forces of socialism. We cannot 
talk about the newest and the most beautiful picture when 
socialist productive forces are still very backward. Moreover, 
we should not decide what kind of principles and policies to 
implement based on the general concepts of socialism. The 
importance of the theory of the primary stage of socialism lies 
precisely in the way it clearly points out that every principle 
and policy we implement must be in line with the actual 
conditions at the primary stage of socialism, and never can we 
adhere rigidly to the general form of socialism or make 
judgments purely in accordance with the abstract criteria of 
socialism. 
  In the democratic revolution, Mao Zedong found a correct 
Chinese revolutionary path in accordance with China's concrete 
conditions. For people who adhere rigidly to the general formula 
of Marxism, this path is absurd. Indeed, if we are divorced 
from concrete conditions and raise a general question on the 
proletarian-led democratic revolution, that is, asking whether 
the revolution should be city- or village-based, such a question 
is unanswerable, or we can reply only that the revolution should 
be city-based. Under China's concrete historical conditions, 
however, the only correct path for a proletarian party is to go 
to the villages and mobilize the vast numbers of peasants to 
carry out armed struggle and to encircle the cities from the 
rural areas. 
  The same is true for socialist construction. As we are 
carrying out socialist construction on the foundation of 
"poverty and blankness," we must admit that we are now at the 
primary stage of socialism. In this way, we must pay closer 
attention to the development of productive forces, and in order 
to develop productive forces, we must implement a series of 
principles and policies in line with the primary stage of 
socialism. Deng Xiaoping said: "Do not stick to the hard and 
fast rules. In the past, we were steeped in hard and fast 
rules; now we have to make a breakthrough" (p. 261). The hard 
and fast rules mentioned here include the general formula of 
socialism in the book. Breaking through the hard and fast rules 
refers precisely to integrating the general principles of 
Marxist socialism with China's actual conditions at the primary 
stage of socialism and to smashing the trammels of the general 
formula. Deng Xiaoping dared to break through the hard and fast 
rules and found the path of socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, which -- just as Mao Zedong dared to break 
through the hard and fast rules and found the victorious path of 
the Chinese democratic revolution -- requires great theoretical 
courage. 
  It is difficult to make decisions on many problems if we are 
fettered by hard and fast rules. Starting from 1978, the 
people's commune system was transformed into the contract 
responsibility system on a household basis with remuneration 
linked to output. "At the time when we proposed implementation 
of the contract responsibility system on a household basis with 
remuneration linked to output, many people were against it, 
asking if the household contract responsibility system could be 
regarded as socialism" (p. 367). If we are divorced from 
concrete historical conditions and ask, without proceeding from 
actual conditions, whether people's communes, in which all 
production means are publicly owned, or the household contract 
responsibility system should regarded as socialism, then it is 
really difficult to answer such a question. As proved by 
historical experience, it seems that the commune ownership 
(later the ownership was divided into three levels on the basis 
of teams) had very strong flavor of socialism, but it could not 
enhance the social productive forces in the countryside and 
improve peasants' living standard, whereas the contract 
responsibility system on a household basis with remuneration 
linked to output (plus the system of unified management, 
combined with independent management), opens up broad 
development prospects for socialist villages in our country. 
  As early as 1978, Comrade Deng Xiaoping said: "We must 
allow some localities, some enterprises, and some workers and 
peasants -- owing to their hard work and great achievements -- 
to earn more income and lead a better life." He said: "This is 
a major policy that can affect and give an impetus to our 
national economy" (Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping 
(1975-1982), p. 142). Later, he repeatedly talked about 
this idea. In February 1984, for example, he said: "We must 
let some localities get rich first; egalitarianism will not 
work. This is a major policy which everyone must consider" (p. 
52). In the last decade or so, we really did it and achieved 
very good results. Viewed from an abstract sense, it seems very 
odd to put forward such a major policy. Socialism aims at 
achieving common prosperity; does this contradict the idea of 
letting some localities and some people get rich first? 
However, if viewed from the actual conditions at the primary 
stage of socialism, this policy is entirely understandable and 
essential. China is so large and various localities are so 
widely different from each other, if all localities and people 
were to advance at the same pace, such egalitarianism would only 
sink us into poverty. 
  Allowing various economies of non-public ownership to exist, 
but with the public ownership at the core, is also an extremely 
important major policy. Deng Xiaoping said: "We allow the 
development of the individual economy and also the development 
of Sino-foreign joint ventures and solely foreign-invested 
enterprises, but socialist public ownership remains the main 
body" (p. 110). Concerning the question of foreign investment, 
he said: "The socialist economic foundation is very large, and 
will not be rocked by intakes of tens and hundreds of billions 
in foreign capital. Taking in foreign capital definitely can 
serve as an important supplement to our socialist construction, 
which in today's view, can be described as indispensable" (p. 
65). In light of this viewpoint and also according to the 
concrete historical situations of the areas of Hong Kong, Macao, 
and Taiwan, he set out the unprecedented idea of "one country, 
two systems." He said: "Socialism must be the main body of 
China, but some areas in our country, such as Hong Kong and 
Taiwan, are allowed to practice capitalism" (p. 59). "Socialism 
is socialism in a region with a population of 1 billion. This is 
a prerequisite without which things will not work. Under such a 
prerequisite, we can allow alongside us the practice of 
capitalism in small areas and within a small scope. We believe 
that the authorized existence of capitalism within a small scope 
is even more advantageous to the development of socialism" (p. 
103). 
  We cannot adhere to the book formula on how to construct 
socialism. It seems that this is a very clear argument, but it 
will be a major breakthrough when we grasp this point in 
practice. Just like the idea of encircling the cities from the 
rural areas put forward by Mao Zedong in those days, dogmatists 
will reckon Deng Xiaoping's viewpoints as absurd arguments that 
depart from the classics and rebel against orthodoxy. Deng 
Xiaoping stressed that Marxism must be developed and that we 
could never treat it as dogma. He said: "In the past, we scored 
a victory in the revolution by encircling the cities from the 
rural areas. This point is not covered by the books on 
Marxism-Leninism. Now, we still uphold Marxism-Leninism and Mao 
Zedong Thought. Here, we have some parts of inheritance and 
some parts of development. To be precise, what we mean by 
socialist construction is to build socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, and only in this way can we truly uphold 
Marxism" (p. 191). 
  What was said in the books written by Marx and Engels was 
only a envisaged idea of the future socialist system. Since 
they summed up the reasonable elements of the desired socialist 
pictures depicted by generations of advanced figures, and in 
particular, studied the rise of capitalism and its development 
history, and pointed out that the capitalist system was doomed, 
so their envisaged idea of the socialist system was scientific 
in nature. However, their envisaged idea could only sketch a 
broad outline of the socialist system. Lenin had preliminary 
practice of socialism, but it was still impossible to set out 
relatively systematic views on socialist construction. Deng 
Xiaoping said: "The socialist system is not equivalent to the 
concrete practice of socialist construction" (Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982), p. 214). If we copy 
indiscriminately the concept of a fully developed socialist 
system, even if this is a completely correct concept, instead of 
exploring the long process of socialist construction, we 
definitely can say that nothing will be accomplished. Our 
modernization proceeds on the track of socialism, but we cannot 
adhere rigidly to the basic concepts of the socialist system and 
treat them as a current program of action. In light of our 
national conditions, we must be good at taking various measures 
that are favorable to the development of social productive 
forces; otherwise it will be impossible to develop our socialism. 
  We differentiate capitalism from socialism according to 
abstract criteria, thus suffering too many losses. We once 
believed that as we were practicing socialism, anything that 
emerged in capitalist society should be rejected. It was in 
this spirit that the once- popular slogan of "fostering 
proletarian ideology and eliminating bourgeois ideology" was 
advanced. Deng Xiaoping said: "In today's view, this old 
slogan is one-sided and not very accurate. Without carrying out 
investigation and analyzing the situation in an all- round 
manner, certain comrades even criticize some of our current 
reforms, which contribute to the development of production and 
the socialist cause as if they are capitalist. This practice is 
incorrect" (Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping 
(1975-1982), p. 298). 
<H5>  III. Reform -- Liberation of Productive Forces </H5>
  A socialist society can never be full-grown and perfect at 
birth; in the process of its growth and development, it is bound 
to undergo various changes in its economic, political, and 
social systems, just like all other kinds of social formation 
experienced in human history. 
  In no matter what country, no slave, feudal, or capitalist 
society was unalterable from beginning to end. After noticing 
that certain malpractices have arisen in the society ruled by 
them, the ruling class in the society of class exploitation 
needs to make some changes in certain aspects in its economic, 
political, and social system and to take resolute actions to 
bring about these changes, which are called reform. In the 
society of class exploitation, the difference between revolution 
and reform lies in the fact that revolution is started by the 
class of the ruled, while reform is started by the ruling class. 
If the revolution is successful, it will result in a 
transformation from one kind of social formation to another, 
whereas reform, generally speaking, means changes within the 
same type of social formation. (There have been cases in human 
history when reform led to changes in social formations. For 
example, a slave society was transformed into a feudal society, 
and a feudal society was transformed into a capitalist society. 
This is because although the two initial social formations were 
different, both were, after all, societies with the class 
exploitation system.) When the United States was undergoing the 
severe economic crisis from 1929 on, the "New Deal" implemented 
by President Franklin Roosevelt was precisely a relatively 
important reform in the development history of capitalism. Once 
the implementation of Roosevelt's "New Deal" was begun, it 
caught public attention from all over the world. Different 
sorts of comments were made at that time, and some people even 
believed that Roosevelt had transformed capitalism into 
socialism. In reality, however, what Roosevelt implemented was 
merely a kind of reform within the limits of the capitalist 
system. This kind of reform really helped capitalism to bring 
its unused vitality into play to get over the crisis. During 
the 300-400 years following the rise of capitalism in the world, 
various countries underwent numerous self-reforms to varying 
degrees. This phase of history merits review. (to be continued) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26986 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  17 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hu Sheng on Nature of Socialism </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hu Sheng on Nature of Socialism </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Part 2 </H4>

<F P=102> HK2706125294 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 17 Jun 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> HK2706125294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Hu Sheng (5170 4939): "What Is Socialism, How </F>
Should We Build Socialism? -- Studying the Selected Works 
of Deng Xiaoping, Volume 3" -- second of two installments] 
  [Text] The establishment of a socialist society indicates 
that a people has created a new society with a high level of 
consciousness unseen in human history. This consciousness came 
from people's understanding of the general law governing 
historical development and shows that people can roughly discern 
the direction in which the new society will develop, though they 
are unlikely to know the specific law governing the development 
of the new society beforehand. Therefore, they cannot build up 
the new socialist mansion at one go without a flawless 
blueprint. In its lengthy historical process of existence, a 
socialist society -- like other types of societies -- is to 
change with the development of the productive forces and the 
change in various objective conditions. As the builders of 
socialism may make mistakes owing to erroneous thinking, the 
change in and development of the new society becomes all the 
more complicated. Historical facts have proved that when the 
objective conditions have changed, and thus call for a change in 
people's thinking, and if the builders of socialism fail to 
carry out reform in time, the cause of building a new society 
may go down the drain. 
  Therefore, the development process of a socialist society 
often calls for reforms; in other words, a situation that calls 
for reforms often occurs. Our current reform is based on our 
experience in building socialism in over 20 years, beginning 
late 1950's. Why the experience has generated a demand for 
reform and what reform program we should have are related to the 
experience in building socialism in many other countries, with 
the Soviet Union as the mainstay for a period of 60 years 
beginning in the late 1920's. In this period, socialist 
construction in various countries provided rich, positive 
experience, and also exposed people's distorted understanding of 
socialism, as well as weaknesses that a country in which 
capitalism had not been developed could hardly avoid in building 
socialism. On the historical signpost appeared an earnest 
warning: reform or appropriate reform, or else doom. 
  The shortcomings cropping up in socialist construction and 
in 
economic, political, and other relevant systems can be 
summarized as follows: 
  1. Unduly relying on centralized state power to manage and 
control everything. This gave the state a heavy burden that was 
beyond its power, and dampened or even suppressed the enthusiasm 
of all social quarters outside state power. 
  2. Failing to assimilate the advances of capitalist 
countries which are been useful for building socialism -- some 
advances can be assimilated directly, while others need to be 
reformed. 
  Such a formula for building socialism suggested that people 
had an incorrect or partly incorrect understanding of socialism. 
According to this formula, social productive forces could grow, 
but they could grow only to a limited extent and then clearly 
stagnated. 
  When beginning to build socialism following the victorious 
revolution, China indiscriminately copied the Soviet Union's 
formula for building socialism. This was because China lacked 
its own experience at that time, but also indicated that Chinese 
leaders were fettered by various concepts initiated by the 
Soviet Union in arriving at a correct understanding of 
socialism. Mao Zedong and other Chinese leaders once took a 
skeptical attitude toward the Soviet Union's formula and tried 
to carry out reform, but they failed to put their reform ideas 
into practice or made mistakes of a different nature in finding 
a correct reform program. 
  Deng Xiaoping said clearly in 1988: "Our past practice of 
indiscriminately copying the Soviet Union's formula for building 
socialism resulted in many problems. We discovered this problem 
a long time ago, but failed to find a good solution" 
(Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, Volume 3, p. 261). 
In 1987 he also said: "There is no way out other than reform. 
The practice over several decades has proved that the old 
formula is unsuccessful. Our past practice of indiscriminately 
copying a foreign country's formula hindered the development of 
the productive forces, led to a rigid way of thinking, and 
prevented the people and the grass roots displaying their 
enthusiasm" (p. 237). He then added: "We have made other 
mistakes, too, such as the `Great Leap Forward' and the 
'Cultural Revolution.' We made these mistakes not because of 
copying other countries' formulas" (p, 237); indeed, the "Great 
Leap Forward" and the "Cultural Revolution" were created by none 
other than China itself. Naturally, such erroneous practices 
were useless in rejecting foreign countries' formulas that were 
unsuitable for China. Clearly, the two basic mistakes mentioned 
above also were found in these mistakes made by China itself. 
  Indiscriminately copying a foreign country's formula, among 
other mistakes, resulted in serious ramifications. Deng 
Xiaoping said briefly: "Our principal mistakes made since 1957 
are `Left' mistakes, and the 'Cultural Revolution' is extremely 
`Left.' In the 20-year period from 1958 to 1978, our society 
actually stagnated, the national economy barely grew, and the 
people's living standards hardly rose. Can we let this 
situation go unchecked?" (p. 237). As compared with traditional 
concepts of socialism, Deng Xiaoping's views on reform bear the 
following characteristics: 
  Deng Xiaoping stressed the need to build socialism with 
Chinese characteristics in line with China's actual conditions, 
while the traditional concepts of other people represented by 
the Soviet Union maintained that any country could copy the 
existing formula for building socialism because it is the ideal 
one. 
  Deng Xiaoping said: "Reform is self-improvement of the 
socialist system and it has brought about a certain degree of 
revolutionary change in certain areas" (p. 142). On the one 
hand, this means that reform represents a certain degree of 
revolutionary change and that it is carried out within the 
framework of socialism. On the other, it means that the 
socialist system has yet to be constantly improved. This view 
contrasts with the traditional idea that the socialist system is 
perfect once it comes into being, or needs only minor 
patching-up. 
  Deng Xiaoping stressed that reform must serve to promote the 
development of the productive forces of socialist society, as 
well as focus on developing the productive forces. So the first 
thing we did when we began the reform in 1978 was to shift the 
focal point of our work. He said: "Since the Third Plenary 
Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee, the entire party has 
shifted the focal point of its work to the socialist 
modernization drive. While upholding the four cardinal 
principles, we have concentrated on developing social productive 
forces. This means setting things right in a fundamental way" 
(p. 141). He also emphasized that reform serves to emancipate 
productive forces. This fundamentally contrasts with the 
traditional idea that only revolution can liberate productive 
forces, and that under conditions of socialism there is no such 
task as liberating productive forces. 
  Now let us discuss, in particular, the viewpoint that reform 
also serves to liberate productive forces. 
  Socialist society was established on the basis of productive 
forces created by the capitalist society, and it negates 
capitalism. The reason the capitalist system must be negated is 
that the capitalist system -- with the capitalist relations of 
production at the core -- can no longer promote the development 
of productive forces. The task of the socialist revolution is 
to liberate the productive forces from the trammels of the 
capitalist system. When a socialist society has been 
established, is there any situation in which efforts should be 
made to liberate productive forces? Is there any task of 
liberating productive forces? For a long period of time, many 
people in the world answered no to these questions, although the 
productive forces in socialist society actually stagnated. 
  In the past, it was Mao Zedong who gave different answers to 
these questions. When the "Great Leap Forward" in 1958 proved a 
failure, after seeing that socialist economic construction did 
not proceed rapidly as he had expected, Mao Zedong realized that 
there were some obstacles to be removed. He also was 
dissatisfied with the practice of indiscriminately copying the 
Soviet Union's experience, and hoped to open up a path of our 
own. Although he did not make an adequate, scientific analysis 
of the failure of the "Great Leap Forward," his abovementioned 
ideas clearly have a few points to recommend them. He did not 
find a correct path later because he gave an entirely incorrect 
answer to the problem of where lay the obstacles or trammels 
hindering the development of productive forces in socialist 
society. He believed that the failure to make a thorough 
socialist revolution, namely, to thoroughly combat the 
capitalist class and capitalism, was where the shoe pinched, and 
that the capitalist relations of production and their 
superstructure died hard in socialist society. So he maintained 
that our tasks were to constantly identify capitalist things in 
socialist society, and to wage a struggle against them. Such 
thinking contradicted objective reality and brought about 
disasters in practice. Following this guiding ideology, people 
regarded all things that did not bear the mark of public 
ownership, as well as all types of individual ownership, as 
capitalist. This guiding ideology then found expression in 
"chopping off the tails of capitalism" in the countryside and in 
"discovering capitalist-roaders in the party," entailing serious 
consequences. To sum up, Mao Zedong's mistakes were due to the 
theories of "taking class struggle as the key link" and of 
"continued revolution under the dictatorship of the 
proletariat." Although the idea of "continued revolution under 
the proletarian dictatorship" was not advanced by Mao Zedong 
himself, he agreed with it and it conformed with his own 
thinking. His thinking was that to develop the socialist 
productive forces, people must constantly free themselves from 
the trammels of capitalism. 
  After the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, our party drew a conclusion from historical 
experience: Though class struggle will exist within certain 
areas, it is no longer the principal contradiction in our 
society; though we must continue to oppose the tendency of 
pulling China toward capitalism -- meaning the tendency of 
bourgeois liberalization -- we cannot develop productive forces 
mainly through class struggle. The trammels hindering the 
development of productive forces do not come from capitalism, 
but from the inappropriate economic system, which is related to 
a misunderstanding of socialism under certain historical 
conditions. In the circumstances, it is wrong to free 
productive forces through making a revolution, as we did in the 
past. 
  Deng Xiaoping stressed: Revolution serves to liberate 
productive forces, and so does reform. He clearly distinguished 
between the tasks of the two in liberating productive forces. 
He said: "Overthrowing the reactionary rule by imperialism, 
feudalism, and bureaucrat-capitalism to liberate the productive 
forces of the Chinese people was the goal of our past 
revolution. So revolution serves to liberate productive forces. 
Basically changing the economic system that is hindering the 
development of productive forces to set up a dynamic socialist 
economic system to promote the development of productive forces, 
once the socialist system has been basically set up, is the goal 
of reform. So reform serves to liberate productive forces" (p. 
370). 
  The reform that is needed in the present stage of socialist 
development must serve to basically change the economic system, 
which is related to various types of rigid ideas, a system 
belatedly relying on centralized state power. This task 
certainly cannot be accomplished through revolution against the 
capitalist class. Moveover, the theory of "taking class struggle 
as the key link" cannot help us learn useful experience from 
various foreign countries. 
  Historical experience has proved 
that "taking class struggle as the key link" in dealing with 
domestic matters is related to closed-doorism. Deng Xiaoping 
said: "Experience over the last three decades has taught us that 
it does not work to engage in construction with doors closed; 
the economy cannot develop in this way" (p. 64). "To seek 
development and to shake off poverty and backwardness, China 
must open to the outside world" (p. 266). He also said: "Many 
years of experience have indicated that we cannot rely on the 
old economic system to develop the economy, so we must 
assimilate useful methods created by the capitalist countries to 
develop productive forces" (p. 149). Daring to assimilate 
useful methods created by the capitalist countries shows that 
socialism has great vitality, rather than suggesting that it is 
weak. Of course, while insisting on pursuing the open policy, 
Deng Xiaoping also stressed the need to reject all the decadent 
things of capitalist countries. 
  Reform represents self-improvement of the socialist system, 
so it is different from revolution, in which one class topples 
another, but both serve to liberate productive forces. Deng 
Xiaoping said: "Like our past revolution, reform aims at doing 
away with obstacles hindering development of productive forces 
so as to enable China to shake off poverty and backwardness. In 
this sense, reform can be seen as revolutionary transformation" 
(p. 135). Since the traditional socialist system has existed 
for several decades and has struck root deep in the people's 
hearts, it is not easy to make a breach in it, either 
practically or ideologically. However, as far as the present 
deep-going and comprehensive reform is concerned, it is a 
revolution in a sense. 
  Deng Xiaoping said: "We regard reform as a revolution, which 
is of course different from the `Cultural Revolution'" (p. 82). 
He continued: "The reform we are carrying out is a bold one, 
but if we do not act this way, we will have difficulties making 
progress. Reform is the second Chinese revolution. This is an 
important thing we must do, though we take risks in doing so" 
(p. 113). Clearly, he meant that though reform is a revolution, 
it is entirely different from the "continued revolution under 
the dictatorship of the proletariat" or the "Cultural 
Revolution" because it is not a simple continuation and 
extension of the past victorious revolution, but is "the second 
Chinese revolution." 
<H5>  IV. The Socialist Market Economy </H5>
  In a socialist society, in order to liberate the productive 
forces it is necessary to shake off the trammels of centralized 
state power and the all-inclusive planned economy. Deng 
Xiaoping said: "We have been practicing the planned economy, 
but many years of practice has taught us that the planned 
economy, in a sense, hindered the development of productive 
forces" (p. 148) 
  In the past, we used to equate the socialist economy with 
the 
planned economy. Some people believed that a socialist society 
can and must practice the planned economy. This has something 
to do with the misunderstanding of socialism. They believed 
that in a socialist society, because people have a high level of 
consciousness, they can predict in detail how the production and 
economic activities will proceed and can reflect this prediction 
in their plans. In fact, however, this is impossible. Man's 
high level of consciousness finds expression mainly in having a 
general understanding of the laws governing social development. 
It is impossible, however, for people to know every detail of 
social economic activities. If you obstinately want to work out 
such a plan and give it the power to control everything, you 
certainly will make the mistakes of subjectivism and 
bureaucratism. When every locality, social group, enterprise, 
economic entity, factory, or every person taking part in 
economic and productive activities is required to act strictly 
according to a unified plan formulated by the state, there is 
enthusiasm displayed only by the central government, and the 
enthusiasm of other social quarters is dampened. Clearly, this 
runs counter to the essential requirements of socialism. 
  Deng Xiaoping was fully aware of the shortcomings of the 
planned economy, and maintained that reform must serve to 
mobilize the enthusiasm of all quarters. He said: "We have 
formulated the opening-up and reform policies because our past 
lessons have taught us that the situation in which China is 
closed to international intercourse must be reversed, and that 
the people's enthusiasm must be aroused" (p. 224). He also 
said: "The goal of our economic reform -- to put it briefly -- 
is to enliven the domestic economy and open China to the outside 
world. Enlivening the domestic economy means lifting 
restrictions on the domestic economy and arousing the people's 
enthusiasm through opening up. As soon as restrictions on the 
rural economy were lifted, the enthusiasm of 800 million 
peasants was aroused. Likewise, the enthusiasm of enterprises 
and all social quarters in urban areas will be aroused as soon 
as restrictions on the urban economy are lifted" (p. 135). 
  Mao Zedong was also aware of the defects and mistakes of the 
Soviet Union's planned economy in 1956. At that time, he tabled 
a basic principle that every positive factor at home and abroad 
should be brought into play to serve the socialist cause. This 
basic principle is undoubtedly correct, but how should it be put 
into effect? Mao Zedong attempted to carry out this principle 
by political means, as shown by his later practice and theories 
-- such as "taking class struggle as the key link" and starting 
mass movements in a big way, which caused serious ramifications. 
In light of this lesson, at the central working conference held 
immediately before the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC 
Central Committee in 1978, in other words, at the outset of the 
reform, Deng Xiaoping said: "We must learn to manage the 
economy by economic means. If we know nothing about it, we 
should learn from those who know, and from the advanced 
management techniques created by foreign countries" 
(Collected Works of Deng Xiaoping--1975-1982, page 
140). 
  What are the economic means that can correct the mistakes of 
the planned economy? It is unlikely that such economic means 
will emerge from sheer imagination; we must seek them from 
historical experience in the cultural development of 
mankind. 
  Deng Xiaoping said: "In comparison with 
capitalism, the strong points of socialism (Note: Socialism here 
clearly refers to the socialism under which the planned economy 
prevails) are that it can coordinate all the activities of the 
nation like pieces in a chess game and can amass all resources 
to ensure that key projects will proceed as planned, while its 
shortcomings are that it is unable to make good use of the 
market to enliven the economy. How can we solve the problem 
concerning the relationship between the market and planning? A 
good solution will contribute to economic development; otherwise 
the economy will suffer" (pp. 16-17). In this speech, Deng 
Xiaoping took an analytical approach to the planned economy, 
instead of totalling negating it. While listing its strong 
points, he pointed out its basic shortcoming: Inability to 
enliven the economy, thus dampening enthusiasm of various social 
quarters. This speech was contained in one of the first 
articles in the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, in 
which Deng Xiaoping puts the market in an important place and 
attributes the stagnated economy to inappropriate utilization of 
the market. 
  People also used to equate the market economy with the 
capitalist economy, believing that the market economy can be 
practiced only in a capitalist society, and that practicing the 
market economy means restoring private ownership and capitalism. 
These concepts have been supported by several generations of 
Marxists, as well as by the capitalist media and academic 
circles in the Western world. In socialist society, negating 
commodities and the market economy and practicing the product 
economy controlled by the state plan were regarded as essential 
measures for rejecting capitalism. 
  Commodities and the market have existed in human society for 
a long time, and the argument that they did not appear until the 
capitalist society is untrue. However, it was the capitalist 
society, especially the fully fledged capitalist society, that 
made it possible for commodities to cover the whole society and 
thus form the market economy, and even the mature market 
economy. The developed market economy and its mechanism are the 
product of socialized mass production. Since socialist society 
builders plan to set up a brand new society on the basis of the 
civilization created by mankind throughout history, they must 
absorb all useful things left over by the capitalist society, 
including production technology, the mass production system, and 
of course, the market economy, which emerged along with the mass 
production system. Since socialist public ownership must be 
based on the developed socialized mass production, there is no 
reason socialist society cannot accommodate the market economy, 
which is related to socialized mass production. Many people 
used to believe that the market economy was unacceptable to a 
socialist society, so they misunderstood that the market economy 
was unique to capitalist society and that it was inseparable 
from privatization. They also believed that between public 
ownership and the market economy, meaning between socialism and 
the market economy, we could choose only one or the other. 
  Since the October revolution, the traditional concept of 
socialism, in general, has been that the market economy is 
incompatible with socialism. Apart from the reason that the 
founder of Marxism thought that future society would organize 
society-wide production and economic activities in a planned way 
and that there would be no commodity exchange, this is mainly 
because the principal countries practicing socialism, restricted 
by social and historical conditions, have not experienced the 
stage of developed capitalism. Before their respective 
revolutions, the market economy did not extend to the whole of 
society, and various mechanisms related to the market economy 
were immature. After the revolution, fairly great achievements 
were made under the planned economy. The reasons were: 1) 
These countries, taking advantage of the popular enthusiasm 
ignited during the revolution, used state power to enforce 
unified arrangements and unified allocations; and 2) The level 
of economic development of these countries at that time was low, 
the scale of construction small, and the economic structure 
simple. However, the popular enthusiasm could not play a role 
for a long time if new fuel was not added. With the economy 
growing to a new level and the economic structure becoming more 
complicated, there was a change in the social and economic 
situation which revealed more and more clearly the defects of 
the planned economy. Under these circumstances, if we did not 
carry out radical reform of the planned economy and if we 
refused to acknowledge the strong points of the market economy, 
economic contraction and political instability would ensue. 
  In the 20-year period since 1956, when China entered the 
socialist stage, we practiced the planned economy to the 
exclusion of the market economy. Facts, however, showed that 
commodities and the market cannot be annulled. Practice over 
the last 20 years indicated, however, that when we acknowledge 
commodity production and respect the law of value, our economy 
grows pretty well. Under the guidance of the "Left" 
deviationist ideology, efforts were made to reduce the scale of 
commodity production conducted by the small producers, such as 
changing the people's commune into a self-support unit, banning 
country markets, and changing the wage system into a free supply 
system. Facts have proved all these are impossible and can 
result only in retrogression. 
  The Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee 
held in late 1978 ushered Chinese economic development into a 
new period. In this new period, by initiating the economic 
reform, the area where the market regulation is brought into 
play has been expanded continuously, the function of the market 
mechanism has been strengthened, and the area where state 
planning -- especially mandatory planning -- holds sway has been 
reduced. Since we took these measures, the people's enthusiasm 
and initiative have been constantly brought into full play and 
the market mechanism has played an increasingly clear basic role 
in the allocation of resources. In short, we made achievements 
we could not have made under the planned economy. Naturally, 
changing the planned economy into a market economy will involve 
many difficulties, but the orientation has been defined and the 
path opened up. 
  While adhering to the principle of taking public ownership 
as the mainstay, we allow the development of other economic 
sectors, including the private sector, but we will not encourage 
privatization because of the setting up of a market economy. To 
develop a socialist market economy, we must adhere to the 
principle of taking public ownership as the mainstay and must 
bring the positive role of the market economy into full play so 
as to facilitate the development of socialist social productive 
forces. 
  The experience of capitalist countries practicing the market 
economy indicates that the state is not passive and inert in 
developing a market economy. On the contrary, capitalist 
countries also rely on macrocontrol to atone for the 
shortcomings and weaknesses of the market economy. To develop a 
market economy under the socialist system, a socialist country 
is in a better position to exercise macroeconomic control in the 
interests of the large numbers of laboring people and in the 
long-term interests of the social development because it has 
shaken off the arduous task of arranging economic activities at 
the microeconomic level -- a task beyond its ability. Of 
course, the state also will be able to focus on those projects 
regarding which it must pool national resources in order to 
achieve success. 
  In line with all this historical experience, Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping pointed out: "There is no fundamental contradiction 
between socialism and the market economy. What is at issue is 
what methods we can apply to more effectively develop productive 
forces" (p. 148). "Why do some people invariably say the market 
belongs to capitalism, while insisting that only planning 
represents socialism? Planning and the market are nothing but 
methods; as long as they can help develop productive forces, we 
can use them. When they serve socialism, they are socialism; 
when they serve capitalism, they are capitalism" (p. 203). 
These two remarks were made by Deng Xiaoping in 1985 and 1987, 
respectively. During his south China tour in 1992, he said 
again: "Whether the emphasis is on planning or on the market 
mechanism is not the essential distinction between socialism and 
capitalism. A planned economy is not socialism; there is 
planning under capitalism too. A market economy is not 
capitalism; there is market regulation under socialism too. 
Planning and market regulation are both means of controlling 
economic activity. In essence, the objective of socialism is to 
liberate and develop the productive forces, to eliminate 
exploitation and polarization, and ultimately to achieve common 
prosperity" (p. 373). 
  By advocating the breaking down of superstitions concerning 
the planned economy, as well as taboos against the market 
economy, and thereby affirming that a socialist society can 
utilize the market economy as an economic means and that to 
serve socialism a socialist society should use all experience of 
the market economy accumulated under the capitalist system which 
helps to develop socialized mass production and promote economic 
development and social progress, Comrade Deng Xiaoping made an 
extremely important contribution to the theory of socialism. 
(Written March-April, 1994) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26987 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Union Leader Says `Workers' Congress System' Necessary </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Union Leader Says `Workers' Congress System' Necessary </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906035594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0334 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906035594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shijiazhuang, June 29 (XINHUA) -- A trade union 
leader said here today that the workers' congress system should 
be adhered to, even as the state-owned enterprises are shifting 
their operational mechanisms in line with international 
practices. 
  Yang Xingfu, vice-chairman of the All-China Federation of 
Trade Unions (ACFTU), said that workers and staff members, as 
"masters of the state and state-owned enterprises", are in 
charge of state property, and shoulder the responsibility of 
preserving its value. 
  Yang was speaking at a national conference on trade unions 
held in this capital of north China's Hebei Province. 
  "Unlike workers in Western countries," he said, "Chinese 
workers can participate in the democratic management of 
state-owned enterprises through the workers' congress system 
with Chinese characteristics." 
  Yang said that workers' congresses have been set up in 
nearly 
all the state-owned enterprises, and the system is upheld in 
China's Constitution, the Enterprise Law, the Trade Union Law 
and the Corporate Law. 
  Yang claimed that the economic efficiency of state 
enterprises can be raised through workers' democratic 
involvement. 
  Of millions of proposals from the workers' congresses across 
the country every year, more than half concern production and 
business operations, according to the vice-chairman. 
  However, he lamented, "in some areas, the democratic 
involvement mechanism has not been beefed up in line with the 
autonomy rights gained by enterprises." 
  And the incidents of workers' rights being infringed upon by 
collectively owned enterprises are increasing, he noted. 
  He urged all parties to explore new ways to strengthen the 
role of the workers' congresses in the transitional period. 
  He stressed that state-owned enterprises, state-funded 
corporations and limited-liability companies funded by the state 
should improve their workers' congresses in accordance with the 
new Corporation Law and the Enterprise Law. 
  The rights of the congresses should include participation in 
the policy-making process concerning the development, production 
and operation of the enterprises. The congresses should have 
the right to examine salaries and bonuses, check safety measures 
and working conditions, and supervise the business operations of 
top executives. 
  Corporations should have workers' representatives on their 
boards of directors and boards of supervisors, Yang said. 
  Workers should account for one third of the members of the 
boards of directors and one third to half of the members of the 
boards of supervisors, he said. 
  Yang said foreign-funded enterprises should also make it a 
rule to let workers take part in their management, by 
establishing trade unions or labor-management committees. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26988 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Security Service Helps Safeguard Social Stability </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Security Service Helps Safeguard Social Stability </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906034994 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906034994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Ma Chenguang: "Nonpolice Personnel Help Keep the Peace"] </F>
  [Text] China's security service forces, a nine-year-old 
nonpolice group, have become an important aid to police in 
safeguarding social stability. 
  They are shouldering a large portion of security work at 
enterprises, government and financial organs, markets, railway 
stations, and airports, filling a gap left by the limited number 
of policemen. 
  During the past nine years, their work has shown effective 
results, said Gao Xu, the President of the China Security 
Association (CSA). 
  Gao was speaking at the close of a three-day conference in 
Beijing to mark the establishment of the CSA. 
  In Beijing, security workers from the Beijing Security 
Service Company act as guards for 2,278 clients. 
  Last year, these employees handled more than 1.1 million 
cases--involving 20,000 thefts or fights and caught 2,474 
offenders. 
  Gao says the CSA will help boost China's service force, 
which 
needs to be strengthened further. 
  The security service first appeared in 1985 to meet the 
changing domestic situation, which called for more security work 
in enterprises and government organs. The forces now have 
200,000 employees across the country, whereas the police team 
stands at about one million, Vice Minister of Public Security 
Mou Xinsheng said yesterday. 
  They are working at about 1,000 security service companies 
nationwide. 
  The security work mainly involves guarding gates, conducting 
patrols for them, and escorting bearers of money or valuable 
goods. 
  Also, they can be asked to safeguard exhibitions, sports, or 
enterprise activities and install security equipment at 
buildings, Mou said. 
  However, they are not allowed to own guns and batons or to 
act as bodyguards for individuals. 
  Before beginning their service, these guards usually receive 
training for one to three months at one of the service companies. 
  Beijing and Shanghai now have the largest teams of security 
workers. 
  Beijing has 23,000 security guards in 26 service companies 
while Shanghai has 20,300 in 25 companies, Mou said. 
  Security service companies get paid by the organizations 
that 
hire their guards. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26989 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Environmental Agency Organizes Three Gorges Survey </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Environmental Agency Organizes Three Gorges Survey </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806155194 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in English 1308 GMT 
28 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806155194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 28 (CNS) -- The National Environmental 
Protection Administration has recently organized renowned 
experts and leading officials to conduct surveys on 
environmental protection, water pollution and environmental 
administration in the Three Gorges area along the Yangtze River. 
  The survey group arrived in Yichang, Hebei Province on June 
24 where the Three Gorges Project is carried out. The group 
comprises scientific advisers from the Environment Committee of 
the State Council, academicians of the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences and those of the Chinese Academy of Engineering. The 
group heard briefing, paid inspection visits to the dam area of 
the Three Gorges, the new site of Zigui county town, the Maoping 
Brook and the Huangbo River. 
  The environmental protection work in the dam area 
includedinto the project is now undertaken by the Three Gorges 
Corporation. Environmental problems resulting from the great 
project mainly involve atmosphere pollution, water pollution, 
noise pollution, healthy state of persons affected by the 
project and public hygiene, abandoned wastes and solid wastes, 
all of which pose intensive and extensive impacts on environment 
of the construction area where the project is carried out. 
  Supervision of environmental quality in the construction 
area 
since the preparatory work for the project showed that water 
quality in the construction area along the mainstream section of 
the Yangtze River basically maintained a certain standard while 
quality of water resources from the water supply plant generally 
met the drinkable standard. Quality of atmosphere in the 
construction area was good while noise pollution there met the 
regulations of noise standard. Quality for other items were 
generally quite sound. As the project goes on, impacts on 
quality of environment in the construction area may appear to 
various extent. Necessary measures will be adopted in the 
course of the project including strengthening supervision of 
environment and prevention of pollution. Meanwhile, scientific 
research will be conducted and special groups required of the 
project be set up while legal guarantee will be offered in a bid 
to effectively reduce environmental pollution because of 
construction of the project. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26990 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   STREET Magazine Experiences Problems in Shenzhen </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    STREET Magazine Experiences Problems in Shenzhen </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906065994 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 29 Jun p 8 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906065994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Bruce Gilley] </F>
  [Text] China's Civil Affairs Ministry is trying to sort out 
a battle at one of its flagship propaganda publications in 
Shenzhen which has been accused of revealing sensitive 
information about political and social problems in large cities. 
In the maelstrom, one of China's best-known modern poets, who 
was working secretly for the publication, has been forced to 
flee to a remote part of the country. 
  Street Magazine, a monthly which began in Shenzhen in March, 
has been under pressure from city officials to reduce coverage 
of controversial issues such as discontent over urban renewal 
and the weakening ideological role of street committees in 
China. The Civil Affairs Ministry has praised the magazine's 
"serious style and high tone" and the Communist Party's 
mouthpiece, People's Daily, voiced its approval of the 
publication in mid-May. But complaints from provincial 
officials have flooded in. 
  The chief editor, Xu Hao had encouraged the magazine's more 
than 100 contributors to "find out things first hand" and often 
despatched staff reporters and photographers to cities 
throughout the country. 
  At a Shenzhen propaganda work meeting at the end of May, a 
deputy party secretary, Lin Zuji, called for a shake-up at the 
magazine, even though Beijing had not called for such a move. 
Xu Hao was sacked two weeks ago. Also purged was one of 
China's best-known underground poets, Meng Lang, who had worked 
for the magazine since the outset. 
  Meng, 32, fled from his native Shanghai in February after 
local police harassed him over his involvement in a U.S.-funded 
literary journal. 
  In early May, Shenzhen authorities sent to investigate the 
magazine discovered Meng's presence and reported it to Shanghai 
police. "He was warned that he was not welcome in Shenzhen, so 
he fled to Sichuan Province," a source said. Meng's sudden 
disappearance raised alarm in China's dissident circles, where 
many feared he had been arrested. The former factory engineer 
was jailed for six weeks in Shanghai in 1992 for his involvement 
in the banned quarterly Modern Chinese Poetry. 
  Recent moves suggest the Street Magazine mess could be 
sorted 
out soon. Senior party cadres in Beijing have now come to the 
aid of Xu, a respected propagandist who formerly ran the Shaanxi 
provincial party committee's theoretical journal. 
  Guangdong's civil affairs department, apparently on orders 
from Beijing, last week reprimanded Chen Yushan, head of the 
propaganda department of Shenzhen's Nanshan District where the 
magazine offices are situated, since he carried out the sacking. 
His plan to replace Xu with a deputy editor from Nanshan 
district's daily newspaper is now on hold. Shenzhen's chief of 
propaganda, Shao Hanqing, was also asked to explain her 
behaviour. 
  "The matter is now being discussed between Shenzhen and the 
central and provincial civil affairs authorities," one local 
source said. "The civil affairs ministry sees no problems with 
the magazine, so the hardline ideologues in provincial and local 
governments have no grounds for tightening control over it." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26991 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   RENMIN RIBAO Carries QIUSHI Table of Contents </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    RENMIN RIBAO Carries QIUSHI Table of Contents </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906094494 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 28 Jun 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906094494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Table of Contents for QIUSHI No 13, 1 July 1994"] </F>
  [Text] Article by Jiang Zemin: "Study, Study, and Study 
Again" 
  Article by Luo Haifan: "Comrade Deng Xiaoping Has Developed 
the Principle of Party Building by Stressing Ideological 
Improvement" 
  Article by Li Renshi: "The Improvement of Organizational 
Buildup Must Be Beneficial to Strengthening Party Leadership" 
  Commentator's article: "There Must Be New Ideas in 
Development" 
  Article by Mao Zhiyong: "We Must Resolutely Hold Firm to the 
Fundamental Issue of Agriculture" 
  Article by Zhu Lilan: "Science, Technology, and Socialist 
Economy--Feelings After Studying Volume 3 of the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping" 
  Article by Chen Zhili: "Education on Patriotism in Primary 
and Secondary Schools Must Be Ensured" 
  Article by Ma Chuanjing: "Discussing Opening Up in an 
Extraordinary Manner" 
  Article by Chen Peirui: "`Track Merging' Is Good 
Anyway--Superficial Views on Reforming This Year's University 
Enrollment System" 
  Article by Meng Fanshu: "The True Reappearance of the 
Shanghai Working Class' Heroic Style--On `Big Storm in Shanghai'" 
  Article by Yang Hongli: "Those Do Not Need To `Hurry to 
Officials for Help'" 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26992 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mayor Repeats Jiang's Comments on Shenzhen, Hong Kong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mayor Repeats Jiang's Comments on Shenzhen, Hong Kong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906034894 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0651 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906034894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenzhen, 27 Jun (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--A few days 
ago, at a conference of all the city's cadres at or above the 
departmental level, Shenzhen City Mayor Li Youwei conveyed Jiang 
Zemin's comments made on a visit to the city on six aspects of 
Shenzhen's relations with Hong Kong. 
  They are: One, utilization: utilize Hong Kong to help 
develop the city; two, reliance: rely on Hong Kong in moving 
toward the international community; three, taking reference: 
learn to do things according to Hong Kong and international 
conventions; four, making ties: establishing ties with Hong 
Kong and branching out in the hinterland; five, making 
distinctions: distinguishing between Hong Kong and one country, 
two systems; and six, convergence: converging with Hong Kong for 
mutual benefits. 
  Li Youwei said: As the "1997" Hong Kong's transition is 
drawing closer, Shenzhen will play an important role in ensuring 
a stable transition, smooth return, and long-term prosperity for 
Hong Kong Shenzhen is a socialist special economic zone, and at 
no time is it an extension or expansion of Hong Kong. We must 
be clear-headed and have a clear understanding of this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26993 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Democrats Oppose Amendment to Reform Bill </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Democrats Oppose Amendment to Reform Bill </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906030494 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
29 Jun 94 p 6 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906030494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Connie Law and So Lai-fun] </F>
  [Text] The United Democrats yesterday stepped up pressure 
on other legislators to vote against the conservative political 
model proposed by the Liberal Party. They lambasted the Liberal 
Party for seeking China's blessing for its proposal, saying that 
was an invitation for Beijing to interfere. "In the Liberal 
Party's proposals we see the face of naked self-interest," said 
Democrat chairman Martin Lee Chu-ming. Independents, whose 
votes will decide today's debate, "will surely be held 
accountable if Hong Kong's last efforts to have a modest measure 
of democracy are never to be realised", he said. 
  The plea came on the eve of the marathon debate on the 
second, and final, part of the political package proposed by 
Governor Chris Patten. The debate will start at 9 am and is 
expected to last until early tomorrow morning. 
  There was only a "very, very marginal" difference in the 
number of supporters and opponents of the Liberal Party's 
proposal, said member Henry Tang Ying-yen. He was"cautiously 
optimistic" the blueprint, widely known as the 1994 package, 
would be endorsed. 
  Sources said the party had secured 27 votes, while 26 would 
vote against it. Martin Barrow was said to have changed his 
position recently from supporting the 1994 package to 
abstaining. Jimmy McGregor was also said to have decided to 
abstain. Timothy Ha Wing-ho had made clear he would not support 
the proposal. The Liberal Party was trying to persuade him to 
abstain. 
  Hui Yin-fat was also said to be wavering between abstaining 
or opposing the Liberal Party's proposal. But Philip Choi 
Shing-kiu of the Hong Kong Social Workers' General Union last 
night said he would be extremely disappointed if Mr Hui, the 
social workers' representative, did anything other than oppose 
the conservative model. 
  Democrat leader Mr Lee said: "(The Liberal Party's proposal) 
would not be accepted even under former Governor Sir David 
Wilson's government. They believe that if Patten's proposal is 
carried into law, the liberals would sweep the elections and 
would form a majority and would cause instability to Hong Kong, 
which is of course a lie." 
  He called on six independents -- namely Roger Luk Koon-ho, 
Simon Ip Sik-on, Mr Barrow, Vincent Cheng Hoi-chuen, Mr Ha and 
Marvin Cheung Kin-tung -- to think twice before voting for the 
Liberal Party. They had indicated support for the Government's 
proposal in three debates. "They owe it to the people of Hong 
Kong, they owe it to history to explain (their change of 
position) on such a critical matter if they do so," Mr Lee said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26994 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Calls For `Maturity' in Legco Voting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Calls For `Maturity' in Legco Voting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906030594 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 
29 Jun 94 p 16 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906030594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "A Time For Maturity"] </F>
  [Text] As legislators steel themselves today for the 
longest single day's sitting in the history of the Legislative 
Council [Legco], they may take pride in the fact that it is also 
the most important. Today's vote is more than just a 
complicated procedure for determining the future shape of the 
territory's democratic institutions. It is a rite of passage 
for Hong Kong's developing democracy, a process enhanced by 
Britain and recognised by China's Basic Law. 
  In less than three years -- since the first directly elected 
members took the oath of office -- Legco has transformed itself 
from a rubber stamp to a body of pragmatic, shifting alliances, 
capable of effective, if not always constructive, opposition to 
government policies. Today, it has a chance to display maturity 
and responsibility. It is the moment to show it has not slipped 
the collar of one government just to clip on to the leash of 
another. A mature legislature is one that has the vision and 
courage to vote for what the public wants and believes in, no 
matter what Britain or China expect. 
  It is two years since Chris Patten began to listen to 
popular 
demand for more democracy and started work on his constitutional 
package. In that time, legislators have had the chance to work 
out what their constituents want and to develop a healthy 
scepticism about both British and Chinese intentions and 
justifications. They must now judge the competing proposals and 
amendments on their merits. 
  The Liberal Party's amendments have the attraction of 
appearing to conform more closely than Mr Patten's 1992 package 
to China's interpretation of the Basic Law. It is argued these 
"1994 proposals" would reduce the disruption to political life 
if China carried out its threat to dissolve all three tiers of 
elected government in 1997. This argument should be rejected, 
for the effect of the proposals would be to maximise the chances 
of Liberal candidates being elected to functional constituencies 
in 1995. 
<H5>  False guarantee </H5>
  The amendments offer no more than a token nod in the 
direction of the faster democratic development Hong Kong people 
consistently have shown they want but they give no greater 
guarantee of a smooth transition than the Patten package. 
Beijing's tacit support can be read in the decision of 
pro-China legislators to vote with the Liberals. But, come 
1997, the voting system for the directly elected seats is likely 
to be switched to whatever method with which China feels 
comfortable (the Preliminary Working Committee, for instance, 
has talked of proportional representation, which would return 
more pro-Beijing candidates). The functional constituencies 
might also be rejigged. 
  At the other end of the scale is Emily Lau Wai-hing's 
quixotic Bill calling for all 60 seats to be directly elected in 
1995. There is a respectable argument that since there is to be 
no through-train, Hong Kong may as well choose full democracy 
for the final 21 months of British rule. There is nothing in 
the Joint Declaration to prevent this and the Basic Law does not 
come into effect until 1997. The majority of Hong Kong people, 
however, would not favour such radicalism. 
<H5>  The sensible course </H5>
  It would re-ignite the conflict with China and jeopardise 
the 
cooperation on other issues at last beginning to resume in the 
Joint Liaison Group. Even by the British reading, the Bill is 
in conflict with the Basic Law. So, too, is Martin Lee 
Chu-ming's call for 10 more directly elected seats. Britain has 
gone out of its way to stay within the Basic Law, however 
controversial its interpretation. It would not wish to destroy 
its own arguments by abandoning any show of convergence with the 
post-1997 constitution. 
  Difficult though it may be for some legislators to accept, 
Mr 
Patten's modest attempt to broaden the franchise represents a 
sensible middle course. It is not a substitute for full 
democracy. But it would go some way to increasing Legco's 
representativeness while staying within the Basic Law as it 
might be read by a court operating within the British legal 
tradition. Hong Kong people would feel cheated if Legco adopted 
a package less democratic than the Basic Law. 
  The storm unleashed by Mr Patten's October 1992 proposals 
should not deflect legislators from their obligation to settle 
the conflict in favour of the people of Hong Kong. It is in 
China's interest as much as Hong Kong's to end the debilitating 
debate of the last two years and allow an executive-led 
administration and a newly mature Legco to get on with the 
business of running the territory's affairs for the remainder of 
British rule and preparing for the transfer of sovereignty. If 
they work well, the arrangements might seem less threatening and 
offensive to Beijing in 1997 than they do today. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26995 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Stresses Legco Reforms To Be Discarded </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Stresses Legco Reforms To Be Discarded </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806121094 Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese 28 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806121094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Chris Patten Stages Constitutional Reform </F>
Duets"] 
  [Text] Chris Patten, the last governor of Hong Kong, and 
some members of the Legislative Council [Legco] recently have 
given two-man comic shows. 
  Example one: Legco member Emily Lau Wai-hing claimed that 
Patten's constitutional reform package "is far from democracy," 
and tabled a private member's bill proposing a comprehensive 
direct election in 1995. In his article published on the eve of 
Legco's examining the constitutional reform package, Patten 
criticized Lau's bill, saying: "Can we put an end to the 
disputes by adopting Lau's bill? Is it true that the public 
needs an electoral arrangement that clearly runs counter to the 
Basic Law?" From this, a person of good sense knows immediately 
that Lau's bill serves only to clear the way for Legco to pass 
Patten's reform package because Lau told the public long ago 
that she would support the package. Rather than really 
criticizing Lau, Patten tried to make electoral arrangements in 
their interest by upholding the Basic Law. 
  Example two: Legco member Szeto Wah, from the United 
Democrats of Hong Kong (UDHK), put forward an unprecedented 
motion to criticize Patten, saying that the latter refused to 
approve Legco's amendment to the decision on rates, in 
contravention of the popular will. Szeto pointed out at the 
meeting that his motion is without parallel in history and 
possibly also in the future. What Szeto really seeks is for 
someone to follow his example in the future by criticizing those 
in power, rather than uniqueness of his motion in history. 
Patten, who understood the implication of Szeto's motion, 
immediately praised Szeto for his "criticism" at Legco's 
question-and-answer session, saying that "this represents a step 
forward toward democracy in a political society." Patten also 
"pledged that he would defend Legco's powers to criticize the 
government, or the governor, before and after 1997." Just as 
the drinker's heart is not in the cup, what Patten hopes is that 
the Hong Kong Government will be subject to criticism after 1997 
rather than before. 
  Example three: Early this year, Legco member Christine Lok 
Kung-wai distributed the draft "Access to Information Law" she 
had drawn up, claiming that after consultation, the draft law 
would be presented to Legco for examination as a private 
member's bill. The basic points of the draft law are: The 
government must keep the public aware of its documents, 
materials, information, and materials about individuals other 
than those which the government can really prove would undermine 
"Hong Kong's major interests" or "the public interests" if 
brought into the open; any resident is entitled to have free 
access to the government's information or make relevant 
inquiries; and the government should appoint a special 
information officer to whom the public can complain of any 
government department's refusal to bring its information to 
light. Recently, Patten decided to "reject" Lok's draft "Access 
to Information Law." Instead, the government will implement a 
comprehensive set of rules on access to information. In fact, 
however, the rules published by the government shows that it has 
incorporated in them the principal points of Lok's draft law, 
which will bring a major change to the operation of government 
departments. To prevent the rule's affecting its governance, 
the government decided that the rules should be tried out before 
they are put into effect in 1996. The government also said it 
does not rule out the possibility of passing the rules into law. 
Is it not very clear what this means? 
  Example four: Patten supports Legco's decision to examine 
the revised version of the "Public Security Ordinance," which 
has been revised in a manner reminiscent of the "Mass 
Organizations Ordinance" revision in 1992. At that time, the 
regulations on banning local mass organizations from 
establishing ties with political organizations abroad, as well 
as political organizations abroad setting up branches in Hong 
Kong, were deleted and the original system requiring mass 
organizations to register with the proper authorities was 
replaced by a system whereby mass organizations need only notify 
the government of their founding, thus weakening the 
government's administration of mass organizations. According to 
the revised "Public Security Ordinance," any mass organization 
need only notify the government of the rally or demonstration to 
be held, instead of applying for a license beforehand. This 
also will weaken the government's administration. This revision 
totally runs against Article 23 of the Basic Law, which 
"prohibits foreign political organizations or bodies from 
conducting political activities in the SAR (the Hong Kong 
Special Administrative Region) and prohibits political 
organizations or bodies of the SAR from establishing ties with 
foreign political organizations or bodies." This is a major 
issue of principle, while a number of Legco members from the 
UDHK criticized the government for making only a limited 
revision of the ordinance, saying the revision relaxing 
restrictions on demonstrations and rallies is "a trivial one." 
  In all these two-man comic shows, standing at the front of 
the stage were pro-British, anti-Chinese Legco members, and 
acting behind the scenes was Patten. Sometimes the two parties 
echoed each other; sometimes certain Legco members "hurled 
abuses" at Patten; and sometimes Patten "criticized" certain 
Legco members. Whatever they did was designed to support each 
other in directing their spearheads at their common target: the 
post-1997 SAR government and the Chinese Government. 
  It is clear to everyone that all the above activities 
suggest 
that the British side has stepped up its arrangements for reform 
of the political and legal systems. When it comes to the 
political system, the British side is trying to arrange for a 
number of pro- British, anti-Chinese elements to sit on the 
post-1997 Legco. Where the legal system is concerned, it is 
trying to revise or work out a set of ordinances to support the 
pro-British and anti-Chinese forces in their effort to make 
trouble in the SAR and in their struggle against the Chinese 
Government. 
  However, cheap tricks after all are worth nothing. No matter 
what tricks Patten is playing and will play, the last three-tier 
council under the British rule will be disbanded 30 June 1997, 
and the future SAR government certainly will not acknowledge 
ordinances that run counter to the Basic Law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26996 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Views Legco Political Reform Bill </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Views Legco Political Reform Bill </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906071794 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 29 Jun 94 
p 18 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906071794 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Exactly 110 years ago Ng Choy became the first 
Chinese member of the Legislative Council [Legco]. He had in 
fact been sitting in the chamber for the previous four years but 
was not officially appointed until 1884. It had taken almost 
half a century of British rule before one of the local people 
was considered suitable to have some say in government. 
  Today the members of the Legislative Council face an even 
more crucial choice on the extent of representative government 
considered suitable for Hong Kong. 
  Despite the rhetoric, they are faced with no more than a 
modest choice. Even the most radical proposal, Emily Lau's call 
for a fully elected legislature, falls far below the level of 
representative government which prevails in newly independent 
Eritrea, a country which has only recently emerged from a bloody 
civil war, leaving only the most basic infrastructure in place. 
  In Hong Kong, where modernity and the latest of everything 
is 
taken for granted, a fully elected legislature would not have 
executive powers and could not form a government. However this 
is of no more than academic interest because Lau's proposal, 
which has a great deal of public support, does not have the 
slightest chance of being accepted by the members of the 
legislature. 
  Instead there is a far more basic choice between a set of 
government proposals which, under the most generous 
interpretation, would give most of the voting population a 
chance to elect half the members and a set of proposals from the 
Liberal Party, which essentially confines universal suffrage to 
no more than a third of the seats up for election. 
  The most remarkable aspect of the debate over this issue is 
that there has been practically no discussion of the merits of 
the proposals but a great deal of talk about whether or not 
China will like the outcome of the debate. 
  Some of those joining the debate appear to have ignored 
China's often repeated position on the matter. The Chinese 
Government has clearly stated that it will not recognise the 
decision reached at today's Legco meeting because it does not 
recognise the authority of the legislature and believes that 
constitutional reform can only be decided in bilateral 
negotiations between Britain and China. 
  Despite this, some members of Legco, notably the Liberal 
Party, believe that the constitutional reforms can be shaped to 
meet China's requirements. This is a bit like trying to achieve 
semi pregnancy. If China is intent on simply dissolving the 
three tiers of government covered by the electoral arrangements, 
it will presumably do as it says. It will not half-or 
quarter-dissolve them in the same way that a pregnant woman will 
not half-or quarter-deliver a baby. 
  It may be, however, that China softens its position or 
decides to scrap the existing bodies and replace them with 
something very similar. The problem is that we are assured, by 
the very people trying to mould their proposals into Chinese 
shapes, that China will not change its policy and it is 
confrontational to expect the Chinese Government to do so. 
  Thus we are left with a decision to be taken on its merits. 
The real question that legislators should be asking is whether 
a higher or lower degree of representative government meets the 
aspirations of Hong Kong's people. 
  This may be considered as an oversimplistic approach. We 
would argue that the issue is essentially simple and should not 
be obscured by unnecessary sophistry. 
  However we cannot ignore the reaction of the new sovereign 
power. China has a perfect right to take a profound interest in 
Hong Kong's constitutional reform. The Basic Law, or 
mini-constitution for the post-1997 period, contains outline 
provision for the election of the three tiers of government. 
Sensibly the Basic Law drafters did not attempt to create an 
inflexible and highly detailed blueprint for the electoral 
system. It says that "the method for forming the Legislative 
Council shall be specified in the light of the actual situation 
in the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region". 
  This is a very flexible statement open to interpretation. At 
the moment China and her supporters are choosing to make the 
most conservative interpretation of the Basic Law. A more 
liberal interpretation may follow. But the Basic Law is clear 
on one point, a point contained in the Joint Declaration. At 
the outset the Basic Law states that the National People's 
Congress authorises the new government of Hong Kong "to exercise 
a high degree of autonomy and enjoy executive, legislative, and 
independent judicial power". 
  If there is a sliver of sincerity in this statement it must 
mean that Hong Kong will be given the right to determine many 
aspects of the way it is governed. 
  Legislators thus have a clear choice today. They can vote 
for what they believe to be right and just or they can vote 
along lines they believe will be acceptable to a power outside 
Hong Kong. The irony of the situation is that the fate of the 
electoral proposals resides in the votes of a handful of 
legislators who have been elected by nobody but hold office 
thanks to a system of colonial appointment which is about to be 
scrapped. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26997 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Unexpected Difficulty' Threatens Airport Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Unexpected Difficulty' Threatens Airport Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906035694 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 29 Jun 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906035694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Rain Ren] </F>
  [Text] An unexpected difficulty is threatening a 
Sino-British agreement on financing plans for the new airport, 
which officials had hoped to wind up tomorrow. This emerged 
during yesterday's talks between experts under the Joint Liaison 
Group [JLG]. 
  The problems follow Britain's refusal to include a specific 
undertaking in the agreement stating that $23 billion of 
borrowing for the project would be treated as corporate debt for 
which the post-1997 government would have no liability. 
  Britain refused to agree that the JLG airport committee 
monitor the administration and expenditure of the future airport 
authority -- a compromise offered by China after its earlier 
proposal for an independent cost-control body to be set up for 
this purpose. 
  Britain said such an idea would be against the spirit of the 
Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) which does not contain such a 
provision. 
  British negotiators proposed that the government provide 
more 
information to the airport committee, instead of giving the 
monitoring powers to the committee. 
  These problems emerged after experts from both sides began 
to 
draft the "basic agreement" after last Friday's airport 
committee meeting. 
  Both sides have agreed "in principle" to the government's 
latest financing proposals, which would allow the injection of 
government equity of $60.3bn and $23bn corporate borrowing by 
the future airport authority and the Mass Transit Railway 
Corporation [MTRC]. 
  It is believed Britain had previously assured China that 
only 
the airport authority and the MTRC would be responsible for the 
repayment of debt. 
  Britain has agreed that the basic agreement should be 
specific about a timetable indicating when the borrowing should 
be repaid by the two corporations. 
  Britain informed China earlier this week that it preferred 
not to be specific in the basic agreement about who should be 
responsible for the borrowing, leaving what China views as a 
grey area in the agreement. China promptly rejected this. 
  Under the basic agreement, there are two appendices about 
financial support for the airport authority and the MTRC which 
have been approved by China. 
  The amount of debt and the Special Administrative Region's 
responsibility for any borrowing has been China's main concern. 
  Hugh Davies, the head of the British negotiating team, said 
yesterday: "The Chinese take the view that the MOU's references 
to debt include debt entered into by the two corporations. That 
is not our view." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26998 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former XINHUA Official on Role </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Former XINHUA Official on Role </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906094894 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 29 Jun 94 
p 6, Part 3 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906094894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The special status of the Hong Kong branch of the 
NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY (XINHUA) is unique within the Chinese 
Government. Ostensibly, it is a local branch of the central NEW 
CHINA NEWS AGENCY, which is a top-level government department. 
Other local branches, such as those in Beijing and Shanghai, 
are also top level. But XINHUA is the same grade as the central 
branch, that is, both are ministries. 
  Apart from its news section, XINHUA has no subsidiary 
relationship with the central organisation. Its function 
corresponds only minimally to its name. 
  The Hong Kong Government and all other representative bodies 
of foreign governments in Hong Kong recognise XINHUA as the 
Chinese Government's chief representative in the territory. But 
it has no legal status, and has no diplomatic immunity. Its 
legal status is not as high as that of the Sino-British Joint 
Liaison Group [JLG] or of the Land Commission, or even of the 
Foreign Ministry's visa-issuing office. 
  The directors and deputy-director of those bodies are 
equivalent to the director of XINHUA. All three bodies enjoy 
the diplomatic immunity that XINHUA lacks. If XINHUA needs to 
purchase a car, it does so in the name of the JLG or the Land 
Commission in order to pay lower import tax. 
  XINHUA's unique circumstances are a product of Hong Kong's 
unusual history. When the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY organisation 
was established in Yanan (Shaanxi Province) during the Japanese 
occupation, it was openly an organisation of the Chinese 
Communist Party [CPC]. 
  When a branch was set up in Hong Kong in 1947, it was as a 
private organisation, with a corresponding legal status. When 
the PRC was established on October 1, 1949, the Chinese 
Government publicly announced that XINHUA was a national news 
agency (and at the same time was the news agency of the CPC). 
The Hong Kong Government did not recognise it as part of the 
national news agency, and even intended to close it down. 
  In 1949 and 1950 the Hong Kong Government made the growing 
power of leftists in Hong Kong a target, passing many new laws 
intended for use against them and even using laws to disband 
some leftist organisations. One of those laws was the Control 
of Publications Consolidation Ordinance. This ordinance 
required the re-registration of all news organisations in Hong 
Kong and payment of a deposit of $10,000, even for private 
organisations. 
  At the beginning of 1951, XINHUA registered in accordance 
with this law of the British Hong Kong Government but it 
registered as a national news agency. The British Hong Kong 
Government rejected this application on the grounds that XINHUA 
was originally registered as a private organisation. This was 
the reason the Hong Kong British Government gave for allowing 
Agence France-Presse to register as a national news agency, but 
rejecting registration of XINHUA. The intention was to close 
down XINHUA. 
  When XINHUA was established in 1947, the PRC was itself not 
yet established, so there was no possibility of it having 
national news agency status. When the PRC was established, the 
government officially announced that XINHUA was a national news 
agency and it naturally followed that XINHUA had the status of a 
national news agency. 
  The Chinese and British Governments did not have formal 
diplomatic relations at that time but the British Government 
announced that it recognised the PRC and the government in 
London had already recognised the London branch of XINHUA as a 
national news agency but the Hong Kong British Government still 
did not acknowledge this status for XINHUA. 
  In 1951, the news division of the Chinese Government and 
XINHUA issued a joint statement to clarify the status of XINHUA 
as a national news agency to counteract the intentions of the 
British Hong Kong Government. This conflict continued for 
nearly a year before it was resolved. In the meantime, Xinhua 
had made all the necessary preparations for being shut down. 
  In April 1951, the director, Huang Zuomei, sent me to Macao 
to establish a branch there. Huang's instructions to me were 
explicit: if the Hong Kong branch was closed down, the Macao 
branch should immediately be activated to take over work 
relating to Hong Kong. 
  When the Macao branch began operations, I was the only one 
working there. Later there were two people, but at no stage did 
the number exceed 15. Only in 1952, when the Hong Kong British 
Government could no longer continue to refuse recognition of 
XINHUA as a national news agency, was I able to shut down the 
Macao branch's operation and return to Hong Kong. 
  Even though the Hong Kong British Government was forced to 
recognise the official status of XINHUA, it used every means to 
ignore it. For a very long period, lasting nearly 20 years, the 
Hong Kong British Government would only assign a member of the 
police special branch to deal with XINHUA. This situation 
continued until the end of the 1960's when the political adviser 
was assigned to deal with XINHUA. 
  Right up until the early 1970's, the Hong Kong British 
Government still treated XINHUA as a mere news unit. When 
members of the royal family visited Hong Kong, the Hong Kong 
British Government refused to invite a XINHUA representative for 
an audience in his official capacity. 
  Only at the end of the 1970's did a Hong Kong governor meet 
the director of XINHUA, and take part in XINHUA's national day 
celebration. 
  Once XINHUA's official status was established, in 1956 Mao 
Zedong, monitoring the work in Hong Kong through Guangdong 
Province, recommended that the fullest possible use be made of 
XINHUA's status in Hong Kong. The Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Group was also transferred from Guangzhou to Hong Kong. Liang 
Weilin was appointed the director of XINHUA, and also the 
secretary-general of the CPC's (CCP) Hong Kong and Macao Working 
Group. 
  From the time that Chairman Mao began monitoring Hong Kong, 
the CPC's central leadership became increasingly well-informed 
about Hong Kong. 
  The preservation of Hong Kong's unique status would be of 
enormous benefit to China. In 1958, Zhou Enlai set the 
direction of the basic approach to Hong Kong: "In the long-term, 
aim for maximum utilisation." At the same time, Hong Kong's 
relationship with the mainland was becoming increasingly close. 
  Even though XINHUA had taken on the status of a national 
organisation, it was still a national organisation in the form 
of a news agency, and a news agency could not easily take on the 
official duties of a top-level government department. For this 
reason, beginning in the 1960's, the premier, Zhou Enlai, told 
the British Government that China hoped to have an official 
central government representative in Hong Kong. The British 
Government refused outright, saying it did not want a system of 
"two governors" to take root. 
  Apart from the development of closer relations between Hong 
Kong and the mainland, there were many issues that required 
official government discussions. For the Hong Kong Government 
simply to send a special branch official to communicate with 
XINHUA was plainly inadequate. 
  One example will illustrate the problem. Hong Kong people 
will remember that from the mid-1950's Hong Kong experienced 
frequent water shortages. Reservoirs were built one after 
another, each one larger than the last but, if there was not 
enough rain, the problem remained unsolved. Not only did the 
people's livelihood suffer but industry also lacked adequate 
water and the serious water shortage limited Hong Kong's 
industrial development. In 1962, the situation became so 
serious that water was only available for four hours every four 
days. 
  Looking back, it is clear that if the water shortage had not 
been solved through communal use of the Pearl River, Hong Kong's 
industrial development would have been impossible. At the end 
of the 1950's, the Hong Kong British Government agreed to talk 
with China about a plan to purchase water from the Pearl River. 
  Talk alone would not bring the water to Hong Kong. It had to 
come a long distance via engineering works through Shenzhen. 
Because the Hong Kong British Government lacked even the most 
basic communication channels with the Chinese Government, this 
plan, so crucial to Hong Kong, was delayed for several years. 
Only at the beginning of the 1960's did the Hong Kong British 
Government send an unofficial member of the Legislative Council, 
Chau Ling-nin, to seek out representatives of XINHUA. 
  The British trusted Chau Ling-nin, and he had a very high 
standing in society, but he was not an official of the Water 
Supplies Department and he was also quite advanced in years. 
  When he was sent to XINHUA to talk, he knew very little 
about 
the subject. He could not even clearly put across the message 
that the Hong Kong British Government had sent him to convey. 
The Hong Kong British Government had only given him basic 
information in writing, which he read out loud. Any reply from 
XINHUA to the Hong Kong British Government had to be sent in 
writing through him. 
  It became obvious that it would be impossible to continue in 
this manner beyond a few such talks but the Hong Kong British 
Government then sent a younger, unofficial member of the 
Legislative Council, Lee Ming-chak, in his place. This is what 
actually happened at that time. For this reason, not long after 
the talks on water supply were concluded in the mid 1960's, Zhou 
Enlai suggested to the British Government that a representative 
of the Chinese Government should be allowed to be posted in Hong 
Kong. 
  Zhou repeated this suggestion many times from the mid-1960's 
right until the early 1970's, spanning a period of nearly 10 
years. The British Government had no reason to refuse, but it 
counter-proposed that it hoped the Chinese Government would 
establish a consulate or embassy in Hong Kong. 
  This was clearly unacceptable to the Chinese Government 
because the Chinese Government's basic position was that Hong 
Kong was Chinese territory and the Chinese Government did not 
recognise the three "unequal treaties." This position had been 
stated worldwide since the establishment of the PRC. If the 
Chinese Government established a consulate or embassy in Hong 
Kong, it would be acknowledging Hong Kong as a foreign country, 
as a British colony, and thereby would be recognising the 
validity of the three "unequal treaties." 
  Even the old government of China under the Kuomintang had 
been unwilling to establish a consulate in Hong Kong. At that 
time its representative organisation was "the Office of Two 
Special Envoys from the Foreign Ministry Office in Hong Kong" 
headed by Guo Dehua. That organisation was disbanded at the end 
of 1949. 
  After the beginning of the 1970's, when Zhou Enlai again 
suggested that China establish a representative in Hong Kong and 
again was refused by the British Government, the subject was no 
longer raised between the two countries. 
  Having eliminated this form of official channel, the Hong 
Kong British Government continued to raise the status of XINHUA, 
in effect recognising it as the Chinese Government's channel for 
communication in Hong Kong and in that way solved the problem. 
Finally, the Chinese Government also tacitly conceded this 
point. That is how XINHUA's unique status came about. 
  In the 1980's, when the Chinese Government set out a 
timetable for resuming sovereignty over Hong Kong, and the 
mainland's reforms and open policies developed steadily, 
relations between Hong Kong and China developed to an 
unprecedented extent. Correspondingly, XINHUA as the Chinese 
Government's highest organisation in Hong Kong, also became 
increasingly important, and its operations became more diverse 
and all-encompassing. 
  XINHUA's relations with Hong Kong society and Hong Kong 
people naturally grew much closer. The Hong Kong British 
Government, representatives of foreign countries in Hong Kong, 
and people from all sectors of Hong Kong society, all recognise 
XINHUA without any doubt as China's highest representative body. 
  Few people understand how unique that status is. Most 
interesting is the question of the status XINHUA will hold three 
years from now, after 1997. This question has been discussed 
for some time within the local branch. 
  According to Annex 1 of the Sino-British Joint Declaration, 
the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region will come under the 
direct jurisdiction of China's central government. At that 
time, all its "ministers" can be in direct communication with 
the central government. Hong Kong's foreign relations and 
defence will be handled by the central government. 
  So, after 1997, there should be a bona fide foreign ministry 
office in Hong Kong and a military representative from the 
Defence Ministry. At that time, XINHUA will no longer need to 
exist under its current special status. It will revert to its 
ostensible and legal status. That is, it will be no more than a 
local branch of the central NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY, and carry out 
genuine news agency functions. 
  XINHUA at that time will perform the same functions as the 
existing office in Sharp Street West. At that time, XINHUA, by 
then in existence for exactly 50 years, will have fulfilled the 
role set out for it in history and its brilliance will dim. 
  Is that how it will be? I think that's how it should be. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-26999 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Ruihuan Addresses Agricultural Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Ruihuan Addresses Agricultural Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806133194 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0926 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806133194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Zhu Dongju (2612 0392 5468) and Sun Yong (1327 </F>
0516)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 27 Jun (XINHUA) -- The Eighth National 
Committee of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference [CPPCC] Standing Committee held its seventh meeting 
this morning at the CPPCC Hall. Agricultural issue topped 
today's agenda. 
  CPPCC Chairman Li Ruihuan presided over and spoke at the 
meeting. He said agriculture is the foundation of the national 
economy. In China, agriculture has a direct bearing on economic 
construction, people's life, social stability, and so forth. 
The broad masses of people show great concern about ways to 
solve the agricultural issue. The CPC Central Committee and the 
State Council also attach great importance to the agricultural 
issue and have called a number of meetings since last year to 
make important arrangements. As a political organization, the 
CPPCC should show concern for and attach importance to 
agriculture and suggest ways and means to solve agricultural 
problems. 
  Li Ruihuan said the CPPCC has made elaborate preparations 
after deciding on the meeting agenda. The CPPCC National 
Committee Office set up three inspection groups. Members of 
many special committees conducted special investigation and 
study. Provincial-level CPPCC organizations have also done a 
great deal of work. Li Ruihuan expressed the hope that comrades 
at the meeting would freely air their opinions, fulfill their 
duty of taking part in politics and in political discussion, and 
contribute to agricultural development. 
  State Councillor Chen Junsheng delivered a work report at 
the 
meeting on agricultural work. He said the situation of 
agriculture and rural economy at present is good as a whole. 
However, he called on all to see that in the course of the 
rapid development of the national economy and in the process of 
changing the economic system, new situation emerges in the 
development of agriculture and of rural economy. China is now 
faced with some issues which it cannot afford to ignore. The 
CPC Central Committee and the State Council have always attached 
great importance to the new situation and new problems. Both 
the CPC Central Committee and various levels of governments are 
adopting measures to solve those problems step by step. 
  He said agriculture has a direct bearing on the overall 
situation of the national economic development. It will be 
difficult to maintain the overall performance of the economy 
unless we take steps to guarantee the basic status of 
agriculture, to further enhance leadership over agricultural 
and rural work, and devote more energy solving existing problems 
in agriculture and in rural work. The CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council have repeatedly stressed the need to attach 
great importance to agriculture, called on localities and 
departments to enhance leadership over agriculture and rural 
work, and called for implementing measures to support and 
develop agriculture in actual work. 
  In conclusion, Chen Junsheng said: The CPPCC has always 
showed great concern for agriculture and rural work; it has 
enthusiastically advanced suggestions and ideas to develop 
agriculture, rural economy, and to build new, prosperous, and 
civilized socialist rural areas. I want to express sincere 
thanks on behalf of Premier Li Peng and the State Council. I 
also hope that the CPPCC members will continue to supervise and 
support our work, make even greater contributions to develop 
agriculture and to revitalize rural economy. 
  CPPCC Vice Chairmen Ye Xuanping, Wu Xuequan, Yang Rudai, 
Wang 
Zhaoguo, Ngapoi Ngawang Jigme, Seypidin Aze, Hong Xuezhi, Deng 
Zhaoxiang, Zhao Puchu, Qian Weichang, Hu Sheng, Qian Zhengying, 
Ding Guangxun, Sun Fuling, Henry Fok Ying-tung, Ma Man-kei, Zhu 
Guangya, Wang Guoquan; and Secretary General Zhu Xun attended 
the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27000 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wei Jianxing Discusses Trade Union Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wei Jianxing Discusses Trade Union Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806142594 Beijing Central Television Program One Network 
in Mandarin 1100 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806142594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing Central Television Program One Network 
in Mandarin 1100 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=105> Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "National News Hookup" program] </F>
  [Text] On 26 June, Wei Jianxing, member of the CPC Central 
Committee Political Bureau, member of the CPC Central Committee 
Secretariat, and president of the All-China Federation of Trade 
Unions [ACDTU], attended the third presidum meeting of the 12th 
ACFTU in Hebei. He stressed the need for those who are involved 
in trade union work to persist in arming themselves with Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory on building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics to guide trade union work. Wei Jianxing pointed 
out the need for those who are involved in trade union work to 
have a good understanding of the nation's general interests when 
engaging in trade union work. He called on all levels of trade 
unions organizations to concentrate their tasks on promoting the 
nation's general interests -- that is, seize the opportunity, 
deepen reform, open up wider, promote development, and maintain 
stability. He urged them to proceed from reality and to 
actively involve themselves in helping solve prominent problems 
which could affect reform, development, and stability. The 
prominent issues which have a direct bearing on the personal 
interests of staff members and workers, according to him, are 
employment, distribution, social security and establishment of 
trade unions at foreign-funded enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27001 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister on Plans To Boost Electric Power Generation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Minister on Plans To Boost Electric Power Generation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806142094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1404 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806142094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China plans to boost 
its electricity generating capacity by eight to nine percent 
over the upcoming seven years so as to meet the growing demand, 
said Shi Dazhen, minister of power industry. 
  Shi said China's power industry development will follow two 
steps: To increase the power generation capacity from 15 
million kw to 17 million kw from 1995 to 1997; to add over 20 
million kw to bring the total power generating capacity to 300 
million kw during the last three years of this century. 
  While boosting its power industry, shi said, China is ready 
to step up technological renovation and advancement of the 
electric power network to save more energy. 
  To ease the acute power shortages in many areas, China plans 
to transmit electricity to all Chinese counties so that over 95 
percent of the rural areas will use electricity and up to 1000 
counties will attain the national standards in rural 
electrification, Shi said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27002 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   First Company Law Affects 1.2 Million Companies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    First Company Law Affects 1.2 Million Companies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906030694 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906030694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Gao Jinan: "Corporate Law Guides Economy"] </F>
  [Text] Some 1.2 million companies now face the tough task 
of restructuring their business in line with the first Corporate 
Law which takes effect on Friday. 
  Adopted by the Standing Committee of the National People's 
Congress last December, it is seen as a key legislation on 
building a modern corporate system. 
  And the law will effect every company in China, said Bian 
Yaowu, of the Legislative Affairs Commission of the NPC Standing 
Committee. 
  He said existing companies will be scrutinized and the 
irregular ones will be given a period of time to regulate their 
practices and bring them under the norms of the law. 
  The State Council will decide on the time limit for the 
irregular companies to improve. 
  Bian did not disclose the number of the irregular companies 
in the country. He also did not give a clear answer whether the 
existing companies need to re-register. 
  The law, containing 11 chapters with 230 articles, oversees 
the establishment and organization of limited liability and 
shareholding companies, share issues and transfers, corporate 
bonds, corporate accounting, bankruptcy and mergers, foreign 
branches in China, and legal responsibility. 
  Bian said the law will provide a legal guarantee to all 
companies. And `company' in the law refers to limited liability 
and shareholding companies. 
  It also provides a legal basis for the State-owned 
enterprises to transform their operations and convert into 
companies. 
  Although a large percentage of state-owned enterprises will 
transform into companies, it is not a must for all state-owned 
enterprises to do so. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27003 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Increasing Numbers Trained in Property Appraisal </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Increasing Numbers Trained in Property Appraisal </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806134994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1255 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806134994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China is training more 
personnel in property appraisal to help the nation carry out 
reforms in state-owned enterprises and establish Sino-foreign 
joint ventures. 
  In the past few years, hundreds of seminars were held with 
instruction from overseas experts, including ones from the 
United States, Australia and Hong Kong. 
  Liu Lunan, deputy director of the Property Appraisal Center 
of the State Administration of State-Owned Property, said that 
these seminars and exchanges with noted foreign counterparts 
have effectively improved the Chinese appraisal level. 
  More than 1,600 property appraisal institutions have been 
founded in China, hiring over 26,700 professionals. About half 
of them have acquired middle or senior professional 
qualifications. 
  Liu said that these institutions have greatly reduced the 
property loss during the transfer of state-owned property and 
given help to reforms carried out in large state-owned 
enterprises. 
  Property appraisal, a new sector which only started six 
years 
ago in China, has been expanding rapidly, Liu said. 
  Most of the professionals have gradually acquired the theory 
and method of appraisal through practice in the past few years. 
Their work in a number of enterprises whose shares were listed 
abroad won praises from their overseas counterparts. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27004 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Reviews History of Opening Up </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Reviews History of Opening Up </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806194794 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 2131 
GMT 25 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806194794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by XINHUA reporters Li Shangzhi (2621 1424 1807), </F>
Zhu Youdi (2612 1635 2769), and Ma Kuijun (7456 7608 0689): "Go 
Toward the Pacific -- China's 15 Years of Opening Up"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 26 Jun (XINHUA) -- XINHUA Editor's note: 
China's opening policy has achieved remarkable results which 
have attracted worldwide attention. In opening itself up to the 
outside world, China has been taking the road of focusing on its 
coastal areas and gradually extending the policy to its 
hinterland. This is a correct decision and a correct measure 
which accords with China's national conditions and the laws 
governing economic development. At present, our opening up is 
facing a new situation, and the international and domestic 
situations are favorable to our opening up. We should sum up 
our expereinces and explore new ways to advance China's opening 
up to a new stage. [end of editor's note] 
  At the beginning of this century and the end of last 
century, 
then U.S. Secretary of State John Mohan [name as transliterated] 
drew an inference: "The Mediterranean is a sea of the past, the 
Atlantic is the ocean of the present, and the Pacific is the 
ocean of the future." 
  Nearly a century has passed. Now, whenever people turn on 
the television and read the newspapers in various areas of the 
world, they can feel the vitality of countries and regions on 
the Pacific rim; particularly they can feel how China, which is 
in the midst of reform and opening to the outside world, is 
marching from the depth of history toward the future, toward the 
new century. 
<H5>  The Call of the Pacific </H5>
  The shifting of the center of the world's economy toward the 
Pacific region began in the sixties of this century. 
  Rapid economy growth occurred in Japan, South Korea, 
Singapore, and China's Taiwan and Hong Kong regions. But at 
that time, Mainland China missed the opportunity for economic 
development. China's economy was still relatively closed and 
backward. 
  As soon as the "Great Cultural Revolution" ended, China 
felt, 
most sorrowfully, the urgency to open itself up and to develop 
economically. 
  At the CPC working conference held in the spring of 1979, a 
leading comrade of the Guangdong provincial party committee made 
a suggestion: We can take advantage of Guangdong being close to 
Hong Kong and Macao and begin opening up to the outside world. 
  With foresight, Comrade Deng Xiaoping supported this 
suggestion and also said: We can designate a piece of land and 
call it a special zone. Shaanxi-Gansu-Ningxia is a special 
zone, you know. It is better to run special zones. 
  As soon as the central working conference ended, a vice 
premier of the State Council led a work group to inspect 
Guangdong and Fujian Provinces. They discussed with the 
responsible comrades of the two provinces specific questions on 
setting up special zones. 
  In June of the same year, the Guangdong and Fujian 
provincial 
party committees wrote their respective reports in which they 
decided to designate areas in Guangdong's Shenzhen, Zhuhai, and 
Shantou and Fujian's Xiamen for running special export zones on 
a trial basis in line with the Comrade Deng Xiaoping's proposal. 
In the spring of the following year, the Central Committee held 
a meeting in Guangzhou, in which leaders of Guangdong and Fukien 
participated. At the meeting, the special export zones were 
officially named "special economic zones." 
  It was decided that the Shenzhen special zone would have an 
area of 327.5 square kilometers [km]; the Zhuhai special zone, 
6.18 square km; the Shantou special zone, 1.6 square km. In 
Xiamen, a beautiful coastal city, 2.5 square km were designated 
for its special economic zone. Today, not only have the areas 
of these special zones been expanded, but the entire Hainan 
Province has been designated as a special economic zone. 
Morever, the special economic zones and open cities and areas 
along the coast have formed an entirely new open economic 
pattern. Facing the Pacific, China's coastal areas have become 
areas with the greatest economic vitality and attraction on the 
continent in the East. 
  In constrast to the Atlantic's economic position, the 
Pacific remained silent for nearly a century. The "silence, 
which spanned the last century and this century," was finally 
broken thanks to China's reform and abrupt rise. 
  Going toward the Pacific -- this marks the beginning of a 
new 
era for China. 
<H5>  Drawing the Blueprint of the Opening Up of the Republic </H5>
  In early 1984, Comrade Deng Xiaoping arrived in Shenzhen, 
Zhuhai, and Xiamen to begin his first inspection of the coastal 
special economic zones. What he saw there was a flourishing 
scene of prosperity. 
  Comrade Xiaoping was able to take control of the trend of 
China's opening to the outside world because he viewed economic 
issues from a political perspective. 
  China was closed to the outside world for more than 300 
years, from the middle period of the Ming Dynasty to the Opium 
War. This brought for it poverty and backwardness. At present, 
there is spring everywhere when the East wind blows. With great 
interest, Comrade Deng Xiaoping inspected the Luohu commercial 
zone, which was under construction, visited a fishing village, 
and toured the China Aviation Technology Import-Export 
Corporation in Shenzhen... on the top floor of the National 
Trade Center, which had just gone into operation after 
completion, he viewed the lights from tens of thousands of home 
in Shenzhen and the meandering Shenzhen River. He looked far 
into the distance and saw Hong Kong through the mist. To people 
by his side, he said: "I saw it, I saw it clearly!" 
  In the dim light of night, China suffered more than 100 
years 
of humiliation, experiencing ups and downs and striving to move 
forward. This cannot but make people sigh with emotion. 
  At that time Comrade Deng Xiaoping said: In establishing 
special economic zones and pursuing the open policy, we should 
have a clear guiding principle -- that is, we should not retreat 
but open up to the outside world. He further made an overall 
important suggestion regarding China's opening up to the outside 
world. 
  A entirely new pattern of opening up to the outside world 
has 
taken shape in China: There is overall development of economic 
and trade relations between the hinterland and the surrounding 
countries, and opening up in the frontier regions has opened 
another door to the outside world; we have established five 
special economic zones, including Hainan Province; we have 
opened 14 coastal port cities and established 32 economic and 
technological development zones and 52 national new and high 
technology development zones in the open cities; after opening 
up the Chang Jiang Delta, the Zhu Jiang Delta, and the Triangle 
Area in Southern Fujian Province to the outside world, the 
entire coastal areas have been designated as areas open to the 
outside world; following this, opening up to the outside world 
has moved toward the hinterland along the Chang Jiang and the 
European-Asian Continental Bridge; some cities in the hinterland 
have successively opened up to the outside world; China has more 
than 900 cities and counties opening up to the outside world.... 
  The world-renowned opening up and development of Pudong, 
which has reached its peak in the nineties, stimulated the 
development of the economic belt along the Chang Jiang. 
  The following data can serve as a vivid history of the 
China's opening up to the outside world. 
  -- China's total import-export trade volume has increased 
from $20.64 billion in 1978 to $195.8 billion in 1993, an 
eight-fold increase, averaging 16.2 percent a year. In 1993 
China's total foreign trade volume ranked 11 in the world. 
China's total import- export volume has accounted for more than 
one-third of its gross national product. 
  -- China now ranks second in the world in using foreign 
capital. In the 15 years between 1979 and 1993, China approved 
174,000 foreign investment projects, with actual investment of 
$63.9 billion. Foreign businessmen who invested in China came 
from more than 120 countries and regions. Foreign investment in 
China has continued to surge upward. In the second investment 
upsurge, which occurred last year, China approved 83,000 foreign 
investment projects, with actual investment of $25.7 billion, up 
70.6 percent and 150 percent over 1992, respectively. 
  -- China's opening up to the outside world has shifted 
from one-way importation to two-way exchanges. A number of 
Chinese enterprises with strong financial strength have moved to 
set up enterprises overseas. By 1993, China's overseas 
enterprises numbered 4,497, with $5.16 billion invested by the 
Chinese side. They are located in more than 120 countries and 
regions. 
  Following the opening of its doors to the outside world, 
China, an ancient country, embraced with boldness of vision the 
tide of the century coming from the Pacific. China has become 
one of the most open countries in the world. 
<H5>  Reform and Opening Up: China's Second Revolution </H5>
  When economic and social prosperity, which once existed in 
the history of this ancient country of China, began to dwindle 
in the memory of the century, the resurgence of the world 
economy has finally come along with the tide of the Pacific. 
China is at the point where the regression of history, the 
replacement of one era by another, and reform and opening to the 
outside world converge. 
  When Comrade Xiaoping revisited Shenzhen in the spring of 
1992, he said: It is necessary to seize the opportunity. Now 
is the opportunity. Judging from international experiences, in 
some countries there have been periods of rapid development or 
phases of rapid development. At present, China's internal 
conditions are ripe, and the international environment is 
favorable. Morever, we can take advantage of the fact that in a 
socialist country, forces can be mobilized to do great things. 
In the long process of modernization in the days to come, it is 
necessary, and also possible, to bring about several phases of 
rapid development with high efficiency. We must have lofty 
aspirations and great ideals. 
  In 1949, the world pattern changed as a result of the 
Chinese 
revolution. Today, Deng Xiaoping has called China's reform and 
opening up to the outside world the second revolution. 
  With the passage of the last 15 years, a line has been 
clearly charted for the victory of China's second revolution by 
the developments in the various regions and industries. 
  Reform and opening up to the outside world have been written 
into the basic line of the CPC and thus have become the 
unchangeable basic national policy for building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics. 
  From 1979 to 1983, China started the building of special 
zones; from 1984, the year Xiaoping inspected the special zones 
for the first time, to 1988, the pattern of the opening up of 
China's coastal areas was basically formed; from the spring of 
1992, the time when Xiaoping inspected Shenzhen and Zhuhai for 
the second time, to the present, the third upsurge of opening up 
to the outside world emerged in the vast land of China. These 
are precisely the "three campaigns" of opening up to the outside 
world in which Comrade Deng Xiaoping seized the opportunity and 
directed the tens of millions of people throughout the country 
to participate. 
  It was precisely in one victory after another that rose in 
the new cities of Shenzhen, Zhuhai, and Pudong; it was these 
victories that led foreign corporations, such as Beijing Jeep, 
Shanghai Volkswagen, Siemens, Philips, and Bell, to settle in 
China; more than 4,000 Chinese enterprises have moved overseas, 
and 50 of them have issued stocks abroad.... 
  It was precisely in the course of difficult marches forward 
that the Chinese have discovered their own latent ability, have 
seen the brilliant light for the rejuvenation of an ancient 
civilization, and opened up a path that it must go down to make 
itself fit into the family of nations. 
  Now, the "relay baton" of reform and opening to the outside 
world has been passed on to the new generation of China's 
leaders. 
  At the 14th CPC National Congress, which was a congress of 
greatest historical significance, General Secretary of the CPC 
Central Committee Jiang Zemin declared: 
  -- Open up more areas to the outside world and form a 
multi-layered, multichannel, and multidirectional opening up 
pattern; 
  -- Accelerate the opening up of hinterland provinces and 
autonomous regions to the outside world; 
  -- With the opening and development of Pudong in Shanghai as 
the lead, futher open cities along the Chang Jiang to the 
outside world; 
  -- Efforts should be made to quickly build Shanghai into one 
of the world's economic, financial, and trading centers, so as 
to stimulate rapid economic development in the Chang Jiang Delta 
and in the Chang Jiang basin as a whole; 
  -- Accelerate the opening and development in Guangdong, 
Fujian, Hainan, and in areas around the rim of the Bohai. 
Efforts should be made to turn, in about 20 years, Guangdong 
and other localities with suitable conditions into China's areas 
which have basically attained modernization.... 
  Facing the Pacific, the Zhu Jiang, Chang Jiang, and Huang He 
are all responding mangnificently to the call of history. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27005 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   PBOC To Tighten Control Over Financial Dealings </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PBOC To Tighten Control Over Financial Dealings </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806162694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1553 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806162694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China is to take steps 
to tighten supervision and control over financial organizations 
in a bid to maintain financial order, according to a recent 
national conference. 
  The conference, held in Beijing from June 21-24, called on 
the People's Bank of China, the central bank, to tighten 
supervision and control over the operation of all financial 
institutions in order to ensure safe and effective operation of 
the financial system. 
  According to the meeting, although the People's Bank of 
China 
has done a great deal to rectify the financial order and 
strengthen supervision and control over financial institutions, 
there are still some problems. These included that some local 
governments and departments approved the establishment of 
financial institutions without authorization; some financial 
institutions have violated rules and regulations and overstepped 
their scope of businesses approved; there are also problems with 
regard to the registration of financial institutions as legal 
persons and in the management of increasing shares and capital. 
  The conference said that the establishment of any financial 
institution must have the approval of the People's Banks of 
China. It urged the People's Bank of China to take stock of the 
financial institutions established without proper authorization 
and solve the problem by deepening reforms. 
  It also called for efforts to formulate standards and 
examination and approval procedures for establishing financial 
institutions. 
  The conference stressed that the power of macro-regulation 
in 
the financial area must be in the hands of the central 
authorities and there should be wavering in this regard. 
  The conference drew particular attention to the supervision 
and control over trust and investment corporations, securities 
companies and other non-banking financial institutions to see 
that they operate according to law. 
  The conference urged the urban and rural credit cooperatives 
to persist in the orientation of serving private and collective 
sectors of the economy in urban and rural areas. They may also 
establish cooperative banks by pooling funds. 
  On the establishment of development cooperative banks, the 
conference said that there must be law first and such banks 
should be established in urban areas first and rural areas 
later. The cooperative banks should operate independently, 
responsible for their own profit and losses, exercising 
self-restraint and seeking development by themselves. Local 
governments are not allowed to interfere in their operations. 
  Vice-Premier Zhu Rongji, who is also governor of the 
People's 
Bank of China (PBC), was present at the conference and made an 
important speech. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27006 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   BOC Export Credit To Support Satellite Launchings </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    BOC Export Credit To Support Satellite Launchings </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906034494 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906034494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Ren Kan: "BOC Supports Satellite Launch With Export </F>
Credit"] 
  [Text] The Bank of China (BOC) yesterday fueled China's 
satellite launching industry by supplying seller credit to a 
large exporter. 
  The loan to China Great Wall Industry Corporation (CGWIC) 
represents the largest export credit ever issued by the bank, 
one of its officials said. 
  Although he declined to reveal the total, the amount exceeds 
the 660 million yuan ($75 million) credit made earlier to China 
Machinery Equipment Import and Export Corporation. 
  The official said the credit this time is intended to help 
the corporation launch satellites for overseas clients. 
  CGWIC is the country's only business organization with the 
exclusive government authorization to provide commercial launch 
services to foreign customers and handle international 
cooperation in space technology. 
  By the end of last year, the corporation had performed seven 
launch and piggy-back missions for foreign customers. 
  China's space officials announced earlier this year that the 
country will launch a total of 30 satellites for overseas 
clients before the year 2000. 
  A series of launch contracts is being honoured while more 
are 
being negotiated. 
  "The booming satellite-launch business needs more capital 
support from the bank," said an official with the corporation. 
  The Bank of China is the country's first financial 
institution to supply export credits. Its first such loan was 
issued in 1980. 
  As the country's major foreign exchange bank, the Bank of 
China has been paying great attention to supporting its export 
of capital products. 
  The bank official said his bank has concentrated capital to 
support the country's export of ships, aircraft, automobiles, 
equipment, and high-tech products. 
  The bank so far has supplied 13 billion yuan ($1.5 billion) 
in export credits to more than 300 projects, which have earned 
more than $6 billion in foreign exchange. 
  Meanwhile, the bank has signed five export import credits 
involving $160 million. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27007 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Daily Says Beijing Issues Investment Criteria </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Daily Says Beijing Issues Investment Criteria </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806114994 Tokyo KYODO in English 0916 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806114994 </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo KYODO </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 KYODO -- The Chinese Government has 
approved basic criteria for industrial projects eligible for 
fixed assets investment, a move aimed at further controlling 
credit in China's booming economy, a state newspaper reported 
Tuesday [28 June]. 
  According to the new regulations titled "the economic 
standards and scale of fixed assets investment projects," banks 
must now give loans and funding priorities to the industries 
listed by the State Council, the CHINA SECURITIES DAILY reported. 
  Such industries, after further approval of the State 
Council, 
or China's cabinet, will also be eligible to raise funds by 
issuing stocks and bonds, the paper said. 
  The first group of industries which will enjoy investment 
approval and priority include those involved in the production 
of refined oil, electrolytic copper and aluminum, polyamide and 
polyester fiber, ethylene and polyethylene fiber, video 
recorders, engines and motor vehicles, it said. 
  The industries listed by the State Council will be subject 
to 
change, the paper said, while it refrained from detailing what 
recourse healthy companies in other sectors of the economy can 
take to assure credit or investment funds. 
  The Chinese Government has largely blamed an overheated 
economy marked by high inflation, massive speculation, huge 
losses and giant profit taking on high fixed assets investment, 
which grew by an average of 75 percent between 1990-92 and 47 
percent last year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27008 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign-Funded Enterprises Cited for `Good Performance' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign-Funded Enterprises Cited for `Good Performance' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806112394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1104 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806112394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Over a thousand 
foreign-funded enterprises were cited here today for their good 
performance in 1993. 
  In a ceremony hosted by the China Association of 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises (CAFFE), the 1,235 companies were 
each awarded the title "well-performing foreign-funded 
enterprise". 
  Together they earned 9.276 billion U.S. dollars for the 
country last year, and turned in 14.67 billion rmb yuan of 
pre-tax profits. And 1076 of them gained over two million U.S. 
dollars each, with more than two million yuan of pre-tax profits. 
  An official of CAFFE said that by the end of last month, 
China had approved about 194,000 foreign-funded enterprises, 
with contracted capital of 254.7 billion U.S. dollars, and used 
investment of 72.4 billion U.S. dollars. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27009 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rules on Exporting Factory Quality Systems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rules on Exporting Factory Quality Systems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806013694 Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 8 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806013694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Measures on Controlling the Appraisal of Export Commodity </F>
Production Enterprises' Quality Systems"] 
  [Text] Concerning Printing and Circulating the 
"Methods for Controlling the Appraisal of Export Commodity 
Production Enterprise Quality Systems" 
  To all commodity inspection bureaus under direct central 
authorities: 
  Based on the requirements of work and with the intention of 
perfecting the rules and regulations for appraisal of the 
quality systems of export commodity production enterprises, this 
administration revised the "Methods for Controlling the 
Appraisal of Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality 
Systems" and, as a corresponding measure, drafted the 
"Procedures for Registering Organizations for Appraisal of 
Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality Systems" and 
"Procedures for Registering Appraisers of Export Commodity 
Production Enterprise Quality Systems" and is now releasing them 
for implementation. They supersede the original "Methods for 
Controlling Appraisal of Export Commodity Production Enterprise 
Quality Systems" and its implementation procedures. 28 April 
1984 
<H5>  Chapter One--General Provisions </H5>
  Article 1 These methods were formulated on the 
basis of the "PRC Import and Export Commodity Inspection Law" 
and its implementation procedures to promote the IS09000 
standard among export commodity production enterprises in our 
country and to strengthen control over appraisal of the quality 
systems of export commodity production enterprises. 
  Article 2 An appraisal of the quality system of an 
export commodity production enterprise refers to the activity of 
examining and scrutinizing by an appraisal organization such an 
enterprise according to the IS09000 standard or its equivalent, 
and the issuing by such an organization of a credential 
certifying that the quality system of the examined and 
scrutinized enterprise is up to standard requirements. 
  Article 3 The PRC State Administration for Import 
and Export Commodity Inspection (hereafter abbreviated as AIECI) 
centralizes appraisal of quality systems of export commodity 
production enterprises; the Export Commodity Production 
Enterprise Quality System (IS09000) Work Committee (hereafter 
abbreviated as Work Committee) is responsible for coordinating, 
supervising, guiding, and providing services for the task. 
<H5>  Chapter 2--Organization and Responsibilities </H5>
  Article 4 The duties for the AIECI in control over 
appraisals of export commodity production enterprise quality 
systems consist of: 
  (1) Formulating principles and policies for appraisal of 
such systems; 
  (2) In conjunction with the concerned State Council 
departments, setting up a quality system work committee with 
which to coordinate and supervise appraisals of these systems; 
  (3) Registering appraisal organizations and appraisers 
responsible for appraising such systems; 
  (4) Accepting and handling challenges or appeals filed by 
clients authorizing the appraisal or appraised enterprises on 
the findings of an appraisal organization, and referring such 
challenges or appeals to the Work Committee for investigation; 
  (5) Developing cooperation with its foreign counterparts and 
participating in international quality certification activities; 
  (6) Making available to the public a list of registered 
appraisal organizations, appraisers, and enterprises awarded the 
quality system appraisal certificates. 
  Article 5 Duties for the Work Committee 
  (1) Study, formulate, and arrange to implement methods and 
procedures for developing a quality system for export commodity 
production enterprises; provide consultancy service and 
training, and carry out appraisals in reference to relevant 
state policies and rules and regulations. 
  (2) Certify the qualifications of appraisal organizations 
responsible for appraising such systems. 
  (3) Carry out the supervision and inspection of registered 
appraisal organizations, appraisers, and enterprises which have 
passed quality system appraisals. 
  (4) Accept and handle challenges or appeals by clients 
authorizing the appraisal or an appraised enterprise on the 
findings of an appraisal organization, initiate investigations, 
and make final rulings. 
  (5) Centralize and coordinate foreign relations work 
concerning the appraisal of such systems; participate in 
international mutual recognition activities; and develop ties 
with related foreign organizations; 
  (6) Set appraisal fees for export commodity production 
enterprises and report the level of fees to concerned 
departments for approval. 
  Chapter 3--Appraisal Organizations and Appraisers 
  Article 6 Only export commodity production 
enterprise quality system appraisal organizations assessed and 
recognized by the Work Committee and registered with the AIECI 
can conduct said appraisals on quality systems in authorized 
areas. 
  Article 7 Only appraisers assessed and recognized 
by the Work Committee and registered with the AIECI are eligible 
for employment with appraisal organizations for quality system 
appraisals. 
  Article 8 The Quality System Committee assesses, 
grants recognition, supervises, and controls appraisal 
organizations and appraisers in accordance with the "Methods for 
Assessing and Recognizing Appraisal Organizations for the 
Quality Systems of Export Commodity Production Enterprises" and 
"Methods for Assessing and Recognizing Appraisers of the Quality 
Systems of Export Commodity Production Enterprises" and their 
implementation procedures. The AIECI will register appraisal 
organizations and appraisers according to the "Procedures for 
Registering Appraisal Organizations for the Quality Systems of 
Export Commodity Production Enterprises" and the "Procedures for 
Registering Appraisers of the Quality Systems of Export 
Commodity Production Enterprises." 
<H5>  Chapter 4--Quality System Appraisals </H5>
  Article 9 Enterprises manufacturing export 
commodities, units involved in foreign trade, and foreign 
manufacturers or their agents can, if they so wish or if 
required by foreign-trade contracts or foreign governments, 
petition appraisal organizations for quality system appraisals. 
  Article 10 Appraisal organizations should draw up 
detailed procedures for quality system appraisals in reference 
to these methods and related international standards; accept 
petitions and organize appraisal groups to examine, approve, and 
grant appraisal certificates to enterprise quality systems in 
accordance with the procedures; supervise and inspect 
enterprises thus certified; and handle related complaints. 
  Article 11 Enterprises awarded IS09001 and IS09002 
quality system certificates by appraisal organizations 
recognized by the Work Committee, can, while the certificates 
are valid, apply for quality approval certificates for related 
export commodities, permits granting exemption from product 
inspection, and commodity inspection identifications, all of 
which entitle them to exemption from inspection of their quality 
systems. 
<H5>  Chapter 5--Appendix </H5>
  Article 12 Violations of laws, administrative 
rules, and relevant stipulations are punishable in accordance 
with relevant laws, rules and regulations, and stipulations. 
  Article 13 Management and assessment staff 
responsible for appraisal work are subject to administrative 
discipline for neglect of duties, jobbery, and corruption; and 
to criminal proceedings by judicial organs if criminal elements 
are present. 
  Article 14 The interpretation of these measures 
lies with the AIECI. 
  Article 15 These measures go into effect on the 
day of their announcement. 
<H5>  "Procedures for Registering Organizations for the Appraisal </H5>
of Quality Systems of Export Commodity Production Enterprises" 
  Article 1 These procedures were formulated 
according to the "Methods for Controlling Appraisal of Export 
Commodity Production Enterprise Quality Systems" and "Methods 
for Assessing and Recognizing Organizations for the Appraisal of 
Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality Systems." 
  Article 2 Having been assessed and recognized by 
the Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality System Work 
Committee (hereafter shortened as Work Committee), appraisal 
organizations petitioning for appraisals (henceforth appraisal 
organizations) must be registered with the AIECI. 
  Article 3 With the notice of approval and 
recognition from the Work Committee, appraisal organizations may 
pay the routine supervision fee to the Work Committee general 
office; the AIECI will process the registration. It will issue 
an "Appraisal Organization Registration License" after signing 
endorsements on a "Form for Examination and Approval of the 
Qualifications of Quality System Appraisal Organizations." 
  Article 4 A registration license issued by the 
AIECI is valid for three years. Applications for extension upon 
expiry should be made in written form to the Work Committee 
general office six months before the expiry date. The office 
will issue a new registration license after reassessment done 
according to the requirements and terms of the "Procedures for 
Recognizing Appraisal Organizations" finds that the applicant is 
qualified. 
  Article 5 With the registration license, an export 
commodity production enterprise quality system appraisal 
organization can, while the license is valid, apply to the Work 
Committee general office for expanding if area of appraisal. 
The Work Committee general office will assess the application 
in accordance with the requirements and terms of the "Procedures 
for Recognizing Appraisal Organizations"; such assessments can 
also be combined with reassessment for continuing registration 
before the validity period expires. 
  Article 6 The AIECI will entrust the Work 
Committee with irregularly announcing the list of the names of 
export commodity production enterprise quality system appraisal 
organizations and provide information to the public on 
registered appraisal organizations. 
  Article 7 The Work Committee may order an 
appraisal organization to make improvements by a deadline, 
suspend its appraisal work, or notify the AIECI to revoke a 
registration license if it discovers during the supervision or 
routine inspection of a registered appraisal organization within 
the validity period one of the following situations: 
  (1) Relatively great changes in the basic conditions of the 
appraisal organization such that the organization no longer 
fulfills requirements set by the appraisal organization 
recognition methods; 
  (2) Knowing submission of an inaccurate appraisal report; 
  (3) Serious errors in appraisal activities leading to grave 
consequences. 
  Article 8 Interpretation of these procedures 
lies with the AIECI. 
  Article 9 These procedures come into effect on the 
day of their announcement. 
<H5>  "Procedures for Registering Appraisers Appraising the </H5>
Quality Systems of Export Commodity Production Enterprises" 
  Article 1 These procedures were formulated in 
accordance with the "Methods for Controlling the Appraisal of 
Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality Systems" and 
"Methods for Assessing and Recognizing Appraisers of Export 
Commodity Production Enterprise Quality Systems." 
  Article 2 Appraisers applying for export commodity 
production enterprise quality system appraisals (henceforth 
referred to as applicants) must, having gained recognition from 
the Export Commodity Production Enterprise Quality System Work 
Committee (henceforth as Work Committee), register with the 
AIECI. 
  Article 3 With notice of approval and recognition 
from the Work Committee general office, applicants may pay the 
Work Committee general office the routine inspection fee and 
approach the AIECI for registration. If approved, the AIECI 
will sign an endorsement on the "Appraiser Qualification 
Certificate," which will be issued to the applicant (applicants 
for temporary registration will not be issued a certificate) 
  Article 4 Registration is valid for three years. 
Applications for extension upon expiry, if so desired, should 
be made in written form to the Work Committee general office 
three months before expiry. The office will reassess 
applications according to the requirements and procedures of the 
"Methods for Recognizing Appraisers" and its implementation 
details. If found qualified, the certificate will remain valid 
for another three years. 
  Article 5 Within the valid registration period, a 
certified appraiser may submit a written application to the Work 
Committee general office for upgrading his professional 
appraisal status. The Work Committee general office will assess 
the parts pertaining to status upgrading in accordance with the 
requirements and conditions of the "Methods for Recognizing 
Appraisers" and its implementation procedures. Status upgrading 
assessment may be conducted in combination with extension 
reassessment before the valid period expires. 
  Article 6 The AIECI entrusts the Work Committee 
with making irregular announcements of lists of names of 
registered export commodity production enterprise quality system 
appraisers. 
  Article 7 The Work Committee general office may, 
with approval given by a coordinating committee-in-meeting, 
order an appraiser to make improvements by a deadline, suspend 
his appraisal work, or notify the AIECI to revoke his 
certificate if during supervision or inspections it discovers 
one of the following situations: 
  (1) Knowing submission an inaccurate appraisal report with 
the intention of gaining personal benefit; 
  (2) Commission of serious errors in appraisals leading to 
grave consequences; 
  (3) A weak sense of responsibility and incompetence in 
appraisal work. 
  Article 8 The interpretation of these procedures 
lies with the AIECI. 
  Article 9 These procedures come into effect on the 
day of their announcement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27010 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPPCC Advocates Boost for Farming </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPPCC Advocates Boost for Farming </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906030794 Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 28 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906030794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Sun Shangwu: "CPPCC Urges Better Rural Production"] </F>
  [Text] China's top advisory body yesterday called on its 
members to play an active role in the campaign to lift 
agricultural development. 
  All sectors must boost farming because it has a direct 
impact 
on the people's lives and social stability, said Li Ruihuan, 
Chairman of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference (CPPCC). 
  He told the opening session of the seventh meeting of the 
CPPCC Standing Committee that the Party and the State Council 
want solid agricultural growth this year. 
  "As the country's top advisory body, the CPPCC should pay 
close attention to the development of agriculture and offer good 
suggestions to solving problems in this sector," said Li. 
  State Councillor Chen Junsheng, who is now in charge of 
China's agriculture, yesterday reported that the rural economy 
is generally good -- there have been several successful 
harvests, the economy has made consistent and comprehensive 
achievements, and the living standards of farmers have also been 
improved. 
  However, he warned that some problems still haunt the 
agriculture sector, which cannot be ignored if the nation is to 
continue economic development and to readjust the economic 
system. 
  The problems include the imbalance in supply and demand of 
grain, uneven agricultural production among areas, gaps between 
cotton supply and demand, slow increases of farmers' income, 
rural unemployment, and disappearing cultivated land. 
  Farming has also been hindered by shortages of scientists 
and 
technicians, the decline of agriculture production in the 
coastal areas, and price hikes of farm production materials. 
  Chen said the government will push for more high yield, 
quality, and efficient agriculture. 
  Meanwhile, the government will give a specialized loan of 10 
billion yuan ($1.15 billion) to support the development of rural 
enterprises, boosting the agricultural modernization drive. 
  "Cooperation between rural enterprises in eastern and 
western 
areas must be expanded," he added. 
  The CPPCC has organized three inspection teams for three 
grain-producing provinces, including Anhui, Henan, and Shanxi, 
to investigate the agriculture situation there. 
  More than 200 CPPCC Standing Committee members will spend 
the 
five-day meeting in Beijing voicing their suggestions and 
opinions on the country's agriculture development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27011 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Project Raises Grain Output in Mountainous Areas </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Project Raises Grain Output in Mountainous Areas </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906095594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0945 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906095594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, June 29 (XINHUA) -- A major Chinese 
"food-and-clothing" project, launched five years ago, has made 
great strides in helping poor areas develop more profitable 
farming ways. 
  The Chinese Government launched the project in 1989 in 17 
provinces or autonomous regions, including Sichuan, Shanxi, 
Gansu, Inner Mongolia, Shaanxi, Ningxia, Hebei, Hubei, Hunan, 
Guizhou and Yunnan. 
  It is designed to help poor mountainous counties to apply a 
new farming technique: Growing hybrid maize with heat-retaining 
plastic sheets covering the ground. 
  The new farming technique was introduced from Japan in 1978 
by the Chinese Ministry of Agriculture. It helps to increase 
the temperature of the earth, keeps fertilizer in place and 
prevents soil erosion and water losses. The system has been 
dubbed "the white revolution" or "silver revolution," and it is 
highly suitable for cold mountain zones. 
  It has now been applied to more than 3.79 million hectares 
in 
483 counties, benefiting 33 million farmer households with a 
total of 135 million people. 
  The technique has raised the per hectare output of corn by 
2,511 kilograms, which represents a 56.4 kg increase in per 
capita grain output in the project areas. 
  "This white revolution has brought about a profound change 
in 
the cultivation mode in the mountain areas," an official of the 
Chinese Agriculture Ministry said. 
  In the past, only maize was grown in the fields, and now 
vegetables and wheat flourish there too. 
  The "food-and-clothing " project has not only helped 
villagers to solve their food problem, but also assisted them in 
learning and using advanced agricultural techniques, he said. 
  To help the project along, the Chinese Government sends 
agricultural scientists and technicians to the project areas to 
work with the local farmers. The necessary materials and 
equipments are also supplied. 
  By the end of last year, the project areas had also 
developed 
333,333 hectares of farmland for other cash crops, such as tea, 
fruit trees and walnut trees, and vegetable-growing. 
  The per capita annual income in the areas has reached 498 
yuan, 120 yuan more than in 1988. 
  People living below the poverty line in those areas have 
been 
cut to three million, from the previous seven million. 
  In the five years, more than 288,000 technical training 
courses have been held in the project areas. Some 36.01 million 
people have attended the courses. 
  The project has cost some 1.1 billion yuan (about 130 
million 
U.S. dollars). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27012 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vice Premier Zou Jiahua Meets Indian, Canadian Guests </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vice Premier Zou Jiahua Meets Indian, Canadian Guests </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806140894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1358 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806140894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-Premier 
Zou Jiahua met with Satish Sharma, Indian minister of state for 
petroleum and natural gas, and Andre Desmarais, president of the 
Power Corporation of Canada, on separate occasions here this 
afternoon. 
  Zou told the Indian guest that Sino-Indian ties have grown 
smoothly in recent years, and China will actively engage in 
cooperation with other countries, especially its neighbors. 
  He said the Chinese Government supports China's petroleum 
industry in its efforts to cooperate with foreign countries. 
  Zou noted that China adheres to two principles in such 
relations, namely, equality and mutual benefit, and long-term 
cooperation. 
  He hoped that Sino-Indian cooperation in the fields of oil 
and natural gas would develop without a hitch. 
  Sharma and his party, guests of the China National Petroleum 
and Gas Corporation, arrived in Beijing on June 26. 
  In his meeting with Desmarais and his party, Zou said China 
welcomes the Canadian Power Corporation to enter into 
cooperation with China in power, mining and other fields. 
  Desmarais and his party came to China at the invitation of 
the China International Trust and Investment Corporation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27013 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   NPC Vice Chairman Meets Tanzanian, Libyan Guests </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NPC Vice Chairman Meets Tanzanian, Libyan Guests </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906092994 Beijing XINHUA in English 0907 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906092994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chen muhua, 
vice-chairman of the Chinese national people's congress (NPC) 
standing committee, met here today respectively with Cleopa 
David Msuya, Tanzanian minister of industry and trade, and Fathi 
Shatwan, Libyan secretary for industry and minerals. 
  The guests from the two countries are here at the invitation 
of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27014 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Calls For Accelerated Talks on GATT Reentry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Calls For Accelerated Talks on GATT Reentry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906060694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0540 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906060694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Geneva, June 28 (XINHUA) -- China today called on 
the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) to speed up 
the talks on the resumption of its membership of the world trade 
body. 
  Gu Yongjiang, head of the Chinese delegation and 
vice-minister of foreign trade and economic cooperation, made 
the appeal at the 17th meeting of the GATT China team 
responsible for the talks. 
  In his speech at the meeting, which began here today, he 
said 
that since China applied for reentry eight years ago it has made 
great progress in its economic and foreign trade reforms. 
  "China has made a series of reforms on its own conditions to 
meet GATT demands." he added. "In some fields the Chinese 
markets are more open than some developed nations." 
  Gu said that after the 16th team meeting held in March this 
year a positive and constructive momentum emerged in the 
negotiations on the issue. 
  According to the Chinese foreign trade official progress has 
been made in the bilateral talks China held with some individual 
GATT member countries and those on cutting tariffs and 
non-tariffs. 
  "China's economic and foreign trade systems have further 
conformed to the international ones." Gu said adding that China 
abolished tariffs on 208 kinds of import commodities from the 
beginning of this month. [sentence as received] 
  He said China would further cut tariffs by negotiations with 
the GATT members concerned but stressed that as a developing 
nation it can only fulfill the obligations taking into account 
current economic conditions. 
  Gu said GATT's conditions for China's reinstatement should 
help perfect the Chinese market economy, promote China's social 
stabilities and economic steady growth, thus making China's 
markets more open to the world and beneficial to a large number 
of the GATT member nations. 
  The four-day meeting is discussing the protocol articles on 
China's reentry. 
  On Tuesday [28 June] Long Yongtu, secretary general of the 
Chinese delegation and assistant to Chinese foreign trade and 
economic cooperation minister, complained that the articles are 
burdensome for China's current economic capabilities and 
therefore unacceptable. 
  He pointed out that although China attaches importance to 
the 
resumption of its founding membership in the world trade body, 
it has other important things to do. 
  Long expressed his hope that all the parties involved in the 
talks act fairly and realistically in the discussions on the 
protocol articles. 
  During the meeting the Chinese delegation will also hold 
separate consultations with the United States, the European 
Union and Japan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27015 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Clinton, Chilean President Discuss Trade, NAFTA </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Clinton, Chilean President Discuss Trade, NAFTA </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906054494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0522 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906054494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Santiago, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Improved trade and 
Chile's intended support for the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA) were the main topics at a meeting between 
Chilean President Eduardo Frei and U.S. President Bill Clinton 
in Washington today. 
  After the White House session Clinton told reporters that 
Chile's success in handling democracy and its economic growth 
made it a potentially important trading partner with the U.S. 
  During talks with U.S. businessmen this morning, President 
Frei emphasized that any future negotiations about a free trade 
agreement with the United States or whether Chile plans to join 
NAFTA, will be considered taking into account the country's 
strategy for increasing investment and developing exports. 
  Clinton, meanwhile, said that it was most important for the 
U.S. Congress to approve the development of relations with Chile 
so that the negotiations for NAFTA membership can be speeded up. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27016 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   XINHUA `News Analysis' on Upcoming G-7 Summit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    XINHUA `News Analysis' on Upcoming G-7 Summit </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806210094 Beijing XINHUA in English 2025 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806210094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["News Analysis" by Wang Nan: "What To Expect From G-7 </F>
Summit?"] 
  [Text] Washington, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The annual summit of 
the Group of Seven industrialized countries next month will be 
the first such meeting in four years when all of the seven 
nations are experiencing positive economic growth. 
  Although such summits rarely accomplished miracles, the 
leaders gathering in Naples, Italy, on July 8-10 are expected to 
reassure the world with promises of cooperation in dealing with 
currency market turmoil. 
  The leaders of the U.S., Japan, Germany, France, Italy, 
Britain, and Canada will also have a chance to underscore their 
commitment to implement the Uruguay Round agreement, observers 
said. 
  The meeting comes at a time of cautious pride for the G-7 
nations, when each of them has brought inflation at below three 
percent and some, like the U.S. and Canada, are enjoying robust 
economic growth. 
  There are underlying concerns. The jobless rate in Western 
Europe is hovering at between 11 and 12 percent. Current 
account and trade imbalances are big worries for Washington. 
Japan's economy stays flat. 
  "There is a law that tends to govern the summit process, the 
law of unintended crises. This time, clearly, is the 
difficulties of the dollar," said Robert Hormats, vice chairman 
of Goldman Sachs International. 
  The dollar hit a historic low last Tuesday, its worth less 
than 100 Japanese yen. Government interventions by major 
industrial nations, which own two thirds of the world gross 
national products, have largely failed. 
  The Clinton administration, which stressed that it did not 
intend to use the dollar as an instrument to cut U.S. trade 
deficit, still has a long way to go to eliminate such concerns 
in the markets. 
  While dumping the issue of dollar decline is impossible at 
the summit, the leaders have to walk a fine line between 
recognizing the importance of this issue and avoiding raising 
expectations too high, observers said. 
  Summit participants are not central bankers. And if they 
cannot deliver, the markets, hoping high for breakthroughs on 
currencies and macroeconomic policies, will be disappointed and 
bring in new volatility. 
  Although U.S. Federal Reserve is not considering 
intervention 
before things get worse, it can raise interest rates in 
coordination with the Bundesbank and the Bank of Japan for 
market stability. 
  Is it possible? "They'll talk about intervention, but I 
doubt 
that we'd see a coordinated interest rates changes coming out of 
this summit," said C. Michael Aho, senior international 
economist at Prudential Securities. 
  While the Clinton administration still shows considerable 
interests in the reforms in Russia and other former Soviet Union 
republics, aid is clearly not a priority concern for the White 
House now. 
  Russian President Boris Yeltsin, who is scheduled to attend 
the summit, will not see new big aid sums under discussion. 
Moscow was promised with 43.4 billion dollars of aid at last 
year's G-7 summit in Tokyo. 
  Without U.S. leadership, noted Robert Legvoid, a political 
scientist at Columbia University, "I don't think other members 
of the G-7 know how to get their act together in terms of the 
industrialized West dealing with Russia." 
  The meeting is also a follow-up to the G-7 jobs summit held 
in March in Detroit, Michigan, although until today, there is no 
money or deadlines attached to the jobs proportion of the summit 
agenda. 
  "This was an overall rubric that had to do with 
macroeconomic 
stimulation, deregulation, renewed commitment to free trade," 
said Robert Stokes, director of the International Trade Project 
for the Council on Foreign Relations. 
  The summit, the 20th of its kind since 1975, also provides 
the leaders, both the new and old faces, a chance to reflect on 
the summit process. It is a kick-off for Cairo's U.N. 
Conference on Population. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27017 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Situation in DPRK, Cambodia, Rwanda </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Views Situation in DPRK, Cambodia, Rwanda </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806113494 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in 
Chinese 24 Jun 94 p 6 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806113494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Shi Jia (2514 0163): "Weekly Commentary on Current </F>
Events"] 
  [Text] New Hope for Solution to the Korea Nuclear 
Issue 
  U.S. President Clinton on 20 June said he saw "indications 
of 
hope" to avoid a conflict from erupting due to the DPRK nuclear 
program. The U.S. Department of State announced that the United 
States would be ready to start a third round of talks with the 
DPRK as soon as the DPRK froze its nuclear program. On 22 June, 
Clinton made another announcement: the United States would hold 
a new round of talks with the DPRK in Geneva. Meanwhile, DPRK 
President Kim Il-song proposed a summit between North and South 
Korea, and ROK President Kim Yong-sam immediately responded to 
his offer. Now the two sides are discussing arrangements for 
the summit. All these developments indicate that the DPRK 
nuclear issue, which has dragged on for several months, has now 
arrived at an important turning point. 
  The basic approach to the settlement of the DPRK nuclear 
issue is by holding dialogue rather than by exerting pressure. 
Whenever it faces a new crisis, the United States always 
resorts to such coercive means as exerting political pressure 
and imposing economic sanctions. Such measures will not bring a 
solution to the problem but will further aggravate the crisis. 
  Nowadays, as the Cold War has already ended, power politics 
has become still more unpopular in the world. People of insight 
in the United States, those in opposition or in office alike, 
have spoken unfavorably of this practice. Former U.S. President 
Carter, who makes nothing of hardship, has shuttled between 
Pyongyang and Seoul and mediated between the DPRK and the United 
States. His efforts have helped enhance mutual understanding 
between all of the parties, eased the hostile atmosphere, and 
paved the way for a political solution to the DPRK nuclear 
issue. It is hoped that all the parties involved will keep 
working in this direction, on an equal footing, and in a 
realistic and calm attitude. 
<H5>  Setback in the Reconciliation Process in Cambodia </H5>
  After the Cambodia roundtable conference for peace and 
national reconciliation in Phnom Penh broke down on 16 June, the 
government of the Kingdom of Cambodia asked Democratic Kampuchea 
[Khmer Rouge] to close its representative office in Phnom Penh. 
All the staff of the Democratic Kampuchean representative 
office left Phnom Penh on 20 June and returned to zones 
controlled by Democratic Kampuchea via Bangkok. Meanwhile, the 
battle has burst out again between government troops and 
Democratic Kampuchean troops. The United States has sent two 
military delegations to Cambodia and has agreed to consider 
extending military aid to the Cambodian Government. 
  The bloody conflict between the two sides has already caused 
severe losses in lives and property over the past several 
months. Furthermore, wars have caused price hikes as well as 
decreasing trade. Consequently, foreign investors are planning 
to pull out, and the country's economic reconstruction process 
will hardly be able to carry on smoothly. The Cambodian people, 
who have endured untold suffering, are very worried about the 
deteriorating situation. Even some government ministers object 
to giving up efforts for a political settlement. To be sure, 
there are still great obstacles in the way of national 
reconciliation in Cambodia, but, after all, this is the only way 
out for peace and reconstruction in this country. All the 
parties concerned should set store by national interests and 
return to the negotiating table. 
<H5>  Why Does France Send Troops to Rwanda </H5>
  At France's request, the Security Council, after several 
days' of discussion, adopted a resolution on 22 June by 10 votes 
with five abstentions, which authorizes France to dispatch a 
2,000-strong force to Rwanda to protect civilians and refugees 
threatened by war. French Minister of Defense Francois Leotard 
later announced that France would start its military 
intervention in Rwanda in the early morning of 23 June, with 
2,500 servicemen, 500 military vehicles, and 40 airplanes sent 
to the country. 
  So far, the war in Rwanda has caused several hundred 
thousand 
people to die and has left millions homeless. However, in view 
of the failure of the peace-keeping mission in Somali, the West 
is now extremely cautious about military intervention. France 
has maintained close economic and military ties with the Rwandan 
Government in recent years. France's purpose in sending troops 
to Rwanda at this moment is to show people that "France is 
playing an important role in Africa." The Organization of 
African Unity summit recently adopted a resolution on Rwanda, 
but some African countries which agreed to send troops to Rwanda 
do not have the means to carry out the mission. This being the 
case, the timing of the French mission is a well though out 
decision. As France has limited resources and to minimize the 
risk, France has called this mission a limited "humanitarian 
rescue operation." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27018 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_a_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Diplomatic Successes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Views Diplomatic Successes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806123694 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0522 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2806123694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Roundup" by reporter Wen Jihua (2429 4949 5478): "China </F>
Reaped Rich Diplomatic Results in First Half of This Year"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 27 Jun (XINHUA) -- This afternoon, a 
military band again played stirring songs to welcome the guests 
in the square outside the East Gate of the Great Hall of the 
People. Here, President Jiang Zemin presided over a ceremony to 
solemnly welcome Casam Uteem, president of Mauritius from Africa. 
  This marks the sixth time this month that People's 
Liberation 
Army's Honor Guard was reviewed by a foreign head of state. In 
the first half of this year, they were reviewed by 26 foreign 
heads of state including a South Korean President, French 
Premier, Egytian President, and Russian Premier. The high 
frequency of the military honor guard's appearance in front of 
the Great Hall of the People is indeed rare in history. Seen 
from another perspective, this reflects the bustling scene on 
the Beijing diplomatic stage. 
  At the same time, Chinese leaders make frequent foreign 
visits; their footprints can be found in every corner of the 
world. Starting from 29 June, Premier Li Peng will make official 
visits to Austria, Germany, and Romania, thus marking the sixth 
foreign visit of the Chinese high-level leaders this year. 
  A peaceful international environment is an important 
external 
condition for China which is now engaged in the modernization 
construction. And one of the important programs of China's 
opening up to the outside world is to attract foreign funds, 
technologies, and advanced management experience via cooperation 
with foreign countries. Developing diplomatic, economic, 
scientific, technological, and cultural relationship with 
countries in the world on the basis of the five principles of 
peaceful coexistence is in line with China's intermediate and 
long-term interests. For that end, China vigorously explores 
room for diplomatic maneuver and develops an omnidirectional 
diplomacy. 
  Obviously, China has always given top priority to its 
diplomacy on consolidating and expanding the good-neighborly 
relationship with neighboring countries. At present, it has 
succeeded in developing a harmonious and peaceful environment 
with neiggboring countries. Its relations with peripheral 
countries have entered the best period in history. Since the 
beginning of this year, Beijing has received Azerbaijani 
President Aliyev, who made his first trip to China, and Russian 
Premier Chernomyrdin. Premier Li Peng visited four central 
Asian countries and Mongolia and signed the Sino-Kazakh border 
agreement and the Sino-Mongolian friendship and cooperation 
treaty which are of historical significance. 
  Constant exchange of high-level visits has been the salient 
feature this year in the development of relations between China 
and European countries. Presidents of Romania and Estonia and 
premiers of Slovakia, Finland, France, and Portugal visited 
China one after another. Qiao Shi, chairman of the National 
People's Congress Standing Committee, and Li Ruihuan, chairman 
of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, 
visited eight European nations. An excellent political 
relationship creates a favorable condition for both sides in 
developing mutually beneficial economic, trading, scientific, 
and technological cooperation. China maintains a strong 
development momentum with Western Europe in the area of economic 
and trade cooperation. After experiencing a certain period of 
sluggish growth, the economic and trade relationship with 
countries in Eastern Europe has been restored and enhanced. 
  Also, in the first few months of this year, China achieved 
new progress in its relations with Latin American countries. A 
CPC Central Committee delegation headed by Hu Jintao, member of 
the CPC Central Committee Political Bureau Standing Committee, 
visited Uruguay, Argentina, and Brazil. Presidents of Ecuador, 
Suriname, and Peru visited China. Canadian Governor's visit to 
China marked the full normalization of relations between the two 
countries. The Canadian prime minister is expected to visit 
Beijing this year. 
  Sino-U.S. relations have lately maintained the momentum of 
improvement and development. U.S. Treasury Secretary Bentsen 
and Secretary of State Christopher, senior U.S. Government 
officials, and congressmen visited China. China's Vice Premier 
Zou Jiahua, State Councillor Song Jian, Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation Minister Wu Yi were invited to visit the 
United States. The Sino-U.S. Economic Joint Commission, the 
Sino-U.S. Commerce and Trade Joint Commission, and the Sino-U.S. 
Science and Technology Joint Commission resumed their work. At 
end of May, President Clinton announced the extension of the 
most-favored-nation [MFN] status to China and said that in the 
future the United States would delink the human rights issue 
from the MFN status when making annual review of the extension 
of the MFN. This decision has created a favorable condition for 
further enhancing and expanding economic and trade cooperation 
and promoting the improvement and development of relations 
between the two countries. 
  Lately, China's solidarity and cooperation with African 
countries has been further consolidated. At the beginning of 
this year, China restored diplomatic relations with Lesotho. 
The end of the apartheid system in South Africa and the birth 
of a new South Africa have created an excellent condition for 
China to establish and develop friendly and cooperative 
relations with South Africa. 
  In addition, China also vigororously pursues a multilateral 
diplomacy and strives to increase cooperation with other 
countries at the United Nations and at other international 
organizations. At the United Nations Human Rights Committee's 
50th annual session held last March, China, together with 
countries which stand for justice and which support China, again 
thwarted a small minority of Western countries' attempt to 
interfere in China's internal affairs on the pretext of human 
rights issue. This showed China's solidarity and cooperation 
with a vast number of devleoping countries. 
  At present, Beijing is busy preparing for the successful 
hosting of the Fourth World Women's Congress. Following the 
signing of a package agreement of the Uruguay Round, China is 
making unremitting efforts to attain the goal of becoming the 
founding member country of the World Trade Organization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27019 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reports on Creation of Clinton Legal Defense Fund </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reports on Creation of Clinton Legal Defense Fund </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906061794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0531 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906061794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Washington, June 28 (XINHUA) -- President Bill 
Clinton today became the first U.S. chief executive in American 
history to set up a personal legal defense fund and ask 
Americans to offer contributions to it, the White House 
announced here today. 
  The fund limits contributions to 1,000 dollars per person 
and 
bars donations from corporations, unions and political action 
committees, White House Press Secretary Dee Dee Myers told the 
White House news briefing this afternoon. 
  "The President will be faced with potentially large legal 
bills and it's in the best interest of the country for the 
President to have those bills paid," Myers said. 
  Clinton's legal bills may top two million U.S. dollars a 
year 
to deal with mounting legal problems including a sexual 
harassment suit and a federal investigation of the failed 
Whitewater Development Corporation in the late 1980s, which the 
Clintons half owned. 
  At a news briefing at the Washington office of the Sullivan 
and Cromwell law firm, which will handle Clinton's legal defense 
fund, the trustees said creating the fund was essential because 
the legal bills facing the Clintons could be "enormous." 
  Estimates put the costs of legal bills at one million to two 
million U.S. dollars a year or more. 
  However, the Clintons' 1993 income was just about 293,000 
U.S. dollars. The couple's net worth is estimated at no more 
than 1.6 million U.S. dollars, according to financial disclosure 
forms. 
  The trustees who will organize the fund-raising effort 
include Republicans as well as Democrats and they will be headed 
by the Rev. Theodore Hesburgh, president emeritus of a 
university, and Nicholas Katzenbach, a former U.S. attorney 
general. 
  No previous U.S. president has had to face the enormous 
personal legal expenses confronting President Clinton because of 
current legal proceedings based on events that allegedly 
occurred well before he took office, Hesburgh and Katzenbach 
said in a joint statement. 
  "We believe it is in the public interest to assist the 
President in meeting a financial burden that could otherwise 
distract him from performing his public responsibilities," they 
said in the statement. 
  The trust was established with a 2,000-dollar contribution 
by 
the Clintons. All donations will be considered gifts, not 
income, and the Clintons will incur no tax obligation because of 
them. The contributions are not deductible for income tax 
purposes. 
  When all legal issues have been concluded and the trust is 
terminated, any unused money will be paid to the Clintons, who 
have agreed to donate it to charity or turn it over to the 
federal government, according to the lawyers and trustees who 
briefed reporters. 
  The organizers of the fund said the names and addresses of 
the donors and amounts donated will be made public every six 
months. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27020 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major Computer Firm Signs Agreement With U.S. Company </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Major Computer Firm Signs Agreement With U.S. Company </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806113694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1123 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806113694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The Beijing Legend 
Computer Group and the U.S. Intermec Corporation, a world leader 
in automated data collection technology, signed an agreement 
here today to jointly develop bar code technology and market it 
in China. 
  The Legend Group is to be responsible for distributing 
Intermec's automated data collection technology and products in 
China. It will also help train personnel for the new 
technology, according to the agreement. 
  Official sources said that more than 75 percent of the 500 
enterprises listed in "FORTUNE" magazine are users of Intermec 
products, which include data collection hardware, software, 
label supplies and services. 
  Speaking at the signing, the Vice-President of the Beijing 
Legend Group, Liu Jinduo, said that his company plays a vital 
role in the domestic micro computers market as well as in 
developing Chinese character processing software. 
  "Our cooperation with Intermec has brought us to the new 
high- tech domain of bar code data collection technology," he 
said. 
  Intermec President Timothy A. Koogle said that his company 
is 
willing to be a firm backer for its Chinese partner. 
  "What is in our mind is to modernize China's manufacturing 
and distributing industries as soon as can be desired and, 
moreover, help China get in line with international practices in 
the circulation area," he said. 
  Bar codes, a new information technology started in the U.S. 
in the 1970s, has been broadly used in computer systems for 
industrial production, commerce, postal service, the management 
of blood banks, libraries, storing, communications and the 
management of commercial bills. 
  Bar code technology was introduced into China in the 1980s. 
By the end of l992, more than 3,000 enterprises applied for bar 
codes and over 40,000 commodities now carry the marks. 
  According to official forecasts, about 8,000 enterprises 
more 
are expected to have bar codes of their own this year and a 
further 100,000 commodities will join the ranks of the code 
carriers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27021 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. Battery Producer Launches Joint Venture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. Battery Producer Launches Joint Venture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806134294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1249 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806134294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Duracell International 
Inc. of the United States is investing 60 million U.S. dollars 
to establish a joint venture in China to produce alkaline 
batteries. 
  The agreement to effect the establishment of the new joint 
venture, the Duracell (China) Corporation, was signed here today 
by Duracell International and the Huaxin Industry and Commerce 
Corporation of Dongguan city in south China's Guangdong Province. 
  Chinese Vice-Premier Zou Jiahua met with representatives of 
the two sides before the signing of the agreement. The new 
project sees the largest investment Duracell has ever poured 
into the Asia- Pacific region. Duracell International is 
believed to be the leading alkaline battery manufacturer in the 
world. Huaxin is a comprehensive enterprise mainly engaging in 
hi-tech development. 
  The new joint venture is designed to produce at least 360 
million battery units within two or three years after it goes 
into operation in early 1996. About 60 percent of the products 
will be sold overseas. 
  Charles R. Perrin, president of Duracell, also announced 
today a donation of 25,000 U.S. dollars to flood-devastated 
areas in Guangdong Province. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27022 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. Net Debt Status Worsens in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. Net Debt Status Worsens in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806222194 Beijing XINHUA in English 2145 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806222194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Washington, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The net debtor 
position of the United States worsened last year, with total 
foreign debt reaching 555.7 billion U.S. dollars, the government 
reported today. 
  This is an increase of 9.4 percent from 1992, whose revised 
level of foreign debt was 507.9 billion dollars, according to 
the Department of Commerce. 
  Net debt is what more foreigners own in assets in the U.S. 
than Americans own abroad. It includes bank loans and other 
investment, like stocks and bonds and real estate. 
  The U.S. had been a net creditor nation before 1987. It 
owned 34.6 billion dollars more in assets overseas than 
foreigners owned in this country in 1986. 
  By the end of 1993, foreigners' holdings in the U.S. reached 
2.93 trillion dollars while American assets abroad were 2.37 
trillion dollars. The difference is U.S. net debtor position. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27023 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vice President Rong Yiren Meets Canadian Businessman </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vice President Rong Yiren Meets Canadian Businessman </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906083494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0808 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906083494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-President 
Rong Yiren met with Andre Desmarais, president of the Power 
Corporation of Canada, at the Great Hall of the People here 
today. 
  The Power Corporation, a member of the Canada-China Business 
Council, is one of the biggest companies in Canada. It deals 
with finance, industry and commerce, telecommunications and real 
estate. 
  Desmarais, who is chairman of the Canada-China Business 
Council, and his party are here to seek cooperation with China 
in electric energy, railway carriage manufacture, mining, 
telecommunications and other areas. 
  During today's meeting, Rong said he appreciates the efforts 
of Power Corporation and the Canada-China Business Council for 
the development of Sino-Canadian economic and trade relations. 
  Rong said that such relations are developing steadily and 
have a broad prospect. 
  He said all countries, including Canada, are welcome to come 
to China and conduct exchanges and cooperation. 
  Desmarais said he is satisfied with the cooperation between 
his company and China. He believed that there is a lot to do in 
such cooperation. 
  Desmarais and his party are here at the invitation of the 
China International Trust and Investment Corporation (CITIC). 
  Earlier today, CITIC and Power Corporation signed an 
agreement concerning Power Corporation's investment in China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27024 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets With Yeltsin </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806131394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1254 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806131394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin met visiting Chinese Deputy Premier and Foreign Minister 
Qian Qichen in the Kremlin today. 
  During the meeting here this afternoon, Yeltsin said he is 
glad that Chinese leader Jiang Zemin had accepted his invitation 
to visit Russia in early September. 
  Qian, who arrived in Moscow for a three-day official visit, 
met with the Russian parliament's upper house chairman Vladimir 
Shumeyko and held talks with Russian Foreign Minister Andrey 
Kozyrev this morning. 
  The Chinese deputy premier is expected to address the Moscow 
State University later this afternoon and then hold a news 
conference in the press center of the Russian Foreign Ministry. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27025 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets Chairman Shumeyko </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806130894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1248 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806130894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin met visiting Chinese Deputy Premier and Foreign Minister 
Qian Qichen here this afternoon in the Kremlin. 
  Qian, who arrived in Moscow for a three-day official visit, 
met with the Russian Parliament's upper house chairman Vladimir 
Shumeyko and held talks with Russian Foreign Minister Andrey 
Kozyrev this morning. 
  The Chinese deputy premier is expected to address the Moscow 
State University later this afternoon and then hold a news 
conference in the press center of the Russian Foreign Ministry. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27026 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Speaks in Moscow </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806165394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1640 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806165394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Visiting Chinese vice 
Premier and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen briefed Russian 
intellectuals here today on China's reforms. 
  Speaking at Moscow State University this afternoon, Qian 
said 
that 16 years ago China shifted the focus of work of state onto 
economic development, beginning a new period of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics through reforms and 
opening to the outside world. 
  The reform in China, first changed the previous single 
public 
ownership system but practiced multi-ownership one with the 
public ownership as the main part, he said. 
  Then, the reform broke the planned economy system, giving 
full play to market mechanisms in economic development. 
Thirdly, it formed a situation of opening China to the outside 
world in various spheres, the Chinese vice premier noted. 
  Pursuing the process of reform and opening up, China has at 
the same time fought crimes, strengthened democracy and the 
legal system and strengthened clean government, he added. 
  He stressed that the all-round reform steps have resulted in 
historically significant changes in the country. 
  China needs both internal stability and a long-term stable 
and peaceful external environment for its socialist 
modernization drive, and is willing to continue to exchange 
experience in reforms with Russia, he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27027 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Speaks on Furthering Ties </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806163594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1627 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806163594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Visiting Chinese Vice 
Premier and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen stressed here today 
that China is ready to expand friendly and cooperative relations 
with Russia. 
  Speaking at the Moscow State University, Qian said 
establishing and developing good-neighborly and friendly 
relations with neighboring countries has occupied a significant 
position in China's foreign policy. 
  Furthering good relations with Russia, China's largest 
neighbor, has a special significance for the Chinese foreign 
activities, he said. 
  China and Russia, two of the powers in the world, may 
contribute to world peace, stability and development if they 
strengthen their bilateral cooperation, said the Chinese vice 
premier. 
  Since the end of 1992, when Russian President Boris Yeltsin 
visited China, bilateral relations have developed quickly in 
various spheres covering politics, economy, science and 
technology, education and culture, Qian said. 
  Trade volumes between the two countries have hit the highest 
level in history, he added. 
  However, Qian admitted there have emerged some problems in 
bilateral expanded contacts, mainly in the trade sphere 
involving individual businessmen, because of a lack of timely 
laws and regulations. 
  The Chinese Government is against illegal trade activities 
and illegal immigration, Qian stated, stressing the need for 
both governments to strengthen cooperation in protecting 
organized and normal trade between citizens of the two countries. 
  China and Russia, with huge economic potentials 
respectively, 
may complement each other in economy, and have big prospects for 
developing friendly and cooperative relations on the basis of 
equality and mutual benefits, the Chinese vice premier said. 
  He underlined the need for both nations to make big efforts 
to expand bilateral cooperation in the fields of economic-trade, 
science and technology, raise level and quality of cooperation 
and and create conditions to bring bilateral trade step by step 
into internationally-normal way. 
  While visiting China, Russian leaders including President 
Yeltsin, Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin and parliament's 
lower house chairman Ivan Rybkin have reaffirmed that Russia 
sees its relations with China as one of priorities in its 
foreign policy, Qian said. 
  During his upcoming visit to Russia in autumn, Chinese 
leader 
Jiang Zemin is expected to discuss the future of bilateral 
relations between China and Russia with Yeltsin, procced from 
the view of the next century, the Chinese vice premier noted. 
  Faced with the complicated international situation, he said, 
China will firmly continue to pursue an independent peaceful 
foreign policy and develop friendly and cooperative relations 
with foreign countries on the basis of the five principles of 
peaceful co- existence. 
  China, which is concentrating its efforts on economic 
development, will not join any arms race, will not join any 
military bloc, will never seek hegemony and will always stand 
firm as a strong safeguard of world peace, Qian stated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27028 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Announces Moscow Summit Dates </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806162394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1610 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806162394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese leader Jiang 
Zemin and Russian President Boris Yeltsin will hold their summit 
meeting on September 2, Qian Qichen, China's vice premier and 
foreign minister announced here this afternoon. 
  Speaking at a news conference at the press center of the 
Russian Foreign Ministry, Qian said his current visit was aimed 
at making preparations for the second Chinese-Russian summit 
meeting in Moscow. 
  While visiting China early this year, Russian Foreign 
Minister Andrey Kozyrev presented Yeltsin's message to Jiang to 
invite the Chinese leader to visit Russia, Qian said. 
  Qian told reporters that furthering bilateral 
good-neighbourly and friendly relations between China and Russia 
is beneficial for peace and stability in the Asian-Pacific 
region and the rest of the world. 
  Qian is scheduled to leave Moscow for Minsk, the capital of 
Belarus, on Wednesday [29 June] after meeting with Russian Prime 
Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27029 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets First Deputy Prime Minister </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906102894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1020 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906102894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-Premier and 
Foreign Minister Qian Qichen today discussed with Russian First 
Deputy Prime Minister Oleg Soskovets the prospect of developing 
trade relations between their two countries. 
  Qian said that Russia and China can have full cooperation in 
the field of trade between Russia's far east region and China, 
and that Russia can help China in its infrastructure 
construction such as hydropower projects and transportation. 
  Soskovets said Russia not only wants to fully develop trade 
with China, but also take advantage of China's geographical 
position to further develop economic relations with other Asian 
countries. 
  Qian ended an official visit to Russia today and left for 
Belarus. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27030 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Talks With Kozyrev </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906044794 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0143 
GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2906044794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporters Wan Chengcai (8001 2052 2088) and Cui Shaochun </F>
(1508 1421 4783)] 
  [Text] Moscow, 28 Jun (XINHUA) -- On 28 June, Qian Qichen, 
vice premier and foreign minister, held talks with his Russian 
counterpart Kozyrev at the Foreign Affairs Villa in Moscow. 
Both sides exchanged views on Sino-Russian bilateral relations 
and other issues of common concern and discussed relevant 
questions in connection with President Jiang Zemin's visit to 
Russia. 
  Qian Qichen said that he was very happy to have another 
opportunity to visit Russia, a friendly neighbor. He said: The 
main purpose of my current visit to Moscow is to make 
preparations for Chinese President Jiang Zemin's visit to Russia 
this fall. The upcoming visit by President Jiang Zemin is a 
reciprocal visit following President Yeltsin's visit to China in 
December 1992. Because it is a great event in the relations 
between the two countries, it is necessary to make earnest 
preparations to ensure the success of the visit. 
  Qian Qichen said: China and Russia are neighbors. The 
maintenance of the long-term, stable, good-neighbor relationship 
between them is not only very important to the people of China 
and Russia but also concerns peace, stability, and development 
in the Asia-Pacific region and in the world as a whole. 
  Qian Qichen said that over the past two years since China 
and 
Russia established diplomatic relations, bilateral relations in 
the political and economic spheres and other fields have 
developed steadily. High-level exchanges between the two 
countries have increased. Foreign Minister Kozyrev visited 
China early this year. In May, Russian State Duma Speaker Rybkin 
and Russian Prime Minister Chernomyrdin successively visited 
China by invitation. The Chinese side is satisfied with the 
development of bilateral relations in recent years and 
reiterates that it will strictly observe the principles of the 
18 December 1992 joint declaration on Sino-Russian relations. 
  Qian Qichen stressed that the Chinese side values very much 
the hard-won, good-neighbor relations between China and Russia. 
China is willing to strengthen and expand bilateral cooperation 
in various fields on the basis of the Five Principles of 
Peaceful Coexistence and of the Sino-Russian joint declaration. 
  Touching on Russia's joining NATO's "Partnership for Peace" 
program, Qian Qichen said: In recent years, a great change has 
taken place in the situation in Europe. It is understandable 
that European countries are concerned about their own security. 
We hope that every arrangement for security in Europe can be in 
accord with not only the wishes and interests of the nations 
concerned but also with international security, peace, and 
stability. He said that the idea and practice of forming a 
military bloc against a certain country in the time of the "Cold 
War" are now outdated and should be discarded. 
  Kozyrev said that the Russian side attaches great importance 
to President Jiang Zemin's visit to Russia this fall and that it 
believes the visit will be of profound and far-reaching 
significance in expanding bilateral friendly relations and 
cooperation. Together with the Chinese side, the Russian side 
will work hard for the success of President Jiang Zemin's visit 
to Russia. 
  Kozyrev said: As for Russia's joining NATO's "Partnership 
for Peace" program, Russia has also suggested that NATO 
transform itself into a new international organization in the 
new situation following the end of the "Cold War." Russia will 
not join any political or military bloc, whether in the East or 
the West, which is directed at a certain country. He said that 
Russia attaches great importance to Russian-Sino relations, 
which, it deems, are as important as those between Russia and 
NATO. 
  Both sides also exchanged views on the situation on the 
Korean peninsula and on other international issues. 
  Present at the talks were Chinese Vice Foreign Minister Dai 
Bingguo, Chinese Ambassador to Russia Wang Jinqing, Russian Vice 
Foreign Minister Panov, and Russian Ambassador to China Rogachev. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27031 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Discusses Peace, Development, Stability </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906031694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0247 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906031694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Visiting Chinese Vice 
Premier and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen today met with his 
Russian counterpart Andrey Kozyrev on questions of common 
concern and bilateral ties. 
  Qian said the stable and long-standing good-neighborly and 
friendly ties between the two neighbors not only are important 
to the two peoples but also have influences over peace, 
stability and development in the Asia-Pacific region and even 
the whole world. 
  Since the establishment of diplomatic ties between the two 
countries, their relations in all aspects have gained a 
sustained development and the exchange of visits by their senior 
officials has increased, he said. 
  China is satisfied with the development of bilateral 
relations in recent years, said Qian, whose current visit to 
Moscow is mainly aimed at making preparations for Chinese 
President Jiang Zemin's visit to Russia in September. 
  Kozyrev said the Russian side attaches great importance to 
the upcoming visit by Jiang and believes his visit to Russia 
will be of profound significance to the development of friendly 
and cooperative relations between the two countries. 
  On Russia's "Partnership for Peace" relations with the North 
Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO), the Chinese foreign 
minister said it is understandable that European nations are 
concerned about the security of their own as there have been 
great changes in the continent in recent years. 
  He expressed the hope that every arrangement for security in 
Europe should be in accord with not only the interests of 
nations concerned, but also security, peace and stability in the 
world. 
  Kozyrev said Russia also holds the view that NATO should be 
transformed into a new international organization after the Cold 
War. 
  He said Russia will not join any military or political 
organization, whether in the West or the East, directed against 
a particular nation. 
  Russia attaches equal importance to its relations with China 
and NATO, Kozyrev added. 
  The two sides also exchanged views on the situation on the 
Korean peninsula. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27032 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Discusses Russian Ties, Nuclear Testing </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906030794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0245 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906030794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Deputy Premier 
and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen, on a visit in Moscow, said 
today that China respects the choice of other nations and hopes 
to develop friendly relations with all countries. 
  Qian was answering questions from reporters on China's 
policies towards Central Asian states. 
  Qian recalled that China had maintained friendly relations 
with the Central Asian region. 
  "As China and Central Asian states have increased contacts, 
we hope to develop such friendly relations and expect Central 
Asian states to expand their friendly ties and cooperation with 
other nations, including Russia," Qian said. 
  When asked about China's comment on Russia's effort to join 
the "Partnership for Peace" program, Qian said, "as a European 
nation and a big country, Russia has certainly maintained many 
links with the rest of Europe." 
  "Russia's establishment of a cooperative partnership with 
NATO is understandable, but it should be different from joining 
any military bloc in the past," he said. 
  "We hope it will help maintain peace and stability in Europe 
and the rest of the world and will not obstruct the development 
of good- neighborly relations between Russia and China," the 
foreign minister noted. 
  Russia signed a Partnership for Peace accord with NATO last 
Wednesday [22 June] to become the 21st country that joined the 
U.S.-initiated military cooperation plan. 
  On China's position about nuclear tests, Qian reaffirmed 
China stands for the total and thorough destruction of nuclear 
weapons. 
  China has unilaterally announced it will not be the first to 
use nuclear weapons, will not threaten non-nuclear nations with 
force and will not use nuclear weapons against them, he 
explained. 
  China has been very much restrained on the issue of nuclear 
tests, he said. 
  As a nuclear power, the United States has conducted more 
than 
900 nuclear tests; the former Soviet Union, including Russia, 
has done more than 600 such tests; France, more than 200; and 
Britain, more than 60. 
  In comparison, China has had the smallest number of nuclear 
tests among the nuclear countries, Qian added. 
  Qian arrived in Moscow Monday evening for a three-day 
official visit. He will also visit Belarus, Lithuania, Estonia 
and Finland. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27033 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Initials Agreement on Border </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806145694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1443 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806145694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Visiting Chinese Deputy 
Premier and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen and Russian Foreign 
Minister Andrey Kozyrev after talks here today initialed an 
agreement on western strip of the Chinese-Russian border. 
  In addition, the two sides also signed an accord on 
cooperation between the two foreign ministries in the sphere of 
information. 
  Qian, who arrived in Moscow on Monday evening for a 
three-day 
official visit to Russia, began his talks with Kozyrev at noon. 
  After the signing ceremony, Kozyrev told reporters that he 
and Qian had concentrated during their 90-minute talks on 
preparations for the second Chinese-Russian summit to be held in 
Moscow this autumn, and he described the forthcoming summit as 
an event of "epoch-making" significance. 
  He said he had exchanged views with Qian on the agreements 
to 
be signed by Chinese leader Jiang Zemin and Russian President 
Boris Yeltsin at the summit, which is to be held in early 
September. 
  The two leaders are expected to sign at least six bilateral 
agreements, including a major political accord, Kozyrev said. 
  Qian, in his turn, told reporters that he and Kozyrev had 
also discussed bilateral relations and exchanged views on 
several international issues, including the situation on the 
Korean peninsula. 
  He described as good the general state of bilateral trade, 
but admitted that there had emerged some problems in this field. 
  Earlier this morning, the Chinese deputy premier met the 
Russian parliament's upper house chairman Vladimir Shumeyko. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27034 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Signs Protocol on Information Cooperation </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906024894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0226 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906024894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese and Russian 
officials signed here today a protocol on cooperation in 
information between their Foreign Ministries and a draft 
agreement on the western sector of the boundary between the two 
countries. 
  The two documents were signed by Deputy Foreign Ministers 
Dai 
Bingguo of China and Aleksandr Panov of Russia after talks 
between visiting Chinese Foreign Minister Qian Qichen and his 
Russian counterpart Andrey Kozyrev. 
  The agreement on the boundary will be officially signed 
during Chinese President Jiang Zemin's visit to Russia scheduled 
for September. 
  Kozyrev told reporters after the signing ceremony that 
Russian-Chinese relations were developing steadily. Chinese 
leader Jiang's visit would further promote the existing friendly 
relations between the two nations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27035 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Attends Bank of China Party </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906075694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0735 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906075694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Visiting Chinese Vice 
Prime Minister and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen today attended 
here a cocktail party hosted by the Bank of China in Russia. 
  The party was held to mark the opening of business by the 
Bank of China in Russia. 
  The bank's mission in Russia will be focused on providing 
financial services to trade between China and Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27036 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Qian Qichen Russian, CIS Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Leaves Moscow for Belarus </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906082594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0815 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906082594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Moscow, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice Premier and 
Foreign Minister Qian Qichen today ended an official visit to 
Russia and left here for Minsk, Belarus, this morning. 
  During the visit, Qian met with Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin and Russian Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin, and held 
talks with Russian Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev. 
  Qian announced Tuesday that Chinese President Jiang Zemin 
and 
Russian President Boris Yeltsin will have a summit meeting in 
Moscow on September 2. 
  Chinese and Russian officials signed on Tuesday a protocol 
on 
cooperation in information between the two foreign ministries 
and an agreement on the western sector of the boundary between 
the two nations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27037 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  20 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Signs Agreements With Amur Oblast </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Signs Agreements With Amur Oblast </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906041494 Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 20 Jun 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> SK2906041494 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] A ceremony was held in the building of the 
provincial people's government on the afternoon of 18 June on 
the signing of an agreement between the Amur Oblast of Russia 
and Heilongjiang Province on enhancing economic and trade 
relations and further developing bilateral cooperation. Wang 
Zongzhang, vice governor of Heilongjiang Province, and Kulichev, 
vice governor of Amur Oblast, signed their names on the 
agreement on behalf of the governments of both sides. 
  Both sides reached 17 agreements in the fields of economic 
and trade cooperation; investment policies; the basic structure 
of developing economic cooperation with foreign countries; the 
exchanges of science, technology, and culture; the transit 
process; and the bilateral work of offering coordination and 
notice. 
  Both sides have decided through discussion to conduct 
transactions in cash or in barter trade and to transit all 
related forms of trade in cash. 
  Both sides agreed to give priority to establishing 
joint-venture enterprises in the fields of light industry, 
planting and processing of farm products, production with the 
newest technologies, the extensive processing of timber, motor 
vehicles, and the technologies of tractor maintenance and repair. 
  Both sides will adopt necessary measures to maintain the 
bilateral agreement on no-visa one and several day tours. They 
also agreed to adopt an equal principle and an indiscriminate 
attitude toward the tourists from both sides. 
  Both sides agreed to establish their own coordination group 
so as to coordinate the bilateral cooperation in the fields of 
economy and trade, science and technology, culture, sports, and 
the exchanges of information. They also agreed to establish a 
link between the corresponding information departments of both 
sides. They guaranteed to create conditions for the arbitration 
and supervisory institutions to effectively supervise the 
quality of trading goods and the security work and to formulate 
their methods of punishing the violation of contract regulations. 
  Both sides agreed to submit their application or suggestions 
to their higher authorities with regard to establishing a 
Russia-China joint-venture bank, assigning banks to act as 
agents for trade payment, building national-level economic 
cooperative zones in the cities of Heihe and Blagoveshchevsk, 
opening inland navigation lines on both sides, and simplifying 
formalities for transit travel. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27038 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Analysis' Views Differences Between Russia, NATO </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Analysis' Views Differences Between Russia, NATO </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806114794 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Jun 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806114794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["News analysis" by staff reporter Zhang Baoxiang (1728 1405 </F>
4382): "Treaty Signed, Differences Exist"] 
  [Text] Brussels, 23 Jun (RENMIN RIBAO) -- On 22 June, 
Russia and NATO signed a framework document on the "Partnership 
for Peace." Sergio Balanzino, deputy secretary general of NATO, 
said this would contribute to the "peace and stability of 
Europe." Russian Foreign Minister Kozyrev described the move as 
"turning to a new chapter of bilateral relations." 
  In order to sign the "framework document," both NATO and 
Russia made compromises and concessions. NATO recognized 
Russia's power status and agreed to "implement an extensive 
partnership scheme commensurate with Russia's size, important 
position, and capabilities" and to have dialogue with Russia on 
issues of common interest. Meanwhile, Russia no longer stuck to 
the principle that NATO must sign a legally binding "protocol" 
which would recognize its power status. 
  On the surface, both Russia and NATO achieved the main 
things 
they wanted: NATO succeeded in getting Russia to sign the 
"framework document of the Partnership for Peace," whereas 
Russia's power status was recognized by NATO. But in reality, 
their conflicts have not been settled yet. 
  The basic difference between NATO and Russia is who should 
play the lead in the security affairs of Europe. Russian 
Defense Minister Grachev suggested that Russia and NATO should 
establish a "strategic partnership" to jointly undertake the 
responsibility of defending the security of Europe. However, 
Balanzino said, "NATO is the most powerful organization for 
European defense" and should "play a leading role" in defending 
the security of Europe." Balanzino also said that NATO would 
neither reach a "new Yalta" agreement with Russia nor draw a new 
"boundary of Europe" with Russia. It seems that such 
differences concerning the future pattern of European security 
will not be settled in the short term. 
  A related issue over which both parties are at odds is the 
eastward expansion of NATO. In Russia's view, due to 
"historical and geopolitical reasons," Russia has major 
strategic and economic interests in Central and Eastern Europe, 
hence it objects to the absorption of Central and East European 
countries into NATO, saying that this is a practice of 
"isolating" Russia. Balanzino stressed that NATO's expansion 
"does not intend to isolate Russia" but "contributes to the 
stability of Europe," and that Russia neither has the "right to 
supervise" nor the "right to veto" NATO's eastward expansion. 
  Another major difference is how to consult each other about 
security issues. Russia has asked for the establishment of a 
formal and automatic consultation system with NATO on European 
and global security issues. NATO agreed to hold dialogue with 
Russia on security issues, but it did not agree to establish an 
automatic consultation system. 
  In addition, Russia also stressed that the CSCE is the 
supreme organ responsible for European security and NATO is a 
military organization subordinate to the CSCE. However, NATO 
insisted on objecting to this view, saying that NATO is the 
"pillar" of post-Cold War European security. 
  As far as the issue of European security is concerned, NATO 
needs Russia and vice versa, and it is impossible to have real 
stability in Europe if either of the two parties is excluded. 
It was precisely because both parties are soberly aware of this 
point that they signed the framework document for the 
partnership of peace. However, both parties have divergent views 
on the question of how to cooperate with each other in Europe. 
Russia intends to "jointly administer" Europe with NATO, 
whereas NATO undoubtedly reckons itself as the "key player." In 
view of this, Russia and NATO must go through a relatively long 
process of bargaining or even conflict before their relations 
can be readjusted and the new pattern of European security 
finally takes shape. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27039 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Japan Welcomes Agreement on Inter-Korean Summit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Japan Welcomes Agreement on Inter-Korean Summit </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806170394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1649 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806170394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Tokyo, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Prime Minister Tsutomo 
Hata today welcomed an agreement reached between the Democratic 
People's Republic of Korea (DPRK) and South Korea on holding 
their first summit meeting next month. 
  The agreement between the DPRK and South Korea is "good 
news," Hata was quoted by local press as saying. 
  The outgoing prime minister said that the summit would also 
have a good effect on relations between Japan and the DPRK. 
  He indicated that Tokyo will provide the DPRK with economic 
and technical assistance if the nuclear issue is settled in the 
forthcoming high-level talks between the DPRK and the U.S. 
  The DPRK and South Korea agreed earlier in the day to hold 
an 
inter-Korean summit in Pyongyang on July 25-27, followed by a 
second meeting at a later date, but the location is yet to be 
decided. 
  In a related development, government sources were quoted as 
saying that Japan will send a senior Foreign Ministry official 
to Washington this week to consult with U.S. and South Korean 
officials ahead of the planned U.S.-DPRK talks in Geneva in 
early July. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27040 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Japan's Hata Calls For Extension of Diet Session </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Japan's Hata Calls For Extension of Diet Session </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806170894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1657 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806170894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Tokyo, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Outgoing Prime Minister 
Tsutomu Hata today called for extension of the current Diet 
(parliament) session beyond its deadline of tomorrow to choose a 
new prime minister, the KYODO NEWS SERVICE reported. 
  "It is inconceivable that the Diet should end its session 
before a new cabinet has been formed," Hata was quoted as 
saying. He announced Saturday [25 June] his intention to quit 
with his entire cabinet. 
  KYODO said Hata made the comments as his ruling coalition is 
stepping up its bid to woo the Social Democratic Party (SDP) 
back into its fold to form a stable, majority government. 
  The Hata cabinet remains in office until a new 
administration 
is launched. 
  The House of Representatives is to convene a plenary session 
at 10:00 a.m. [0100 GMT] tomorrow. 
  However, it remains unclear whether the lower house will be 
able to vote on a successor to Hata tomorrow in view of 
intensifying parliamentary maneuverings by both the coalition 
and the opposition Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) to win over 
the socialists to their respective camps. 
  The SDP can swing the balance of power because it holds 74 
seats in the powerful 511-member lower house while the LDP has 
206, and the governing coalition 183. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27041 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Ministry Welcomes Inter-Korean Summit Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Ministry Welcomes Inter-Korean Summit Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906011794 Seoul YONHAP in English 0107 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> SK2906011794 </F>
<F P=104>  Seoul YONHAP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (YONHAP) -- The Chinese Government 
welcomed the agreement by Seoul and Pyongyang to hold an 
inter-Korean summit in Pyongyang from July 25-27. 
  A Foreign Ministry spokesman said, "We hope that the 
inter-Korean summit talks will make smooth progress." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27042 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   }Kim Il-song Welcomes Military Delegation From China </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    }Kim Il-song Welcomes Military Delegation From China </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906101594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0751 
GMT 29 June 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2906101594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [XINHUA reporter Ji Xinlong (1213 2450 7893) and RENMIN </F>
RIBAO reporter Zhou Gongzhong (0719 0361 1813)] 
  [Text] Pyongyang, 28 Jun (XINHUA) -- Kim Il-song, 
president of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea [DPRK], 
met a friendly PLA delegation at the presidential office today. 
The delegation was headed by General Wang Ke, commander of the 
Shenyang Military Region. Both the host and the guests held 
cordial and friendly talks. 
  President Kim Il-song said he was pleased to welcome the 
delegation led by Comrade Wang Ke. He asked General Wang Ke to 
convey his greetings to Comrade Deng Xiaoping. 
  President Kim Il-song said: The situation on the Korean 
Peninsular has been eased and is moving in a positive direction. 
Although countries may differ in size and economic development, 
there shall not be any dominating or dominated countries. Nor 
shall there be any countries in a high or low position. The 
DPRK cannot be bullied. The greater the outside pressure, the 
stronger the DPRK's resistance. 
  President Kim Il-song continued: China has achieved success 
in building a socialist country. The DPRK is very pleased to 
see this success and greatly appreciates it. He asked the 
guests to convey the greetings of the people of the DPRK to all 
the Chinese people after they return home. He also asked them 
to convey his personal greetings to Chinese party and state 
leaders. 
  General Wang Ke conveyed Chairman Jiang Zemin's greetings to 
President Kim. He said that, during his visit to the DPRK, he 
personally witnessed tremendous achievements by the people and 
the army of the DPRK in all fronts under the leadership of 
President Kim Il-song and Supreme Commander Kim Chong-il. He 
said: PRC-DPRK friendship was built by revolutionists of an 
older generation like Comrade Mao Zedong, Comrade Zhou Enlai, 
and President Kim. Such friendship will be further consolidated 
and developed in the future. China will make unremitting efforts 
to achieve this goal. 
  The delegation arrived in Pyongyang on 21 June and will end 
its visit on 29 June. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27043 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kim Il-song Meets Delegation, Views Nuclear Issue </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kim Il-song Meets Delegation, Views Nuclear Issue </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906032794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0306 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906032794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Pyongyang, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Kim Il-song, 
president of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK), 
held talks on Tuesday [28 June] with a Chinese military 
delegation which is on a nine-day visit here. 
  President Kim briefed the Chinese delegation on the 
situation 
in the Korean peninsula and the latest developments in 
preparations for his summit meeting with the South Korean 
president on the nuclear issue, and the upcoming talks with the 
U.S. on July 8 in Geneva. 
  The situation in the Korean peninsula has been eased and is 
moving in a positive direction, said Kim. 
  The Chinese delegation, headed by Wang Ke, 
commander-in-chief 
of the Shenyang military area command of the Chinese People's 
Liberation Army, arrived in the capital on June 21 and will 
leave for home on Wednesday. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27044 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Diplomatic Relations Established With Andorra </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Diplomatic Relations Established With Andorra </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906093894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0926 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906093894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Madrid, June 29 (XINHUA) -- China and Andorra today 
formally established diplomatic relations. 
  A communique to the effect was signed in Andorra City today 
by Chinese Ambassador to Spain Song Guoqing and Andorran Foreign 
Minister Marc Vila Amigo [name as received]. 
  The communique said, "the two governments agree to develop 
relations of friendship and cooperation between the two 
countries on the basis of mutual respect of sovereignty and 
territorial integrity, non-aggression, non-interference in each 
other's internal affairs, equality and mutual benefit, and 
peaceful coexistence." 
  "The government of the Principality of Andorra recognizes 
that the Government of the People's Republic of China is the 
only legitimate government of China and that Taiwan is an 
inalienable part of the territory of China," said the communique. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27045 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    To Visit Austria, Germany, Romania </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806104494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1017 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806104494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Premier Li Peng 
left here today for an official visit to Austria, Germany and 
Romania. 
  Li will travel via Urumqi, capital of the Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Region. 
  The premier left for his trip at the invitation of Austrian 
Prime Minister Franz Vranitzky, German Chancellor Helmut Kohl, 
and Romanian President Ion Iliescu and Prime Minister Nicolae 
Vacaroiu. 
  The premier's entourage includes Vice-Premier Li Lanqing, 
Minister Wang Zhongyu of the State Economic and Trade 
Commission, Vice-Minister Ye Qing of the State Planning 
Commission, Minister Liu Qi of the metallurgical industry, 
Director of the Foreign Affairs Office under the State Council 
Qi Huaiyuan and Vice-Foreign Minister Jiang Enzhu. 
  Among those seeing Li off at the Great Hall of the People 
were Vice-Premiers Zhu Rongji and Zou Jiahua as well as 
diplomatic envoys from the three countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27046 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Visit Will Help "Boost" Relations </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806132894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1312 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806132894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Premier Li Peng 
left here this morning for a three European nation tour that 
will cover Austria, Germany and Romania. 
  Li will fly to Europe via Urumqi, capital of the Xinjiang 
Uygur Autonomous Region. 
  The Chinese premier was invited for the two-week trip by 
Austrian Prime Minister Franz Vranitzky, German Chancellor 
Helmut Kohl, and Romanian President Ion Iliescu and Prime 
Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu. 
  Meeting the press at the Great Hall of the People here prior 
to his departure, Li Peng said that "the visit will help boost 
the friendly relations and co-operation" between China and the 
three European countries. 
  He said that China wishes to see further development in the 
co- operation with them in economy, trade, science and 
technology, education and other spheres. 
  During his current return visit, Li will exchange views in 
depth with leaders of the three countries on both international 
and bilateral relations, especially bilateral economic 
co-operation. 
  Li expected that some governmental agreements and business 
accords will be signed with the three countries during his trip. 
  Western Europe now has a population of over 370 million and 
its total GNP has overtaken that of the United States, he noted. 
  In addition, it boasts advanced technologies, and has 
adopted 
a relatively open attitude toward technology transfer to China, 
Li said. 
  China has had very good trade ties with the region, Li 
stressed. 
  Li said there has been a long history of co-operation 
between 
Germany and China, and Germany ranks as China's biggest trade 
partner in western Europe. 
  Li revealed that his entourage includes not only 
high-ranking 
officials, but also executives from over 30 large and key 
enterprises in metallurgy, power, petrochemicals, automobiles, 
machinery and trade. All of them have direct business links 
with Germany and Austria. 
  Li expressed the belief that the visit would bring fruitful 
results to the economic co-operation between China and the three 
countries. 
  During his absence, Vice-Premier Zhu Rongji will act as 
premier. 
  The premier's entourage includes Vice-Premier Li Lanqing, 
Minister Wang Zhongyu of the State Economic and Trade 
Commission, Vice-Minister Ye Qing of the State Planning 
Commission, minister Liu Qi of the metallurgical industry, 
Director of the Foreign Affairs Office under the State Council 
Qi Huaiyuan and Vice-Foreign Minister Jiang Enzhu. 
  Among those present at the Great Hall of the People to see 
Li 
off were Vice-Premier Zhu Rongji and and Vice-Premier Zou Jiahua 
as well as diplomatic envoys in Beijing of the three European 
countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27047 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Aims To "Strengthen" Economic Cooperation </H4>

<F P=102> HK2806061694 Hong Kong AFP in English 0509 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2806061694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (AFP) -- Chinese Prime Minister Li 
Peng left Beijing on Tuesday for a two-week European tour which 
will take him to Austria, Germany and Romania, the foreign 
ministry said. Li is accompanied by the vice-premier 
responsible for external trade Li Lanqing and a large delegation 
of economic experts and state industry leaders. 
  The aim of the tour is to strengthen economic cooperation 
with the three countries, particularly Germany its main economic 
and commerical partner in Europe, said Li in a brief press 
conference before leaving. "During my visit (to Germany) I will 
sign some contracts and letters of intent," he added. He said 
he would also have an exchange of views with leaders in all 
three countries on the international situation, but did not 
elaborate. 
  It is the second major European tour Li has undertaken in 
the 
past two and a half years. Early in 1992 he visited Spain, 
Portugal, Italy and Switzwerland. "China attaches great 
importance to its relations with European countries," said Li. 
  Due to serious heart problems Li, 65, did not travel abroad 
last year. But in May this year he undertook a 10-day tour of 
centrial Asian countries. "I have completely recovered. I work 
eight hours a day, sometimes longer," he said. During his 
absence vice-prime minister Zhu Rongji will be in charge of the 
government. 
  [Hong Kong RTHK Radio Four in English at 0500 GMT on 28 June 
reports: "Chinese Prime Minister Li Peng says cool political 
relations with Britain are bound to affect economic ties. Mr Li 
blamed Britain for the strained relations over the question of 
Hong Kong. He said he hoped Sino-British economic and trade 
relations would develop, but it was not possible to free them 
from the adverse effects of the cool political relationship. Mr 
Li, who was speaking at a news conference before leaving for a 
visit to Austria, Germany, and Romania, pointedly praised 
Germany for its long-standing cooperation with China."] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27048 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Remarks on Relations With France, UK </H4>

<F P=102> OW2806133694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1325 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806133694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Premier Li Peng said 
here today that Sino-French relations have entered a stage of 
overall restoration and development. 
  The Chinese premier made the remarks while meeting the press 
prior to his departure for an official three European nation 
tour that will cover Austria, Germany and Romania. 
  Asked to comment on the prospects of the development of 
Sino- 
French relations, the premier said that he was personally 
satisfied with the current state of development. 
  Earlier this year, China and France signed a memorandum on 
the improvement of relations between the two countries. In 
April, French Prime Minister Edouard Balladur paid a visit to 
China, he recalled. 
  During his visit here, Prime Minister Balladur conveyed from 
the French president an invitation to Chinese President Jiang 
Zemin. At present, the two governments are discussing the 
exchange of visits between the two countries' leaders, Li said. 
  On Sino-British links, Li noted that there are quite big 
differences in the views of China and Britain on the Hong Kong 
issue, so much as that they have affected the overall relations 
between the two countries. 
  "But the responsibility does not lie with China," he 
stressed. 
  Recalling his recent meeting with a British entrepreneur, Li 
said China hopes that the economic and trade relations between 
China and Britain would develop normally, but it is impossible 
that such relations would not be affected by the political 
relations between the two countries. "What we should do is to 
try as far as possible to avoid the negative effect," he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27049 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Arrives in Vienna for 5 Days </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906104994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1036 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906104994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Vienna, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Premier Li Peng 
arrived here today to begin a five-day official visit to Austria. 
  Austria is the first leg of his three-nation European tour, 
which will also take the premier to Germany on July 3-9 and 
Romania on July 9-12. 
  Li is the first Chinese premier ever to visit Austria. 
  During the visit, Li will hold talks with his Austrian 
counterpart Franz Vranitzky on bilateral relations and major 
international issues. 
  He will also meet Austrian President Thomas Klestil, 
parliamentary leaders, other political figures and 
representatives from the business circles. 
  Accompanying Li on the visit are Vice-Premier Li Lanqing and 
other government officials, as well as some leaders from China's 
major enterprises. 
  The two countries are expected to sign a number of documents 
on trade and economic cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27050 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng, Entourage Leaves for Official European Trip </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Daimler-Benz Chief Issues Statement </H4>

<F P=102> OW2906065494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0631 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906065494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Bonn, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Edzard Reuter, 
Daimler-Benz company's chairman of board, has welcomed the 
forthcoming visit by Chinese Premier Li Peng to Germany. 
  In a statement received here today, Reuter said Premier Li's 
visit will bring about "new propelling force" to the economic 
relations between Germany and China. 
  Premier Li is to make an official visit to Germany on July 
3-9. 
  Reuter said that his company has several projects in China 
and that in 1993 alone, the company sold 1.3 billion deutsche 
marks of its products to China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27051 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qian Qichen To Visit Finland </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qian Qichen To Visit Finland </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706032794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0255 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706032794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- Vice-Premier and 
Foreign Minister Qian Qichen will pay a visit to the Republic 
of Finland from July 2 to 3 at the invitation of Finnish Foreign 
Minister Heikki Haavisto, Foreign Ministry spokesman announced 
here today. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27052 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_h_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Analysis' Views French Intervention in Rwanda </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Analysis' Views French Intervention in Rwanda </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906102194 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Jun 94 p 25 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906102194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["News Analysis" by staff reporter Xu Shiquan (6079 0013 </F>
6898): "Wanting To Repeat United Nations' Somalia Operation in 
Rwanda?"] 
  [Text] New York, 23 Jun (RENMIN RIBAO) -- On 22 June, the 
UN Security Council adopted Resolution No. 929, which had been 
proposed by France, with 10 votes in favor and five abstentions, 
under which France was authorized to implement a two-month 
"provisional multinational operation" in Rwanda, where fighting 
is increasingly intense at present. A French Army unit of 2,500 
soldiers planned to enter Rwanda on 23 June. 
  Since the civil war broke out in Rwanda in October 1990, in 
order to overcome the crisis in this central African country, 
the UN Security Council has adopted 10 resolutions one after 
another and set up a "UN Assistance Mission for Rwanda" to 
conduct peace-keeping activities. In explaining the proposal, 
the French delegate said that the reason why France had taken 
the initiative was that massacres had occurred in Rwanda during 
the past two months, and, before personnel and equipment of the 
UN Assistance Mission for Rwanda was replenished, it "needs 
multinational action to protect the lives of civilians." 
However, the new resolution adopted on 22 June was different 
from previous ones in two aspects: 1) The French operation was 
taken outside the framework of the UN Assistance Mission for 
Rwanda, and, in fact, it is a military action taken by France 
alone. 2) The action was not unanimously supported and 
endorsed by the conflicting factions. The opposition party, the 
"Rwanda Patriotic Front [RPF]," which controls more than half of 
the country's territory, is explicitly opposed to the French 
dispatching troops. Delegates from some countries favoring the 
resolution cited the U.S. troops sent to Somalia in December 
1992 as an example. However, it is precisely this example that 
has aroused anxiety from quite a few countries which have 
devoted their efforts to make the work of the UN Assistance 
Mission for Rwanda a success. Chen Jian, China's deputy 
delegate to the United Nations, said unequivocally in his speech 
that considering the factors, including experience and lessons 
gained from the UN peace-keeping activities in Somalia, China 
had decided to abstain from the voting. He pointed out 
emphatically: "Use of force and resorting to tough measures 
will only lead to a further deterioration of the situation." 
The Brazilian delegate, who also abstained, expressed his worry 
that the French action would harm the tasks of the UN Assistance 
Mission for Rwanda. 
  If we look back at the history of war and chaos in Rwanda 
and 
the twists and turns experienced by the United Nations in its 
Rwanda peace-keeping activities, people will not find it 
difficult to understand clearly the position taken by China, 
Brazil, and other countries. 
  There are profound historical, political, and racial reasons 
for the war in Rwanda. Owing to lengthy colonial rule, the Hutu 
nationality, who account for 85 percent of the total population, 
and the Tutsi minority have undergone several periods of bloody 
strife in history. On these two sides of the current civil war, 
the government forces are mainly composed of Hutus, while the 
majority of the RPF are from the Tutsi. Although both sides 
have reached cease-fire agreements several times since the 
outbreak of the war, the flames of war have never been quenched 
due to the difficulty of eliminating these contradictions. The 
government side maintains that the conflict is, in essence, of a 
"nationality nature," that is, the Tutsi people had refused to 
accept Hutu majority rule, which was established by a general 
election held under UN supervision in September 1961. The RPF, 
however, maintains that the conflict is of a "political nature" 
and has called for the setting up of a nationality government on 
an extensive basis. In spite of this, after positive mediation 
by the Organization of African Unity and Tanzania, the 
conflicting parties signed a peace accord in Arusha, Tanzania, 
which agreed to establish a transitional government and 
transitional parliament on an extensive basis in January this 
year. For various reasons, the accord could not be carried out 
as scheduled. On 6 April, when Rwanda President Habyarimana and 
Burundi President Nyaryamira were killed in a mysterious plane 
crash at Kigali Airport, the tragedy immediately escalated the 
war and led to the genocidal slaughter of civilians. As 
estimated in a report to the UN secretary general, in this 
country, which only has a population of 7 million people, 
250,000 to 500,000 people have been killed, 1.5 million people 
are homeless, and 400,000 people have become refugees after 
escaping to neighboring countries. According to the report, 
"absolute proof" indicates that the government and its 
supporters are responsible for the slaughter, as the victims 
have mostly been Tutsis. Under such chaotic conditions, 10 
members of the Belgian task force belonging to the UN Assistance 
Mission for Rwanda were also killed. For this reason, the 
Security Council passed Resolution No. 912 on 21 April to reduce 
the number of troops in the UN Assistance Mission for Rwanda 
from 2,500 to 270, thus, the peace-keeping activities in Rwanda 
suffered setbacks. Although the Security Council adopted 
another resolution, No. 918 on 17 May, to replenish the mission 
so that its troops were increased to 5,500, they were once again 
reduced to 503 people at present and found it very difficult to 
fulfill the tasks entrusted to them. 
  The above facts show that the crisis in Rwanda was not built 
in one day, and the key to resolving this issue is to urge the 
two sides to value the interests of the country above all else 
through patient negotiations so as to gradually iron out 
differences and turn hostility into friendship. It is 
impractical to think that by dispatching a battalion of troops, 
the critical malady can be cured, no matter what motives one 
harbors. One need not look far for a lesson, because the U.S. 
expedition to Somalia can serve as an example. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27053 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   PLA Chief Zhang Wannian Meets Ecuadoran Guests </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PLA Chief Zhang Wannian Meets Ecuadoran Guests </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2706111994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1049 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2706111994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 27 (XINHUA) -- General Zhang Wannian, 
chief of the general staff of the Chinese People's Liberation 
Army (PLA), met with and feted Lieutenant General Alfonso 
Alarcon [name as received], head of the joint command of 
Ecuadorian Armed Forces, and his party here this evening. 
  This morning Zhang hosted a welcome ceremony for Alarcon and 
his party. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27054 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mexican Party Leader Urges Improved Trade Ties </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Mexican Party Leader Urges Improved Trade Ties </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906061894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0526 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906061894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Mexico City, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Mexico is very much 
interested in developing trade relations with China, Mexico's 
ruling party leader said today. 
  Ignacio Pichardo Pagaza, chairman of the ruling 
Institutional 
Revolutionary Party (PRI), told XINHUA that his party's 
presidential candidate, Ernesto Zedillo, is giving great 
importance to the development of trade ties with Asian 
countries, especially with China, since it feels that China will 
be a world economic power with its current economic growth rate. 
  The PRI leader said Mexico is very much interested in 
continuing its economic ties with China as Mexico is a big 
market for China, and vice versa. 
  Asked about the anti-dumping measures that the current 
Mexican Government imposed against a series of Chinese products 
last April, the party leader said it would be better if trade 
regulations provided fair treatment to both countries. 
  "The products we export to China are those that compete 
correctly and adequately with others and China's exports to 
Mexico are based on equal and fair treatment," added Ignacio 
Pichardo Pagaza. 
  The PRI leader described trade with China as "of great 
importance" to Mexico, which believes that "China is going to 
play an increasingly important role in the economic development 
of Asia and we want to be present in that process." 
  The two countries can do other types of businesses together 
apart from goods export, such as bilateral cooperation in the 
petroleum industry sector where each country has its own 
technology, said the PRI leader. 
  "In this way I see a very brilliant future for relations 
between Mexico and China," the PRI leader said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27055 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  14 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   Peruvian Leaders Meet Chinese Oil Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Peruvian Leaders Meet Chinese Oil Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1706084494 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0828 
GMT 14 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW1706084494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Wang Quanfu (3769 2938 1381)] </F>
  [Text] Lima, 13 Jun (XINHUA) -- Peruvian Acting President 
and Congress President Jaime Yoshiyama and Energy and Mines 
Minister Daniel Hokama met with a visiting Chinese oil 
delegation on 10 and 13 June, respectively. 
  When meeting the delegation, Haime Gysun praised the growing 
cooperative relations between Peruvian and Chinese oil sectors, 
gave a briefing on Peru's oil development policy, and expressed 
the hope for further strengthening Peruvian-Chinese cooperation 
in the oil industry. 
  Daniel Hokama and members of the Chinese delegation 
exchanged 
views on strengthening oil cooperation between the two countries. 
  Headed by Wang Tao, president of the China National 
Petroleum 
Corporation, the Chinese oil delegation arrived in Peru on 9 
June. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27056 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing, Caracas Celebrate 20 Years of Diplomatic Ties </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing, Caracas Celebrate 20 Years of Diplomatic Ties </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806142394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1415 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806142394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- A reception was held 
here this evening by the Chinese People's Association for 
Friendship with Foreign Countries to celebrate the 20th 
anniversary of the formulation of diplomatic ties between China 
and Venezuela. 
  Xu Qun, vice-president of the association, and Miguel del 
Pozo, charge d'affaires ad interim of the Venezuela Embassy in 
Beijing, spoke at the reception. 
  Sun Fuling, vice-chairman of the National Committee of the 
Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, and others 
were present at the reception. 
  Last night, Miguel del Pozo hosted a banquet to mark the 
anniversary in the embassy. Chinese Minister of Power Industry 
Shi Dazhen and Vice-Foreign Minister Liu Huaqiu took part in the 
party. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27057 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPPCC Vice Chairman Meets SELA Executive </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPPCC Vice Chairman Meets SELA Executive </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2506143294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1345 GMT 25 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2506143294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 25 (XINHUA) -- Wu Xueqian, 
vice-chairman of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference (CPPCC) National Committee, met here today with 
Salvador Arriola, executive secretary of the Sistema Economico 
Latino Americano (namely economic system of Latin America or 
SELA). 
  Wu, also president of the Chinese Association for 
International Understanding (CAIU), had a cordial conversation 
with the guest. 
  Earlier today, CAIU's Vice-President Li Yining, a leading 
Chinese economist, had talks with Arriola. 
  Arriola and his wife arrived here Friday [24 June] as CAIU's 
guests. They are also scheduled to visit Guangzhou, Zhuhai and 
Shanghai. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27058 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_s_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Rapid' Agricultural Development of Region </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Rapid' Agricultural Development of Region </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906062894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0609 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906062894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Northeast China, which 
occupies the position of head on the rooster-shaped map of China 
and used to be the country's biggest industrial base, has become 
conspicuous for the rapid development of its agriculture in 
recent years. 
  At present, at least 100 million of China's total 300 
million 
urban residents rely on the grain produced by the three 
provinces of the area, namely Heilongjiang, Jilin and Liaoning. 
  Last year the area produced 60 billion kg of grain, or 13.14 
percent of the national total. About half of the grain is 
marketable grain, which accounts for one third of the national 
total of such grain, which is supplied to the country's urban 
residents. 
  It is especially noticeable that Liaoning, an old industrial 
province where urban residents account for 73 percent of the 
total population, has produced more than 15 billion kg of grain 
annually for four years in a row. Last year its grain output 
reached 17 billion kg, 40 percent more than in the 1980s. Thus, 
the province has become self-sufficient in grain for the first 
time. Furthermore, last year it supplied 2.2 billion kg of rice 
to southern China and exported some rice to Japan. 
  At the same time, the outputs of other varieties of farm 
produce such as meat, eggs, milk, aquatic products, vegetables 
and fruit have also increased rapidly. In recent years the milk 
and aquatic products supplied by the northeast China area have 
accounted for 30 percent and more than 10 percent, respectively, 
of the national total. 
  Liaoning, which has 14 large- and medium-sized cities, used 
to be short of farm produce. Only a dozen years ago each urban 
resident in the province had a rationed supply of a mere two kg 
of rice, 1.5 kg of flour, 0.15 kg of edible oil and 0.25 kg of 
meat besides a supply of coarse food grains every month. When 
an urban resident of the province travelled to other parts of 
the country, he often carried back large amounts of pork, which 
was scarce at home. So, at that time people in the other parts 
of the country nicknamed the people travelling from Liaoning 
Province "hungry tigers from the northeast." 
  But now the supplies of meat, vegetables and other varieties 
of farm produce in the free markets of Liaoning Province are 
sufficient and the prices are reasonable. The province has not 
only become self-sufficient in the supply of farm produce, but 
also has surpluses. Last year Liaoning supplied 300,000 pigs to 
other parts of China. 
  The three provinces of northeast China cover an area of 
787,000 sq [square] km, equal to the total territories of 
Britain and France. It used to be China's metallurgical and 
machine-building base. About 50 percent of the total population 
of nearly 100 million people are urban residents, quite a large 
proportion compared with the other regions of China. Meanwhile, 
the area has 16.29 million ha [hectares] of farmland. 
  In recent years the leadership at various levels in 
northeast 
China has attached great importance to the development of 
agriculture. All the three provinces have increased their 
investment in agriculture. In the past four years Jilin has 
invested a total of 18.4 billion yuan (about 2.1 billion U.S. 
dollars) in agriculture, showing a yearly average increase of 11 
percent. In one year the province even invested one fourth of 
its total revenue in agriculture. 
  The provinces have also made efforts to promote advanced 
farming technology. Heilongjiang has spread high-yield 
technology for growing maize, rice, soybean and wheat. Liaoning 
has made great efforts to optimize the composition of 
fertilizers, interplanting and irrigation. Calculations show 
that scientific farming accounts for 40 percent of the factors 
leading to increases in grain output. 
  Attention has also been paid to mechanization of agriculture 
and to the development of a diversified economy, including the 
development of fisheries, forestry, animal husbandry and rural 
industrial enterprises, so as to increase the farmers' income 
and arouse their enthusiasm for production. 
  Gu Jinchi, secretary of the Liaoning Provincial Committee of 
the Communist Party of China, pointed out that the speedy 
development of agriculture in northeast China in recent years 
has not only made the rural economy develop in an all-round way, 
but also greatly supported the economic reform and industrial 
development in the urban areas. 
  Besides, the rapidly growing agriculture in northeast China 
has also played an important role in stabilizing the grain 
markets throughout the country after the central government 
relaxed controls over the grain prices earlier this year. In 
the past four years northeast China has supplied over 100 
billion kg of marketable grain to other parts of the country. 
  A senior central government official has praised the three 
provinces in northeast China, particularly Liaoning, for their 
success in developing agriculture, saying that they have set an 
example for the country's industrially developed coastal areas 
to develop agriculture too. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27059 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_s_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Acting Mayor Meets Japanese Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Acting Mayor Meets Japanese Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806014994 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806014994 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Acting Mayor Tian Fengshan met with a delegation 
from Hokkaido Development Consulting Company Ltd, of Japan this 
morning. Led by the former governor of Hokkaido, (Uchiko 
Nagahara), the delegation was invited by the provincial 
communications department to attend the ceremony marking the 
establishment of (Beilong) technology development company--a 
Sino-Japanese joint venture. 
  Acting Governor Tian Fengshan extended a warm welcome to the 
visiting delegation. He said: Heilongjiang and Hokkaido have 
established a long-term friendly cooperative relationship and 
profound understanding. Heilongjiang is a major province with 
rich natural resources. Its economic development over the past 
few years can not be separated from its achievements in highway 
construction. The establishment of this (Beilong) joint-venture 
company to engage in highway design and development is very 
conducive to the construction and development of our province's 
communications undertakings. He expressed the hope that the 
Hokkaido Development Consulting Company Ltd, will conduct 
further cooperation with our province in agricultural 
development and urban construction in Harbin, including the 
building of a subway train. 
  Also attending the meeting were Cai Qi, deputy secretary 
general of the provincial government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27060 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_s_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Secretary Attends Bridge Inauguration </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Secretary Attends Bridge Inauguration </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806022094 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806022094 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Daheihedao highway bridge which is an important 
passageway leading to Blagoveshchensk, Russia officially opened 
to traffic on 25 June. Yue Qifeng, secretary of the provincial 
party committee, attended the ribbon-cutting ceremony. 
  Wide enough to accommodate two cars running abreast, 
Daheihedao highway bridge involves an investment of over 7 
million yuan. Its completion will play an important role in 
invigorating the border port's economy and trade and serve as a 
major scenic spot in Heihe city. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27061 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_s_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Large Economic Region' Created in Liaoning Province </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Large Economic Region' Created in Liaoning Province </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906020494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0138 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906020494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, June 29 (XINHUA) -- A large economic 
region has sprung up in the middle part of northeast China's 
Liaoning Province. 
  The region comprises eight large industrial cities, namely, 
Shenyang, Anshan, Fushun, Liaoyang, Benxi, Dandong, Yingkou and 
Tieling. 
  As early as 1985, the eight cities decided to set up a 
cooperation region to give full play to their own advantages. 
  As a heavy industrial base of China, this region has sound 
scientific and technological foundation and the most 
concentrated railway network in the country. The 
Shenyang-Dalian expressway links the region with the leading 
port in northeast China. 
  By now, the industrial production value of this region has 
amounted to 62 percent of the total of the province and the 
heavy industrial production value to seven percent of the 
country's total. 
  In the past ten years, the region has established 22 
enterprise groups involving machinery, metallurgy and 
environmental protection, and it set up a united market in 1992 
in Shenyang, capital of the province. 
  The cooperation region not only helps the eight cities 
supplement each other but also helps these cities to jointly 
open the world market. 
  These cities have jointly held several trade talks and 
strengthened trading with Japan and the Republic of Korea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27062 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Fulfills Treasury Bonds Sales Quota </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Fulfills Treasury Bonds Sales Quota </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906092194 Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 0400 GMT 26 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906092194 </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] On 20 May, Guangdong fulfilled the task of selling 
1.2 billion yuan of two-year state treasury bonds ahead of 
schedule, and greater efforts were made to do a good job in 
sales of three-year state treasury bonds. By yesterday morning, 
three-year state treasury bonds amounting to 6.69502 billion 
yuan had been sold throughout the province. In this way, 
Guangdong has fulfilled the state-assigned task of selling state 
treasury bonds ahead of schedule. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27063 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_p_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenzhen's Industrial Output Rises 35.8 Percent Jan-May </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenzhen's Industrial Output Rises 35.8 Percent Jan-May </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806151594 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1054 
GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806151594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenzhen, 27 Jun (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--Statistics 
from the relevant department show that Shenzhen's economy 
enjoyed sustained, stable, and coordinated development [chi xu 
wen ding xie tiao 2170 4958 4489 1353 0588 6148] in the first 
half of this year and that construction undertakings have taken 
on a sound momentum of development on several occasions. 
  Between January and May this year, industrial production 
continued to maintain a comparatively high growth rate, 
accumulated gross industrial output value increased by 38.5 
percent over the same period last year, and the industrial 
production setup was readjusted somewhat. The market was brisk 
and lively. From January to May, the total volume of retail 
sales increased by 42.9 percent over the same period last year. 
Foreign trade increased by a wide margin. Because of such 
measures as foreign trade and foreign exchange restructuring, 
the merger of the dual-track foreign exchange rates, and the 
abolition of handing over foreign exchange this year, the 
enthusiasm of enterprises for exports to bring in foreign 
exchange has been given full play. From January to May, the 
export volume was $1.898 billion, an increase of 22.1 percent. 
At the same time, financial revenues increased with the same 
high rate of growth, with financial condition improving somewhat 
and the favorable balance of savings deposits and loans 
increasing. In addition, Shenzhen's building of key projects 
enjoyed smooth progress. Of 20 key projects in the arrangements 
made this year, assessment of the first phase of the No. 1 
subway line was completed, a proposal on the eastern power plant 
has been approved by the State Planning Commission, the 
extra-large integrated circuit project completed listing work in 
the plan, construction of a second airport lounge and the 
expansion of the parking apron are in full swing, and the first 
phase of Yantian Port passed checks before acceptance by the 
state. 
  On the whole, while conducting finance, taxation, banking 
and 
foreign exchange restructuring, Shenzhen's economic construction 
enjoyed comprehensive and harmonious development in the first 
half of the year and laid a sound foundation for the city's 
economic development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27064 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_p_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Governor Chairs Meetings on Yangpu Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Governor Chairs Meetings on Yangpu Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906062694 Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906062694 </F>
<F P=104>  Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Governor Ruan Chongwu presided over of the 37th and 
38th routine work meetings of the provincial government on the 
morning and afternoon of 24 June. At the meetings, the final 
draft for deliberation of the Regulations on the Supervision and 
Management of Quality of Products of Hainan Province was 
deliberated and approved in principle, and issues concerning 
development and construction of Yangpu were discussed. 
Attending the meetings were Vice Governors Wang Xiaofeng, Wang 
Xueping, Mao Zhijun, and Liu Mingqi, and Secretary General Cui 
Zongjun of the provincial government. Attending the meetings as 
nonvoting delegates were comrades in charge of provincial 
departments concerned. 
  The issue of the quality of products has a bearing on the 
immediate interests of thousands upon thousands of households. 
Constantly improving the quality of products and ensuring a good 
economic mechanism of the special economic region are pressing 
needs for the development of an export-oriented economy and for 
improving the investment environment in our province. In the 
past two years, our province has repeatedly organized 
large-scale activities to crack down on fake goods and has made 
considerable achievements. However, viewed from the actual 
situation, the existing laws and regulations can hardly meet the 
need of enforcing laws on supervision over quality. The 37th 
routine work meeting held that to promulgate as soon as possible 
regulations on the supervision and management of quality with 
Hainan's own characteristics was of great significance to 
strengthening supervision over quality and protecting 
competition on an equal basis according to law. 
  The routine meeting approved in principle the final draft 
for 
deliberation of the Regulations on the Supervision and 
Management of Quality of Products of Hainan Province. In 
addition, the meeting also decided to submit the regulations to 
the Standing Committee of the provincial People's Congress for 
deliberation and examination after revisions are made. 
  The 38th routine work meeting discussed issues concerning 
the 
development and construction of Yangpu. The routine work 
meeting held that under the correct leadership of the State 
Council and the provincial government, and with the concerted 
efforts of the Yangpu Administrative Bureau, businessmen engaged 
in the development of Yangpu, and builders of Yangpu, great 
changes had taken place in Yangpu, China's first large 
development zone being developed by foreign businessmen over a 
vast area, and great progress had been made in development and 
construction. Major achievements made are manifested in the 
facts that the developers have basically fulfilled the contracts 
and have invested large amounts of capital in the construction 
of infrastructure in the past year and more, and the scale and 
speed of construction have tallied with the requirements of land 
transfer contracts and agreements on projects. In the Yangpu 
Economic Development Zone, the social order is stable and the 
people support the development and construction. Domestic and 
foreign investors have always taken a keen interest in and a 
positive attitude toward Yangpu. However, since the development 
and construction of Yangpu have been carried out without the 
support of a city or any infrastructure, and have encountered 
considerable difficulties, some time is needed. The provincial 
CPC Committee and the government will enthusiastically help 
overcome these difficulties, for example by linking the supply 
of electricity from the Yangpu Power Plant to the major power 
grid, by supplying water, and so on. The government will also 
enthusiastically coordinate with other sectors concerned to 
solve other problems. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27065 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_p_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hubei Secretary, Governor Study Deng's Theories </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hubei Secretary, Governor Study Deng's Theories </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906005194 Wuhan Hubei People's Radio Network in Mandarin 
1000 GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906005194 </F>
<F P=104>  Wuhan Hubei People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial party committee standing committee's 
core theory study group met on 23 June to study socialist market 
economy theories. After listening to a lecture by Wuhan 
University Professor Chen Shuxiang, the core theory study group 
members -- including Guan Guangfu [secretary of the provincial 
party committee], Jia Zhijie [governor], Hui Liangyu, Qian 
Yunlu, Ding Fengying, Li Daqiang, Wang Zhongnong, Deng Guozheng, 
and Huang Yuanzhi -- glowingly expressed views on Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's market economy theories in light of the province's 
realities. They acknowledged the importance and urgency of 
studying socialist market economy theories and deemed the 
building of a socialist market economy structure, ideological 
emancipation, and the continued development of productive forces 
as a great and innovative experiment in China, as well as a new 
topic in the course of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. 
  The core theory study group maintained that given the fact 
that most cadres are still unfamiliar with the new situations 
and new tasks, it is all the more necessary to conscientiously 
study socialist market economy theories. The socialist market 
economy is part and parcel of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. In order to 
grasp socialist market economy theories, it is imperative to 
comprehensively and systematically study the relevant 
expositions contained in Volume 3 of Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping; clearly understand the spirit and essence of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's expositions; and make painstaking 
efforts to study and comprehend the "Decision of the Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee" in order to 
accurately grasp the guiding ideology, basic principles, and 
specific steps of the on-going reform. 
  The core theory study group stressed that the key to 
building 
a socialist market economy structure lies in placing resources 
under both market regulation and state macroeconomic regulation 
and control. In building a socialist market economy, it is 
imperative to abide by the law of value, adapt to changes in 
supply-demand relations, and provide more efficient sectors with 
more resources by virtue of the lever of prices and through a 
competition mechanism. 
  The core theory study group noted: We often are confronted 
with the following scenario: Once control is lifted, economic 
operation becomes chaotic, and once regulated, economic 
operation becomes stifled. This is because there has been no 
sound market mechanism in the province. In the process of 
economic regulation and control, we have been unable to clearly 
define macroeconomic regulation and control, intermediate 
economic regulation and control, and microeconomic regulation 
and control. This is why we are still unable to employ various 
economic regulation and control measures in a coordinated 
fashion. In addition, the country has yet to build a unified 
big market. Under such circumstances, we should correctly 
handle in practice the relations between stronger macroeconomic 
regulation and control, on the one hand, and stronger market 
mechanism, on the other; make flexible use of economic signals 
sent by the market; and waste no time in coordinating production 
and consumption. 
  The core theory study group asserted that in building a 
socialist market economy structure, it is necessary to 
conscientiously study and boldly draw upon successful market 
economy experiences from all countries in the world. 
Operationally, a socialist market economy is identical to a 
capitalist market economy. Thus we should boldly draw upon and 
master successful market economic experiences and measures from 
all countries in the world, as long as such experiences and 
measures are in conformity with the law of modern production. A 
market economy should not be built in total disregard of a 
country's basic historical and social conditions. We should try 
to digest and transform the successful market economy 
experiences of developed countries in order to make them serve 
socialism and help create and develop both a new economic 
operational mechanism with Chinese characteristics, and a 
socialist market economy structure. 
  The core theory study group stated that in developing a 
socialist market economy, we should build two civilizations 
simultaneously. This is at once a basic point repeatedly 
stressed by Comrade Deng Xiaoping, and a line of demarcation 
between socialism and capitalism. With regard to building two 
civilizations, party and government leaders at all levels across 
the province should strengthen confidence, make unswerving and 
persistent efforts, and develop a strong sense of 
responsibility. We should take overall interests into account, 
concentrate on key aspects of work, realize spiritual 
civilization in each and every domain, successfully sum up and 
invent new forms of spiritual civilization welcomed by the broad 
masses of people, build better systems and promulgate better 
rules and regulations for spiritual civilization, and strive to 
raise the standard and quality of spiritual civilization. 
  Before the meeting, the core theory study group members had 
already studied the relevant socialist market economy theories 
on their own. In accordance with a theory study plan, since the 
second quarter of this year the core theory study group members 
have started studying by themselves each and every relevant 
article carried in Volume 3 of Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, as well as the "Decision of the Third Plenary 
Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27066 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_p_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hubei Head Calls For `Better Style of Thinking' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hubei Head Calls For `Better Style of Thinking' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906060194 Wuhan Hubei People's Radio Network in Mandarin 
1000 GMT 25 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2906060194 </F>
<F P=104>  Wuhan Hubei People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] While speaking yesterday afternoon at the 
meeting to exchange experiences in improving the style of 
thinking of the leading bodies of departments directly under the 
jurisdiction of the provincial government, provincial party 
Secretary Guan Guangfu stressed: Departments directly under the 
jurisdiction of the provincial government should strengthen the 
building of their leading bodies and [words indistinct]. 
Provincial party Deputy Secretary and Governor Jia Zhijie 
presided over yesterday's meeting. Present at the meeting were 
provincial party Deputy Secretary Qian Yunlu and Ding Fengying, 
Li Daqiang, Deng Guozheng, and Huang Zhiyuan, Standing Committee 
members of the provincial party committee. 
  In his speech, Guan Guangfu fully affirmed the gratifying 
achievements scored, over the last few years, by the leading 
bodies of departments directly under the jurisdiction of the 
provincial government in improving their style of thinking. 
[passage indistinct] [passage omitted] 
  Some leading bodies and leading cadres have little interest 
in theoretical study. Some leading cadres' sense of purpose is 
getting blunted, and ideas such as money worshiping, hedonism, 
and out-and-out egoism are spreading among them. A small number 
of cadres are corrupt. Some leading bodies inadequately 
practice democratic centralism and are disunited and 
uncoordinated in action. Still other leading cadres have a 
superficial style of work, lax discipline, and are inefficient 
in work. We should attach great importance to these problems 
and take effective measures to solve them. [passage indistinct] 
[passage omitted] 
  Guan Guangfu pointed out: In the new situation, in improving 
the style of thinking of the leading bodies of departments 
directly under the jurisdiction of the provincial government, 
with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line as the guide, 
we should comprehensively improve their quality and genuinely 
build them into strong and fighting collectives which are firm 
politically, bold in making reform and blazing new trails, 
united and coordinated in action, and are able to perform 
official duties diligently and honestly, maintain close ties 
with the masses of people, and comprehensively implement the 
party's basic line. Therefore, at present and for a certain 
period of time to come, in improving the style of thinking of 
the leading bodies of departments directly under the 
jurisdiction of the provincial government, we should pay 
particular attention to the following aspects of work: 
  1. We should thoroughly study Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics, learn about 
socialist market economy, and strive to enhance our ability to 
solve practical problems by using theories as a weapon and to 
control the overall situation of market economy. [passage 
indistinct] For leading cadres to study theories, what counts 
is perseverance, willingness, and an effective guarantee in 
terms of systems. The core-group study system of the leading 
bodies of departments directly under the jurisdiction of the 
provincial government should be upheld. 
  2. We should practice democratic centralism, do an ever 
better job of maintaining unity among leading body members, 
foster an idea of keeping the overall situation in mind, enforce 
discipline, strive to achieve unity with the party Central 
Committee ideologically, politically, and in action, ensure that 
government decrees are implemented smoothly, and promote Hubei's 
reform, development, and stability. [passage omitted] 
  3. We should effectively improve party style and strengthen 
the building of clean government and strive to set a good 
example in performing official duties diligently and honestly. 
Persisting in opposing corruption and encouraging honesty, 
improving party style, and strengthening the building a clean 
government have always been the focus of the party building in 
the new period and especially improvement of the style of 
thinking of leading bodies. [passage omitted] 
  4. We should improve our leadership methods, change our work 
style, and improve our work efficiency. Leading bodies should 
start with overcoming formalism, enhance the sense of 
approaching things realistically and stressing practical 
results, and creatively do their work in light of the actual 
conditions of their subordinate departments. Leading bodies 
should energetically conduct investigation and study, adhere to 
the concept of from the masses and to the masses, go down to 
grass-roots units to extensively solicit the opinions and 
demands of the masses, find out the contradictions and problems 
existing in their practical work with comrades at the 
grass-roots units, study work, sum up the new experiences the 
masses have created in practice, offer specific guidance, and 
help them solve practical problems. [passage omitted] 
  In conclusion, Guan Guangfu stressed: Secretaries of the 
working party groups (party committees) of various departments 
should effectively and personally take up the job of improving 
the style of thinking of leading bodies and play an exemplary 
role in this regard. [passage omitted] 
  More than 1,000 persons including members of the working 
party groups (party committees) of the various departments, 
commissions, offices, and bureaus under the direct jurisdiction 
of the provincial government attended the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27067 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Enterprises Raise Output, Profits in Jiangxi </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Enterprises Raise Output, Profits in Jiangxi </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2806130194 Nanchang Jiangxi People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1100 GMT 24 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2806130194 </F>
<F P=104>  Nanchang Jiangxi People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] Since the beginning of 1994, our province's 
industry has developed rapidly. Industrial and communication 
departments have seized opportunities and concentrated their 
efforts on organizing production with the stress on doing a good 
job of elevating the efficiency of 100 industrial enterprises to 
a new level. From January to May, the total output value and 
industrial sales value of the 100 industrial enterprises 
assigned the task to elevate their efficiency to a new level 
increased 15.7 percent and 13 percent respectively over the same 
period last year. These growth rates were 8.1 percentage points 
and 5.9 percentage points higher respectively than the output 
value growth rates of large and medium-sized enterprises in the 
province. Their profits and taxes registered a rise of 28.7 
percent over the corresponding period last year. [passage 
omitted] 
  During the January-May period, the profits of the Jiangxin 
General Plant, the Jiangxi State Pharmaceutical Factory, and the 
Jiujiang City No. 1 Cotton Mill increased by 699 percent, 816 
percent, and 1,080 percent respectively on the same period last 
year. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27068 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Secretary Attends Overseas Chinese Congress </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Secretary Attends Overseas Chinese Congress </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2806015294 Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 27 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2806015294 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The fifth Shandong Provincial congress of returned 
overseas Chinese and their relatives ceremoniously opened in 
Jinan on the morning of 27 June. Attending the congress were 
some 400 representatives from across the province, from Hong 
Kong and Macao, and from abroad, and some specially invited 
guests. Provincial leading comrades Jiang Chunyun, Zhao Zhihao, 
Li Wenquan, Li Zhen, Tan Fude, Han Yuqi, Xu Xuemeng, and Tian 
Jiang attended the congress. Before the opening of the 
congress, these leading comrades posed for a picture with 
representatives. 
  Li Wenquan, deputy secretary of the provincial party 
committee, delivered a congratulatory speech on behalf of the 
provincial party committee and the provincial government. He 
said: Returned overseas Chinese and their relatives as well as 
Chinese residents abroad constitute an important force in 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. Thus, their 
patriotic initiative must be protected and exploited well. 
China's reform, opening up, and modernization are now precisely 
at a key moment. We hope that the vast numbers of returned 
Overseas Chinese and their relatives will, as always, further 
emancipate their mind, tap overseas potential, and positively 
plunge into economic construction. Overseas Chinese federations 
and organizations in various localities should mobilize and 
unite the vast numbers of returned Overseas Chinese and their 
relatives as well as the Chinese residing abroad to make even 
greater contributions to fulfilling all tasks of Shandong. 
  On behalf of the fourth committee of the Shandong Provincial 
Federation of Returned Overseas Chinese, Lin Shuniang delivered 
a report to the congress, entitled "Seize Opportunity, Utilize 
Advantages of the Returned Overseas Chinese, and Make New 
Contributions to Shandong's Reform, Opening Up, and 
Modernization." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27069 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Team Meets Shandong Secretary To Discuss Discipline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Team Meets Shandong Secretary To Discuss Discipline </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906014894 Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2906014894 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] On the afternoon of 27 June, after the provincial 
team to report advanced deeds in administrative honesty and 
diligence arrived in Jinan, Jiang Chunyun, secretary of the 
provincial party committee; Li Wenquan, deputy secretary of the 
provincial party committee; and Tan Fude, standing committee 
member of the provincial party committee and secretary of the 
provincial discipline inspection commission, cordially met and 
talked with all members of the team. 
  Jiang Chunyun pointed out in his speech: On the occasion of 
commemorating the 73d anniversary of the founding of the CPC, it 
is very necessary for the province to organize a team to report 
advanced deeds in administrative honesty and diligence 
throughout the province. Jiang Chunyun stressed: To 
successfully promote administrative honesty and diligence, we 
should, on the one hand, launch the anticorruption campaign in a 
resolute, in-depth, and sustained manner and severely 
investigate and punish a tiny minority of morally degenerate 
elements, and should, on the other hand, vigorously summarize 
and popularize the advanced deeds of a large number of 
individuals and collectives who have been maintaining 
administrative honesty and diligence, selflessly dedicating 
themselves to the state, and willing to be public servants of 
the people in a bid to promote healthy trends and foster a new 
atmosphere of socialism. 
  Jiang Chunyun expressed hope that this team would make good 
reports after going to 17 cities and prefectures in order to 
affect and educate the vast numbers of party members and cadres. 
Jiang Chunyun also expressed hope that press, radio, and 
television units would vigorously publicize and report the deeds 
of this team to form a social effect so that these advanced 
deeds would yield positive results in various professions and 
trades. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27070 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  19 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign-Funded Enterprises `Infringe' on Workers' Rights </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign-Funded Enterprises `Infringe' on Workers' Rights </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906061394 Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 19 Jun 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> SK2906061394 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By trainee Li Fujie (2621 1133 2638) and reporter Wang </F>
Fuliang (3769 4395 0081): "The Three Types of Foreign-Funded 
Enterprises Must Not Infringe on the Legal Rights and Interests 
of Staff Members and Workers"] 
  [Text] The three types of foreign-funded enterprises have 
developed rapidly in Shandong over the past few years. 
According to statistics, Shandong's three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises had totaled 14,000 by the end of June 
this year, instilling new vigor into Shandong's economy and 
becoming the choice of more and more job seekers thanks to their 
special charm. As has been shown in the survey conducted by 
pertinent departments, however, many of the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises, especially the enterprises 
exclusively funded by foreign firms and the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises located in towns and townships, have 
infringed on the legal rights and interests of their staff 
members and workers to a rather serious extent. For this 
reason, people say that the three types of foreign-funded 
enterprises are no longer the "paradise" of the choice of job 
seekers. 
  --The three types of foreign-funded enterprises do not sign 
labor contracts with their staff members and workers. The 
survey of labor departments showed that about 70 to 80 percent 
of the three types of foreign-funded enterprises did not sign 
labor contracts with their staff members and workers, so that 
they could dismiss staff members and workers any time they 
wanted. Once disputes occurred, labor arbitration departments 
also had difficulty in handling them, making it difficult to 
duly protect the legal rights and interests of staff members and 
workers. 
  --The three types of foreign-funded enterprises adopt 
various 
means to embezzle the wages of staff members of workers and 
default payment. The three types of foreign-funded enterprises 
were once a favorite among job seekers due to their excellent 
pay. Many such enterprises, however, no longer offer "higher 
pay." According to relevant state stipulations, the basic wages 
of staff members and workers of the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises should be at least 20 percent higher 
than that of the state-owned enterprises of the same trades in 
the same localities. "Doing one thing under the cover of 
another," however, some three types of foreign-funded 
enterprises included numerous subsidies of enterprises with 
basic wages and compared it with basic wages of other 
enterprises. In appearance, the basic wage of these three types 
of foreign-funded enterprises was higher, but the actual income 
of their staff members and workers was much lower. Some 
enterprises even defied state stipulations to withhold overtime 
pay. 
  --The three types of foreign-funded enterprises are wanton 
in 
their administration and meting out of physical punishment to 
workers. The bosses of some enterprises scolded or beat staff 
members and workers at every turn and ordered those who had 
violated plant regulations to face the wall or run around the 
plants as punishment. 
  --The three types of foreign-funded enterprises provide poor 
labor protection. According to the survey of the labor 
department of a certain city, 33 percent of the local three 
types of foreign-funded enterprises developed production in a 
very poor environment, 95 percent of them lacked necessary labor 
protection facilities, and one recorded lead poisoning levels 
dozens of times higher than the standard in their workshops. At 
some enterprises, the overtime hours of their staff members and 
workers exceeded the state-stipulated amount by over 100 hours. 
A joint venture in a certain city even asked pregnant workers 
and workers at nursing period to work overtime or regarded them 
as being absent without leave and dealt with them accordingly if 
they refused. 
  --The three types of foreign-funded enterprises adopt harsh 
terms in labor management. The rules and regulations of many of 
the three types of foreign-funded enterprises go against China's 
labor laws and regulations. For example, some enterprises 
dismissed their workers for absence without leave for even a 
single day or banned their workers from going to restroom during 
work hours. 
  In view of the infringement on the legal rights and 
interests 
of staff members and workers by some three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises, responsible persons of the 
provincial labor department called for accelerating legislation 
so that there will be laws to abide by in labor protection. 
They also called for improving the trade unions of the three 
types of foreign-funded enterprises so that staff members and 
workers will have a place to turn to when they have something to 
say. Meanwhile, they also urged the staff members and workers 
of the three types of foreign-funded enterprises to enhance 
awareness of laws to protect their own legal rights and 
interests. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27071 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  13 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Issues Regulations for Social Security System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Issues Regulations for Social Security System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906101594 Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 13 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> SK2906101594 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial labor department, industrial and 
commercial administration, tax bureau, and trade union council 
recently drew up a regulation to call for application of the 
old-age insurance system extensively to the staff members and 
workers of the urban collective enterprises below the county 
level, those of private enterprises, and self-employed laborers 
within a year. 
  The regulation states: The old-age insurance system should 
be applied to all the staff members and workers of the urban 
collective enterprises below the county level, those of private 
enterprises, and self-employed laborers. These staff members 
and workers and self-employed laborers, aged 60 or over in the 
case of males and aged 50 or over in the case of females, who 
have paid the basic old-age insurance premiums for five years or 
more will be able to enjoy the basic old-age pension, subsidies 
for medical expenses and funerals, and pension or relief funds 
for supporting dependents. The basic old-age pension is made up 
of two parts. One is a fixed percentage of the average monthly 
wage of the province in the year before the staff members and 
workers are retired. Those who have paid the insurance premiums 
for 15 years or more will be paid 25 percent of the average 
monthly wage; those who have paid the insurance premiums for 10 
to 14 years will be paid 20 percent; and those who have paid the 
insurance premium for 5 to 9 years will be paid 15 percent. The 
other is 1.4 percent of the average monthly wage based on which 
the premium is paid for every year of the period when the 
insurance premiums are paid. The basic retirement pension will 
be appropriately adjusted according to the average wage increase 
of society in the preceding year so that the staff members and 
workers can share the social development achievements. 
  Regarding the collection and management of the old-age 
insurance funds, the regulation demands: The basic insurance 
premiums paid by units should be no less than 18 percent of the 
total payroll, and individuals should pay 2 percent of their 
actual monthly income every month. The old-age insurance funds 
should be deposited in the special bank accounts and used as 
insurance funds only. No tax, fee, or funds should be charged 
from them. The basic old-age insurance premiums paid by units 
and individuals are recorded in the unified "workers' old-age 
insurance booklets" of the country, which will be transferred 
when staff members and workers are transferred, and the length 
of payment before and after the transfer will be calculated 
together. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27072 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Reports Anticorruption Results, Priorities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Reports Anticorruption Results, Priorities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2406131394 Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 23 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2406131394 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan Shandong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The forum on anticorruption work of some organs 
under the provincial government held in Jinan on the morning of 
23 June pointed out: We should correctly understand the 
situation of this year's anticorruption campaign and concentrate 
efforts on major points to ensure the even greater results of 
the campaign. 
  After listening to the report of the anticorruption 
situation 
of departments concerned, Zhang Ruifeng, vice governor of the 
province, said: Since the beginning of this year, party 
committees and governments at various levels in the province 
have achieved outstanding results in opposing corruption. 
According to the survey of 131 units directly under the 
provincial authorities, 24 cars bought in violation of state 
regulations were ferreted out; 22 imported 3,000-cc sedans were 
secured; 2,592 unreasonable financial levies were canceled, 
which would reduce financial levies by 250 million yuan; 228 
economic entities run by party and government organs were 
abolished; 6,378 economic entitles run by party and government 
organs were forced to separate themselves from party and 
government organs; and 125 overseas tourist teams were canceled, 
which would save some 8.12 million yuan in expenses. 
  For the next step of anticorruption work, Zhang Ruifeng set 
three demands: First, leading cadres should effect new progress 
in maintaining high standards of ethical integrity. They should 
talk and behave in strict accordance with the new five-point 
regulations set forth by the central authorities this year, 
should correct mistakes as quickly as possible, and should exert 
great efforts in yielding practical results. Second, new 
progress should be made in the work of correcting unhealthy 
trends. This year, the priorities of this work are to clear up 
unwarranted pooling of funds and arbitrary requisition of 
donations and exaction of fees from enterprises, to screen the 
overseas tours with public funds, to prevent party and 
government organs from sharing the interests of enterprises 
without compensation, and to vigorously check the evil trends 
prominently existing among departments and trades. Third, a new 
breakthrough should be made in investigating and handling major 
and appalling cases. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27073 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  19 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Holds Conference on Oil Distribution Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Holds Conference on Oil Distribution Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2906060194 Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 19 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> SK2906060194 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By correspondent Zheng Xinghua (6774 5281 5478) and </F>
reporter Hou Yanqian (0186 1750 6197): "Establish New 
Mechanisms for Smooth Operation of Production and Distribution"] 
  [Text] The provincial conference on reform of the crude 
oil and refined oil distribution system was concluded in Taian 
on 18 June. At this three-day conference, the guidelines of the 
State Council instructions were relayed, the methods for the 
reform of Shandong's crude oil and refined oil distribution 
system were discussed and drawn up, and rectification of the 
refined oil markets throughout the province was arranged. Vice 
Governor Wang Yuxi gave a speech at the conference. 
  Wang Yuxi said in his speech: The basic guideline of this 
reform is, by achieving a balance between the total demand and 
total supply, to control resources, prices, and tax revenues, 
rationalize the channels for marketing, implement the two-tier 
reserve system, strengthen supervision and management, and 
establish new mechanisms to ensure the smooth operation of 
production and distribution. The major content of the reform is 
as follows: First, based on the economic development rate, 
industrial policy, import and export policies, energy 
consumption pattern, the policy of frugality, and oil field 
production capacity, the State Planning Commission draws up 
annual plans as well as medium- and long-term plans for 
balancing the total supply and total demand of crude oil and 
refined oil to guide and arrange the production, import and 
export, and distribution of crude oil and refined oil. Second, 
the crude oil to be processed according to plans will be 
delivered to the petrochemical corporation by the State Planning 
Commission; and the crude oil not covered in the plans will all 
be organized for processing by the petrochemical corporation 
except for that used by oil fields themselves and the amount 
lost in a reasonable way. Oil fields are no longer permitted to 
exchange oil for electricity or materials and to provide crude 
oil directly to local governments. Regarding the crude oil 
delivered to local small oil refineries for processing as a 
support to the refineries, its amount will not be increased. 
All oil refineries will no longer take domestic crude oil for 
processing. Third, the refined oil produced by all refineries 
from the crude oil distributed by the state in a unified manner, 
the imported refined oil, and the refined oil produced by 
foreign-funded enterprises to be marketed in China according to 
regulations will all be distributed under state guidance. The 
distribution of refined oil will be organized by the 
petrochemical corporation along with the various provincial, 
regional, and municipal petroleum companies. Fourth, all the 
refined oil produced by refineries will be sold at the 
state-stipulated factory prices, and all gas stations and retail 
outlets should sell at the stipulated retail prices. All 
distribution units should strictly implement the state tax 
system and unify the tax rate. Fifth, the channels for 
marketing will be rationalized, and the intermediate links will 
be reduced. Sixth, the existing oil product wholesale units 
will be strictly screened, and the existing gas stations and 
refined oil retail outlets will be rectified with great efforts. 
Meanwhile, the sales agent system will be phased in. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27074 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_o_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Taiwan Investment Growing in Zhejiang </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Taiwan Investment Growing in Zhejiang </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806131994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1253 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806131994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hangzhou, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Taiwan investment in 
east China's Zhejiang Province has entered a new era to form 
group enterprises and go in for long-term investment. 
  Up to March this year, total investment in Zhejiang has 
topped 3.3 billion U.S. dollars, including contracted investment 
of 2.4 billion U.S. dollars from Taiwan. 
  First, the number of huge projects invested in is 
increasing. 
Among the 1,722 Taiwan investment projects, there are 34 
projects with an investment of over 10 million U.S. dollars 
each. Although the number is quite small, their invested funds 
account for two-thirds of all Taiwan investment. 
  Second, the investment field has been enlarged. Taiwan first 
invested in Zhejiang in such areas as beverage production, 
restaurants and clothing. Now, Taiwan investments have expanded 
to energy, transportation, petrochemicals, machinery, textiles 
and construction materials. And more and more 
technology-intensive and even high-tech industrial enterprises 
are emerging. 
  Third, long-term investment is growing. Many Taiwan 
businessman pay attention to intensive investment within 
professions, coordination between professions and development of 
series of products. The recently established Far-East Toy 
Industrial City and Taiwan Machinery Industrial City are good 
examples. 
  Zhejiang has advantages in attracting overseas investment. A 
Taiwan investor said, "I chose to invest in Zhejiang for its 
social stability and good basic infrastructure." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27075 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_m_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing's Purchase of Su-27K Fighter Planes Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing's Purchase of Su-27K Fighter Planes Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906062594 Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 23 Jun 94 p 11 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906062594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Ping Hefu (1627 0668 1133), researcher of Russian </F>
military affairs] 
  [Text] Russia officially confirmed in April this year that 
the CPC has decided to import a new batch of Russian Su-27 jets, 
and the two sides are now discussing the prices at the talks. 
At the same time, the Russian air force and scientific and 
technological personnel are helping the CPC set up a large Su-27 
jet maintenance center. Talks on transferring the Su-27 ground 
training simulator production technology are also under way. 
This shows that equipping the CPC's air force with Russia's new 
Su-27 fighters is just a matter of time. 
  News from the Russian air force and the Sukhoi Design Bureau 
has confirmed that the first batch of 26 jets are the Su-27k 
model aircraft used by the navy and air force, that is, the 
already imported Su-33 model, which is produced in limited 
quantity. It is noteworthy that when the air unit of the 
Russian navy (stationed in the Kara peninsula) was equipped with 
the first batch of 12 Su-33 model jets, the firing and control 
system was redesigned at the request of the consumer. The new 
generation of Su-33 jets are refitted with SS35 firing control 
radar. The air and ground search distance (of the improved 
N-011 "Beetle" model) is 400 and 200 km, respectively. It can 
track 15 targets in the air at the same time and intercept 6 of 
them. The whole process of the Su-27 jet from take-off to 
searching targets, launching missiles, and returning is 
automatic, and it needs almost no manual operation. When the 
CPC's navy is equipped with the Su-33, it will undoubtedly 
become the best functional jet in Asia. It outshines the CPC's 
Su-27, which is now in service, and has the capability of 
attacking navy vessels and threatening warning systems. 
Meanwhile, the future trend of the weaponry such as the new 
Kh31 anti-vessel missile and the AA12 middle range air-to-air 
missile with a firing range of 400 km, which are in conformity 
with the Su-33 aircraft, also merit attention. If the CPC 
purchases these weapons, it will be able to change the 
comprehensive offensive and defensive structure across the 
Taiwan Strait. When something happens, it can make the most of 
the long-range advantage of the Su-27 (3,000 km) and use systems 
like the AA12 to attack Taiwan's warning systems from the 
northeast or southeast. 
  The CPC's air force will possess a total of 52 jets when it 
is equipped with the second batch of Su-27. While its overall 
combat effectiveness has been enormously enhanced, the CPC will 
have more bargaining chips at the talks to obtain part of the 
Su-27 production technology. Viewed from the examples of 
Russian-Indian military cooperation, the transfer of production 
technology is carried out on the basis of a certain amount of 
imports. Nevertheless, it is unlikely that the CPC will batch 
produce the Su-27 and turn it into the main combat force in the 
21st century because it is costly, the production price for each 
aircraft reaching as high as $40 million. Moreover, the 
technology is complicated. Beset with economic difficulties, it 
seems that Russia simply cannot ensure a regular supply of 
technology and materials. 
  The purchase of Su-27K once again proves that the CPC has 
taken the needs of both the navy and air force into account and 
has resolved the source of aircraft for the manufacture of 
medium and large aircraft carriers. There was hearsay about the 
CPC's interest in the vertaplanes on board the Yak-141, but the 
report was denied by the Yak Designing Bureau. Hence, the 
intention of the CPC to build a large aircraft carrier for 
fixed-wing planes is very clear. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27076 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin Greets `Model Party Members' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin Greets `Model Party Members' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806144694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1438 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806144694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Jiang Zemin, general 
secretary of the Communist Party of China (CPC) Central 
Committee, today greeted model party members selected from 
central party and government departments and the Beijing 
municipality as part of the 73rd anniversary of the founding of 
the CPC, which falls on July 1. 
  Accompanied by Liu Huaqing and Hu Jintao, both members of 
the 
Standing Committee of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central 
Committee, and other senior party leaders, Jiang extended 
festival greetings to the 652 outstanding party members and 
advanced party workers present and posed for pictures with them. 
  The outstanding party members present today range from 
intellectuals to workers and farmers. They have been awarded 
for their efforts in different walks of life to push ahead with 
reform, help promote economic development and safeguard 
stability. 
  Meanwhile, they were lauded for striving to care for the 
masses, resist or fight against corruption, or explore new means 
for economic construction. 
  Over the past two years, a majority of the advanced and 
model 
workers selected were party members, according to the CPC 
Central Committee. 
  Communist Party members have made up 88.1 percent of the 
people who have received national May 1 medals, the highest 
honor given to advanced workers on the first of May each year. 
In 1993, 1.89 million party members were named "excellent party 
members" by party committees at various levels. 
  Last year, over 50,000 party organizations were newly 
established at grassroots and another 1.76 million people were 
admitted to the Communist Party of China. 
  The Communist Party of China has a total of 3.34 million 
local organizations. About 54 million Chinese people have party 
membership. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27077 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_k_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ding Guangen Addresses Propaganda Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ding Guangen Addresses Propaganda Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906013894 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1111 
GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW2906013894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 28 Jun (XINHUA) -- Ding Guangen, member of 
the CPC Central Committee Political Bureau and Secretariat, 
recently chaired a discussion meeting of propaganda department 
directors of some provincial, municipal, and autonomous regional 
party committees. Ding Guangen said: Since the party's 14th 
national congress and this year's national propaganda and 
ideological work conference, our major policy for propaganda and 
ideological work has been laid down. The most important thing 
to do now is to work under the leadership of the party Central 
Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin at its core, seriously 
implement the guidelines of the national propaganda and 
ideological work conference, persistently take Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory on building a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics as our basic guidance, uphold the party's basic 
line, and do a solid work. 
  Ding Guangen pointed out: The excellent situation of China's 
reform and construction has provided a favorable condition for 
us to do good propaganda and ideological work. At the same 
time, doing active work on the propaganda and ideological front 
can create a good environment for reform, development, and 
stability. Since the national propaganda and ideological work 
conference this year, party committees at all levels have 
strengthened their leadership over propaganda and ideological 
work. Remarkable progress has been made in studying and 
publicizing Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building a 
socialism with Chinese characteristics. In journalism, we have 
emphasized promoting unity, stability, enthusiasm, positive 
propaganda, and the general task of the party, and we have 
achieved comparatively good results. We have made great efforts 
to publicize and promote the main melody [zhu xuan lu 0031 2467 
1774], have introduced advanced persons with distinct features 
of the times such as Xu Honggang, Bao Qifan, and Zhao Xuefang; 
have carried out rich and varied mass cultural activities, and 
have promoted the building of socialist spiritual civilization. 
  On journalism, Ding Guangen said: Journalism is a very 
important type of work on the propaganda and ideological front. 
Since the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, China has accomplished the tremendous development of 
journalism. The number of newspapers has increased from 186 to 
2,039; radio broadcasting stations from 99 to 983; television 
stations from 38 to 683; and the daily volume of XINHUA 
transmissions from some 100,000 characters to more than 1 
million characters. An important task of our socialist 
journalism during the new period is to guide people with a 
correct media opinion. Such a task meets the need for deepening 
reform, opening up wider, promoting development, and maintaining 
stability, as well as the need for winning the people's support, 
promoting unity, making the country prosperous, and revitalizing 
China. It also meets the need for cultivating a new generation 
of socialist-minded people who have lofty ideals, moral 
integrity, education, and a sense of discipline. Journalism 
should serve the general task of the party and the state, work 
for the interests of the party, the state, and the people; 
actively develop a correct and healthy public opinion, arouse 
the people's enthusiasm for building a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, and promote the sustained, rapid, and healthy 
development of national economy and all-around social progress. 
  On how to actively promote the thriving and healthy 
development of the cultural market, Ding Guangen said: The 
cultural market is a component part of the socialist market 
system, and it is an important field in the building of 
socialist spiritual civilization. If we are to attain the 
second-step development objectives and make the people become 
comparatively well-off by the end of the century, we should also 
strive to accomplish the corresponding development of our 
cultural undertakings and our cultural market by then. In 
recent years, the cultural market has flourished in our country, 
yielding a positive impact on promoting the reform of the 
cultural system and the development of cultural undertakings, 
and on invigorating the people's cultural life. However, there 
also exist some unhealthy phenomena which affect the building of 
socialist spiritual civilization and which cause complaints 
among the people. Those phenomena must be dealt with properly. 
  Ding Guangen said: To promote the thriving and healthy 
development of the cultural market, it is necessary to make 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics the fundamental guide in our guiding 
ideology; uphold the party's basic line, adhere to the direction 
of "serving the people and socialism" and the principle of "let 
a hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought 
contend"; make sure that social benefit is the priority, 
integrate economic efficiency with social benefit, make the 
spreading of the main melody our main theme for revitalizing the 
cultural market; and serve reform, opening up, economic 
construction, the construction of socialist spiritual 
civilization, the popularization of national culture, the 
promotion of external cultural exchanges, and the needs of the 
people's spiritual and cultural life. As far as the work 
principles are concerned, it is necessary to equally emphasize 
revitalization as well as management, to promote thriving as 
well as healthy development, and to meet the needs of the people 
as well as to guide them cautiously. In approaching the 
existing problems of the cultural market, we should take both 
stopgap and radical measures, integrate centralized 
administration with regular management, form a full-time 
managing team while depending on social supervision, and make 
relevant departments share responsibility and coordinate with 
each other. Ding Guangen demanded that propaganda and culture 
departments at all levels vigorously organize the production of 
cultural products that publicize the main melody, and that they 
publish one group of fine literary and art works after another 
that reflects the spirit of the times, radiates the charm of 
art, and caters to the masses, so as to lift the spirits of the 
masses, to arouse their fighting will, to amass national 
strength, to inspire social vitality, and to promote the 
flourishing and thriving of our cultural undertakings. He 
expressed his hope that the broad masses of literary and art 
workers would go deep into the masses and their lives and 
dedicate the best spiritual nourishment to our times and our 
people. 
  Deng Guangen said: There is a great deal of work on the 
propaganda and ideological front. We must closely adhere to the 
four tasks proposed by Comrade Jiang Zemin: arm the people with 
science and technology, guide them with correct public opinions, 
form their character with a noble spirit, and inspire them with 
excellent works. We should enhance the sense of responsibility, 
work in a down-to-earth manner, and strive for actual results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27078 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_w_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vote on Patten Reforms `Too Close To Call' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vote on Patten Reforms `Too Close To Call' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2906114394 Hong Kong AFP in English 1127 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2906114394 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Robert MacPherson] </F>
  [Text] Hong Kong, June 29 (AFP) -- Governor Chris Patten's 
plans to strengthen democracy in Hong Kong ahead of the 1997 
handover to China were in danger of collapse Wednesday as 
Beijing-leaning opponents gained ground at a marathon sitting of 
the territory's assembly. Eight hours into the debate in the 
Legislative Council, the outcome of an historic vote on the last 
and most complex part of Patten's reforms was too close to call. 
  "Nothing is certain. We won't know until it comes to the 
vote. It's that close," Liberal Party deputy leader Selina Chow 
told AFP during a break in the proceedings. 
  Local radio station Metro Plus estimated that as many as 29 
legislators might vote to back Patten's original blueprint -- 
with another 29 going for the Liberals' version, aimed at 
appeasing Beijing, which takes back the British colony on July 
1, 1997. With one member, Jardine Matheson executive Martin 
Barrow, promising to abstain, a 29-29 outcome would force 
council president John Swaine to make a rare tie-breaking vote. 
  The Liberals are hoping that by boiling down Patten's 
proposals by limiting the popular vote, China would be less 
likely to scrap any changes, as it has vowed to do when it takes 
back Hong Kong in 1997. "Society has been destabilized (by the 
governor's proposals). There have been ups and downs," Liberal 
Party leader Allen Lee, who has close contacts with Beijing's 
Communist Party leaders, said. "Our ultimate target is not to 
opt for radical changes," he said. 
  But the Liberals' move was condemned by pro-democracy 
legislators, including Hong Kong General Chamber of Commerce 
representative Jimmy McGregor, who condemned it as a "convoluted 
nightmare." "It's a dog's breakfast and dinner that the Liberal 
Party is serving up today," he said. If the Liberals' amendment 
is passed, the spotlight will shift to Patten to see if he would 
accept such a radical change to the proposals that he first 
spelled out in October 1992 to Beijing's fury. 
  Fourteen amendments were on the order paper, including a 
long-shot attempt by independent firebrand Emily Lau for all 60 
seats to be directly elected -- even though China has vowed to 
scrap any electoral reforms after 1997. The Legislative Council 
has already adopted an earlier part of the reforms, which, among 
other aspects, enshrines the principle of British-style, 
first-past-the-post elections -- in lieu of proportional 
representation, which many say would help usher in pro-Beijing 
politicians. 
  In favor of Patten's reforms Wednesday were the United 
Democrats, Hong Kong most popular political group, whose 
vice-chairman Yeung Sum called Wednesday's vote a last chance 
for true democracy. "We should make use of the present 
opportunity," he said. "We already have the basic conditions 
for democracy." 
  Besides setting aside 20 seats for direct election in 1997, 
Patten's reforms would give almost every man and women -- about 
2.5 million altogether -- the chance to vote for 30 seats known 
as "functional constituencies." Such seats are set aside for 
special interest groups and business sectors, and now are filled 
by corporate voting, which Patten feels are open to manipulation 
and corruption. The remaining 10 seats would be decided by an 
electoral college that itself would be directly elected. 
  Launching the debate, Patten's second in command, Anson 
Chan, 
repeated the governor's oft-stated position that only his reform 
package can guarantee human rights and the rule of law in Hong 
Kong after 1997. "It is essential for the protection of the 
fundamental aspects of Hong Kong's way of life that it holds so 
dear," she said. She added: "Whether China will dismantle (the 
reforms) is a question only China itself can answer." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27079 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Says Overall Economic Situation `Good' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Says Overall Economic Situation `Good' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806135394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1345 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806135394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Premier Li Peng 
said here today that the overall economic situation in China is 
good and that the macro-economic control measures have achieved 
initial results. 
  Prior to his departure this morning for an official three 
European nation tour that will cover Austria, Germany and 
Romania, Li told the press that China's policy is to enable the 
economy to develop in a sustainable, fast and healthy manner. 
  China has taken a series of macro-economic control measures 
since June last year in a bid to curtail inflation, the Chinese 
premier said. These measures included cutting back on the size 
of capital construction, controlling the fast growth of 
consumption funds, promoting agricultural production and the 
urban vegetable basket project and tightening the control over 
prices. 
  "These measures have yielded positive results," he said. 
"The price hikes have begun to fall off over the past few 
months." 
  Though China has not reduced the growth rate to the targeted 
nine percent, he noted, it has been slowed down. 
  China's imports and exports have grown at a double-digit 
rate, far higher than that of the national economy. "This will 
no doubt contribute to the healthy development of the national 
economy and China's opening up," he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27080 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. To Send 3 Ships to Korean Peninsula </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. To Send 3 Ships to Korean Peninsula </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806223194 Beijing XINHUA in English 2217 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806223194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Washington, June 28 (XINHUA) -- The United States 
will be dispatching three Navy ships to South Korea to bolster 
U.S. military forces there, the Defense Department said here 
today. 
  "Two mine countermeasure ships, the Guardian and the 
Patriot, 
accompanied by an amphibious ship, Juneau, will be heading for 
the vicinity of South Korea," spokeswoman Kathleen Delaski told 
reporters at a news briefing. 
  She said that the minesweeping capability of the U.S. 
military forces in the area "was felt to be deficient" and "it 
would be foolish not to try and improve that capability." 
  "We're not going to stop the kinds of prudent measures that 
we've been taking over the past six months," Delaski said. 
  However, the United States has announced it would resume 
high- level talks with the Democratic People's Republic of Korea 
(DPRK) in Geneva on July 8. 
  "We're not going to stop those because the diplomatic 
efforts 
seem to be moving in a positive direction," she said, "we would 
continue to take those steps which are prudent, which are 
common- sense oriented." 
  The spokeswoman called those measures "purely defensive" and 
"should in no way be taken as provocative." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27081 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_c_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central Eurasia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin Meets Russian Vice Premier </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin Meets Russian Vice Premier </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906075394 Beijing XINHUA in English 0736 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906075394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Chinese President Jiang 
Zemin said here today that to maintain a long, stable and 
good-neighborly relationship and mutually beneficial cooperation 
between China and Russia conforms to the fundamental interests 
of both countries and peoples. 
  It also represents an important factor to promote peace, 
stability and development in the Asia-Pacific region and the 
rest of the world, said Jiang at a meeting with visiting Russian 
Vice- Premier Aleksandr Shokhin here this morning. 
  Jiang noted that Liu Huaqing, vice-chairman of the Central 
Military Commission, had had a fruitful discussion with Shokhin 
on enhancing economic and scientific cooperation, particularly 
on converting military technology to civilian use. 
  He said he was sure that Shokhin's visit to China will help 
facilitate such cooperation. 
  Vice-Premier Shokhin, who arrived here yesterday on a 
two-day 
visit, said the Russian Government is keen to develop its links 
with China and wants to develop cooperation with it in economy, 
technology and shifting military technology to civilian use. 
  Russia highly rated Sino-Russian trade and economic 
relations 
over the past few years, he said. 
  The meeting proceeded in a cordial and friendly atmosphere. 
  Liu Huaqing participated in the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27082 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_d_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPPCC Leader Wu Xueqian Meets Japanese Visitors </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPPCC Leader Wu Xueqian Meets Japanese Visitors </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906083594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0811 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906083594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- Wu Xueqian, 
vice-chairman of the National Committee of the Chinese People's 
Political Consultative Conference (CPPCC), met here today with 
Mishioki Kazumi, president of Japan's Seinendan (Youth League) 
Council. 
  During their meeting in the Diaoyutai state guesthouse, the 
two exchanged views on how to enhance the mutural understanding 
and exchanges between the two peoples, especially between the 
young generations. 
  Mishioki Kazumi and his seven-strong party arrived here 
yesterday as guests of the All-China Youth Federation. During 
their stay in China, the Japanese visitors will also visit 
Harbin, Shenyang and Dalian cities in northeast China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27083 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Minister Meets With Ecuadoran Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Defense Minister Meets With Ecuadoran Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2906034394 Beijing XINHUA in English 0303 GMT 29 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2906034394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, June 29 (XINHUA) -- General Chi Haotian, 
China's defense minister, met with Lieutenant General Alfonso 
Alarcon, head of the joint command of the Ecuadorian Armed 
Forces, and his party here this morning. 
  Alarcon and his party have come to visit China as guests of 
the Chinese Defense Ministry. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27084 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_s_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Good Harvest' Expected in Northeast Provinces </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Good Harvest' Expected in Northeast Provinces </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2806144794 Beijing XINHUA in English 1433 GMT 28 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2806144794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Harbin, June 28 (XINHUA) -- Northeast China, known 
as the country's largest bread basket, is expected to reap 
another good harvest as major crops like maize, soybean, rice, 
Chinese sorghum, millet and beets are all growing well. 
  Maize makes up one-third of the grain production in the 
three 
northeast provinces of Heilongjiang, Jilin and Liaoning, which 
are growing 5.7 million hectares of maize this year. 
  Sown areas for major crops like maize and soybean have 
largely been expanded this year as farmers have been encouraged 
by price incentives and various preferential measures by central 
and local governments. 
  An average northeastern Chinese farmer has 0.27 hectares of 
arable land, well above the national average. The three 
provinces have turned out over 50 billion kg since 1990. The 
region's grain output reached a record high of 60 billion kg 
last year, 25 billion kg of which were sold to the state, making 
the region a major bread basket in China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-27085 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi125_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-125 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jun 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Presents Tibet Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Presents Tibet Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2406140494 Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 6 Jun 94 pp 1-3 </F>
<F P=103> OW2406140494 </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on government work delivered by Gyaincain Norbu, </F>
chairman of the Tibet Autonomous Regional People's Government, 
at the Second Session of the Sixth Tibet Autonomous Regional 
People's Congress on 15 May; place not known] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies: On behalf of the autonomous 
regional people's government, I now submit a report on the work 
of the government for your examination and approval, and also 
for suggestions and comments from members of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other 
comrades. 
<H5>  I. Review of Work in 1993 </H5>
  Under the guidance of the guidelines of the 14th CPC 
National 
Congress and the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee, over the past year governments at all levels 
steadfastly implemented the party's basic line, made earnest 
efforts in implementing the guidelines of the Fourth Enlarged 
Plenary Session of the Fourth Tibetan Regional CPC Committee and 
the First Session of the Sixth Tibet Autonomous Regional 
People's Congress, adhered to the principle of "grasping two 
links" at the same time, made economic development our central 
task, and -- with the focus on the goal of establishing a 
socialist market economic structure -- deepened reform, opened 
up wider to the outside world, and promoted the development of 
productive forces. The gross regional product came to 3.65 
billion yuan, up 8.1 percent over the previous year in terms of 
comparable prices. Fresh progress was made on all fronts. 
  -- The economy in farming and pastoral areas developed 
steadily. Governments at all levels increased inputs in farming 
and stock breeding in terms of funds, materials, and technology, 
thus promoting economic development in farming and pastoral 
areas. The region's total agricultural output in 1993 topped 
2.32 billion yuan, up 5.3 percent over the previous year in 
terms of comparable prices. The region saw its sixth 
consecutive good year of agricultural production. The total 
grain output was 620,000 metric tons, up 3.3 percent over the 
previous year. In spite of natural disasters in some 
prefectures and counties, all the major stock-farming indexes 
rose slightly and remained stable compared to the previous year. 
Relatively rapid progress was made in the development of 
village and town enterprises and diversified undertakings. The 
total output value of village and town enterprises topped 100 
million yuan, an increase of 14.9 percent compared to the 
previous year. Income from diversified undertakings stood at 
240 million yuan, up 18.8 percent from the previous year. 
  -- The situation in industrial production was rather 
good. The region's total industrial output value reached 
535 million yuan, up 9.4 percent over the previous year in terms 
of comparable prices. The output of major manufactured goods 
improved markedly. The up-to-standard and good-quality rates of 
products improved, and the sales rates of industrial products 
reached 94.85 percent, bringing about, for the most part, the 
simultaneous growth of production, sales, and efficiency. 
  -- Smooth progress was made in infrastructure 
construction, with the focus on energy, transportation, and 
telecommunications projects. The region's investment in 
fixed assets in 1993 was 1.59 billion yuan, up 19.3 percent over 
the previous year. The Gonggar airport expansion project was 
completed and put into operation. The paving of the main runway 
at Bangda airport was basically completed. We have fulfilled 
our annual plans for renovating the Sichuan-Tibet, 
Qinghai-Tibet, China-Nepal, and Zetang-Honggar Highways. The 
Zhamu-Medog Highway has been preliminarily opened to traffic. 
The Yamzho Yumco and Chalong power stations overfulfilled their 
annual construction plans. Breakthrough progress was made in 
deep geothermal prospecting north of Yangabain. With the 
construction of telecommunications projects accelerating, urban 
telephone service in seven prefectures and cities has become 
automated. We have basically completed the earth-and-stone 
construction projects and the equipment installation for 61 
satellite communications ground receiving stations. The 
satellite communications ground receiving stations and automated 
telephone service have entered the stage of trial operations in 
seven prefectures and cities and 35 counties. Technical upgrade 
projects covered by the plan were completed rather well. 
  -- The region maintained a good momentum in growth in 
foreign trade and tourism. The autonomous region's total 
import-export trade volume was $103 million, up 60.9 percent 
over the previous year, of which exports were $15.03 million and 
imports were $87.60 million. Both figures showed marked 
increases over the previous year. As for tourism, we received 
23,000 tourists from Hong Kong, Macao, Taiwan, and foreign 
countries; the volume of business was 106 million yuan, up 14 
percent over the previous year, and the region earned $9 million 
in foreign exchange from tourism. 
  New progress was made in introducing investment from abroad 
and in establishing lateral ties at home. In 1993, the 
autonomous region officially approved 41 projects to introduce 
investment from abroad and to establish same-level ties at home, 
with contracts involving the use of external capital of 67.11 
million yuan and $9.63 million. In addition, the autonomous 
region set up, either on its own or in partnership, 129 
enterprises in coastal and other provinces and regions, which is 
a 370-percent increase over the previous year. 
  Customs, commodity inspection, hygienic inspection, animal 
quarantine, and border inspection departments offered active 
coordination and support in expanding opening up and developing 
foreign trade, economic cooperation, and tourism. 
  -- New progress was made in developing a market 
system. While improving the administration of industry and 
commerce, the region paid close attention to the planning and 
development of markets. The autonomous region built and rebuilt 
23 country markets. As a result of accelerated efforts in 
developing the market and improved market facilities, the market 
helped stimulate economic growth by guiding and promoting 
commodity circulation. The volume of retail commodity sales in 
Tibet was 1.9 billion yuan, up 12.8 percent over the previous 
year. Urban and rural markets were brisk, with flourishing 
buying and selling activities, and an initial success was 
achieved in cracking down on contraband and counterfeit goods. 
  -- Revenues increased by a comparatively large 
margin. Financial departments at all levels worked hard to 
push forward the development of production, and they made 
noticeable progress in expanding sources of revenue, 
strengthening financial departments at the county level, 
strictly enforcing the levying and management of taxes, and 
increasing revenues. In 1993, the region's local revenues 
totaled 156 million yuan, up 43.5 percent over the previous year. 
  --Living standards improved continuously. While 
directing all our efforts to develop the economy, we worked hard 
to improve the people's living standards. By stepping up 
efforts for renovating cities and towns and increasing the 
production of vegetables, meat, and butter, we met, by and 
large, the needs for daily necessities in both urban and rural 
areas. The per capita income of peasants and herdsmen was 521 
yuan, up 6.3 percent from 1992. Municipal facilities and living 
quarters in both urban and rural areas improved. New progress 
was made in social welfare services, such as giving special care 
to disabled servicemen and to families of servicemen and 
revolutionary martyrs. 
  -- New progress was made in education, science and 
technology, and other social undertakings. We made the 
development of education and science and technology a strategic 
priority by deepening reform and increasing input. A total of 
248 new schools of all types were set up in the region 
throughout the year. The school attendance rate of eligible 
school-age children reached 63.2 percent, up 2.7 percentage 
points from the previous year. Teaching conditions and quality 
were improved. Thanks to the energetic support of the State 
Education Commission and the provinces and municipalities 
concerned, notable results were achieved by schools that we set 
up in the hinterland which have a total enrollment of 11,000. 
In science and technology, we carried out basic research while 
attaching importance to the popularization of applied 
technology, which played an important role in revitalizing 
agriculture and promoting the technical transformation of 
enterprises. In social sciences, we carried out theoretical 
studies and academic exchanges in various fields, in focusing on 
ways to promote economic and social development, in safeguarding 
the motherland's unity, and in enhancing national unity. We saw 
a fairly rapid development in radio, cinema, and television 
projects and scored new results in literature and art, which 
have continually enriched the cultural life of the masses. We 
scored gratifying achievements in preserving our ethnic cultural 
heritage, and the work to repair the Potala Palace and other key 
relics proceeded smoothly. In public health, we made some 
headway in preventing and controlling diseases, in supervising 
hygiene, and in raising the standard of the people's health. 
Mass sports activities flourished, with the quality of 
mountaineering being continually improved. Fresh progress was 
also made in journalism and publications, meteorology, 
insurance, and other social undertakings. 
  -- We further strengthened work related to ethnic and 
religious affairs. We launched extensive education on the 
party's nationalities policy and on national unity, focusing on 
the implementation of the "Law on Regional National Autonomy" 
and the guidelines of the central conference on nationalities 
affairs. We further strengthened national unity, helped ethnic 
cadres grow to maturity, and continued to attach importance to 
studying, using, and developing ethnic languages. A ceremony 
was held to mark the completion and opening of the Great Stupa 
for Bainqen. In religious affairs, we concentrated on 
implementing the party's policy on religious freedom in an 
all-around manner, on strengthening the administration of 
religious affairs, and on formulating rules and regulations for 
managing temples and shrines. Meanwhile, we actively guided the 
large number of religious believers to help safeguard social 
stability and to promote economic development. 
  Under the party Central Committee and the State Council's 
kind concern and direct leadership and through the joint efforts 
of party and government organizations throughout the region, the 
party's policies were implemented in all fields. From 1980 to 
1993, a total of 220 million yuan were spent for the 
implementation of these policies, including nearly 100 million 
yuan for temples and shrines. The comprehensive implementation 
of the party's policies on the united front and on ethnic and 
religious affairs further enhanced the prestige of the party and 
the government among the masses and consolidated and developed 
political stability and unity. 
  -- We intensified the construction of democracy and the 
legal system and obtained fresh results in building spiritual 
civilization. The regional people's government 
conscientiously implemented resolutions of the regional people's 
congress and its Standing Committee, voluntarily accepted their 
supervision, and actively assisted the CPPCC regional committee 
in exercising its functions of political consultation and 
democratic supervision. The regional people's government 
earnestly handled motions of people's deputies, CPPCC regional 
committee members' suggestions, and visits and letters from the 
people; submitted six local laws and statutes to the regional 
people's congress for deliberation and approval; and formulated 
a number of administrative rules and regulations. We launched 
extensive education on popularizing legal knowledge to 
continuously enhance the awareness of laws among cadres and the 
people at large. We made headway in the campaigns to identify 
instances of "model counties (cities) in terms of double 
support," to promote spiritual civilization through the joint 
efforts of the Army, the Armed Police, and the masses, as well 
as in giving special care to disabled servicemen and to family 
members of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen, and in 
resettling demobilized soldiers. With a view to training a new 
generation of people who have lofty ideals, moral integrity, a 
good education, and a strong sense of discipline, we deepened 
and broadened education and focused on patriotism, socialism, 
and the Marxist outlook on ethnic and religious affairs. We 
scored fresh progress in building socialist spiritual 
civilization. 
  The Army and Armed Police units stationed in Tibet, while 
endeavoring to become modernized, regular, and revolutionary, 
actively assisted local people in economic construction and 
contributed to safeguarding the border, stabilizing the 
situation, supporting the government and cherishing the people, 
promoting spiritual civilization through joint Army-civilian 
efforts, and rescuing disaster victims and delivering disaster 
relief. 
  All in all, 1993 was a year in which the people of all 
nationalities in the region, guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory of building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the party's basic line, seized the opportunity, deepened reform, 
opened up wider, and concentrated efforts on economic 
construction. The regional economy was further developed, the 
political situation became more stabilized, national unity was 
further strengthened, and advances were made in all fields of 
endeavor. The situation as a whole was good. The work in the 
past year can be summarized by the following distinctive 
characteristics: 
  Strengthening the sense of urgency regarding economic 
development, with mind emancipation as the forerunner. To turn 
the guidelines of the 14th National CPC Congress into conscious 
action by the masses and cadres, we made mind emancipation and 
changing concepts the prerequisite for deepening reform, opening 
wider to the outside world, and accelerating development; held 
discussions on mind emancipation and changing our way of 
thinking; and organized inspection delegations to learn from the 
hinterland. Through study tours, the cadres and masses enhanced 
their awareness of the importance of reform, opening to the 
outside world, and accelerating development after realizing that 
Tibet's economic development is lagging far behind other 
regions. After discovering Tibet's advantages and potential for 
developing the economy, the cadres and the masses became 
increasing enthusiastic about making plans, promoting 
development, building markets, and running enterprises. 
Throughout the autonomous region, 855 new state-owned and 
collective enterprises have been established with registered 
capital amounting to 830 million yuan, which is an increase of 
37.3 percent and 26.6 percent, respectively, over 1992. The 
nonpublic sector of the economy developed rapidly. The number 
of people employed by and the registered capital of individual 
industrial and commercial enterprises rose 73.8 percent and 71.6 
percent, respectively, over the previous year. Throughout the 
autonomous region, 46 private enterprises were established in 
1993 with registered capital of 7.31 million yuan, which is an 
increase of 330 percent and 120 percent over the previous year. 
  Intensifying the reform process while focusing on the 
objective of establishing a socialist market economic structure. 
In the reform of rural and pastoral areas, by further 
stabilizing and improving the policy in connection with "no 
changes in two aspects for a long time to come," developing 
social service systems, readjusting the production setup, and 
accelerating market construction in rural and pastoral areas, we 
promoted economic development in these areas. In enterprise 
reform, in focusing on transforming the operating mechanisms of 
enterprises, we ensured that enterprises enjoyed independent 
decision-making power, and we worked hard to improve 
enterprises' external environment for production and operations. 
As a result, their vitality was enhanced, and their economic 
performance rose. At the same time, we also conducted 
experiments in practicing the shareholding system in some 
enterprises and in forming enterprise groups. A big stride was 
made in pricing reform. We decontrolled the selling prices for 
timber. In accordance with the state's unified plan, we 
readjusted the prices of grain, edible oils, petroleum, and 
electricity. In a reform of the planning system, we delegated 
to lower-level organizations the power to examine and approve 
some capital construction investment and technical 
transformation projects. Enterprises were given greater power in 
making investments, while prefectures and counties were given 
greater control over financial and material resources, 
investment, and other areas. Besides, we have drawn up a 
preliminary program for reform of the financial, taxation, 
circulation, labor and employment, and housing systems, as well 
as reform of the social security system after carrying out 
investigations and conducting feasibility studies. 
  Improving and strengthening macroeconomic regulation and 
control to promote the healthy development of the economy. In 
accordance with the guidelines of Document No. 6 of the Central 
Committee, we achieved marked results in adopting measures for 
strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and control 
to deal with the problems facing reform and development. By 
rectifying the financial order, we succeeded in putting a stop 
to illegal interbank lending and indiscriminate fund-raising 
activities. As of the end of 1993, banking institutions 
throughout the region had recovered 310 million yuan of 
interbank loans made in violation of regulations, with a 
recovery rate exceeding 60 percent. Savings deposits by rural 
and urban residents rose by a big margin, and by the end of 
1993, such deposits amounted to 905 million yuan, an increase of 
29.46 percent over the previous year. More than 2.5 million 
yuan -- money collected from workers and staff members -- was 
returned to them. 
  Meanwhile, vigorous measures were taken 
to ensure a better cash flow to meet requirements of key 
projects. Following intensified tax collection and management, 
various tax revenues rose relatively fast, reaching 219 million 
yuan regionwide, a 34-percent increase over the previous year. 
The issue of fund-raising and fee collection in farming and 
pastoral areas was reviewed and checked, those documents and 
regulations that run counter to the interests of peasants and 
herdsmen were abrogated, and unwarranted fees were abolished. 
While strengthening audit supervision, the continued general 
inspection of accounting, taxation, and commodity prices 
produced marked results, resulting in the discovery of 
unaccountable-for sums amounting to 49.99 million yuan, of which 
13.42 million yuan have been deposited with the state treasury, 
as well as the abolition of over 80 items of unwarranted fees. 
Thanks to macroeconomic control and regulation, the economy 
developed in a healthy manner. 
  The social situation was further stabilized through 
adherence 
to the principle of "carrying out two tasks simultaneously with 
equal attention to both." In promoting reform, opening up, and 
economic development, we consistently took antisplittism and the 
stabilization of the situation as a major task, and we 
effectively carried out an antisplittist struggle in light of 
the new situation and new characteristics that had emerged in 
splittist activities. In particular, in light of changes in the 
international situation after last May, the Dalai Lama clique 
changed its techniques by attempting to exploit "hot" social 
topics to create new disturbances and troubles. Under this 
complicated situation, we resolutely cracked down on various 
splittist activities by strictly distinguishing between and 
correctly handling two types of contradictions which are 
different in nature, by doing well mass-related work, and by 
firmly trusting and relying on the masses. In giving full play 
to the superiority of combining specialized organs with the mass 
line, we enhanced the art of combating splittism, gained 
experience in launching an antisplittist struggle under the new 
situation, and achieved new victories in this respect. At the 
same time, we stepped up the comprehensive management of public 
security by severely clamping down on a number of serious 
criminals, including murderers, robbers, rapists, and thieves, 
and effectively maintained social order. 
  Efforts were made to deepen the anticorruption drive and to 
constantly improve the social atmosphere. A full-scale 
anticorruption drive was launched in accordance with the 
regional party committee's unified arrangements after the Second 
Enlarged Plenary Session of the Central Disciple Inspection 
Commission, from which we gained a better understanding of how 
party and government organs ran enterprises. The regionwide 
self-screening exercise by cadres at the county level and above 
was basically concluded by the end of the year. In fighting 
corruption, discipline inspection and supervisory organs at 
various levels heeded information given by the masses and 
conscientiously carried out investigations of 141 clues 
involving cadres at the county level and above. As of the end 
of 1993, seven people were given party and government 
disciplinary sanctions, one person was referred to judicial 
organs, and 192,400 yuan in economic losses were recouped. The 
initial success achieved in the anticorruption drive further 
enhanced the confidence of cadres and the masses. 
  The achievements we attained were the outcome of party 
committees and governments at all levels earnestly implementing 
the party's line, principles, and policies, as well as the 
outcome of the people of all nationalities throughout Tibet 
fighting in unity and advancing courageously to overcome 
difficulties. On behalf of the regional people's government, I 
pay sincere tribute to the vast numbers of cadres, workers, 
peasants and herdsmen, and intellectuals; to Army commanders and 
fighters, Armed Police officers and men, public security and 
state security cadres and police, and officials of the central 
departments stationed in Tibet; and to patriotic people of all 
nationalities in all circles. I also extend heartfelt gratitude 
to comrades from fraternal provinces and regions and friends 
from other countries who have concerned themselves with and 
support Tibet's economic development and are here to help the 
region's development and construction. 
  A comprehensive analysis and summation of our work shows 
that 
there are quite a few shortcomings and failings in our work, and 
that we face many difficulties and problems down the road. The 
most salient ones are: 1) Our minds are not sufficiently 
emancipated; our thoughts are outdated; we have failed to 
explore more ideas and measures for accelerating economic 
development; and we have not moved fast enough in reform and 
opening up. 2) Because Tibet has a fairly large number of 
inherent difficulties and problems -- such as backward energy, 
transportation, and communications facilities; poor natural 
conditions; a lack of talented personnel; and financial straits 
-- we face a formidable task in establishing a socialist market 
economic structure, and we need to adopt sound, coordinated 
reform measures. 3) Tibet's underdeveloped markets and 
inadequate market mechanisms and rules still lag far behind the 
needs of economic development. 4) Poor comprehensive 
agricultural productive capacity and weak rural economic 
strength have slowed the growth of peasants' and herdsmens' 
incomes. 5) The functions of government departments still 
cannot catch up with the demand for establishing a socialist 
market economy; while mental sluggishness, inertia, 
bureaucratism, formalism, subjectivism, and other unhealthy 
practices which alienate government departments from the masses 
are prevalent among some cadres, and a handful of cadres are 
engaged in corruption and dishonesty. 6) Due to the sabotage by 
hostile forces at home and abroad, factors for instability 
remain and have even escalated in certain aspects, thus 
seriously undermining reform, opening up, and economic 
construction. The aforesaid problems merit our keen attention 
and should be earnestly resolved. 
<H5>  II. Intensify Reform Efforts and Promote the Sustained, </H5>
Rapid, and Healthy Development of the Regional Economy 
  This year will be crucial for carrying out comprehensive and 
coordinated reform programs, achieving breakthroughs in key 
areas, and accelerating the establishment of a socialist market 
economy in Tibet. The guiding principles for the government's 
work are: taking as our guidance Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the 
party's basic line; comprehensively implementing the guidelines 
of the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee 
and of the Fifth Enlarged Plenary Session of the Fourth Tibet 
Regional CPC Committee; seizing the opportunity, deepening 
reform, opening up wider, promoting development, and maintaining 
stability; and continuing to improve macroeconomic regulation 
and control, to step up infrastructure construction, to 
energetically readjust the economic structure, and to improve 
economic efficiency, in order to promote the sustained, rapid, 
and healthy development of the regional economy. Economic 
development targets are set as follows: 4.01 billion yuan in 
gross regional product, or an increase of 8 percent from 1993 
when calculated in terms of comparable factors. This shall 
include 1.87 billion yuan, or a 4.3-percent increase, for 
primary industries; 600 million yuan, or a 10-percent increase, 
for secondary industries; and 1.54 billion yuan, or a 12-percent 
increase, for tertiary industries. 
  In accordance with the aforementioned guiding principles 
and tasks, we must ensure that all our work for this year is 
subordinate to and serves the overall task of reform, 
development, and stability, with reform playing a dominant role. 
In Tibet's reform of the economic structure, it is necessary to 
judge reform against the criterion of whether it will help 
develop productive forces, seize the opportune time, implement 
comprehensive and coordinated reform programs, and achieve 
breakthroughs in key areas. We should keep our framework and 
system consistent with those of the state. Based on Tibet's 
actual conditions, we must act firmly, carry out policies 
flexibly, and take each step steadily and properly. Governments 
at various levels should meticulously implement various reform 
measures already launched and work in a down-to-earth manner in 
all areas. 
  (1) Quicken the Economic Development of Agricultural 
and Pastoral Areas With the Primary Goal of Increasing Peasants' 
and Herdsmen's Incomes 
  The issues of agriculture, rural areas, and peasants are 
always fundamental issues that concern the party and country as 
a whole. They are also the foundations for economic development, 
social stability, and the country's self-reliance. We must 
further increase our understanding of agriculture and animal 
husbandry and of our work in farming and pastoral areas. We 
must earnestly implement the "Outline of China's Agricultural 
Development in the 1990's" and unswervingly give top priority to 
agriculture and animal husbandry in economic work. For some 
time to come, the guiding principle governing economic 
development in farming and pastoral areas is to deepen reform, 
rely on scientific and technological progress, increase 
investment, make better use of our resources, readjust the 
industrial structure, quicken the pace of eliminating poverty, 
and increase peasants' and herdsmen's incomes in keeping with 
the need to establish a socialist market economic structure. We 
should continue to stabilize and improve the policy that will 
remain unchanged for a long time to come. We should institute 
measures to ensure that land acreage will not change with the 
increase or decrease in the number of people working on it; 
implement a licensing system for grassland utilization; and 
clearly define grassland utilization rights. We should 
gradually institute the system of transferring, on a voluntary 
basis, the right to use land and grassland in return for 
payments without changing the ownership and designated uses of 
land and grassland. With the government's approval and under 
the guidance of unified planning, we should encourage peasants 
and herdsmen to develop uncultivated shoal land and hill slopes. 
We should implement a system whereby those responsible for 
opening up and operating wastelands will get the profit. We 
should improve the grain contract purchase system and set 
minimum prices for local grain purchases to protect peasants' 
interests. 
  We should increase inputs in agriculture and animal 
husbandry. We should broaden the channels of investment in 
agriculture and animal husbandry by increasing the proportion of 
fixed asset investment, fiscal inputs, and credit inputs, and 
encourage collectives and individuals to increase inputs. This 
year, Tibet's budget for aiding production in the rural areas 
will increase over that of last year by 13.7 percent, while 
fixed asset investment in local budgets will grow by 33.3 
percent. Furthermore, the region has invested 120 million yuan 
in the comprehensive agricultural development project for the 
"Yarlung Zangbo, Lhasa, and Nyang Qu River Valleys." We should 
properly manage the investment in agriculture and animal 
husbandry and establish an effective macroeconomic regulation 
and control mechanism. For diversified investments in 
agriculture and animal husbandry, we should raise investment 
returns through overall planning and coordination so that the 
production forces of the two sectors will be combined. To help 
Tibet's poor peasants and herdsmen, we should exploit the 
relatively rich labor resources in farming and pastoral areas to 
further improve the labor investment system and strengthen 
infrastructure construction for agriculture and animal 
husbandry. We should prepare well ahead for agricultural and 
animal husbandry projects, actively institute the project 
responsibility system and the objective-based management 
responsibility system, and vigorously improve production 
conditions to lay a good foundation for the steady development 
of agriculture and animal husbandry. 
  We should restructure according to market demand. We 
should strive to develop the agricultural sector into a highly 
efficient sector which produces greater and better yields by 
cultivating new grain strains, improving their quality, and 
raising efficiency. While ensuring a steady increase in grain 
output, we should restructure the planting sector. In 
restructuring the planting sector, we should focus on the 
Yarlung Zangbo, Nyang Qu, Lhasa, and Nyang River valleys and 
gradually shift to a three-crop structure composed of grain, 
cash, and forage crops. While continually strengthening animal 
husbandry on grasslands and changing the proportions of various 
animals, we should also vigorously develop animal husbandry in 
farming areas, promote local grain processing, and accelerate 
the construction of bases that expeditiously fatten cattle and 
sheep. We should thoroughly and extensively develop 
comprehensive agricultural development projects. While 
developing these projects, we should also pay attention to 
helping the poor, to improving small river valleys, and to 
carrying out afforestation activities. Furthermore, we should 
comprehensively improve hills, rivers, farmland, forests, and 
roads so as to raise the overall productivity and efficiency of 
agriculture and animal husbandry. Additionally, we should make 
great efforts to develop village and town enterprises and 
diversified operations. When developing village and town 
enterprises, we should proceed from the actual conditions of 
various localities and formulate rational programs and 
comprehensive plans. We should concentrate them in cities and 
towns where the supply of energy resources is assured, where 
transportation is convenient, and where economic activities are 
relatively brisk. In accordance with market demand in Tibet and 
elsewhere, and after taking into account local advantages in 
terms of resources, we should develop whatever we can and 
organize production and management in whichever way is conducive 
to development. Where conditions permit, certain localities may 
develop some joint enterprises that operate across township and 
county lines, and should expand their production and operational 
scale and upgrade their products. Relevant departments should 
lend their full support to the development of village and town 
enterprises by supplying them with funds, technology, personnel, 
and information, and should properly guide and serve them. 
Various localities should pay close attention to diversified 
operations, which are an effective way to raise the income of 
peasants and herdsmen, are compatible with the current level of 
productive forces in Tibet's farming and pastoral areas, and can 
benefit thousands of households. We should mobilize and 
organize the broad masses of peasants and herdsmen to make great 
efforts to develop diversified operations so as to strengthen 
the agricultural and stockbreeding sectors' own ability to 
accumulate wealth and lay the foundation for even greater 
economic development in farming and pastoral areas. 
  We should implement policies to protect the agricultural 
sector and animal husbandry. Starting with the marketing of 
this year's newly harvested grain, we should raise the 
procurement prices for wheat and rapeseed. After fertilizer 
prices have been readjusted, we should provide peasants with 
funds -- derived from a reduction in subsidies to offset 
policy-induced losses in enterprises engaged in the production 
of agricultural means of production -- as outright subsidies so 
as to protect their enthusiasm for growing grain. The whole of 
Tibet, including all prefectures (cities) and counties, should 
actively gather money to establish funds against production 
risks for agriculture and animal husbandry. We should ensure 
the sustained development of agriculture and animal husbandry. 
We should also continue to take effective measures to earnestly 
and properly reduce the burdens of peasants and herdsmen. 
  We should realistically and properly help and support the 
poor. At present, some people in Tibet still have difficulty 
clothing and feeding themselves. We still face very arduous 
tasks in helping and supporting the poor. We must concentrate 
on properly tackling the arduous tasks in helping the poor in 
accordance with the State Council's "plan of helping 80 million 
poor households in China to shake off poverty by the year 2000." 
Tibet has formed a leading group specially in charge of tasks 
in helping the poor. We should formulate programs to help the 
poor across Tibet and should establish a help-the-poor 
responsibility system, as well as a system whereby leading 
cadres are responsible for helping specific poverty-ridden 
areas. Relevant departments should actively coordinate among 
themselves, provide support to key areas, and help poor people 
shake off poverty within stipulated periods. We should 
transform our help-the-poor program from one based on simple 
relief to meet everyday needs to one based on development, 
scientific and technological progress, and knowledge. We should 
take measures which are normally taken in construction projects, 
and launch a number of help-the-poor projects which can be 
completed shortly and can yield high returns so as to explore 
ways to help the poor shake off poverty and become rich. 
  We need to stress: Governments at various levels should have 
a firm conviction in combating calamities and in reaping bumper 
harvests. We should be fully prepared to combat major 
calamities and should strive to ensure bumper harvests in 
agriculture and animal husbandry in 1994. This is an important 
and realistic issue for developing agriculture and animal 
husbandry and for raising the income of peasants and herdsmen. 
We must attach great importance to this issue. 
  (2) Intensify Infrastructure Construction and 
Improve the Ability To Sustain Regional Economic Development 
  Energy, transportation, communications, and other 
infrastructure facilities are the material foundations on which 
to promote economic development, as well as the prerequisites 
for improving Tibet's investment environment and increasing its 
ties and economic contacts with foreign countries and other 
provinces and regions. We must endeavor to markedly improve 
Tibet's infrastructure within a relatively short period of time. 
  In stepping up infrastructure construction, we must deepen 
the reform of fixed asset investment, further arouse the 
enthusiasm of various investors, and gradually set up a system 
under which investment sources are diversified, investment 
decisions are made at different levels, and funds are secured 
through various channels. Based on how fixed asset investment is 
used in society, on the investment scope of various investment 
sources, and on the economic and social benefits and market 
demands of different projects, investment will generally be made 
in competitive, infrastructure, and public welfare construction 
projects. Financing and investment activities for competitive 
projects will be gradually shifted toward the market, with 
enterprises raising funds and building and operating the 
projects in the market, while investment in infrastructure and 
public welfare construction projects will be made mainly by the 
state and the autonomous region. Regional budgetary 
appropriations will be arranged and managed by planning 
departments, and used primarily for the construction of 
agricultural, transportation, energy, postal, 
telecommunications, and other infrastructure facilities, as well 
as for education, science, technology, urban construction, and 
other public welfare services. We will gradually establish an 
investment risk-control mechanism, actively implement the 
responsibility system for enterprise legal entities, standardize 
financing and investment activities for construction projects, 
and establish a stringent responsibility system for investment 
policy decisions. We shall strengthen macroeconomic regulation 
and control over investment scale, continuing to make mandatory 
plans for the total volume of budgetary and loan investment, 
guidance plans for other investment by state-owned units, and 
forecasting plans for investment by collective, private, and 
individual economic sectors. We shall reform the system of 
managing capital construction, organize and set up regional 
project consulting companies, gradually liberalize design and 
construction markets, and comprehensively implement the public 
bidding system. 
  In intensifying infrastructure construction, we must pay 
close attention to key projects and ensure their quality. This 
year, the regional budgetary investment in fixed assets will be 
50 million yuan more than that of 1993. This is the maximum 
amount that we can afford to make in view of Tibet's financial 
straits. All localities and departments must comply with the 
State Council's circular on continuing to strengthen 
macroeconomic regulation and control over fixed asset 
investment, earnestly strengthen investment management, improve 
investment returns, and strictly review and approve construction 
projects. In accordance with the regional industrial policy and 
with the principle of ensuring key projects, we shall take into 
full account the comprehensive benefit and give priority to key 
projects already under construction, as well as to agriculture, 
animal husbandry, energy, transportation, telecommunications, 
and other infrastructure facilities. We shall continue to 
expedite the construction of projects already under construction 
and their management after completion. Particular attention 
shall be paid to ensuring adherence to the construction schedule 
for and the quality of the Yamzho Yumco and Chalong power 
stations; the revamping of the Qinghai-Tibet, Sichuan-Tibet, and 
China-Nepal highways; the repair of Bangda airport; and the 
comprehensive agricultural development project for the Yarlung 
Zangbo, Lhasa, and Nyang Qu river valleys. 
  (3) Effectively Tackle Industrial Production by 
Centering on Upgrading Efficiency 
  State enterprises are part of the backbone of Tibet's 
modernization as well as the central link in the region's reform 
of its economic structure. In accordance with the demand to 
change the operating mechanism of state enterprises and 
establish a modern enterprise system, we must actively and 
comprehensively promote reform to raise economic efficiency of 
enterprises. 
  We should further deepen enterprise reform and continue to 
implement the "Regulations on Changing the Operating Mechanisms 
of State-Owned Industrial Enterprises," as well as the Tibet 
regional autonomy's measures for implementing the regulations, 
so as to fully grant various rights to enterprises. We should 
guide enterprises in concentrating their efforts on changing 
their operating mechanisms and raising efficiency. We should 
comprehensively promote the linkage of renumeration and 
efficiency as well as deepen reform of three systems. We 
should, in accordance with the "Company Law," actively explore 
an efficient way to establish a modern enterprise system, 
further clarify property rights relations, and strengthen the 
supervision and control of state assets. We should encourage 
enterprises to optimize their organizational structures through 
merger, separation, a shift to other product lines, takeover, 
and the establishment of enterprise groups. Poorly managed and 
inefficient state enterprises should be reorganized, leased, or 
auctioned off according to different situations. Bankruptcy 
experiments should be carried out carefully and properly in 
accordance with the law for state enterprises that have long 
incurred losses, have no hope of eliminating losses, and are 
unable to repay debts with their capital. As enterprises change 
their operating mechanisms and raise their economic efficiency, 
governments at all levels should change their own functions, 
better serve enterprises, and adopt more effective measures to 
lessen enterprises' burdens and enhance their vitality. 
  We should seize the opportune time for reform to upgrade 
enterprise production capacity and economic efficiency. 
Enterprises of various categories must strive to change their 
business strategies by gearing their operations toward the 
market and adopting effective production and sales measures. In 
accordance with the demand of the market economy, enterprises 
should strengthen their management and further improve their 
internal responsibility systems. They should enhance 
on-the-spot supervision as well as impose strict industrial, 
labor, and financial discipline. In addition, enterprises 
should establish and perfect their various rules and regulations 
and standards for production quotas; strengthen quality control; 
ensure steady upgrading of product quality; and bring about 
simultaneous growth in production, sales, and efficiency. We 
must conscientiously turn enterprise losses into profits, and, 
starting with state enterprises that suffer from heavy losses, 
we should make great efforts to reduce the proportion of 
loss-making enterprises and cut their losses. We should 
earnestly implement effective technological transformation 
measures through restructuring, upgrading product quality, and 
reducing energy and raw materials consumption to enhance 
enterprise production capacity and competitiveness. 
  We should quicken the development and utilization of 
resources, and convert abundant resources into economic gain. 
We should continue to develop livestock, forestry, and mineral 
products by increasing product varieties, enlarging production 
scale, and vigorously creating added value during the course of 
processing. This year, we should do a good job in preliminary 
work for gold mining and begin work early. We should exploit 
Tibet's unique material resources to actively develop new and 
superior economic sectors producing such goods as health care 
products and tourist souvenirs with uniquely highland 
characteristics. In accordance with the demand of the growing 
capital construction market, we should actively develop the 
building materials industry. Following the improvement in 
Tibet's energy supply, we should formulate early development 
plans for the processing industry and gradually implement them 
to strengthen secondary industry and make it a new growth area 
which can quicken Tibet's economic development. 
  (4) Open Wider to the Outside World; Vigorously 
Develop Foreign Trade and Tourism 
  Foreign economic exchanges and trade enjoy a unique, 
superior 
position in Tibet, as do tourism. Hence, they should contribute 
more to economic development. We must seize the opportunity to 
deepen reform, gradually establish operating and competitive 
mechanisms that are compatible with common international 
economic and market rules, and continue to open wider to the 
outside world in an in-depth manner. 
  We should deepen reform of the foreign economic and trade 
system; establish a foreign trade operating mechanism capable of 
meeting the requirements of a market economy; and uphold the 
reform orientation that emphasizes unified policies, liberalized 
operations, fair competition, responsibility for one's own 
profits and losses, the integration of industry and trade, and 
the promotion of the agency system. The highlights of reform 
are: 1) To move in step with the rest of the country in 
unifying the foreign exchange rates; abolish the mandatory plan 
governing receipt and expenditure of foreign exchange in export 
trade and the retention and delivery of foreign exchange 
receipts to the state; and to adopt a system of settling foreign 
exchange through banks; 2) to formulate and improve preferential 
policy designed to encourage exports; 3) to accelerate the 
transformation of the operating mechanisms of various categories 
of foreign trading enterprises by turning them from executors of 
state plans to dealers in import and export commodities, and 
introduce a system under which enterprises will link wages and 
bonuses to foreign exchange earnings generated by exports and to 
economic efficiency; 4) to empower qualified production and 
commodity distribution enterprises to conduct foreign trade with 
a view to establishing, as soon as possible, a number of foreign 
trading companies along the lines of general merchandise stores; 
5) to strengthen and perfect macroeconomic regulation and 
control over foreign trade to ensure a sound foreign trading 
order. The quota system applied to a small number of export and 
import commodities -- whose total amount is subject to state 
control -- should be continued. Quotas should be allotted 
through open bidding, auction, or standard procedures, they 
should take into account the efficiency of an enterprise, and 
operate in accordance with the principle of fairness and equity. 
  We should vigorously develop foreign economic exchanges and 
trade. We must, as required by reform of the foreign trade 
system, start with small-scale foreign trade and aim for 
large-scale foreign economic exchanges and trade; enlist all of 
society in foreign economic exchanges and trade; and use trade 
to promote opening up, which, in turn, will spur development. 
We should make great efforts to expand exports in a bid to 
stimulate the development of other industries. We should 
diversify our markets, take the initiative in entering the 
market, and seek development through fair competition. We should 
correctly apply the series of preferential policies offered by 
the central government, enhance our legal consciousness, 
strengthen management, and maintain Tibet's reputation in 
foreign trade. Currently, we should stress the following tasks: 
Using Tibet's resources to actively produce, for export, such 
key products as local and special farm and livestock products, 
ethnic handicrafts, and tourist souvenirs; taking advantage of 
our border location to improve existing trading posts and to 
simultaneously expand trade and develop cooperation in various 
fields with neighboring countries; appropriately linking 
production, processing, and export to promote the integration of 
trade, industry, agriculture, and technology; further 
strengthening economic and technical cooperation and lateral 
economic ties, and taking advantage of preferential policies to 
improve the investment environment and attract more investors 
from abroad and other parts of the country; exploring a variety 
of new ways to channel foreign funds; continuing to forge 
interregional cooperation with inland enterprises in various 
fields, establishing enterprise associations with them for the 
provision of mutual support and the exchange of materials and 
goods, and establishing joint production bases for the export of 
products in an effort to expand exchange-generating exports. 
  We will continue to vigorously develop tourism. We will 
concentrate on quality and efficiency and stress the development 
of tourist markets, resources, and commodities to open up new 
tour routes and tourist areas; gradually form a pattern 
combining individual tourist spots, tour routes, and tourist 
areas; and actively develop specialist tours such as 
mountaineering, expeditions, and scientific investigations. It 
is necessary to strengthen the development of new tourist spots 
and routes, strengthen management and quality awareness in the 
industry, upgrade the caliber of tourism personnel, and improve 
our overall ability to receive tourists. Efforts should be made 
to intensify propaganda and promotional activities, attract a 
wide range of tourists, and steadily develop group tours. We 
will strive for new breakthroughs in tourism in terms of the 
number of tourists, business income, and foreign exchange 
earnings. It is essential to strengthen tourism administration, 
contribute to social stability in carrying out tourism-related 
work, and resolutely put an end to the acts of some tour guides 
in colluding with foreign tourists to harm state security. 
  We will attach importance to and strengthen foreign-related 
work. While actively accommodating overall state diplomacy and 
focusing on the central tasks of the regional party committee 
and the government, we will conscientiously do a good job in 
frontier administration, consular and foreign-related work, 
protocol and reception, and the establishment of inter-city 
friendly relations and friendly associations, so as to try to 
create a good environment, continually expand foreign contacts, 
and promote the region's reform, opening up to the outside 
world, and economic construction. 
  (5) Continue To Properly Carry Out Financial, 
Taxation, and Monetary Work To Guarantee Funding for Economic 
and Social Development 
  Good financial and taxation work is an important guarantee 
of 
deepening reform and economic construction and social 
development. It is essential to conscientiously take good charge 
of financial and taxation reform, which is a major task in 
reform of the economic structure, and gradually adapt it to the 
needs of a socialist market economy. We should fully inspire 
the initiative of governments at various levels in increasing 
revenue, cutting expenditure, and developing the economy to 
continually strengthen local economies. 
  We will actively pursue reform of the financial and tax 
systems. 1) We will unify and lower domestically funded 
enterprise income tax and abolish the regulatory tax, bonus tax, 
and energy and communications fund contributions levied on 
state-owned enterprises. 2) We will enforce the new personal 
income tax. 3) We will impose turnover taxes, of which 
value-added tax constitutes the main component. 4) We will 
expand the levying scope of some taxes as well as abolish and 
introduce some other kinds of tax. In accordance with the needs 
of the state's new financial system, the autonomous region will 
implement in its prefectures and cities the financial and tax 
system of "dividing tax items, appraising revenue and 
expenditure, granting fixed amounts of subsidies, and 
implementing a contractual responsibility system at each level." 
It is necessary, as soon as possible, to draw up a realistic, 
rational program for specifically implementing tax system reform 
and determining the relationship, in terms of revenue 
distribution, between the autonomous region and the prefectures 
and cities and between the prefectures and cities and various 
counties, so as to truly implement financial and tax reform. At 
the same time, it is essential to reform administrative 
procedures for financial budgeting and work out a compound 
budget at the autonomous regional level. It is necessary to 
beef up organizations that administer state assets and 
strengthen such administration. We will earnestly carry out the 
appraisal of fixed assets and circulating funds in state-owned 
enterprises in accordance with the national unified arrangements. 
  We will earnestly and properly carry out financial and 
taxation work. Finance and tax departments at all levels should 
cope with the needs of the new system to give full play to the 
different functions and roles of budgeting, taxation, financing, 
and other means of regulation and control, and flexibly apply 
these means, to the extent required, in the light of changes in 
economic development in order to promote healthy economic 
development. It is necessary to vigorously organize revenue 
collection, strictly enforce tax laws and exercise tax 
authority, strengthen tax collection and administration, collect 
and deposit in the regional treasury the full amount of tax 
payment due, and block tax defaults and evasion. Continued 
efforts should be made to improve county-level finances. We 
should begin by developing production and foster inexhaustible 
financial sources to gradually upgrade the level of financial 
self-sufficiency in various counties. We must strengthen 
auditing and give play to its supervisory function in upholding 
the solemnity of financial budgeting. We should adhere to the 
policy of austerity and tightly control institutional 
consumption to guarantee adequate funds for key projects, for 
the payment of workers' wages, and for the implementation of 
various reform policies. 

    The banking service should continue to adhere to the purpose 
of supporting Tibet's reform, opening up, and economic 
development; rectify banking order; and play the important role 
of macroeconomic regulation and control of optimizing resource 
distribution. It is necessary to improve credit management and 
optimize credit structure according to market economic demand. 
A high priority should be given to the loans which are extended 
to support the development of agriculture, animal husbandry, and 
village and town enterprises, and easier terms should be set for 
borrowers to obtain such loans. The banking service should 
support the construction of energy sources, transport, 
telecommunications and other basic industry and key projects. 
It should support enterprises in changing operational 
mechanisms and taking part in market competition. 
  (6) Accelerate the Construction of Markets and 
Cultivate a Unified and Open Market System 
  While continuing to improve and develop the commodity 
market, 
we should accelerate the cultivation of the production-factors 
market, step up the formulation of market rules, maintain market 
order, and create a united, open, competitive, and orderly 
market system as soon as possible. 
  We should continue to deepen the reform of the commodity 
circulation system, encourage and support various economic 
sectors in participating in Tibet's commodity circulation, and 
create an operational mechanism for the smooth circulation of 
massive quantities of commodities through large markets 
characterized by a close relationship among producers, 
suppliers, and sellers. We should establish, step by step, a 
modern commodity circulation enterprise system; and develop such 
commodity circulation enterprises as enterprise groups, chain 
stores, and department stores. We should promote the 
integration of domestic trade and foreign trade, and conduct 
experiments in letting some commodity circulation enterprises 
engage in import-export trade. We should attract foreign 
investors, import advanced managerial expertise, and run 
Chinese-foreign retail joint ventures on a trial basis. We 
should set up an autonomous regional supply and marketing 
cooperative, organize county supply and marketing federations 
after experiments prove them feasible, and turn supply and 
marketing cooperatives into comprehensive economic organizations 
which serve the farming and pastoral areas and perform the 
functions of producer, supplier and seller. State-owned 
commercial enterprises should engage mainly in wholesale 
business and should take an active part in building the 
wholesale market. In principle, small state-owned commercial 
enterprises may be operated by private individuals under state 
ownership, or leased or auctioned off to private individuals. 
It is necessary to deepen reform of the grain circulation 
system and the reform of accounting system of petroleum 
enterprises. 
  We should actively and prudently promote the reform of the 
pricing system in accordance with the unified arrangements of 
the state, and seriously implement the autonomous region's 
commodity price reform policy. In the meantime, we should step 
up macro-economic regulation and control of prices, as well as 
the work of monitoring and tracking commodity prices. Whenever 
a problem is discovered, it should be solved promptly through 
coordination. A small number of important goods and materials 
are marketed mainly by state-owned commercial enterprises; the 
expenses in connection with their wholesale should be properly 
managed; and both minimum protective prices and ceiling prices 
should be set for them. Greater efforts should be made to 
monitor the prices of daily necessities and services for 
residents, and to ensure that the prices of commodities and 
services are clearly marked to protect the interests of both 
producers and consumers. Effective measures should be taken to 
establish a risk regulatory fund and an important materials 
reserve system. It is necessary to keep in reserve a proper 
quantity of certain important materials which have a bearing on 
the national economy and the people's livelihood, so as to 
ensure supply and stabilize the prices and the market. 
  We should gradually establish and improve the markets of 
various categories. At present, efforts should be made to build 
primary country markets in various counties and towns at which 
peasants and herdsmen will do business. It is necessary to 
build a production-factors markets, develop a money market with 
capital mainly provided by banks, and establish standard 
securities management and issuance organs. It is necessary to 
set up a manpower exchange center, open up the labor market, 
promote personnel exchanges between Tibet and fraternal 
provinces and regions, actively attract qualified personnel from 
the outside to work in Tibet, and gradually create a market 
mechanism for the development, utilization, and rational 
distribution of manpower. It is necessary to build an 
information transmission and feedback network which suits 
Tibet's reform, opening up, and economic development. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop individual and 
private sector of economy. The autonomous region's "Certain 
Provisions on Accelerating the Development of the Individual and 
Private Sector of the Economy" contain a series of preferential 
policies. No restriction whatsoever has been imposed on the 
proportion of the individual and private sector that can be 
developed in relation to other sectors. As for the speed of 
development, so long as the individual and private sector 
conforms to our industrial policy, produces marketable goods, 
and shows good economic efficiency, it can develop as fast as 
possible. In operating scale, we support this sector in 
creating large associations and running large enterprises. All 
business areas are open to the individual and private sector, 
except those areas prohibited by the state. The individual and 
private sector may operate in a flexible and varied way without 
being subject to restrictions, and it is permitted to operate 
state-owned enterprises under contract or lease, or to buy out 
state-owned enterprises. We support qualified private 
enterprises and individual economic entities using foreign 
capital to run joint ventures and cooperative enterprises. It 
is necessary to handle correctly the relationship between the 
government's macroeconomic regulation and control and the market 
forces because both are essential under the socialist market 
economic structure. On the one hand, we should actively 
cultivate and develop the market system, continue to promote the 
reforms of the pricing system and the commodity circulation 
system, and make the market play the basic role in resource 
distribution. On the other hand, we should seriously improve and 
strengthen the regulation, control, management and supervision 
of the market, continue to combat "fake goods and smuggling," 
and prevent and overcome economic disorder. 
  (7) Great Efforts Should Be Made To Develop Education, 
Science, and Technology, and To Improve Worker Quality 
  The establishment of a socialist market economic structure 
and the realization of modernization are ultimately determined 
by improving the quality of people, the training of qualified 
personnel, and scientific and technological progress. For this 
reason, we must always make development of education, science, 
and technology a strategic priority, and rely on scientific and 
technological progress to revitalize Tibet. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop education. We should 
seriously implement the "Decision of the Tibet Autonomous 
Regional Party Committee and People's Government on the Reform 
and Development of Tibet's Education," and make great efforts to 
develop education in the region while striving to attain the 
objectives proposed in the "Decision" that each county should 
have at least one middle school, each township should have at 
least one well-developed elementary school, and 80 percent of 
school-age children should be admitted to school by the end of 
the century, while at the same time striving to meet the 
manpower needs of a socialist market economy. In order to do so, 
we should first deepen reform of the education system in 
accordance with the state's general guidelines and unified plan 
for educational reform and in consideration of Tibet's 
realities. We should readjust the educational structure and 
academic disciplines to meet the needs of establishing a 
socialist market economic structure. Second, we should 
seriously carry out the "Procedures of the Tibet Autonomous 
Region for Implementation of the `Compulsory Education Law of 
the People's Republic of China'"; conscientiously strengthen 
basic education; arouse enthusiasm in all sectors of society; 
develop various forms of vocational, technical, adult, and 
social education at various levels; and accelerate the training 
of junior and intermediate-level technicians to meet the urgent 
need for economic development. We should give high priority to 
the development of teachers' education and train reserve 
teachers with both moral integrity and ability. Third, we 
should attach importance to investment in education. While 
schools are mainly run by the government, we should encourage 
the public to run schools by pooling resources, so as to 
accelerate the development of education. Fourth, we should 
seriously implement the "Teachers Law," build up the contingent 
of teachers, do a good job in teacher training, improve the 
teachers' performance appraisal system, improve teachers' 
political quality and professional quality, and adopt effective 
measures to stabilize the current contingent of teachers. Fifth, 
we should earnestly improve education administration and raise 
the efficiency of school administration and educational quality. 
While attaching importance to teaching basic theories and 
knowledge, we should pay attention to cultivating practical 
skills. Schools of all categories at various levels should 
firmly put the correct political orientation above all else, and 
strive to train qualified personnel who have lofty ideals, moral 
integrity, a good education, and a strong sense of discipline. 
  We should firmly foster the viewpoint that science and 
technology are a primary productive force and that economic 
development should rely on scientific and technological 
advances, and further strengthen scientific and technological 
research and development so as to solve crucial technological 
problems in industrial and agricultural production. We shall 
continue to do a good job in popularizing applied technology. 
Scientific research units should conduct technological 
transfers, technological development, technological 
consultation, and technological services, along with the effort 
to promote the autonomous region's technological advances and 
the popularization of agricultural and animal husbandry science 
and technology, and gradually shift to market-based and 
enterprise-type operations. On the basis of attaching 
importance to research and development, we shall accelerate 
transforming scientific and technological findings into 
productive forces in order to gradually guide Tibet's economic 
development onto the track of relying on scientific and 
technological advances. While concentrating on academic 
activities, science and technology associations and societies 
should attach importance to the popularization of science so as 
to create a good social atmosphere in which knowledge and 
talented people are respected and science is widely studied and 
applied. 
  We must effectively do a good job in training personnel. 
This is crucial to the smooth development of undertakings in 
our region. We must attach a high degree of importance to the 
work of training personnel and carry it out in earnest. We 
should adopt practical and feasible measures to stabilize the 
existing contingents of trained personnel. Efforts should be 
made to improve their working and living conditions so as to 
enhance their enthusiasm and give play to their wisdom and 
intelligence. We should encourage and urge trained personnel of 
various types to work at grassroots units and the frontline of 
production so that they can use their talent there. Meanwhile, 
we should accelerate the renewal of knowledge by strengthening 
the work of training existing personnel on the job and sending 
them for further studies in other areas, so as to meet the needs 
of economic and social development. We should actively bring in 
trained personnel of all types badly needed in our region. We 
should do this by implementing preferential policies and by 
combining the organized transfer of personnel with the free 
introduction of personnel, by combining permanent personnel with 
floating personnel, and by combining long-term stay with 
short-term stay, so as to gradually expand the contingents of 
trained personnel. 
  (8) Improve the Social Security System and Accelerate 
the Pace of Reform in the Urban Housing System 
  We shall accelerate reform of the social insurance system 
which consists mainly of old-age pension and unemployment 
insurance. We shall expand the scope of overall planning of 
old-age pension insurance and raise the proportion of overall 
planning by including in the overall plan the workers and staff 
of state-owned enterprises and the workers of state organs, mass 
organizations, and institutions owned by the whole people. 
Money to be collected from funds under the overall plan shall 
be increased from 20 percent to 25 percent; old-age insurance 
funds shall be arranged under overall plans at the autonomous 
regional level in order to strengthen the regulatory function. 
Efforts should be made to improve social security work in 
farming and pastoral areas by continuing to conduct experiments 
in old-age pension insurance and insurance against disasters in 
agriculture and animal husbandry. Meanwhile, we shall 
conscientiously do a good job in employment work by enhancing 
the enthusiasm of all sectors of the economy and society toward 
solving the question of employment and raising society's ability 
to create more jobs. Collective and individual economic 
entities whose main mission is to provide jobs for unemployed 
people will be given preferential treatment in these aspects -- 
scope of operation, credit, taxation -- to enable them to employ 
more people and lighten the burden of the masses and the 
pressure on society. 
  It is necessary to quicken the pace of urban housing 
system reform and establish a new housing system that 
corresponds to the socialist market economic system. The major 
tasks for housing reform are: raising public housing rents; 
providing appropriate subsidies to workers who have a job or 
have retired; comprehensively promoting the housing accumulation 
fund system; actively carrying out experiments in public housing 
sales by implementing preferential home purchase policies for 
workers within a specified period to encourage them to purchase 
houses; and proposing the gradual use of housing funds by 
government and work units exclusively for constructing and 
repairing urban housing. We should quicken housing construction 
to alleviate housing shortages and improve living conditions; 
gradually commercialize housing on a society-wide basis; and 
strive for notable improvement in housing conditions for Tibet 
residents within a fairly short period. 
  In urban construction, we should follow the principles of 
developing production, promoting economic prosperity, and 
improving living conditions; develop sound plans and execute 
them in stages with a view to developing central markets in 
which economic activities are carried out. We should strengthen 
overall urban management and constantly improve and give full 
rein to urban functions. We should carry out housing 
construction in counties and towns in a step-by-step manner. 
  In environmental protection, it is necessary to strictly 
enforce the "Environmental Protection Law" to protect and 
improve the production and ecological environments, prevent 
various environmental pollutants, strengthen environmental and 
geological monitoring efforts, and implement bioengineering 
measures to minimize losses caused by various natural disasters. 
We should earnestly strengthen the protection of precious and 
rare wild animals and plants. In addition, we must ban wanton 
poaching, tree felling, and digging to safeguard the ecological 
balance and bring environmental protection into line with 
socioeconomic development. 
<H5>  III. Strive To Create a Good Social Environment To Ensure </H5>
Smooth Process in Reform and Development 
  Development is the foundation for social stability, and 
reform will inject strong vigor into development. It is 
possible to promote smooth progress in reform, opening up, and 
economic development only when social stability is maintained. 
We must correctly handle the relationships between reform, 
development, and stability so as to create favorable conditions 
and a good social environment for deepening reform and 
quickening development. 
  (1) We should earnestly study Volume 3 of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping while keeping in mind 
the overall task of reform, development, and stability. To 
ensure smooth progress in reform and development, we must arm 
the people in Tibet with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. In particular, 
it is necessary to study well Volume 3 of the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping. This is currently a major event in 
Tibet's political life. Cadres at various levels, particularly 
leading cadres at and above county-level, must set an example 
and take the lead in studying the book well. Through study, we 
should truly grasp the book's essence, deepen our understanding, 
and correctly understand the important theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics and the major policy 
decision on establishing a socialist market economic system. We 
should further emancipate our minds, renew our concepts, enhance 
the sense of responsibility and mission to quicken Tibet's 
development, and continue to upgrade our political, ideological, 
and leadership levels. We should strengthen our capability to 
master the reform process and work creatively. 
  (2) We should adhere to the principle of "grasping 
two links simultaneously" and further stabilize the situation, 
and must deepen the struggle against separatism. 
Separatism and opposition to separatism, being a serious 
political struggle, have a bearing on the fundamental interests 
of the people of all nationalities in the country, including the 
people of Tibet. In recent years, our region has achieved 
significant successes in the struggle against separatism, but 
the separatist forces inside and outside China have by no means 
abandoned their scheme for "Tibet independence." Under the new 
situation, the Dalai Lama clique and international hostile 
forces are strengthening their collusion, constantly readjusting 
their tactics, and changing methods in their intensified 
activities to split the motherland. They continue to send 
agents and spies into China to expand their underground 
reactionary organizations and to intensify political, 
ideological, and religious infiltration. They are extending the 
feelers of separatist activities to farming and pastoral areas 
and are using every means to compete with us in winning over the 
next generation. Exploiting "hot" topics in society, they 
incite the masses, sow dissension among various nationalities, 
and create incidents in an attempt to undermine political 
stability and unity, and to interfere with reform, opening to 
the outside world, and economic construction. Facts show that 
separatist activities are still the principal factor affecting 
our region's stability and that the struggle between the forces 
for separatism and those against it will be protracted, acute, 
and complicated. Under no circumstances should we take this 
lightly and lower our guard. We must unswervingly grasp the two 
important matters -- opposing separatism and stabilizing the 
situation. After decades of development and construction, our 
country is becoming increasingly stronger with each passing day, 
with its status rising swiftly in the international community. 
The conspiratorial activities of a handful of hostile forces 
and separatists are doomed to fail, because we are determined 
and able to smash all their sabotage activities. In the 
struggle against separatism, we must firmly believe in and rely 
on the masses, conduct propaganda among them, organize them to 
thoroughly expose the separatists' schemes, constantly heighten 
the masses' consciousness of waging a struggle against 
separatism, and vigorously commend advanced models who have 
struggled resolutely against the separatists and serious 
criminal elements. Meanwhile, we should continue to give play 
to the special role of patriotic people of all nationalities and 
all walks of life in the struggle against separatism and try to 
build the struggle against separatism on a solid and broad mass 
basis. We must strengthen the people's democratic dictatorship 
and continue to implement the principle of "having a clear-cut 
stand, giving tit for tat, and dealing resolute blows." In 
dealing with disturbances engineered by the separatist forces, 
we should have resolute policies; our command must be effective; 
we must deal telling blows, and never should we become 
tender-hearted. 
  To consistently adhere to the principle of "grasping two 
links simultaneously" and to further stabilize the situation, it 
is necessary to strengthen the comprehensive management of 
public security. In line with the principles of combining 
prevention and control with the participation of the masses, 
combining crackdown with prevention, tackling problems as well 
as the root cause of problems, and giving emphasis to tackling 
the root cause of problems, we should further implement the 
responsibility system under which "the person in charge will be 
held responsible." We should mobilize forces in society and 
give full play to the role of military-police-civilian joint 
defense, public security joint defense, public security 
protection, and militia organizations, so as to enable them to 
undertake joint responsibility for safeguarding public security. 
It is necessary to closely integrate crackdowns and 
special-purpose struggles with regulatory work. Serious 
criminals and economic criminals, no matter who they are, must 
be severely and speedily punished according to law, so as to 
protect state security as well as the property and lives of the 
people. 
  To consistently adhere to the principle of "grasping two 
links simultaneously" and to further stabilize the situation, it 
is necessary to strengthen the building of contingents of 
personnel. Public security departments, state security 
departments, judicial organs, and units of the armed police 
shoulder the important historical mission of ensuring political 
and social stability in the country. Therefore, governments at 
all levels should attach a high degree of importance to them. 
The masses of police officers should acquire a better 
understanding of the situation and be aware of their 
responsibility. It is necessary to set strict standards of 
conduct for the police, effectively strengthen the building of a 
clean and honest government, improve discipline and work style, 
and strive to build a contingent of law-enforcing personnel who 
are loyal, reliable, and professionally proficient, and who 
strictly observe discipline and enforce laws impartially. We 
should give full play to their functions and role in maintaining 
stability, protecting the people, attacking the enemy, punishing 
criminals, and serving economic construction. Meanwhile, we 
should unswervingly carry out national defense education to 
enhance citizens' national defense awareness. We should 
conscientiously do a good job in militia reserve services and 
launch extensive activities to support the army and give 
preferential treatment to the families of armymen, and to 
support the government and cherish the people so as to 
consolidate army-government and army-civilian unity. 
  (3) We should strengthen organs of political power at 
the grass-roots level. Organs of political power at the 
grass-roots level serve as bridges and links to help the party 
and the government maintain ties with the masses. The strength 
of grass-roots organs has direct influence over the overall 
situation of reform, development, and stability. Generally 
speaking, grass-roots organs and cadres in farming and pastoral 
areas are good and able to stand up to all tests. Under very 
difficult circumstances, they have worked hard and made positive 
contributions to economic development and stability in farming 
and pastoral areas. However, the overall quality of some 
grass-roots organs is poor; some cadres are weak, unmotivated, 
and incapable of boldly leading the masses to fight against 
separatists; and there are not enough reserve cadres. 
Governments at all levels must resolutely and conscientiously 
resolve these problems. They must attach great importance to 
the construction of organs of political power at grass-roots 
level and regard it as an important mission. They must 
strengthen training of grass-roots cadres by offering training 
classes for township-level cadres who attend the classes on a 
rotation basis in different stages and groups; and enhance 
grass-roots cadres' political and ideological awareness, their 
leadership in economic affairs, and their levels of general 
education and scientific knowledge. We must seriously 
reorganize and consolidate a few grass-roots organs that are 
politically feeble and lax in organization. We must promote to 
leadership positions comrades who dare adopt a clear-cut stand 
against separatism and maintain national unity, and who are 
capable of leading and organizing. At the same time, we should 
select and cultivate leading cadres from among outstanding army 
veterans and young intellectuals who return to their hometowns. 
Leading organs at all levels must be geared to the needs at the 
grass-roots level, make efforts to help grass-roots units solve 
problems, take care of grass-roots cadres materially, cherish 
them politically, support their work, and give full play to 
their role. We must firmly crack down on people who harm and 
retaliate against grass-roots cadres. We must strengthen organs 
of political power at the grass-roots level in border counties 
and townships to enable them to carry out such important 
missions as consolidating border defense, fostering 
good-neighborly and friendly relations, making people in border 
areas prosperous, and maintaining stability. 
  (4) We should conscientiously do a good job in mass 
work. In the course of deepening reform, because of the 
readjustment of the pattern of interests and relations between 
different interests, changes in social contradictions and new 
features of contradictions among the people are bound to emerge. 
We must do a careful and thorough job in political, 
ideological, and other relevant work. Whenever we introduce new 
reform policies, especially reform measures that are closely 
related to the people's vital interests, we must explain and 
publicize them among the masses in a clear and effective way. 
We must persist in guiding public opinion in the right 
direction and give full play to the role of grass-roots 
mediation organs to dispel people's misgivings or 
misunderstandings and to gain the understanding, participation, 
and support of all social sectors. Continuously improving the 
people's material and cultural standards is the basic goal of 
economic development and the starting point of government work. 
We must firmly establish the mass viewpoint, go down to the 
grass roots, immerse ourselves among the masses, and make closer 
contacts with the masses. We must try every possible means to 
increase the incomes of peasants and herdsmen; increase workers' 
incomes by improving enterprises' economic efficiency; create 
more employment opportunities in urban and rural areas; pay 
attention to the "shopping basket" by increasing the supplies of 
commodities, vegetables, meat, and butter; and make efforts to 
improve the people's living standards. We must pay special 
attention to practical problems facing poor peasants and 
herdsmen, workers of enterprises in bad shape, retirees, 
disabled servicemen, and family members of revolutionary martyrs 
and servicemen. We must make proper arrangements for their 
production and convey the concern of the party and government to 
every household. Only by doing so can we gain greater public 
support for party and government policies and enlist the joint 
efforts of people in developing the favorable situation marked 
by stability and unity. 

    (5) We should do nationality and religious work well in 
the new period. We should carry out the principal tasks on 
nationalities in the 90's by fully implementing the party's 
policy on nationalities and religion, consolidating and 
developing socialist nationalities relations, upholding and 
improving the regional national autonomy system, and promoting 
prosperity in Tibet. In the course of socialist revolution and 
construction, people of all nationalities in the region, who 
breathe the same air and share the same destiny, have cemented a 
close relationship that sees all nationalities going through 
thick and thin together and depending on each other for 
existence. In the new historic period, it is necessary to 
uphold education on Marxist nationality outlook; to enhance the 
ideological awareness of the people of various nationalities on 
patriotism and socialism; to firmly foster the concept that all 
nationalities are inseparable from each other; and to constantly 
strengthen equality, mutual help, unity, and cooperation among 
all nationalities. We should fully implement "The Law on 
Regional National Autonomy"; gradually establish a package of 
laws and regulations and supervisory mechanisms based on Tibet's 
political, economic, and cultural characteristics; 
conscientiously improve work relating to nationality townships; 
and guarantee that the rights of the various minority 
nationalities in Tibet in managing their internal affairs and in 
jointly running the state affairs will be fully exercised. We 
will continue to stress and strengthen the study, use, and 
development of the Tibetan language; intensify training of 
minority nationality cadres to produce large numbers of 
socialist-minded minority nationality cadres who are prepared to 
safeguard the unity of the motherland and nationality 
solidarity, honest in performing their official duties, keen on 
revolutionary cause, and adaptable to the requirements of the 
modernization drive. While enjoying continued state support and 
aid from economically developed regions, we should carry forward 
the spirit of hard struggle and self-reliance to accelerate 
Tibet's economic development. 
  In fully implementing the party's policy on religion, we 
should protect, according to law, the right of the broad masses 
to profess or not to profess a religion; resolutely overcome the 
phenomenon of weakness in not boldly attending to and managing 
problems which emerge in the religious field and in letting 
things run their course without interference; conscientiously 
enforce "The Regulations on the Management of Places of 
Religious Activities," and "The Provisions on Managing Foreign 
Nationals' Religious Activities Within the Boundaries of the 
PRC," both promulgated by the State Council; and firmly manage 
temples and religious affairs according to law. It is necessary 
to ban and crack down on activities conducted in the name of 
religion to split the motherland, commit crimes, interfere in 
state administration, judicial affairs, education, marital 
affairs, and normal production in society. Religious activities 
should be strictly placed within the limits permitted by both 
constitution and law. While resolutely preventing separatists 
from using religion for infiltration, it is necessary to 
actively guide religion to adapt itself to a socialist society 
by using certain positive factors in religion to serve 
socialism; to justly and forcefully publicize atheism, 
scientific knowledge, and anti-superstition efforts among the 
broad masses; to firmly suppress and crack down on both 
sorceresses and sorcerers who conduct feudal, superstitious 
activities to swindle money and harm the people; to strengthen 
education on patriotism and law observance among the monks and 
the nuns; and to direct the enthusiasm of the masses -- with or 
without religious beliefs -- to reform, opening up, economic 
development, and efforts to revitalize Tibet. 
  With the search for the Panchen reincarnated boy entering 
its 
crucial stage, it is hoped that people from all sectors, 
particularly the religious community, will resolutely adhere to 
principles set by the central authorities, unify understanding, 
keep in step, take the overall situation and interest into 
consideration, and closely coordinate with each other to ensure 
a successful search. 
  (6) We should strengthen the legal system. 
During the course of establishing the socialist market economic 
structure, a major task of the government is to formulate a 
complete set of laws and regulations to govern the economic 
activities of the government, enterprises and individuals, 
strengthen supervision over economic activities, and standardize 
and put on a legal footing economic relations, and economic 
operation and management. While the reform of the economic 
structure is being deepened and our region is opening wider to 
the outside world, the departments concerned should promptly 
study and put forward relevant draft laws and regulations in 
consideration of Tibet's reality, and submit them to the 
people's congress standing committee for deliberation and 
adoption, so that our legislation will keep pace with reform and 
our reform measures will be sound and legally binding. At the 
same time, we should improve various administrative rules and 
regulations and attach equal importance to both legislation and 
law-enforcement. We must ensure that we have laws to follow, 
existing laws must be obeyed and enforced strictly, and whoever 
violates the law must be brought to justice. We must apply the 
law in governing and safeguarding economic and social order. A 
further step should be taken to improve the judicial 
administration, do a good job in publicizing the legal system 
and spreading legal knowledge, and enhance the citizens' 
awareness of the need to apply the law in governing economic and 
other activities, so as to ensure smooth progress in reform, 
opening up, and economic construction, as well as other 
undertakings. 
  (7) We should actively promote various social 
undertakings and step up the building of spiritual 
civilization. In literature and art, radio and television 
broadcasts, cinema, press, and publications, we should continue 
to adhere to the orientation of "serving the people and 
socialism," and the policy of "letting a hundred flowers blossom 
and a hundred schools of thought contend." We should work under 
the guidance of the theory on building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line. We should adhere to 
the correct orientation for literary and art creation, and 
provide correct guidance for public opinion. To accelerate 
reform and development and stabilize the situation is the main 
subject of our present political and economic life. With this 
main subject in mind, we should strive to sing the praises of 
advanced deeds and advanced persons on various fronts, the 
people's creative spirit, and the old Tibetan spirit of hard 
struggle and selfless dedication. We should strive to report 
the new achievements in socialist modernization and the new 
situation in this region, guide the people to foster a correct 
outlook on life and correct values, guide them to establish 
lofty ideals and firm faith, and encourage them to work hard for 
Tibet's socialist modernization. At the same time, we should 
advocate diversification of literature and art to satisfy the 
people's daily increasing demand for nourishment for the mind. 
We should take a further step to excavate and sort the fine 
cultural heritage of all nationalities, improve the management 
and protection of cultural relics, and inherit and improve on 
the fine national culture in a scientific way. We should 
improve the management of the cultural market, firmly ban 
reactionary and profane books and audio-video products, and help 
socialist culture thrive. 
  In the public health work, we should adhere to the principle 
of putting prevention first, strive to offer primary medical 
care in farming and pastoral areas, and do a good job in 
enacting, implementing, and overseeing the enforcement of health 
care laws and regulations. We should pay more attention to the 
work of Tibetan doctors, develop the production of Tibetan 
medicine, ensure good work ethics among doctors, and raise the 
level of medical care. We should continue the current family 
planning policy. In farming and pastoral areas, we should put 
emphasis on propaganda, education, volunteering, birth control, 
and technical service, and pay more attention to the floating 
population. We should integrate the promotion of prenatal and 
postnatal care with the efforts to shake off poverty and achieve 
prosperity. We should vigorously promote mass sports and 
extensively carry out various sports activities among minority 
nationalities, and improve the people's physique. We should pay 
attention to training outstanding athletes and constantly 
improve their sports skills. 
  (8) We should deepen the anticorruption 
struggle. The anticorruption struggle is a matter of great 
significance to the success of reform, opening up, and the 
destiny of the party and the state. Leaders at all levels must 
further enhance their awareness of the anticorruption struggle's 
importance, urgency, and protracted nature, and earnestly do a 
good job and make achievements in this field. At present, Tibet 
has scored preliminary results in the anticorruption struggle. 
However, progress in this aspect has not been even. Some 
problems have provoked strong reaction from the masses and the 
anticorruption tasks remain arduous. We must conscientiously 
deepen the anticorruption struggle in line with the CPC Central 
Committee's principles and policies, and the autonomous regional 
party committee's plans. The anticorruption struggle should 
begin with cadres at all levels; leading cadres at or above 
county levels in particular must be honest and self-disciplined, 
and serve as a good example to others. Cadres at or above 
county levels are required to conduct earnest 
self-investigations and self-correction by the end of May in 
accordance with the five new provisions. Problems discovered in 
self-investigations will be handled leniently. We will 
investigate those few cadres who do not conduct any 
self-investigations and self-correction, and whose acts are 
deeply resented by the people. After verifying their acts, we 
will handle them strictly. We must continue to investigate and 
prosecute major cases of embezzlement, bribery, and serious 
malfeasance. We must pay close attention to handling and 
prosecuting cases involving leading cadres that are proved by 
clear evidence as well as make public some cases that will 
generate a great impact on society. We must decisively deal 
with persons who interfere in handling and prosecuting 
corruption cases, as well as instances of such interference. We 
must continue to do a good job in redressing irregularities in 
various trades and put the stress on government, judicial, 
administrative, law enforcement, and economic administrative 
organs. We must organize our efforts in investigating the 
reoccurrence of unauthorized fees that have been canceled by the 
government. We must carry out relevant measures and make 
progress in this field. 
  In the anticorruption struggle, we must correctly recognize 
the limits of various policies and make a strict distinction 
between various issues in terms of their nature in order to 
severely punish wrongdoers and to help those who have made 
mistakes at the same time. We must correctly handle the 
relationship among the anticorruption struggle, deepening 
reform, and establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure; and combine the anticorruption policies and measures 
with the practical moves of deepening reform. By deepening 
reform, we can stop up the loopholes emerging from the 
transition from the old system to a new one. Moreover, we must 
pay attention to certain areas in which problems tend to occur 
easily, step up our work, and improve rules and regulations in 
order to ensure healthy economic development. 
  (9) It is necessary to improve the style of work 
and strengthen leadership. Leading cadres at all levels 
must improve their work style, working methods and leadership; 
enhance their revolutionary dedication and their sense of 
urgency with respect to current tasks; and concentrate their 
energies on accelerating reform, promoting development, and 
ensuring stability. Leading cadres should conscientiously 
improve their work style, conduct investigation and work at the 
forefront of reform and production, and solve problems and 
direct the work there. They should apply the working method of 
"from specifics to generality," draw experience, relevant to the 
characteristics of their own work, from selected units at 
various levels, and make efforts to foster a number of models in 
various fields to promote a healthy development of overall work. 
We should practice the system under which leading cadres at 
various levels are held responsible for the attainment of 
certain objectives during their tenure. We should strictly 
appraise leading cadres' job performance with respect to reform, 
opening up, and economic construction, and the stabilization of 
the situation. In work, leading cadres should dare to pioneer, 
dare to be the first to do something, dare to practice, and have 
the courage to blaze new trails. They should assume a 
scientific attitude and have a keen sense of discipline. It is 
necessary to unify understanding, consider the interests of the 
whole, and advocate the subordination of partial interests to 
the interest of the whole, and of immediate interests to 
long-term interests. All departments, particularly departments 
for overall economic balancing, should coordinate with each 
other and prevent different departments from practicing 
different policies. It is necessary to stress overall 
coordination among various reforms. We must carefully plan and 
meticulously organize the implementation of all reform policies, 
and carry out these policies seriously. During the course of 
implementation, we must monitor progress and have a 
comprehensive understanding of the situation. When a problem is 
discovered, it must be solved promptly through coordination so 
as to ensure the smooth proceeding of reform. 
  Fellow deputies, we will usher in the 30th anniversary of 
the 
founding of the autonomous region next year. The central 
authorities have always been concerned about Tibet and the 
people of all nationalities in Tibet. Three generations of the 
central collective leadership with Comrades Mao Zedong, Deng 
Xiaoping, and Jiang Zemin at the core respectively have made 
painstaking efforts for Tibet's economic development and social 
progress. Tibet has obtained tremendous assistance from 
fraternal provinces, municipalities, and autonomous regions, as 
well as from the people of all nationalities across the country. 
The splendid achievements made by Tibet are the results of the 
correct leadership and cordial attention of the Party Central 
Committee and State Council; the results of vigorous support and 
unselfish assistance provided by the people of all nationalities 
across the country; and the results of unity, hard work, and 
unremitting efforts of the people of all walks of life and all 
nationalities in Tibet. In order to celebrate the autonomous 
region's 30th founding anniversary and display the new 
appearance of Tibet, the autonomous region has requested the 
state to approve a number of construction projects for 
agriculture, animal husbandry, infrastructure, and social 
development. Now, the state is actively studying the request 
and making arrangements, and some provinces, municipalities, and 
autonomous regions are stepping preparations for assisting us in 
the construction. The construction of these projects will 
surely play a great role in accelerating our economic 
development and promoting our social progress. There is only a 
little over a year left between now and the celebration day. We 
have a short time and yet a heavy task. We must do all we can 
to prepare for the start of the construction, to ensure good 
quality construction, and to complete all the construction 
projects successfully. We call on the party organizations, 
governments, army and police units, and the people in Tibet to 
work with one mind and one heart, redouble their efforts and 
greet the autonomous region's 30th founding anniversary with 
action and outstanding achievements. 
  Fellow deputies, our task is very arduous and there are many 
difficulties ahead. So long as we unite closely around the 
Party Central Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin at its core and 
hold aloft the great banner of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics; and so long as the whole region unites as one 
and works hard, we certainly can create a new situation of 
reform, development, and stability in Tibet, and rapidly push 
all undertakings in Tibet into a new period of development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
